 If you're a photographer, keep all the necessary lens, cords, and batteries in the same quadrant of your home or studio. Paints should be kept with brushes, cleaner, and canvas, print supplies should be by the ink, etc. Make broader groups and areas for your supplies to make finding them easier, limiting your search to a much smaller area. Some ideas include:   Essential supplies area -- the things you use every day. Inspiration and reference area. Dedicated work area . Infrequent or secondary supplies area, tucked out of the way.; , This doesn't mean cleaning the entire studio, it just means keeping the area immediately around the desk, easel, pottery wheel, etc. clean each night. Discard trash or unnecessary materials and wipe down dirty surfaces. Endeavor to leave the workspace in a way that you can sit down the next day and start working immediately, without having to do any work or tidying.   Even if the rest of your studio is a bit disorganized, an organized workspace will help you get down to business every time you want to make art.  As visual people, a lot of artist clutter comes from a desire to keep track of supplies visually instead of tucked out of sight. By using jars, old glasses, vases, and cheap, clear plastic drawers, you can keep things in sight without leaving it strewn about haphazardly. Some ideas, beyond those just mentioned, include:   Canvas shoe racks on the back of the door Wine racks with cups in each slot to hold pens/pencils. Plastic restaurant squirt bottles for paint, pigment, etc., Simply string up the wires across a wall or along the ceiling and use them to hold essential papers that you don't want to cut or ruin with tacks or tape. Cheap and easy, this is also a good way to handle papers and ideas you touch regularly or need to pin up and down for inspiration., Shelving is an artist's best friend and is a cheap and easy way to get more room in your studio or art space. Don't be afraid to get up high either, especially for infrequently used supplies. The upper reaches of the room are often the most under-utilized, but provide vital space for all your tools and materials., Turning one wall into a chalkboard gives you a perfect space for ideas, sketches, and planning without requiring extra equipment or space. You can even use it for smaller areas. Paint over jars or storage equipment, allowing you to relabel them with chalk as your needs change.  A lot of disorganization comes when you keep moving the location of things, trying to optimize your space by reorganizing frequently. This usually has the opposite effect, leading to lost items and uncertainty when cleaning, but an afternoon with a label maker can solve everything. Instead of spending all of your mental energy looking for or storing things, you can just follow the labels, freeing your mind to think about art., Once a month, do a purge of your studio. If it isn't essential or part of a project, either throw it out or file it away for later. Artists are constantly making new things, experimenting, and making a mess. This is a good thing, but only if you set aside time to declutter. It may not be fun at the moment, but it is a lot more fun than spending 30 minutes digging through junk to find the right paint or an old sketch.   Don't be sentimental here. If you haven't used it in the last six months there is little chance you'll use it in the next six months. Toss it.  

keep related supplies in the same area.  make an effort to clean a dedicated workspace after every session.  place loose supplies in large, clearly visible containers.  use clotheslines and clips to hang sketches, photos, and reference material.  use every inch of the room for storage, especially vertical space.  use chalkboard paint to make space for drafting ideas right on the walls.  purchase a label maker to make your organization strategy semi-permanent.  make a habit of throwing out old, excess, or useless stuff each month. 

 See the image for how this drawing develops step-by-step. However, there is an important detail: the following drawings are to examine it, and then, to create something unique.   Use the lines to create the image shape and sections. Fill appeared sections with different patterns/ ornaments. Add text if needed, for example "NeoPopRealism is 25!" Add a colored strip on the top, any color you wish.; , Painting a mural always requires some preparation. You‘ll need equipment and effort, but planning and attention to detail will help you succeed. Painting a mural requires a suitable location, with the right surface that can be painted.  This surface should be smooth and flat. However, even rough-textured surfaces can be used for your NeoPopRealist mural project.  For exterior projects that last for years, using a newer 100% acrylic exterior paint would be your best choice. For interior walls, use latex paints. Latex offer easier cleanup and lower costs. By measuring the total wall area to be covered, the total amount of paint can be calculated, but since this mural painting requires two colors - white and black - figuring the actual area to be painted each color is necessary to allow purchasing the right amount of each one.  Large walls backgrounds may be rolled or sprayed with a white paint sprayer, where details may be added with brushes. Paints are sensitive to high temperatures, humidity, direct sunlight, however, the interior projects do not have many complications. In public places, keeping the mural protected may require attention. For that reason, if you make your NeoPopRealist mural dedicated to its 25-year anniversary in school or office, you can consider using varnish for your mural.  See sample above. The design will give you a sense of proportion. You will have unique requirements and elements., Use a sketch and measure at scale the distances and locations of various points of your subject. Measuring key features will help you calculate the amount of paint when each feature is identified by its color., If the surface is low, the whole mural can be painted standing on the ground or from a stepladder. For higher work, you may have to rent a scaffold., Mark the horizontal and vertical lines., Use white paint as background., Then begin marking, using your scaled sketch, the location of key elements of objects, located in the foreground. Everything depends on the complexity of your mural. If you are confident in your artistic results, you may choose to draw all of the details in freehand., Be careful, keep clean transition edges from one color (black) to another (white). However, mistakes can be touched up later. Always allow fresh color to dry before proceeding to the drawing., An example would be painting a large patterns use big brushes, limbs, use small brushes for tiny and detailed patterns., If you have a drip or run, paint over it with the color paint appropriate for that location. Sharpen lines and patterns if they are blurred., If it is intended to last a long time or if it is on a surface that require cleaning, overcoat your mural project with a clear sealer., However, if you won't be able to involve more than 16 percent of your brain's grays matter, you'll end up with the primitive crafting of patterns or even worse, with doodling or so-called zen-doodling. But to create the NeoPopRealist ART one needs the abilities, which can be developed in talented people by studying using Nadia Russ' Neopoprealist instructional books. Other, the copycats' self-promotional superficial books will teach you only how to doodle because they have nothing in common with visual arts and its mission.  

create a sketch in the neopoprealist manner of the future mural on a small piece of paper 8"x10" using the black ink pen.  prepare to create your neopoprealist mural.  prepare your paint.  begin your project with a design.  produce a scaled down version of your finished mural.  prepare the wall to be painted.  after you have primed the surface, measure the wall.  paint in the base coat of the background.  allow the background and base coats to dry.  draw the lines, then fill the appeared section with different repetitive patterns (examine the images above).  paint patterns with brushes of suitable size for the particular portion of work you are painting.  clean up the lines and shapes as needed.  seal the mural if needed.  be inspired and it will help you succeed! 

 It is possible to become a VFX artist without a college degree, but the path is often easier with one. VFX artists usually major in fine arts, computer graphics, or animation. Choose a college with a reputation for strength in these areas and a reputation for good job placement for graduates. The availability of internships is another factor to consider.Out of the jobs advertised for VFX artists, a majority at any given time specify a bachelor’s degree as a minimum requirement for applicants.; , Some studios offer short-term programs for people who want to learn more about VFX artistry without pursuing a college degree. Enrolling in these programs can be expensive as financial aid isn’t always offered, but they usually have the most cutting edge technology for you to learn from., Although you may create some hand sketches, the majority of your work will be completed on the computer using the most up-to-date programs. Stay informed about the newest software advances by following VFX blogs and taking online computer tutorials.For example, VFX artists are expected to be well-versed in graphics and animation programs, such as Adobe Creative Suite and JavaScript.Clearly list every program that you can work with on your resume.  Hop onto YouTube or another video service and search for VFX clip reels or demonstrations. Some of these videos will focus on a particular skill set, such as shading, which you then can practice on your own. Challenge yourself to mimic some of the more difficult tasks, or even try to improve upon the models used., Take as many art and design classes as you can. Or, simply carry a sketch pad around with you to work on your basic animation skills. As you draw, consider factors such as lighting and framing. Even geometry skills can come in handy when creating a particular type of background or even a person’s face.Make a choice to become an observer of the world around you. Ask yourself: how could I capture the movement of the leaves? Or, in what situations do shadows appear?  , Watch all of these creations with an eye for detail. Look for the techniques used and any original approaches that you see. Try to recreate any scenes that you find particularly interesting. Research the artists and see what their backgrounds are and contact them if you like., As you gain more experience, you’ll likely find yourself gravitating toward a certain aspect of design. This will become your “calling card” and directors and other professionals will seek you out for this type of work. To build your specialization, start choosing jobs with that emphasis and attend additional training seminars.For example, some VFX specialists focus on human character’s faces, animal figures, or city backgrounds.  

get a bachelor’s degree.  enroll in a studio-based program.  train on a number of vfx computer programs.  watch online tutorials.  nurture your artistic side.  pay close attention to movies, television shows, and video games.  develop a specialization. 

 The best art investors do their research on the pieces of art that they buy, so someone with some education or interest in the art world is more likely to understand this niche market. As well as personal research, you will need to have contacts with people in the art world, such as auctioneers, gallery directors and dealers, who can give you good investment advice.; , You may confuse these three terms, if you are not careful. Each of them has a slightly different goal in mind when looking to buy art.   Art collectors do not buy art for investment purposes. They buy it to decorate and display in their home. Because they consider them to be an important part of their home or life, most art collectors have a hard time parting with pieces of their collection. While many collectors do end up selling some pieces of art, it may be done because of necessity. Collectors often loan their works out to museums and occasionally donate them to museums upon their death. Art investors seek to diversify their portfolio with an art investment. Some investment firms put about two and a half to three percent of their investment money in art. They seek good advice and often buy paintings that are older and have been popular historically, such as paintings by the Old Masters. These investments are kept over decades, and sold off when the market is right, with the investor seeking to get a six to ten percent profit rise per year. These investments are also often made to be given as inheritance to future generations of the family. Art investment is often undertaken by the very wealthy. Art speculators try to invest in art that they believe will appreciate in value. They aim to buy art at a low price from budding artists in the beginning of their careers. Then they hope to sell their work in 10 to 15 years when the artists are at the peak of their careers and people or collectors are willing to pay much more for their pieces. This is a type of investment that takes intimate involvement with the art world and liquidity in order to buy the art.  Art investments should be no more than a small part of your investment portfolio, along with stocks, bonds, new businesses and more. Figure out what your range is before you begin to pick out potential pieces, and get advice from investors and art dealers.  Study the Mei Moses Fine Art Index to get a firm grasp of the art market today. Although they cannot predict what will be popular in the future, they can tell you what art tends to keep its value and be a low-risk and what art has a more volatile market value.  While this is not an absolute rule to follow, paintings from successful artists tend to get better returns than sculpture and installation art.  Get all the information you can out of them before making a purchase. If you are going to buy at auction, be prepared to walk away if the price goes higher than your investment range.   Beware of art auctioneers or dealers that promise too high a return on paintings. In many ways, they are just like stock brokers and other financial investment firms, who may promise anything to get a sale. They should be found trustworthy before you buy anything, because ponzi schemes and art market bubbles are part of this investment landscape as well. If you have never bought art in an auction environment before, you may want to seek advice about how it is done properly. You should study the auction booklet before hand, learn about secret buyers and how prices can quickly inflate. Most fine auction houses would be willing to teach you the basics if they see you as a serious investor.  Arrange for payment, shipping and insurance. Each piece of art should be insured and catalogued as part of your estate.  In order for an art investment to retain its value, it should be kept at low-humidity and avoid being marred. You may choose to hang it in your home, but you may want to get an art collector's advice about where to hang it and how to care for it.   Share this information with your children, if it is intended as an inheritance investment. They need to be well aware of how to take care of art, or they may lose money or ruin the painting entirely.  As well as keeping tabs on the art world to understand the rise and falls of certain schools of art, an appraiser can tell you how your investment is maturing. They may clue you in on when you have reached your desired profit.  If the art you buy does not fit in your home, and you will only be storing it, research banks, hotels and other institutions that rent fine art on a rotating basis. You may be able to demand thousands of dollars per year for your art to hang in another building. Keep in mind you will need to make sure your art is covered by an insurance policy for loss or damage.   Make sure the renter provides insurance for your art. You should prepare a contract that stipulates the time allotted, the fee, the insurance and the shipment of your art.  Unless you employ an art dealer or auction house at the exact moment when the art is in high value, it can take years and thousands of dollars in fees to find the right buyer.  

start with some experience or interest in art.  understand the difference between art collectors, art investors and art speculators.  figure out what you are willing to pay for art, before going to an auction house.  pay attention to what schools of art are selling well, and which are down.  focus art investments on fine art paintings, rather than decorative art.  reach out to trusted auction houses and dealers when you are looking to buy art.  buy your investment art when you feel confident of its worth, its price and its ability to grow in value.  study how art is properly stored.  have your art investments appraised occasionally.  consider renting out your art investments.  understand that selling an art investment can take time. 

 As you start planning for a project or work, you'll likely be gathering scraps of inspiration and test sketches. While everyone has a strategy, there is nothing more maddening than digging through a book or the internet to re-find the cool idea you saw three months ago. Try out:   Dedicating 1 notebook, preferably with insert folders, to each project. Making a bookmark folder for each project on your internet browser to easily compile online inspiration. Tacking up physical inspiration on a wall or cork board near your workspace., Very few artists simply dive right into large projects. Almost 100% of the time they instead work on related, smaller projects called "studies" to prepare for the larger work. You might practice the face of the portrait you're making, sketch our different composition ideas, or practice a vulnerable or difficult part of a sculpture. Keep these organized as a way to prepare both the skills, ideas, and supplies needed for the final project.  At the end of the day, artists are visual people, and tucking everything away neatly and cleanly may not be conducive to the artistic process. Of course, neither is losing or misplacing essential supplies. Find a compromise by packing away any supplies not currently in use, and leaving a little bit of "essential" clutter. It's okay to have inspiration scattered around the studio -- just make sure it's the inspiration you need for the current project.   Just because you "aren't organized" is no excuse not to make an attempt. Don't feel like the only options are perfect cleanliness or an utter mess-- there is a middle ground.  Nothing is worse than spending a long night on a painting only to realize you've run out of white paint halfway through a section. Once a week, or more frequently if possible, check in on the quantities of your supplies so that you can refill them before it becomes a problem.   A simple spreadsheet or notebook, marked at the end of each artistic session, is a quick and easy way to keep tabs on your stuff.  Deciding to paint a mural is a huge undertaking. But sketching the idea, transposing the image onto the wall, painting the basic colors, then adding shading/detail are four separate and more manageable projects. Organization is key to big projects, even if it feels "constraining" to your creativity. In reality, organizing your work and progress frees your mind to actually be creative, instead of worrying about logistics.   Figure out the building blocks of each part of the project, tackling each at once. Don't jump around across all parts of the project haphazardly.  

keep your reference materials, sketches, articles, photos, etc, in one easy to find place.  make "studies," or practice sketches, to organize effectively for larger projects.  limit the supplies you leave out to the project at hand.  keep an updated list of all of the necessary supplies, and the quantities of each.  break down bigger works into more easily completed parts. 

 When you finish a project, whether it sells or not, don't just stuff it away in a drawer. You never know when you'll want to revisit and idea or, more excitingly, when interest in your current work will drive up interest in past projects.   If you do electronic work, back it up every 3-6 months on a dedicated hard drive. There is nothing worse than an accident destroying all of your old projects., More than many industries, successful artists need to cultivate a diverse network of other artists, curators, instructors, and gallery assistants to be successful. You never know when someone will hit it big and provide a helping hand, or when you'll have some work you want to place in a friend's art show. Don't leave meetings and connections up to chance -- organize and compile your contact information in once place for later. Make notes of:   Phone number Email Location Role in the art world How you met or connected., If you're looking to make a living off art, you need to treat certain aspects of the process like a business. This, however, does not need to interfere with your creative process. Simply holding on to your receipts and writing them down in one sheet is a great first step towards financial security and autonomy.   You can often write off almost all of these receipts on your taxes, as they are private business expenses. Keeping expenses organized isn't just about time, it is about saving money., If you're making the same or similar pieces each day, you can figure out how much each piece costs you to make them by dividing the cost in supplies by the number of pieces made. So, if 10 wood sculptures cost you $100, each sculpture cost you $10 to make (100/10 = 10). This may seem trivial, but you need to have a complete picture of your finances if you hope to make money off your work.   At the very least, ensure that you are not losing money on each piece.  If you want an organized, productive artistic practice, you need to know about the trends around your work. Keeping organized is about more than just your own studio, it is about understanding the art market you're a part of. Peruse Etsy, visit galleries and show openings, and follow art blogs and news to keep abreast of the latest developments and prices.  While it doesn't have a dollar value, make sure you value your time as well as your materials. In the earlier example, don't forget that it cost more than just $10 to make the sculpture. Your hours of work and experience are essential too, so don't sell the piece for $20 if it took you a week to make. While pricing your work is difficult, don't balk at the high prices you see other artists selling for -- not everyone can do what you do, and people are paying for your talent and experience.   At the very least, consider what you'd be paid if you used your time otherwise. Twenty hours spent painting could be worth $15 an hour at another job. You should consider this "missed" money when pricing work. If you want to make art your living, you need to price the work high enough to take care of yourself. Careful financial organization is essential to pulling this off.  

keep all of your past work organized and accessible.  record all of your artistic contacts and connections in one place.  log the costs of supplies needed for each project.  find out how much it costs you to make and sell each piece.  pay attention to what other, similar works of art are selling for.  consider the "cost" of your time when pricing work. 

 This should be a short video showcasing the breadth and depth of your skills as an artist. Some choose to follow a storyline format while others cycle through a series of clips. Most college programs will give you time to create this work in your junior or senior years using professional grade equipment and software.Your reel is also a chance for you to showcase any unique skills that you possess, such as drawing or sculpting.Don’t be afraid to work with other artists to create your reel. Showing that you can collaborate well with others is something that studios often look for when hiring.  If you are enrolled in a VFX program, talk to your career counselors to see what opportunities might be available. If you are developing your skills on your own, reach out to studios to see if they have any spots for paid or unpaid interns. This will give a potential employer a chance to get to know you and might make it easier for them to hire you in the future., Over half of VFX artists are their own bosses. Being a freelance designer gives you more control over your schedule and project selection. But, it also means that you will need to handle administrative tasks and could struggle with bringing in a consistent income.If this path interests you, it would be wise to take a few classes in marketing and accounting. Getting established is a hard struggle that many self-employed artists face.Choosing your own projects can mean that you’ll establish a specialty more quickly than you might in a large studio. However, affording the most recent design equipment may be tough, depending on how successful you are.  This is a more traditional option where you agree to full or part-time employment with an established company. Your work schedule and salary will very much depend on the prominence of the company and the types of projects that come in. However, you may get the opportunity to work on some big Hollywood blockbusters or top-rated television shows!Get your foot in the door of larger companies by serving as a junior 2D artist or runner. A junior artist will assist those with seniority by creating basic outlines for scenery and the like. A runner literally runs sketches and communications between the VFX team and a director, for example., With enough time, effort, and luck, you may get the chance to take on a leadership position for a project. As a supervisor, the final product that audiences see is your responsibility. You’ll take all of the raw images and make them fit together while working alongside the production team. 

create a compelling reel or portfolio.  land an internship.  consider self-employment.  sign on with a design company or studio.  move up to a supervisor position. 

 Networking is a great way to find new opportunities and exchange ideas. Start establishing your network as soon as you decide to become a VFX artist. Join an industry group, such as the Visual Effects Society (VES). If you can’t fully join, then simply follow their activities and attend events when you can.The VES has almost 3,400 members spread across the entire world. Their work ranges from video games to television., Most VFX work situations will require that you communicate with a number of people as you complete a task. You may need to talk with directors, other VFX artists, and animators to create a unified vision for the final product. Taking communication courses in college is only one way you can learn how to communicate effectively.This also means that you will need to find ways to work with constructive criticism and feedback. Altering your final product based on information from the wider production team is often something that you just have to do. For example, a director might ask you to cut down a scene that you’ve spent weeks working on. Pitching your creative vision and ideas to others is also an important part of the process. If you can make a product more memorable in an advertisement, for instance, then the creative team probably wants to know.  Most VFX artists start work mid-morning and go until the late evening. Or, your shift could be an overnight one that ends in the early morning hours. The schedule very much depends on the deadlines that are looming and how the work is divided over time. You’ll want to be prepared for unpredictable timelines as a VFX artist.Partially due to the long hours, many VFX professionals describe their work setting as being pretty laid back in terms of dress and even behavior.  If you are considering working in the entertainment industry, try to get out of your office and away from your computer and head to the actual sets. This will give you a chance to see how the production team works together on the ground. Pay attention to how each person’s job feeds into the final product. 

join a professional society.  enjoy working with a team.  expect long work hours.  spend time on a tv or film set. 

 Some entire movies are improvised, some plays are. Sometimes a group gets together to improvise one scene or find ways to improve a scene. Sometimes a drama lesson can be a while series of different improvised scenes. A class leader may ask everyone to stand and improvise a moonwalk as an ice breaker. You might be put into small groups and given a set time to put together a scene. Improvisation covers a lot! Make sure you know exactly what you have to be good at.; , Often in improvisation, you will be given a topic or scenario which determines what, where and who you are. Stay in character. Whoever has decided the scenario, wants to see your interpretation of it, not something completely off topic that you prefer to perform. Keep it appropriate. Don't introduce the fact you have a super power if you are supposed to be showing how to close a sale or pretend the room is starting to flood when you're meant to be being your interpretation of a clock that needs winding.  Yes, some amusing words may get a laugh, but don't lose a good story line by trying to be too funny, unless that's your character. If you work with a partner, don't end up in a comedy contest, trying to be better than your partner.  Focus on your acting; not the audience.  Don't let fear hold you back. It can be scary to stand up in front of a crowd. Take a speech class to practice this and help you get over stage fright.  If someone in your group says, "I'm the best soccer player ever!", don't cut him/her off and say, "Really? I thought you were a gymnast!" because you know that's what they really do. Remember the rest of the groups is improvising too.  That always ends the show. Being energetic is great, in the right situation, but screaming and shouting or running around excessively just isn't always realistic.  Being nervous can ruin the improvised scene. Relaxing and enjoying yourself can make the audience enjoy you.  Imagine how that character would move, would react, would speak, would think, would feel. Show that in your actions.  There are a lot of improvisation games that were show cased in the popular TV show Who's Line is it Anyway. Research that. Or try other options such acting a scene where everyone who speaks has to include a colour in their sentences. Or you can start a scene and as soon as the actors are in an opportune position, someone says pause, takes a character out, and starts the scene again at a completely different situations inspired by the position of the actors.  

make sure you know what is expected of you.  stick to your topic.  don't try to be to be funny unless the scenario calls for it.  act naturally for the situation; talk, act and sit as your character would usually do in the circumstances.  participate.  don't react to what others say as yourself, stay in character.  don't make anything violent or too crazy.  relax and enjoy yourself.  be your character.  play games that allow you to practice improvisation. 

 Use your friends’ conversations to figure out what’s popular. Pay careful attention to which shows, bands and artists, movies, and celebrities they mention. Make a list and add new references whenever they come up.   You can use this list to pick which people and sources of entertainment you should follow first. It’ll be most important for you to catch the references your friends drop, so this is a great place for you to begin your pop culture education.; , There are lots of websites and online magazines that detail the glitzy and glamorous lives of the rich and famous. Some teen magazines also have content on these topics. Use these to make sure you never miss a reference to someone’s new baby or a dramatic breakup.Download your favorite celebrity news outlet’s app to be instantly informed of new gossip. Try Us Weekly or People. Seventeen and Teen Vogue are also good sources.  TV shows are big sources of pop culture. Even if you don’t have cable, you can stream shows through platforms like Hulu. Be sure to also check out Netflix for binge-able content your friends will surely talk about.If you’re willing to wait a week for new episodes, you can usually watch popular shows either on the networks’ websites or on Hulu for free.  Billboard.com and iTunes both have Top 100 charts that keep track of the most popular songs in the United States. Go online to look at these charts and download the top 10 or 20 songs. You’ll be singing along to all the hits in no time.Billboard updates their chart weekly, and iTunes updates in real time.  You’ll know when this happens. Even if people aren’t planning Harry Potter-style midnight showing parties, make an event of big movie releases. Get your friends together on a Friday or Saturday night and do a group outing.  Social media has made it much easier to feel connected to the stars. Check Twitter to stay updated on their thoughts, opinions, and even their politics. Use Instagram to see their cute or funny photos.Check what’s trending on Twitter to see what people are talking about on a day-to-day basis. This is a great way to make sure you don’t miss any viral stories that could be tomorrow’s pop culture references.  As you start to follow new shows, celebrities, and artists, don’t stick with one genre. You may decide you really like crime shows, but be sure to check out some dramas as well. This will help you avoid missing references that fall a little outside your normal set of interests., If you’re a podcast listener, you’re in luck! There are tons of shows dedicated to giving you weekly content just about pop culture. The hosts will make jokes about it, criticize it, and generally keep you informed.NPR’s Pop Culture Happy Hour and Slate’s Culture Gabfest are catch-all shows about all pop culture. Who Charted? discusses top music and movies. Nerd Culture Podcast focuses on all things nerd, including comics, TV shows, and movies.You can also follow pop culture writers on Twitter.  

make a list of what your friends watch, read, and listen to now.  go online to check celebrity gossip.  watch popular tv shows to be in the know.  check top 100 charts to see what music is popular now.  go to the movies whenever something exciting is released.  follow your favorite celebrities on twitter and instagram.  vary your interests to avoid missing references.  listen to podcasts about pop culture. 

   Listen to local radio broadcasts for advertisements that reference casinos in your area. If none are in your area, listen to national radio broadcasts for advertisements of casinos in other areas. Note the location that is mentioned in each advertisement that involves a casino. If no locations are mentioned, note any additional contact information, such as a website or phone number. Use that information to find out where the casinos are.; ,   If you learn about more than 1 casino on the radio, use the Internet to search the distance between your location and each casino. Sites such as maps.google.com or mapquest.com will help you in this search. 

listen to radio advertisements.  determine the distance from your location to each casino.  choose the casino that is the shortest distance from your location.  

 Theatre classes aren’t just for budding actors. See if your local community college offers classes in touring production, stage lighting, or theatre management. You can also get a degree in stage management, theatre practice, or technical theatre. Whether you take one class or many, you’ll learn invaluable skills and tips for managing a production., To gain valuable experience, volunteer at your local high school, playhouse, or theatre. They are always looking for people to help make their production a success. They don't pay much (or none at all), so go into it with an open mind and open heart. You’ll get to be part of a production and make connections with others who have a love for theatre.   This is a great learning opportunity for someone who is older but looking to break into stage management. Volunteering allows you to work with more experienced people and gain knowledge of the industry.  In order to become a stage manager, it is essential that you know how to do every job in the theatre. Work on the set, coordinate costumes, help with hair and makeup, become a prop master, assist the director, and learn how to work the rigging, stage lighting, and audio equipment.If you don’t have any theatre experience, try becoming a stagehand or spotlight operator first. You’ll work closely with the stage manager and learn what’s required for that role.  Many large companies, like Disney Theatrical Group, offer internships for students. Taking a position like this can help you get your foot in the door and increase your chances of landing a job as a stage manager. Not only will you get to see amazing productions and work with professionals, there is also a chance you could get hired on permanently., Research theatres and playhouses in your area and visit each one. Bring your resume as well as any referrals or letters of recommendation, and inquire about stage management openings. If there are none, ask the person you speak to if they know of any openings., Middle schools, high school, colleges, and universities usually have theatre departments. Visit all the schools in your area and see if they have any openings for stage managers. This would be a great position for someone who enjoys working with kids. Make sure you are prepared for your visit by dressing professionally and bringing your credentials with you., Concert halls and other music venues, even outdoor rock and roll shows, also require stage directors. If you can’t find an opening at a theatre, try managing the stage for music productions. Many of the responsibilities, such as overseeing artists and keeping track of show times, will be similar. Plus, you’ll gain experience to add to your resume., Networking is a great way to find a job. Make connections with other people in the industry, especially from past productions you have worked on. If you show your coworkers that you are dedicated and knowledgeable, they may refer you when they hear of a stage manager position available.Reach out to people you already know in the industry. Ask for recommendations or referrals. Attend as many productions as possible. Stick around after the performance and introduce yourself to members of the cast and crew, when appropriate.  Wearing black is a must in all theaters; it keeps the crew from being too visible on the wings of the stage. Dressing conservatively is a must for all professional jobs, so be sure not to wear anything too showy or revealing -- you want to blend in, not stand out. Invest in several black tops and pants so you will always have a clean supply., A stage manager is a very demanding job, time-wise. You need to have enough time in your schedule to be early to every single event, whether it be a meeting, rehearsal, dress rehearsal, or a performance. You’ll also need to set up for every event, as well as clean up afterwards., Stage managers have a lot of people and things to keep track of. You must remain calm, cool, and collected. However, stand your ground when needed to make sure that things are progressing as they should be. Be assertive, but polite to the cast, crew, and guests.   Express yourself directly and openly. Don’t be afraid to tell others how you feel, or how you think they are doing in their own roles. Give specific examples of ways they can improve, and be sure to praise them when they follow your advice. Be firm but still friendly.  Guests coming to see the production need to be treated well so they have the best possible experience. Though you will likely be busy with numerous other things, take guest’s requests or complaints seriously and do your best to attend to them.   For instance, if someone complains about gum on the floor, assure them it will be taken care of immediately, and then get someone from your crew or the house management crew to clean it up if you are in a tight spot. If someone approaches you during a break in the performance and tells you they are unable to hear the dialogue or music, take steps to rectify the situation. Adjust the audio for that section of the theatre if others in the area are having similar trouble. You could also offer the person another seat in a different section, if possible.  Stage managers are in charge of the entire production, so you must be a good leader for this job. You’ll need to know how to delegate tasks and manage other people. Stage managers must be patient, calm, and level-headed, especially when things go wrong.To be a great leader, you need to be an active listener. When someone is speaking with you, give them your undivided attention and make eye contact. Don’t interrupt or judge them, but do try to understand where they are coming from. Great leaders also take responsibility for their actions. Own up to any mistakes you make, and realize that as the stage manager you will be responsible for mistakes that other people make as well. Make sure someone is able to effectively complete a task before delegating it.  You’ll need to be able to communicate well with a variety of people on the cast and crew. Not only will you be in charge of the stage crew, you’ll also have to communicate with the director, choreographer, and actors. Stage managers also schedule meetings and call times, take notes during meetings, and write up rehearsal reports.Speak clearly and assertively to everyone you encounter. You should also be specific when making requests to others in order to avoid confusion. Body language is also a part of communication. Demonstrate friendliness and approachability by using open body language, such as smiling and angling toward people who are speaking. Avoid frowning, crossing your arms, and fidgeting.  There are many things for a stage manager to take care of and coordinate, so you’ll need to be organized. Keep a notebook for each production to jot down rehearsal and call times, contact info for the cast and crew, blocking notations from the director, etc.Pay attention to the details. You’ll need to keep track of everything from the names of the understudies to the quality of the gel sheets for the stage lights. You can also make to-do lists, set deadlines for tasks, and multitask in order to get everything accomplished on time.  

take theatre classes.  volunteer at a theatre.  try out every position.  apply for an internship.  apply at local theatres.  see if there’s an opening at a school near you.  apply at music venues.  network.  wear black and dress conservatively.  dedicate your time.  be assertive.  provide great customer service.  improve your leadership skills.  communicate clearly.  stay organized. 

 Depending on the age of your van, it may still be under the original manufacturer's warranty. Another possibility is that your van is covered by an extended warranty. All information about warranties should be with the other documents relating to your vehicle purchase. Warranty information should include details about length of warranty and types of repairs covered.; , If your van is still covered by a warranty and the repairs are included, call the customer service number provided with your warranty information. Ask the customer service representative for a list of mechanics in your area.  References from trusted sources will help you find someone you can put your faith into as a mechanic. Additionally, some independent car dealers and body shops have good connections with mechanics. They may be able to recommend a reliable mechanic, too.  Also, ask him if he has time to work on your van any time soon.  These types of mechanics work exclusively with these types of repairs and are experts.  Most auto shops will not charge for this. If you are not pleased with the estimate or the way the shop plans to repair your problem, visit another shop and request another estimate. Do not hesitate to ask for details. You shouldn't be caught unaware of additional labor costs, part costs or other miscellaneous costs.  If they do not coincide with your availability, it may be a wise choice to look for a shop that offers extended hours.  Many shops will guarantee their work for at least 30 days. If a shop isn't willing to stand behind its work, move on to another mechanic.  Others' opinions may reveal something you hadn't noticed about your potential mechanic.  

determine if your minivan is currently under warranty.  if so, locate a mechanic for warranty work.  ask your friends, colleagues and family members for recommendations for a good mechanic.  visit or call the recommended mechanic and ask him if he does the kind of repairs or maintenance you need done on your minivan.  select a specialized mechanic if your van needs brake repairs, alignment adjustments, exhaust work or radiator replacement.  request a detailed estimate before you authorize work to be completed.  ask about the shop's business hours.  inquire about the shop's guarantee on completed work.  get references or read testimonials for a mechanic or auto shop before you make your final decision. 

 Whether you are teaching a skill, delivering information or increasing awareness, outline the goals of your workshop. What do you want your workshop participants to learn? This analysis may result in a list of specific skills you will be teaching, concrete topics you will cover, or simply a feeling you will inspire in your participants. Think carefully about what you want to accomplish and why it is important.Some examples of workshop objectives include:   Learn how to write a persuasive cover letter. Learn how to break bad news to a patient. Learn 5 techniques to get a reluctant student to talk in class. Learn how to create an effective Powerpoint presentation.; , Will the workshop participants know one another or are they strangers? Will they come in with knowledge about your topic or will they be completely unfamiliar with it? Are they choosing to attend your workshop or is it a requirement for their job training? Answers to all of these questions will affect how you organize your workshop.For example, if your audience already knows each other, you might be able to launch into group activities very quickly. If they are complete strangers, you might need to schedule extra time for icebreakers and introductions.  These are the times when participants are most awake and alert.  You want your participants to be fully engaged and aware. If you can, avoid scheduling evening workshops after the workday when everyone is tired and impatient., Pass around flyers, hang up posters, or contact suitable businesses to encourage workshop participation. Having a catchy title helps, as does a brief explanation for why your workshop is important and necessary.Be sure to include images as well as text in your flyers to catch people's attention.  A workshop is not the same as a large lecture. You want your group to be small enough to ask all their questions, practice their skills, and work together. But you also want your workshop to be large enough to keep things interesting. Ideally a workshop will have 8-15 participants.Sometimes you don't have a choice about your group size. If you have a very large group, find creative ways to make sure the size doesn't become overwhelming. For example, a group of 40 participants could be divided into 5 different break-out groups of 8 participants each. You could also bring in co-facilitators and co-presenters to handle groups that are larger than ideal.  Some workshops require that participants do work well before the workshop takes place. Perhaps they have to study journal articles, write a short story, or read one another's work. If your participants have homework to do before the workshop takes place, be sure that your expectations are clearly stated from the beginning.   Be sure to set hard deadlines if your students have to submit work to the group ahead of time. Be clear about where and how your students should submit their work. Will they have to give you hard copies, or will you circulate materials by email?  , Most workshops are time-limited. They can be as short as 30 minutes or as long as three days. But no matter what, you will only have a short period of time to impart your knowledge to participants.Rather than covering absolutely everything in a short amount of time, think about the most important skills, techniques, and information you want your audience to gain. Prioritize those in your lesson plan.  Adults learn in all kinds of ways: visually, orally, through hands-on practice, or any combination of the above.Remember that you might not know your participants' learning styles ahead of time, so you will want to have a variety of materials prepared. Depending on the topic and objective of your workshop, you might want to prepare paper handouts, audio-visual aids, computer-based lesson plans, and role-playing activities., Readings, case studies, lists of key terms, and quizzes are all possible teaching aids you might wish to prepare. It is best if you prepare these handouts well ahead of time. That way you can catch typos or errors. Be sure to use a large, easy-to-read font. Give each document a clear label and date so that your participants will be able to use these handouts in the future.   If you have lengthy readings, consider precirculating these handouts to the group so that they can come in prepared.If you are handing out numerous documents, consider providing your participants with a folder or binder to keep their papers neat and organized. If you give this workshop often enough, you might even want to compile your materials into a bound book that you give to your attendees.  If you plan to present a slideshow, video clips, or sound clips, you will have to prepare these ahead of time. Test them at home to make sure they are working correctly. Make sure that they are in a format that can be used in your workshop space.   It is wise to consult with your venue's a/v technicians to make sure that your materials can be presented properly. Not all projectors are compatible with Macintosh computers, for example. And some rooms might not have sound projection. Make sure that your venue can accommodate whatever technology you wish to use.  If your workshop participants will be expected to complete a computerized quiz or participate in an online discussion forum, you will need to organize these materials ahead of time.Think about whether your participants will have to bring in their own personal computers or devices, and notify them if so.   If your participants will be expected to do activities online, be sure to consult with your venue's a/v technician. You will have to make sure that your workshop space is equipped with wireless internet, and you might have to ask for the network's password in advance.  Depending on the topic and size of your workshop, you might want to bring in other team members to facilitate learning. An expert can provide a live demonstration of a new medical technique; a guest speaker might be able to tell a lively anecdote about why your workshop topic is important; and an assistant might be able to help you manage a large group. If you require help from anyone, make sure that you recruit them well ahead of time. The more prepared they are, the better your workshop will be.  Interaction amongst a group of participants sets a workshop apart from other ways of learning. Brainstorm educational group activities that are suitable to your workshop's objectives. Keep in mind that activities can be done in pairs, small groups, or as a full group. Make sure that you include enough opportunities for every workshop participant to contribute meaningfully to your workshop. Some possible group activities include:   Debates. Break the workshop into two groups and have each group argue for their position. Think-pair-shares. Ask your participants a discussion question. Have them think about it on their own, discuss their thoughts with a partner, and then share their conclusions with the full group. Question-and-answer sessions. If you have a lot of information to present, include your attendees in the discussion by allowing them to ask questions about the material. You can answer these questions yourself or ask other workshop participants to answer them. Role-playing activities. Assign participants roles to play in order to practice the new techniques they are learning. Brainstorming sessions. Ask your workshop to shout out as many ideas as they can think of. Write them all down on a chalkboard or whiteboard. Then ask your workshop to evaluate what they have come up with.  People are more focused on tasks when they have the chance to take short breaks.They are also more likely to remember what they have learned. Schedule your workshop plan to include at least one 5-minute break per hour of your workshop. This will shorten your time with your participants but will make that time more valuable.  Actual activities can often take 10-20% more time than we estimate.If you think a q-and-a session will last 10 minutes, it might very well last 12 minutes or longer. Build in enough time for each major activity or topic you want to cover. Resist the urge to cram in as much as possible: your participants will feel tired and rushed.   If you are worried that your workshop will end early, you can always prepare a couple of optional extra activities that will reinforce learning. If you have time for them, great! And if not, no harm done.  Workshops take a lot of work and energy. Help keep your participants' energy levels up by providing healthy foods and beverages.Ideally the costs of these snacks will be covered through participant registration fees or by the organization that asked you to lead the workshop. You should not have to pay for snacks out-of-pocket.   Try to avoid junk foods. Unhealthy foods might give short bursts of energy but then will cause energy crashes very soon. That will leave your participants bored and tired. Aim for energizing healthy snacks such as fruit, vegetables, hummus, and whole grain breads., Leave yourself plenty of time to set up the space and get comfortable in the room. You might have to meet with a/v technicians, caterers, or your team members before your workshop begins as well. Give yourself as much time as you can in case you have to troubleshoot or make last-minute adjustments to your workshop plan., Computers, laptops, projectors, and speakers will all have to be fine-tuned in advance. After all, you want your workshop time to be productive: you do not want to spend it fiddling with technology. If you can, see if you can have the venue's a/v technician assist you with the set-up. You might not be familiar with the room's technological capabilities, and an expert might be able to set everything up more efficiently.  The way you arrange the chairs will depend on the size of your group, the size of the room, and the activities you have planned. Ideally the group will be small enough to sit in a circle or semi-circle: this will help establish rapport and facilitate conversation.If everyone will need to look at the front to watch video clips or a live demo, perhaps a semi-circle or straight rows of seats is more appropriate., If you have notebooks or other workshop materials to hand out, place them on the tables or chairs in advance to save time during the workshop. Make sure they are in the correct order and that they are clearly labeled. Other materials you might need to set up in your workshop space include:   Snacks and beverages. Name-tags and markers. Pens and pencils.  Arriving early allows you to set up, relax and get to know participants before the start of the workshop. This helps in building relationships with the participants.  Once everyone is seated, you will have to orient them to your workshop. Be sure to tell them your name and what they should call you. Give a few words about why you should be considered an expert in the topic and what got you interested in it. Explain to your participants what the goal of the workshop is and why it is important. It is also a good idea to give a rough outline of how the workshop will be run so that they can be prepared. Try to limit this segment to just a couple of minutes.   Even if your topic is a serious one, consider using humor to lighten the mood and get everyone comfortable with one another. Explain to your participants what the materials around the room are and what they should do with them. For example, you can ask people to fill out name-tags, grab a cup of coffee, and make sure they have their handouts. If you would rather that your participants not pull out their readings or laptops right away, you can tell them when those materials will be needed.  Ask your participants to introduce themselves. Limit the introductions to a few sentences by asking everyone to answer two or three specific questions, such as their names and what they hope to gain from the workshop. You don't want the icebreakers to go on forever, but it is important that your attendees feel comfortable talking in front of the group.   You can also ask everybody to break the ice by answering a light-hearted question like "What is your favorite movie?" or "What is your favorite bad song?"  , This is when all of your careful preparations can be put into action. Have your outline in front of you, and try to stick to the outline if you can. Feel free to tell your participants directly what you are doing and why. Your lesson plan doesn't have to be a surprise, and your participants might appreciate being told why you've organized the workshop in the way that you did. For example, you might tell them:   "First we are going to go over our case studies to make sure we understand their nuances. After that, we will divide into small groups to determine an ideal solution to the problem." "We're going to spend some time learning key terms that will be useful to you as you learn this new computer program. After I explain these terms, we'll take a quiz to make sure we are on the same page. After that, we will open things up for discussion." "Please introduce yourself to the person sitting next to you. In a few minutes, you will role-play a counselor-student interaction with your partner."  , It is good to have a plan for your workshop, but be prepared to alter your workshop's content based on the reactions and experiences of the participants. Build some flex time into your lesson plan so that you can address their questions, concerns, and interests.You can even provide options for activities that your workshop group can vote on. This will allow you to focus on what really matters and skip over redundant or unnecessary content.  Always follow up the delivery of information with the reinforcement of that information through some kind of group activity. Interactive group work is a particularly effective method to teach problem-solving techniques.  A workshop is not the same thing as a lecture, and you want to honor the thoughts and opinions of your workshop participants. Let them teach each other at the same time that you are teaching them. For example, you can:  Deliver information in short spurts and then allow participants to ask questions. Divide participants into groups to complete a task and ask them to report back to the entire group. Show a video clip and then ask pairs of participants to discuss their reactions. Provide advice about how to handle a difficult situation and then ask small groups of participants to role-play the scenario. Have an expert demonstrate a technique and then ask your students to take a collaborative quiz about the technique.  You do not want to micromanage every stage of the workshop. Your participants might get bored or annoyed.Keep in mind that a workshop is different from a lecture or a typical meeting: it is a format that thrives on interaction, activity, and group work., Scheduling breaks helps people assimilate the information and reflect. Let participants know how often they will get breaks and the lengths of the breaks. This allows workshop attendees to plan accordingly for restroom usage, phone calls and other personal needs. Do not skip breaks, even if you are running short on time.  Attention spans begin to wane after 20 minutes of the same activity. View this fact as an opportunity for creativity instead of as a problem. Change up your activities, ask your participants to rearrange their chairs, or schedule a break at least once every 20-30 minutes to keep everyone engaged and motivated., Even if you are treating a serious topic, humor can be a great way to emphasize information and keep everyone attentive.Think about ways that you can introduce humor in a responsible, ethical way into your presentations, discussions, and activities. This will also encourage your participants to remain relaxed, alert, and comfortable.  Make sure that all of your workshop participants are treated equally and respectfully.This means that any leadership roles (such as group discussion leader) should be distributed evenly across the workshop. Encourage quiet, shy participants to speak. You want everyone to feel heard and respected. Similarly, you do not want a single participant's voice (or your own voice for that matter) to dominate the discussion.  Most workshops will run smoothly. After all, the participants presumably want to be there and want to learn. However, there might be scenarios where somebody is unwilling to participate or might be insulting to a colleague. Be professional no matter what, and encourage respectful behavior by modeling respectful behavior.Be clear in what you expect from your participants. If you have a participant who is acting up or trying to bully a colleague, consider speaking privately with that person. Emphasize the importance of what you are teaching, and tell them that you expect adult, professional behavior from them.  Explain everything that your participants have learned over the course of the session.This will help emphasize how far they have come and what new skills they have acquired. Refer explicitly to the objectives you laid out at the beginning of the workshop, and explain how you think the participants have met those objectives. Congratulate your workshop for their hard work and for their new knowledge.  Design an evaluation form that your participants can fill out in the last few minutes of the workshop. Be sure that you leave them with enough time to comment and consider your questions carefully.Immediate feedback not only will help you improve your workshop but will also help reinforce the learning your participants have undertaken.Good questions to ask include:  What is the stated objective of this workshop? Did the workshop meet its stated objective? What activities helped your learning the most? The least? Was the workshop an appropriate length? What workshop materials (handouts, readings, quizzes, etc.) were the most useful? Which ones were the least useful? How have you learned or grown from this workshop? How do you think your colleagues have learned or grown? How would you change this workshop in the future? Any suggestions for improvements? Are there any topics that you would like to take a workshop on?  , Ask workshop attendees if you may contact them in the future for their input. Some people need time to reflect back on their workshop experiences. Following up with workshop participants several days or weeks later might reveal new insights. You can ask additional questions such as:   How well have you retained the information you learned in the workshop? Do you still find yourself thinking about the workshop? How has the workshop helped you at work? Were there ways it could have helped you more? What materials have you found useful since the workshop? What materials have you thrown away or forgotten about?  , If enough participants are interested in more advanced versions of your workshop, consider scheduling a Part 2. In the follow-up workshop, you can address more of their questions, dig more deeply into the topic, or engage in more advanced versions of the techniques taught in Part 1. Be sure that your follow-up workshop is not too repetitive and that it is suitable for more advanced attendees.  

define the workshop objective.  decide who your audience is.  schedule your workshop for the morning or early afternoon.  publicize your workshop.  recruit 8-15 participants for your workshop.  prepare your participants for the workshop.  prioritize your goals for the workshop.  prepare a variety of teaching aids.  prepare paper handouts.  arrange your audio-visual materials.  organize your computer-based materials.  recruit experts, speakers, and assistants.  decide on your group activities.  leave time for breaks.  resist cramming.  secure catering.  arrive early.  set up all equipment before participants arrive.  arrange the chairs in advance.  distribute materials.  greet participants as they arrive.  introduce yourself and the workshop.  begin icebreakers.  execute your lesson plan.  be flexible.  use interactive exercises to reinforce information.  don't talk too much.  stick to your scheduled breaks.  switch up activities every 20-30 minutes.  lighten the mood.  maintain a respectful, democratic atmosphere.  be prepared for the unexpected.  conclude the workshop with a summary of what they have learned.  get feedback immediately after the session.  follow up with the participants a few days or weeks later.  schedule a follow-up workshop if necessary. 

 If you’re new to pop culture, you’ve likely missed a lot over the past years or even decades. Pay attention when people chat about older shows or movies, and make a list of the ones that come up most often.   If people just drop references without mentioning which show or movie they’re talking about, you may have to ask them. If you’re trying to hide your lack of knowledge, try to memorize the quote or reference and look that up instead.  People love to quote movies and shows to get a laugh or make everyone feel nostalgic. There are tons of online lists that rank the best movies and TV shows of all time. Check out these lists, as well as lists with famous quotations from TV shows and movies.   You can also find lists of quotations from specific shows, such as The Office or Buffy the Vampire Slayer., Words and phrases can become part of pop culture, too. If you’re feeling confused when you chat with your friends, go online to look these things up. Urban Dictionary is one option, or you can just Google the word or phrase.  View your lack of experience with pop culture as a chance to bond with the people you’re close to. Don’t be embarrassed, because they’ll probably be excited they get to binge-watch their favorite shows and movies with you!   Netflix is a great place to look for older shows and movies.  There’s so much that counts as pop culture, and it’s impossible to know everything. That’s ok! Start with the most popular stuff and the things your friends are into, and then develop your own tastes and interests from there. As you become aware of older and newer pop culture, you’ll catch more and more references.  

make a list of references you don’t understand.  look up quotations from popular shows, movies, and songs.  use online slang dictionaries to look up words you don’t know.  watch or listen to the old stuff with friends.  don’t try to know it all. 

   While watching television, pay close attention to any advertisements that mention casinos. Note the location that is mentioned in each advertisement that involves a casino. If no location is mentioned, note any additional contact information, such as a website or phone number. Use that information to find out where the casino is.    If you learn about more than 1 casino on television, use the Internet to search the distance between your location and each casino. Sites such as maps.google.com or mapquest.com will help you in this search. 

watch television advertisements.  determine the distance from your location to each casino.  choose the casino that is the shortest distance from your location.  

   Pay close attention to any articles or advertisements that mention casinos. Note the location that is mentioned in each article or advertisement that involves a casino. If no locations are mentioned, note any additional contact information, such as a website or phone number. Use that information to find out where the casinos are.    If you learn about more than 1 casino in your local newspapers, use the Internet to search the distance between your location and each casino. Sites such as maps.google.com or mapquest.com will help you in this search. 

read local newspapers and/or newspapers with a broader focus.  determine the distance from your location to each casino.  choose the casino that is the shortest distance from your location.  

   Check for a section that is titled "Casino", or something similar. Note the location of each casino.    If you learn about more than 1 casino in your phone book, use the Internet to search the distance between your location and each casino. Sites such as maps.google.com or mapquest.com will help you in this search. 

read your local phone book.  determine the distance from your location to each casino.  choose the casino that is the shortest distance from your location.  

   You will be able to find the nearest casino if you are in the United Kingdom, United States, Belgium, Denmark, France, Ireland, Italy, Portugal, or Spain.    If you click the link for casinos in the United Kingdom, a list of UK cities will appear. Click the link that applies to your city for a list of casinos in that location. If you click the link for casinos in the United States, a list of US states will appear. Click the link that applies to your state for a list of casinos. If you click on any other country's link, it will take you directly to a page that lists the available casinos in that country.    If you learn about more than 1 casino on the Internet, use the Internet to search the distance between your location and each casino. Sites such as Google Maps or Mapquest will help you in this search. 

visit the following url on your internet browser: http://www.pokerhouse.co.uk/landbasedcasinos.html.  click the link that applies to your location.  determine the distance from your location to each casino.choose the casino that is the shortest distance from your location. 

 There are a number of symptoms, referred to as pre-syncope, that you may experience immediately before fainting. Most fainting spells occur when you are standing, and recognizing warning signs will help you prepare yourself if you do indeed faint. In addition, awareness can also help to prevent a fainting episode and will help you stay safe if you do faint.   Common symptoms include yawning, a sudden sweat, nausea (sickness), fast and deep breathing, confusion, lightheadedness, blurred vision or spots in front of your eyes, and ringing in your ears. ; , The symptoms of fainting can come on very quickly and with little warning. If you experience the above symptoms it is a good idea to conduct 'antigravity' measures, which when done immediately upon feeling symptoms, can help you avoid a fainting episode.   Medical experts suggest that you lie or sit down and place your head between your knees. These positions will help restore blood flow to the brain and can prevent a fainting episode. If standing, you can also cross your legs and tightening your abdominal muscles. This is effective if you are in a crowded place and you are unable to lie down immediately. , By preparing, you can ensure that you are in a safe and secure place when you faint. Try telling someone near you what is happening and ask for assistance, try lying down, or try bracing yourself against a wall to prepare. If you find yourself on stairs or other precarious surroundings, sit down and hold on to a railing immediately.   If you do faint, blood flow will resume to your brain naturally and you should regain consciousness in two minutes or less., It is normal to feel weak and confused for 20 to 30 minutes after fainting. Remain calm when you regain consciousness. Also, take some time to lay on your back to allow blood flow back to the brain. You should also hydrate yourself with water. , Fainting spells are not necessarily an indication of a serious medical condition. In fact, fainting spells may be caused by anxiety, fear, pain, emotional stress, hunger, dehydration, surprise, overexertion, clenching, spasms, choking, or drug and alcohol use. If you suspect that your fainting spells are being caused by one of these issues, there are measures you can take to prevent future episodes.  Hydration is the best way to prevent fainting spells without medication. Drinking more water is ideal, but you can get fluids from food sources (like watermelon), milk, soups, etc. All caffeinated beverages, including sodas, should be eliminated. If you are sufficiently hydrated, you will be urinating regularly and your urine will be clear or light colored, not dark. Caffeine stimulates the heart, making fainting spells more likely to occur. If you drink large amounts of caffeine, you should cut back slowly to avoid headaches. While the amount of fluids you need each day depends on a number of factors — including your level of activity, your climate, your overall health and whether you are pregnant or breastfeeding, you should drink about half of your weight in ounces each day. So if you weigh 200 lbs. then you should be consuming 100 oz (or 12.5 8-oz glasses) of fluids each day.If you are an athlete with more muscle-mass, you should drink about two-thirds of your weight in ounces.Eating regularly can also help to reduce lightheadedness and reduce your chance of fainting by boosting blood sugar.  If anxiety and stress are causing fainting spells, calming techniques can help you avoid fainting spells. You can try counting your breaths or deep breathing, flexing and relaxing different muscle groups, and paying attention to the immediate moment rather than the past or future (also known as mindfulness). Avoid placing yourself in stressful situations and do your best to remove yourself from such situations. Learning to stay calm and to assert yourself can help you to overcome feelings of anxiety.  The flushed look that many people get when they drink alcohol is actually blood rushing to the surface of the skin. This takes blood away from the brain, and can cause fainting episodes. Excessive drinking also causes dehydration, which is a leading cause of fainting spells. Illegal drugs, particularly stimulants such as cocaine or ecstasy, also cause fainting spells. These should be avoided.  While it is possible that fainting spells are not related to medical conditions, it is also possible that they are a sign of a medical problem. To determine this, you will need to visit your doctor. You should see your doctor immediately if you experience fainting while exercising, if fainting occurs with rapid heartbeat, or if your family has a history of fainting. If you experience repeated fainting spells, you should consult your doctor. , Your doctor will ask a number of questions to determine the cause of your fainting. These may include the situation you find yourself in when you faint, how long the episodes last, how quickly it takes you to return to normal, and any other symptoms you may experience during the episodes. The doctor may also order a number of tests to determine the cause of your fainting spells.   An electrocardiogram will be ordered if the doctor suspects a heart condition is the cause. An electroencephalogram will be ordered if the doctor suspects something in the brain is the cause. , There is a chance that your doctor will not recommend any medication for your fainting spells. There is no medicine that treats fainting spells themselves, so your doctor may instead prescribe a medicine to treat the cause of the fainting spells. These may include medicine for low blood sugar, seizures, anemia, or low blood pressure.   If any medications are prescribed, be sure to take them exactly as your doctor advises.  

determine if a fainting spell is approaching.  react quickly to the symptoms.  prepare yourself for losing consciousness.  take it slowly if you do faint.  identify the cause.  prevent fainting spells through hydration.  practice calming techniques.  avoid excessive drinking and illegal drugs.  find out if you have a medical condition.  provide the doctor with your history.  follow the doctor's advice. 

 A bedridden person may or may not be able to keep with their own hygiene tasks. If they can't, you or another caregiver will need to help them. Even if they can, you might need to provide them with reminders and the tools to take care of their hygiene. Bathing, dental care, nail care, hair care, and changing clothes are all tasks your parent may need help with. For bathing, you may be able to help your parent into a shower chair (using a wheelchair), where they can mostly bathe themselves with some supervision. On the other hand, they may need a sponge bath. If your parent is completely bedridden, you'll need to bring items to them. For instance, you can bring a toothbrush, a cup with clean water, and a spitting cup over to the bed. Let the person brush their teeth or ask them to open their mouth so you can brush their teeth. Make sure you are helping them trim their nails regularly. They will likely need help with their toenails, even if they don't need help with their fingernails. You'll also need to help the person shave. An electric razor works best for this process, particularly if you've never shaved anyone else.; , Being bedridden comes with certain health risks that you need to help watch out for if you're providing care for your parent. For instance, bed sores are a common problem. They generally appear where the person's body touches the mattress, such as the bottom of the feet, the shoulders, the buttocks, and the back of the head.To combat pressure sores, try to change your parent's position every 2 hours, and encourage them to move their body in the bed as much as possible. You can also find special mattresses and cushions that can help relieve pressure points. Pay attention to the sheets. They should be cotton or silk, and you should smooth them out before putting your parent on them, as wrinkled sheets can increase the chance of bed sores. Make sure your parent's skin is moisturized regularly. Also, avoid using scented soaps and talcum powder, as those can dry out the skin. Dry skin makes your parent more susceptible to bed sores. It can also help to make sure your parent is drinking at least 2 liters of fluid a day. On people with darker skin, you may see blue or purple patches, while the patches will be red or white on lighter-skinned people. Cracks, wrinkles, swelling, shiny areas, blisters, and dry areas are also indicators of bed sores. Talk to a nurse if you start noticing these signs.  When laying in bed regularly, liquids can build up in the lungs, leading to congestion and even pneumonia. The best way to combat this problem is to make sure your parent is rotated to a new position regularly, preferably every 2 hours., The emotional side of a illness can be just as destructive as the physical side. When your parent becomes bedridden, they can't do the things they used to or visit with the people they enjoyed seeing regularly.Encourage people to come over and visit with your parent, so they have regular interaction. Also, try to encourage your parent to still participate in activities they enjoy as much as possible. For instance, if your parent enjoys making art, get them a small set of art supplies they can use in bed with a table. It's also important to provide a safe place where your parent can talk about what's going on. They need a sounding board as much as you do. You can be this person some of the time, but make sure that your parent feels comfortable talking with other people as well. If you are their only source of support, then this can put a lot of pressure on you when you already have so much going on.  Often, a person who is bedridden will qualify for having a social worker assist with their needs. A social worker can benefit you, too, as they can help you find the care you need for your parent, as well as other resources.Most hospitals have social services on site, though you can also visit a Medicare/Medicaid office in your local community, or visit the offices of an insurance company that that your parent goes through.  When your parent is sick, you may feel like you're alone in the situation. However, more often than not, friends and family would like to help you, but they don't know how. Take the time to meet with friends and family members one at time to ask for help.It is important to be assertive when asking for help from friends and family. Try saying, "I'm creating a weekly schedule for Mom's care. Please let me know which two days you would like this week." Offer a specific task if they don't seem to know how to help. If you have children, then you might also consider asking a friend or family member to watch them for you one evening per week while you care for your parent. Be sure to let your children know why you need someone to watch them during these times.  If your parent has become bedridden, it's likely you'll need some help from professional caregivers. If you're caring for the person at home, you can get help from people who come to the house. If the person will need long-term care, you may need to consider placing them in a facility that can provide care. If your parent has a terminal illness, hospice care may provide some relief.Both in-home care and care facilities can be expensive. Insurance and medicare may cover some in-home care (which sometimes includes in-home care at senior facilities). Have a talk with your parent about getting some help. They may not like the idea much, as some people are reluctant to have outside help. If you need help persuading them, try asking someone who's been in a similar situation to help. It might also be hard for your parent to hear this from you. You might consider asking someone who has a different relationship with your parent to talk with them instead, such as a close friend, a cousin, or a spiritual leader. You can hire whatever level of care you need. For instance, some non-medical care can help with basics like bathroom assistance and meals. However, if your parent needs medical care, you will need to hire nurses or nursing aids to help, though that kind of care is generally prescribed by a doctor.  When your parent is bedridden, you likely will have a surplus of emotions, which is perfectly normal. You may find you feel anger or resentment. You might feel guilty that you can't spend more time with them or that they're bedridden and you're not. You also may feel anxiety about the situation. Grief is also common, as you've lost who your parent was.Let yourself feel those emotions. Acknowledge them, and give yourself permission to feel them. Also, make sure you find someone to talk to. Anyone with a sympathetic ear will do.Writing down your feelings is also a good way to get them out and understand them better. Try keeping a journal as well. You can also talk with others who are facing the same issue. You can join a local support group or find one online. In fact, if your parent is on hospice, many hospice organizations have grief support groups available for people in your situation. Just knowing you're not alone can help. Professional counseling can also be beneficial. If your parent is bedridden, particularly if they have a terminal illness, it can be difficult to come to terms with that, especially if you have a complicated relationship with your parent. A professional can help you work through those feelings and come to terms with what's happening., When it comes to a parent's failing health, you may find that having specific answers can somehow make the diagnosis more manageable. When you have questions about your parent's health, ask the doctors and nurses. If you don't understand their answer, ask them to explain it in layperson's terms. You deserve to know what's going on (with your parent's consent, of course).Taking notes or having another person there to help you remember everything during conversations with doctors and nurses can also be helpful. Emotions may be high, which might make it hard for you to remember everything.  Take time to do things you normally do for your spiritual self, such as praying or meditating. These activities can have a calming effect in a stressful situation. Of course, not everyone considers themselves a spiritual person, and that may be the case with you. Nonetheless, it can still help to take a few minutes each day to just be or sit in silence., When you're taking care of a parent, it can be difficult to find time for yourself to do things you enjoy. However, it's very important to take time each day to relax if you can. It can be something seemingly insignificant, like drawing a little picture or watching the birds outside. Whatever it is, take some time each day to do something you enjoy.Similarly, it's important to maintain the relationships in your life. Try to get away to spend time with people you care about, so you can just be you for a while.At the very least, set aside some time each day to return calls, respond to text messages, or check in with your other loved ones. Also, take time to escape. That is, sometimes, escaping into the fantasy world of a book, movie, or television show can give you the mental break you need. You can even enjoy these with your parent. Listening to your favorite music can also help you take a break.Be sure to schedule this time in. Don’t wait until you feel like you need a break.  When you're providing care, you need to make sure you know what your limits are. Determine how much time you can actually give, as well as how much physical care you can give. Be firm with those limits, and get help as needed.For example, it is important to maintain your relationship with your spouse/partner and children (if you have them). This might mean that certain times of the day will be set aside for spending time with your family, such as dinner time.  When you're caring for someone, it can be easy to neglect your physical health, but it's important to make that a priority, too. Make sure you're eating enough and that you're eating healthy meals with lean protein, whole grains, fruits, and veggies. Try to get some exercise in when you can, as it will lower your stress level and keep you healthy.In addition, make getting enough sleep a priority. Even if you can get enough sleep all at at once, try to work in 7 to 9 hours a day to make sure you'll be able to function. Finally, make sure you are keeping up your regular doctor's appointments and dental care, so that you stay healthy. 

help with basic hygiene.  watch for bed sores.  look for signs of chest problems.  provide emotional support.  ask about a social worker.  request help from friends and family.  let the professionals help.  acknowledge your emotions.  ask questions.  take care of your spiritual needs.  enjoy what you can.  determine your limitations.  maintain your health. 

 This is a very fun part of having a pet. Choose a name that represents the pet, you, your role model, or just pick a name that you really like.; , Depending on the size of your pet, the bowls (Bowls are only used for dogs and cats. Caged pets usually have a bowl of food and a little drip bottle for water.) should be refilled about 2-4 times a day. If your pet is an outside pet, make sure it has a bowl of water outside as well. If you want, you can put a bowl of food outside as well, but it usually gets attacked by some sort of insect(s). If you have a fish, feed it fish food (preferably a tropical kind) about twice a day; once in the morning and once in the evening.   Always make sure it has a full bowl of water.  If you have a cat, make sure you have a litterbox, and that the litterbox is always clean. If you have a dog, make sure to let it outside every other hour, or so. Or, and this applies for dogs and cats, you can install a pet door, allowing your pet to go in and out as it pleases. If you have a caged pet, make sure to change out the scraps (newspaper shreds or the cage shavings you can buy at a pet store) frequently. For a fish, clean the filter (if you have one; some fishbowls don't need one) once a month. Also, make sure that the water stays clean.  This part is pretty much geared toward cats and dogs (Any pet that doesn't have to live in a cage or a bowl. It's hard to get a goldfish to shake your hand!). If you want to keep it from doing something, punish it. For dogs, hit it (not smack-hard, but with a little force) on the nose and tell it that was not good, or it's a bad dog. But don't lean in close to it's face or scream at it. Just use a little force in your voice. For cats, tell it it's a bad kitty and hit it on the head. Like I said before, only with a little bit of force. If you want to commend your pet for something, give a treat, and shower it in praise. For example, if you are trying to get your pet to shake your hand, gently grab its paw and shake it, while saying, "Shake," repeatedly. Then, give it a treat and give it many complements. Do this about four or five times, then hold your hand out to it and say, "Shake." If your pet automatically puts its paw there, give it a treat and praise it.  Make sure your pet always knows that you love it. Play with it or pet it or, and I know this sounds crazy, talk to it. Tell it it's a good pet.  If it needs any shots, make sure to get the pet its shots right away.   If there are any problems with your pet, always go to the vet. Better safe than sorry.  

name it!,  make sure your pet always has enough food and water.  keep your pet clean.  train your pet.  care for your pet.  make sure to take it to the vet at least every 6 months. 

 If you just can't, reduce meat from your meal.; , Artificial fur clothes are the same, but they are animal-friendly too! It's not cool to be cruel.  Only animals that are injured or too tame to survive in the wild should live in captivity.  Don't buy a pet, instead, adopt a friend. There are tons of animals (mainly horses,dogs, and cats) that are unwanted all over. Go to an SPCA or animal shelter. Don't forget! Animal shelters have small animals and birds too!  , If it's not practical for you to adopt, volunteering is always a great idea. It differs from shelter to shelter, but here are some of the things you might be able to do at a shelter:   Play with the puppies and kittens to help them socialize. This prepares them for being adopted. Clean cages and litterboxes. Walk dogs. Feed the animals and refresh their water.  Protecting the planet means protecting animals' habitats, which are vital for the animals.  For example, hunting may not seem "animal friendly", but in some circumstances, it is (like if it's in an area where there's not enough food or a disease).  Sign petitions, donate, and spread the word. Tell your friends why to be animal-friendly, and try to get them to become animal friendly too.  

go vegan!,  don't buy real fur products!,  don't visit zoos or circuses that you know mistreat animals.  adopt!,  volunteer at an animal shelter.  recycle and compost.  know your facts.  get involved! 

 All pets are different and have unique personalities. Some do well when left alone for longer periods of time and others do not. Pets that are more social, have medical conditions, or that are used to having lots of interaction with others may not do as well on their own for long periods of time.Also consider your pet's feeding schedule or if your pet likes to get into things and make a mess when you are not around. Younger pets may not be able to handle being left alone as well as more mature pets. If your animal has separation anxiety, a pet-sitter or a boarding house may be a good option.; , Two weeks before your vacation, start leaving your pet home alone for longer periods of time. If you usually leave your pet at home while you are away at work, leave your house for a couple of hours after work each day. If you usually see your pet during the day, leave your pet at home while you are at work.This will prepare your pet to spend more time alone.  If you are leaving your pet in someone else's care, it is important that you give him or her enough information to care for your pet. Leave your contact information, the phone number of your veterinarian in case of an emergency. If your pet has any special dietary needs or likes specific treats or toys, write this information down. Include information about your pet's routine, bathroom habits, schedule, and any medications.Also include any information about your pet's personality that someone may need to know. Does your pet get excited when someone is at the door? Does your pet have a favorite hiding place?   Be as detailed as possible when writing down the instructions. It is better to give someone too much information than not enough.  It is important that your pet is up-to-date on vaccinations and is healthy before you leave for vacation. This is also the time to ask about the best options for leaving your pet when you are gone. Your veterinarian may have recommendations for pet sitters and boarding options. Leaving your pet in a safe and trusted place will keep you from worrying while you are gone. 

assess your pet's needs.  adjust your pet's schedule.  write detailed instructions.  talk to your veterinarian. 

 Even if you have a busy schedule and return home late, make sure to call out to your pets. If you have a dog, he will probably be all over you within seconds of your arrival unless he's busy trying to dig out a bone from his favourite hidden place, your couch.   Calling out to your pets generates a positive attitude towards them and they feel less threatened. If you have a lot of pets, call out their names one after the other. Kittens usually do not respond if they are asleep, so you might need to respect that but they will scurry towards you if they suspect cat treats in the grocery bags you just bought in. Remind them that they were missed.; , Even 20 minutes will help them feel taken care of. For more active pets, a walk might be a good idea , If your cat has peed on your favourite luggage bag, wipe it clean. There is nothing much you can do about it, except try to take away the pungent smell from the luggage, beds or linen they tend to soil. The very best and most effective cleanser would be bicarbonate soda and/or a little white vinegar. You can try a solution of a little detergent mixed with bicarbonate soda: a few drops of bleach, a tablespoon of vinegar, 5 drops of Dettol, 2 tablespoons of bicarbonate soda and oodles of water. Cats cannot be screamed at, because they simply won't understand. They will know that you are angry for some reason and rubbing their snouts on the soiled area can repeat their behaviour. Carry your cats or kittens to the litter tray and be gentle with them. Soon they will learn.  Dogs love to travel, but only if they get to ride shot-gun, so invest in a proper and spacey carrier box. Kittens like to sneak into dark corners within the car and this can be pretty hazardous if your kittens slip towards the food pedestals. Beware, invest in spacey and cosy carrier box.  

greet your pets.  take special time each day to interact with your pets.  wipe/clean up "accidents".  give your pets a safe place to travel. 

 Cleaning, feeding, grooming, exercising, and ensuring a supply of fresh water is available for your animals takes time. See how long it takes you each day to properly care for all the animals you own. Compare this with the amount of free time you have available after other obligations are met, such as work, school, family time, etc. Make sure you won’t be neglecting another area of your life to care for all your animals.   Always remember to take care of your pets. If you don't have time to take care of them all or don't remember which ones you have taken care of that day, you may have to get rid of some of them. Some animal types will require different maintenance. A long-haired dog, for example, probably needs to be brushed daily, while a cat can groom himself. Bird and hamster cages need to be cleaned out and disinfected often, with soiled bedding removed regularly. Be sure to consider the total amount of time you spend on all caretaking tasks for each animal you own each day, week, and month. The amount of free time you have available and are willing to spend caring for pets will determine how much time you spend with them. However, if it takes over two to three hours to take care of all your animals every day, then you may already have too many pets.; , Consider what your living arrangements are —how large is the living area and yard space you have for your animals? If you live in a small upstairs apartment without a yard, then take that into account when thinking about how many animals you can house. If you live out in the country on several acres, then you can probably keep more animals. Remember that each animal needs to have enough room to walk around and not be in a cramped space.   While space definitely needs to be considered so that everyone can live together comfortably, time is the more important factor here. If you have the time to walk your dogs, then providing a large area to run in is not as important as making sure you can take them for walks every day to meet their exercise needs.  Your health status is an important factor to consider when getting more pets. Be aware of what you can and cannot handle without assistance. If you have difficulty getting around on your own, another pet may not be the best idea.   Also, consider your mental health status. Depression can make it very difficult to care for yourself as well as pets. Your animals rely on you, so not taking on more than you can handle is very important for everyone’s wellbeing. Animals can cause stress and contribute to mental health problems, such as anxiety. You are responsible for your pets. The more animals you have, the more their needs, health issues and behavior can weigh on you.  Though the number of pets you have can give you an idea of whether you already have a lot, the resources that you have available are more important than the actual number of animals you own.You need to be able to care for and provide an enriching environment for all your animals so that they can be happy and bring you joy as companions instead of more life stress.Consider what species of animals you have as well as individual temperaments and group sexual dynamics before getting another pet.   Overcrowding may have a negative effect on the pets you already have. For example, it's recognized that in household with five cats or more there is a high likelihood of inappropriate spraying in order to mark territory. This is because the cats view the presence of other cats as a threat. The more cats, the bigger the perceived threat. So consider whether or not it's fair to take on another pet if it adds to the stress of your existing pets. If you can't count all your pets, or lose count, you have too many pets and shouldn’t get any more. While some people may look down on a person with 10 cats, as long as the owner can provide a sanitary place to live, afford medical care and emergency services for each cat as well as meet their own needs and pay bills, then there isn’t a problem. The pack mentality can increase as you get more dogs, and this can cause more behavioral problems because the social dynamics become more complex and your ability to give attention to each animal is lessened.Mixing male and female animals can increase competition. Hormones, territorial tendencies, and breeding behavior all contribute to problems you will have to deal with. Keep this in mind before adding new pets to the ones you already have.  Write down your expected expenses and income for the month. Use bank statements, receipts, and bills to help determine what you’re spending every month. Include your house or rent payment, car payments, insurance, groceries, gas, utilities, and other spending. Be sure to include all the expenses related to your pets, such as food, grooming, toys, bedding, supplies, medications, and healthcare costs.   Doing this will allow you to see how much you are spending on your pets every month. Consider how adding another pet will change these numbers. Is it something you still want to do?  , Looking at the numbers, what could you afford if you didn’t have so many pets? Look at yearling savings as well as monthly. This can really show you whether another pet is worth it or not.   If you didn’t have pets, could you increase your entertainment costs or pay for a car? Could you take that trip you’ve been wanting to take? Now, think about the monthly and yearly costs associated with getting another pet. What will you have to cut out of your budget and lose?  , Don’t skip meals to pay for your cats’ litter. Make sure you get the nutrition you need and can pay your bills on time. If you’re regularly making late rent payments or not going to the doctor so you can buy your dogs’ food, then you probably don’t need another pet.  Medical care for animals can be expensive — sometimes thousands of dollars a visit. You’ll want to be able to save up money regularly in case you need to pay for emergency care or buy prescription medications for your animals. You need to be financially prepared for each animal that you own.   Keep up to date with shots. Many young animals need a series of vaccinations the first year and regular rabies vaccinations after that. If you have multiple animals, pet insurance may be a good option. Be sure you can make your payments every month and pay any remaining balances for each pet.  Your apartment or neighborhood may have rules that dictate the size, breed, and number of animals you can have. Check your lease, talk to your landlord or your neighborhood association to find out if there is a limit to how many animals you can keep on your property.  Your local animal control and zoning laws probably dictate how many animals you can keep on your property. Governing bodies do this in order to prevent unsanitary, unhealthy conditions for residents. You will want to call animal control or talk to your city or county administrative office to find out what the local laws are so you can remain in compliance.   Pet hoarding, or having too many pets than you can take care of, is likely in violation of your state, city, county, or other local health and zoning laws. You could lose your pets and even your house., Many cities and counties require animals to be registered and licensed. In order to license pets, the pet often has to be spayed or neutered (or a breeder license purchased) and all shots be up to date. You can be fined or jailed if you do not have all your pets legally licensed.  Because you are responsible for your pets and your children, having too many pets can compromise your ability to care for your children. If you can’t keep your property and home clean or neglect your animals, you can be charged with child neglect or endangerment as well. Make sure your children are taken care of before you consider getting anymore pets.  The more animals you have, the more odors and noise they create. Don’t get so many pets that your neighbors start complaining. The size of your residence will play a factor in this as well — an apartment is going to be right next to another apartment, whereas you probably have some space between houses.   Many apartments and cities have noise ordinances. Check with yours to make sure that adding another barking dog won’t be a problem.  Some people have a mental illness that causes them to have more than the typical number of pets. They are unable to meet minimal care requirements and cannot recognize that they have a problem — even when animals become ill or die. You will need to contact your local police or health department or humane society if you or someone you know suffers from this condition.The unsanitary conditions of pet hoarding also negatively affect the community by increasing the risk of fire, creating poor air quality, attracting pests, and encouraging the transmission of infectious diseases. It is in your best interest to report suspected pet hoarding cases. When animals do not have access to enough food, live in unhygienic conditions or don’t get medical care, it’s considered to be animal cruelty. If you suspect you may be a pet hoarder, seek professional help right away.  If you find that you can’t support the pets you have or take care of them, then you need to give up some of them. You and your animals all deserve to have a good quality of life. If you can no longer give them the attention, time, space, or provide the food or medical care that they need, you must allow them a chance to get the care they deserve with someone else.   Friends, family members, and co-workers might be able to take one off your hands. If not, there are many rescue groups, shelters, and animal sanctuaries that can help. Put an add up in your local paper, at a local pet shop, feed store, or on an online site like craigslist.com for the animals you need to give up.  If you can no longer take care of extra animals, you can still help out in other ways. Support documented 501(c)(3) corporations with a reputation for providing high-quality animal care however you can. Your local shelter can always use your help as well. 

consider time spent caring for your pets.  calculate space requirements for your pets.  make sure you have the ability to care for your pets.  count the number of pets you already have.  create a budget.  consider what you could spend your money on without pets.  make sure all your needs are being met.  pay for medical care.  find out what the rules are.  check city, county, and state laws.  make sure all pets are licensed.  consider any children in the house.  be courteous of others.  be aware of pet hoarding.  find a new home for excess pets.  volunteer or give money to support animal rescue groups or shelters. 

 Don't use materials like plastic.  The bigger the animal, the larger the container should be., Don't scrub them with anything abrasive. You want them to stay as pristine as possible. Scratches and abrasions will encourage mold and bacteria growth., It doesn't work, unless you are sending it through a commercial level dishwasher (which uses soap, anyway). Use whatever soap you use, and be sure to rinse it really well., Do it at least twice a day. If it is a warm day, they will be needing more water than usual, and no one wants to drink gross water., It helps to ensure that there are fewer germs and parasites for your pets to be exposed to. The tiny amount of hydrogen peroxide that they are exposed to is insignificant., There are more and more things in our water that we don't want in our bodies. If you drink filtered water, so should they. 

use stainless steel or ceramic for the water bowl container.  make sure the container is over-sized.  take care of the condition of your water bowl.  don't just use really hot water.  change the water frequently.  spritz the bowl with a light mist of peroxide after you have cleaned it.  give them filtered water. 

 While pets are loving additions to your home, they are not always easy to manage. All pets require time, money, and love in addition to the specific needs of each animal and breed. You need to be sure you want a pet not just that day but in the long-term.   Most pets require attention and maintenance during the day, so make sure you'll be home enough to take care of your pet. If you have kids, consider what pets will be kid friendly. Hamsters and fish, for example, make great early pets. If you plan on moving or making large lifestyle changes you shouldn't consider a pet until you are more stable. ; , Even different types of dogs have different needs, so make sure you pick a pet that suits your means. Before buying a pet do thorough research on the behaviors and needs of various pets you like. Don't go into this decision dead-set on one species or breed -- being open-minded can lead to happy surprises and the right pet for your family. Keep in mind some general concerns with different pets:    Dogs - though dogs vary widely by breed, all dogs need lots of attention, time to exercise, and plenty of room to roam.  Cats - Intelligent and individual, cats will be fine with less supervision, though they still need your love and time to keep from acting out..  Hamsters, Gerbils, Ferrets, and Rodents - Economical and short-living, rodents make good first pets. They often, however, have strong odors.  Fish - Fish need careful monitoring and care to thrive, and won't cuddle anytime soon. Think of having a fish like having a garden.  Lizards - Happy on their own and generally easy to care for, lizards do not offer much affection and can be difficult to diagnose when sick.  Birds - Birds can be incredibly messy and are often loud. They are also expensive and occasionally temperamental, especially bigger birds like parrots.  Curious, food-driven, and unable to listen to your warnings, pets can get into trouble if you don't create boundaries or safe spaces. Birds may dart out of open windows, lizards can scamper around the house, and dogs or cats may run into the street. Take note of openings your pet could accidentally escape through and make sure you can keep food out of their reach.   Remove any harmful objects like knives or poisonous food. If you want your animal to have outside time, consider putting in a fence. Put aside one room that you can designate as the pet's "bedroom." Aim to adopt your pet during a relatively quiet time in your life so that everyone can avoid undue stress while getting used to each other.  Talk to the pet store attendants or adoption agencies about things you'll need -- housing, toys, grooming supplies, etc. -- and shop before you bring your new pet home. Teach your family members how to use everything so that everyone is on the same page.   If you have young children you can help them prepare for pet care by "feeding" a doll or regularly watering plants.  Pets are not ultra expensive, but that doesn't mean you won't need to spend money. Below are some annual cost estimates provided by the ASPCA:    Dogs-- $600-$900, depending on size  Cats-- $600  Rabbit-- $700  Rodents--$300-$650, depending on size  Fish -- $40 Small Birds -- $400  Large Birds (Parrots, Macaws)-- $700-$1,200 Set aside a few hundred dollars in case of emergency veterinary costs.  Be sure to bring your pet to the vet soon after adopting it as well. Just like humans, pets need regular check-ups to spot problems before they become serious conditions. Use your first visit to discuss how often you should schedule check-ups and your pet's dietary and medical needs.   Be sure to schedule shots and vaccinations as soon as you can. Ask your vet what symptoms to look for if your pet gets sick. Spay or neuter dogs and cats to prevent pet over-population. Record your vet's number as well as the number of a veterinary hospital in case of emergencies.  The cheapest food you find may not always be the healthiest. Feeding animals table scraps - no matter how cute they are when they beg - is not a good idea since people food often has minerals and items in it that can be harmful to our animal friends. Only feed your pet appropriate foods and give them responsible portions.   Research or ask your vet about good food sources and portion sizes. Natural foods, though more expensive, are healthier than dry or processed foods. , Though this is certainly true of dogs and cats, even fish and lizards require dedication and love to really thrive. Animals are social beings much like humans, and you need to set aside time to play with your pets so they get exercise and mental stimulation.   Give your pet room to roam -- the bigger the animal, the more room they'll need. Buy toys and play-sets for you and your pet to use together. Give your pet the occasional treat after good behavior to motivate it and cement good habits.  This will keep both you and your pet healthy and happy. Create a regular cleaning schedule, at least once every 2-3 weeks, and stick to it, cleaning your animal and it's living spaces to prevent disease and odor.   For larger pets like cats and dogs, there are animal cleaning centers with large tubs and hoses. Keep up with regular grooming, such as brushing fur or scrubbing scales, every few days. For dogs and cats, make sure you keep their nails short so they don't break painfully. , While these steps are general guidelines for pet ownership, each animal is different and you need to adapt accordingly. Ask friends who have similar pets, check out books from the library, and search internet discussion boards about your breed or species. You can never know too much.   Be flexible once you bring your pet home. Pets have personalities and will have different wants and needs.  

determine if you can adequately care for a pet.  choose a pet that fits your lifestyle.  prepare your house for your incoming pet.  buy necessary pet supplies in advance.  budget enough money for adequate care.  schedule regular visits to the vet.  make sure your new "family member" has food that suits their nutritional needs.  give your pet your affection and attention.  clean your pet and all of its enclosures.  do in-depth research about care for your pet. 

 It is critical that you do adequate research before buying the pet. Different animals have different needs regarding care (for example, tropical fish cannot be treated the same way as cold water fish), and even within the same species, different breeds can have different needs.   If you are buying a dog, then buying a high energy, large breed such as a wolfhound would be unsuitable if you live in a small apartment or spend all day at work and have nowhere to let the dog roam in the day. Focus on the pet's needs, not your wants.If you want an animal like a snake instead, research is still important. It is critical that the snake has enough space to crawl around in and a heat source (such as a lightbulb). If you're leading an active life, choose a dog. If you are away from home a lot, though, choose a cat or some other free-roaming animal. If you just want an animal to look at and don't want to interact with it directly, or don't have lots of time, choose a fish or a snake, or other creepy-crawlies.; , It’s a mistake to just decide “I want a dog” (or any other animal) and to buy the animal without considering the needs and requirements of the breed.   Some breeds are natural shepherds, which makes them great for 1 person, but some breeds (Border Collie, for example) have the sheep-herding instinct in their blood. This means that when a child roams too far from the rest of the "herd," the collie will try to get it back. How does it do it with the sheep? It bites them. This may result in grave injuries to children. Please do your research on how breeds behave. It is important that a pet lives in an environment where it will be comfortable, safe and provided with what it needs. Some animals are very adaptable, such as cats, which can live happily in environments ranging from farm land to city centers, while others have more specific needs. For example, horses must have a lot of pastureland and somewhere safe to shelter. For animals that will roam the house, not being confined to tanks or cages, they will need places to sleep that are out of the way of general household traffic, where they can lie without being disturbed, such as the corner of a room. If they are a cat that will often be shut indoors, then it is also important that they have a litter tray that is regularly cleaned out.  Some pets are more expensive than other pets, and you need to be honest with yourself about whether you can afford the pet - and whether you have the time and maturity to handle it.   Costs associated with pets include set-up supplies. Depending on the kind of pet, you might need a crate, an aquarium, and leashes. Don’t forget the ongoing costs of caring for a pet. You need to factor in the cost of regular food purchases, but also whether you can afford to take your pet to the veterinarian for preventative care (like shots), not just emergency care. That's essential to keep the pet healthy, and it can be quite costly.  Figure out the exercise needs (if any) of the pet before you buy it, and consider whether your lifestyle gives you enough time to meet them.Some pets don't require you to do much beyond providing them with a safe place to move about, such as buying a run for a rabbit, and making sure the tank is large enough for fish. But other pets must be exercised. Dogs require a more hands-on approach to exercise because they need to be walked regularly. Making sure your pet gets enough exercise can help prevent aggression and destructive behaviors.  Many foods that are edible for humans can be inappropriate for animals, making them ill when they consume them, so it is important to research what foods your pet can not eat as well as those they can eat.   Overfeeding is as harmful as underfeeding, so it is important that your pet gets the amount of food it needs and not too much extra. For some animals, dietary requirements may change with the season; for example, if you have horses or other grazing animals, they will often require more hay during the seasons when there is less grass. Look at pet food labels to make sure you are purchasing food for your pet that is properly nutritious. Research which food could harm your pet. It is vital that all pets have a constant water supply. Check water bowls at least once a day to ensure that they have enough water and that the water is clean and not contaminated.  Many animals will largely take care of themselves, only really needing to be groomed or bathed when they manage to get very messy. Others, such as long-haired dogs or cats, may need regular grooming.   It is a good idea to desensitize your pet to being groomed or bathed from an early age. When brushing fur, ensure any brush used on the face is soft, and if brushing long, tangled fur, take the time to work out knots gently rather than tugging. You can buy brushes for pets at pet stores. When bathing your pet, make sure that the water is lukewarm and that the products you use do not cause an allergic reaction - buying specialist shampoos is not always necessary, but heavily perfumed products may cause a rash for many animals. Consider taking your pet to a professional groomer if you aren’t sure you are competent to do it. You don’t want to accidentally injure the pet.  As pets cannot tell us when they are ill or injured, it is up to us to keep an eye on them and look out for any signs of injury.   Knowing your pet's normal behavior is very important; if they are sick or injured, they will often act unusually, such as sleeping more, going off their food, etc. If they begin to act oddly, check them for any injuries and keep an eye on their food and water intake; if they stop eating or drinking, or they have obvious wounds that are concerning you, then take them to the vet. Make sure that your pet has all of the proper vaccines and other preventative medication suggested by your veterinarian, such as heart worm pills for some dogs.  A major part of caring for a pet is training. Training is essential for the safety of the animal and the people who interact with it.If you have an apartment cat, the litter box is very important from the start. You have to teach your cat to use the litter box and to think of it as its only place to do the necessary business.The litter box needs frequent cleaning (once or twice a day, depending on the cat).Feeding is approximately 2 or 3 times a day, again, depending on the cat. Water should be supplied continuously. Dogs need to be trained so they understand proper behavior, such as where to go to the bathroom and not to jump on people when they enter the house. It’s important that the owner establishes control, but never in an abusive or harmful way to the animal.  Some animals require more attention than others, so the amount of time they need is often relative. Just be sure than you are capable of fulfilling whatever that need may be.   Try to take a little time out of each day to spend with your pet, even if it's just sitting down with them. More often than not, your pet would be more than happy to relax with you. Dogs should be walked, and hamsters need time to run around in their balls.Play should be fun for both your pet and you, but make sure it is safe and monitored at all times. Research whether your pet breed needs to socialize with other animals. Play with it - dogs are very social animals so they need to spend time with their owners. With toys or simply chasing him around is enough for exercising. Dogs have a natural craving for chewing things, so buy a chewing toy to keep him entertained.  Love is what your relationship with your pet has to be about. Show him or her your affection by petting and playing.   Your pet will be a member of your family, so treat it like one. A good cuddle will do the both of you good. Pets respond to the tone of people's voices as well as touch. Horses need attention. Like wild horses, if you don't love them properly, they pretty much turn into mustang. Give them a treat once in a while, take a walk with them, or ride them for fun. Train a pet with positive reinforcement, never cruelty or abuse.Keep your pet and its environment clean. If you have a small animal, clean their cage weekly. You're not showing your pet love if you let it sit in filth. If you have a dog, vacuum fur regularly from the house and wash their dog bed from time to time. Neglecting to clean your pet could result in infection, so keep on top of its cleanliness!  

research the type of pet, so you can make sure the pet fits into your environment and lifestyle.  choose your breed carefully, especially if you have children.  be realistic about your budget, and your ability to shoulder responsibilities.  exercise your pet if it’s the kind of pet that needs it, such as a dog.  watch your pet’s diet carefully.  consider whether your pet needs to be groomed.  monitor your pet for illness and injury.  train your pet if it’s the kind of pet that needs it.  make time for your pet.  love your pet. 

 You must always keep in mind that your pet has feelings. Just like you, they want freedom, good food, entertainment and may have acute feelings like sorrow, happiness etc. A pet may not be a human but it's feelings and needs are very similar. They may not be able to express their feelings to us but they feel just like us and they enjoy and suffer, just like you and me.; ,, It is your duty and responsibility to see that they don't feel as if they are different or that they suffer from loneliness or sorrow. You must take and treat them as a family member, loving and caring for them as if it was brother, sister, son or daughter.  Read and learn about your pet. This way you will be able to understand his or her needs. Try to understand his or her body language. Spending more time with him or her will strengthen your relationship and allow you to understand your pet better. A pet who is comfortable in new surroundings will not be active and may be defensive/aggressive. These pets are ideal for families or the elderly. On the other hand, curious and active personalities are not submissive and are ideal for families without children below 10 years old.  Unless your pet will be alone for a long period pf time, examples would be for an entire day or a few days at length.  Allow your pet to enjoy his freedom. Don't disturb his or her sleep and try not to leave them in a closed atmosphere .  Allow your pet to come in contact that is harmful, try not to disturb as he might have a reason but he is unable to express it.  

remember that they too are living things.  (if small animal) don't make them live in a small cage choose a big cage, or even make one!  ,  treat them like your family.  understand them.  take control of their stuff, rather than hiring a person to look after them.  give them freedom.  let them do what they want. 

 Not only do you need to make a nice living space for your animals before you even get them; but you need to follow and, most often, exceed local or federal laws about minimally required spaces for each species.   Depending on the type of exotic pet, find an empty pasture or clear a space on your property that's about one acre long. Fence the area and remove any hazardous items. Buy or make a gate for the front of the pasture. Then build a shelter for them to sleep and escape from rain, hail, snow and other adverse weather conditions. Make sure it's the right height, especially for a llama! a good house for an exotic animal is about 10 feet (3.0 m) by ten feet. Several animals can fit in it! It's easier to make it a three-sided house so you don't have to mess with a door.; , This includes a place to store the food, like a new metal trash can, something to carry the food in, like a pitcher, and a hay feeders with several areas for eating with trays underneath to put the food in. You can make one yourself or buy one at a farm store.  Buy a padlock and secure the gate on the pasture. Always keep the key in the same place, and check the lock after each time you feed the animals.  Make sure it doesn't have any cracks or holes in it, rinse it out with a hose, and watch your animals sip their drinks! These should be emptied of contaminated water away from feeding areas, scrubbed clean all over with a small amount of bleach and a stiff brush, rinsed until you can no longer taste or smell any trace of bleach or fecal matter whatsoever, and refilled with clean, pure water.  Clean the droppings out of the pasture, animal housing, common areas and, especially, feeding areas daily with a rake and snow shovel, dumping it into a wheelbarrow. Then rinse any wooden or paved areas with water and squeegee the area dry. Don't make your animal(s) sleep or live on wet floors no matter what the season. Clear away all food left out the previous day from all areas before putting out fresh food and water. Carefully clean all water containers that might have gotten droppings, food, or other contamination in them.  Pet them every day and give them hugs and kisses. Gently brush their fur and feed them out of your hand. Make sure your animal(s) have lots of safe, interesting toys and other enrichment like new things to smell or play with everyday. Don't leave enrichment with an animal for more than 3 -4 days at a time and clean all toys, etc. thoroughly with a small amount of bleach, lots of water, and a stiff brush before storing it or giving it to any other animal. Caring for exotic animals of any species is very hard work but, when done with dedication and love can be a great experience for you and your animals.  If it bites, approach it carefully.  

make a living space for them.  get feeding supplies.  secure the area.  buy a water tank.  be prepared to clean droppings.  don't forget to love them!,  finally, have overall common sense! 

 Having someone come to your home will allow your pet to be comfortable in its usual environment. Decide how often your sitter will visit your pet. Will the sitter come by once a day or multiple times a day?It's best to use a professional sitter. Professional pet sitters can be found on the National Association of Professional Pet Sitters (NAPPS)or Professional Pet Sitters Inc.Pet sitters are also ideal for cats, who prefer to stay in their home environment and find being away from home stressful.Have a back up sitter in case of emergency., Leave your pet at home and have a neighbor or friend come and check on your pet from time to time. Introduce your pet to your neighbor or friend so your pet is comfortable. Try taking a walk with your pet and the friend or have your friend over for a meal.Find out how much experience your friend or neighbor has with pets. You could also have your pet stay at the friend's or neighbor's house. If you are taking your pet to someone else's home, bring something from your home that will make your pet feel comfortable (e.g. bed, blanket, favorite toy).  You can make arrangements to take your dog to a kennel. Make sure the kennel is certified by the International Boarding & Pet Services Association (IBPSA). Other questions you should ask the kennel include: the staff-to-pet ratio, clean and secure facility, climate controlled, frequency of exercise for the animals, grooming options, where will your pet be housed (e.g. individual crate or suite), and how much interaction your pet will have with other animals.Dogs do well at kennels because they are social animals. It's best to visit the kennel before you make arrangements for your pet to stay there. You want to be comfortable with wherever your pet is staying. Leave your contact information and your veterinarian's contact information with people at the kennel.  Some individuals will offer boarding for a small number of animals in their home. This is good for animals who like to socialize and be with other animals. This setting is more intimate than a traditional boarding kennel. Ask your veterinarian for a referral.Evaluate the in-home boarding place the same way you would evaluate any other boarding kennel.   Dog Vacayand Roverare good places to find in-home boarding for your dog. Go and check out the facility before you send your pet there.  

try a pet sitter.  ask a friend or neighbor to check on your pet.  take your pet to a boarding kennel.  try home boarding. 

 If your pet will be staying at home on its own, keep the thermostat at a comfortable temperature for your pet. Maintain the thermostat as if you were still at your house. Close the doors to any rooms that you do not want your pet to get into. Make sure that your pet has a good bed and way to go to the bathroom (doggy door or litter box).   Leave food and water for your pet in a familiar place.  Your home should be safe if you have a pet that roams freely throughout the house. Keep trash cans, toilets, and heating/air vents covered. Move any plants that may be poisonous, household cleaners, medications, and chemicals to higher shelves. Put away any toys, games, magazines, arts and crafts supplies, food, and household knick-knacks or decorations that may be tempting to your pet.   Hide your clothing and shoes from your pet as well.  If you must leave your pet alone for a few days, use an automatic feeder. An automatic feeder will portion out your pet's food as many times a day as necessary. This will keep your pet from overeating. Also, some pets, such as cats, prefer eating fresh foods and would not be happy with a huge bowl of food left out.   There are automated feeders for both food and water., If you have no one to check on your pet while you are away, a pet camera will allow you to monitor your pet. Some of these tools will allow you to interact with your pet as well.If you are unable to purchase a camera, there are surveillance apps that are more affordable. 

make your home comfortable.  pet-proof your home.  use an automatic feeder.  consider a pet camera. 

 Think about how you would want to teach a small child. If they feel safe, calm, comfortable, and alert, they are more likely to take instruction effectively. The same is true for your parrot.   Find a quiet space where you and your avian student can focus on the task at hand. Choose somewhere familiar to the bird so it will already have a level of comfort before training starts.Don’t try to train when the parrot is overly agitated. Wait for a calmer moment. However, training with treats works best when the bird is hungry, so training before mealtime is usually the best scenario.; , While parrots are often quite friendly and caring, they are not in general known for being overly patient. Delays and mistakes during training sessions may not go over well, so preparation beforehand is important.   Gather up the supplies you will need for they type of training you will be conducting. These might include items like a hand-held perch, a towel, a clicker (if “clicker training”), a chopstick or drumstick (if “target training”), a leash/harness (if taking training outdoors), bitter apple spray (to make common areas of parrot nibbling like draperies unappealing), and, of course, treats.Choose a treat that your parrot especially enjoys, and also that you can easily feed to your bird. Thin apple wedges, for example, can make a good hand treat for a parrot., We’ve all heard that old dogs have trouble learning new tricks, and the same principle holds true for just about any animal, including parrots (and people, for that matter!).   Begin the process of training your bird as soon as possible. So long as your parrot has reached the point of being capable (if not yet entirely willing) to eat a treat from your hand, you can begin training.Hold multiple training sessions during the day, ideally at similar times each day for consistency, but more importantly when the parrot is in the mood for learning (that is, calm). However, keep the sessions relatively short — no longer than fifteen minutes at a time. Once your bird begins to lose interest, it is best to end the session and begin again another time., Rewarding your bird with a treat from your hand is essential to practically every type of parrot training out there. It also helps establish a bond between you and a new and/or young parrot.Start the process with the parrot inside its cage. Slowly approach and present the treat. Stay calm and offer only encouraging approval when the bird eventually takes the treat. Apple slices, again, make a good treat option if you’re worried about having your fingers nibbled upon. You can also wear gloves, if you so choose, though your bird may find those even more appealing to peck at.  “Shaping” is a training ideology that focuses upon rewarding the bird for approximations, and eventually deliberate acting, of the steps required to complete a training task.Shaping is well-named, for it is all about molding behaviors through positive reinforcement. As one example, if you were teaching your parrot to bathe itself in a small water dish, you would reward the bird for (among several other intermediary steps) looking toward the dish, looking at the dish, moving toward the dish, moving to the dish, testing the water, stepping into the water, and eventually splashing around.  Pets ranging from birds to cats can often benefit from “clicker training,” which involves using a hand-held clicking device (think of the sound a pen clicker or metal juice-bottle cap makes) to indicate proper behavior worthy of a reward.The “click” serves as an audible cue that an appropriate response has occurred, and should occur immediately upon said response and be accompanied immediately by a reward. Thus, you may hear the phrase “click and treat” to describe what is essentially a single maneuver. For instance, if using a clicker during “step up training” — as detailed elsewhere in this article — the “click and treat” would occur immediately upon the parrot stepping up onto your finger/hand. Clicking can be incorporated into virtually any training program.  Another training option, which can be used in combination with a clicker if desired, is known as “target training.” It uses a bird’s natural curiosity in investigating new objects to build a reliable response.In a basic version of target training, a chopstick, drumstick, or other wooden wand is pointed in the vicinity of the parrot, and any contact with the tip is immediately rewarded with a treat (or “click and treat,” if desired). Slowly, over time, the parrot will learn to follow the target throughout the cage and around the room, in the process learning to obey a simple command prompt.Target training builds a key basic skill, therefore, that serves as a gateway to more specific training.  As the name indicates, this skill involves your bird learning to step or hop from one perch to another as directed, with the target perch usually your hand, finger, or hand-held perch (such as a dowel rod).   The step up is an ideal skill to teach early on for several reasons:It is relatively easy to master for both teacher and student. It derives from a natural parrot behavior, the desire to move from perch to perch. It is practical, as having your bird hop into your hand on command makes everything from playtime to cage-cleaning easier. It leads into other, more detailed skills as a basic maneuver.   While the step up is a simple skill, there are numerous training methods of varying complexity from which to choose, a few of which are described in the following steps.  If your new bird has some prior training experience or just a natural inclination, the simplest training option may be sufficient.Offer your finger or wrist to your parrot (depending on the bird’s size and your preference), placing it in front of the bird at mid-breast level. Many birds will naturally step up onto the new perch without any coaching at all. Create a cue for the behavior, either by saying “step up” or employing a clicker simultaneous to the parrot making its move. Reward the bird immediately as well. If the bird does not step up unprompted, employ “shaping” and reward incremental behaviors, such as touching the perch with the beak, placing one foot on the perch, etc.  In this method, you use the treat more as a lure to coax the desired behavior, but the basic training principles are quite similar.Hold the treat in one hand, and offer the other hand/finger to the bird at chest level. Orient your hands so that the easiest way for the parrot to reach the treat is by stepping up onto the offered perch. If your bird does not immediately step up, reward any contact with the offered perch at first, and incrementally reward only the desired step-up behavior. If you’re handy enough with the clicker to use it while both hands are occupied, it can be incorporated, and/or a verbal cue like saying “step up.”  , If other methods have been less successful, or you have been utilizing target training already, you can teach the step-up by employing the familiar target and reward system.Hold your familiar target — a wooden drumstick, for instance — in one hand, and your desired perch (your finger, hand, or hand-held perch) in the other. Alternatively, if your manual dexterity is up to the task, you can do both with one hand, which leaves the other for holding treats, a clicker, etc. Locate the target so that it directs the bird to the new perch, which should be located in the common step-up position at the bird’s chest. Immediately reward positive behavior, and use the clicker or a verbal cue if desired. Eventually, the target will no longer be required to prompt the behavior.  Especially for people new to parrot ownership, talking is usually the first skill they think of teaching and of which they presume their bird will be able to master.   The truth of the matter is, every parrot is different, and you should never acquire a bird — even of a breed known for talking — with the assumption that it will talk., Some parrots will require little or no training to learn to talk, and may in fact pick up words and phrases you’d prefer they not repeat.   Excited utterances — such as things you might shout at the TV during a sporting event — are often more readily picked up by a parrot, and they’re listening more often than you may think. So be careful what you say around them!, Parrots talk to other members of their flock, and it is easier to establish yourself as part of your bird's flock early in its life. Therefore, you are more likely to have success when starting with a baby bird.Use a clear, calm, happy voice to repeat a simple word or phrase as you start the training process. Think about how you would try to teach a human child to say "Mommy." Early in the process, reward any sound, then any approximately accurate sound, and eventually a recognizable sound with an immediate treat.  Repetition is the key element of training a parrot to talk. Simply put, the more times you say a word or phrase around a parrot, the more likely it is to pick it up and repeat it.   Train as often as you like. Parrots will not tire of conversing with another member of their flock, although you may. Some experts recommend recording yourself saying a phrase and playing it back on a loop for the bird.Of course, by using this method you lose the personal interaction between the two of you.  

create a proper training environment.  be prepared.  start early, train often, but don’t push too hard.  have it eating out of your hand.  shape the desired behaviors.  get your clicks.  stay on target.  employ the “step up” as an early training step.  test the most basic method.  use an alternate treat-based step-up.  move on to the target-training step-up.  don’t presume your parrot will (or won’t) talk.  watch your mouth.  start young and stay calm.  repeat, and repeat again. 

 Greetings like "Hello" or "Good morning" are examples. Don't train it to say long sentences. For example: "I like ice cream and I want the ice cream truck to come over to my house so we can buy some." It might be too confusing.; , You can make it compliment you--"(Insert Name Here) is awesome."  , Close the door so nobody comes in to disturb, or else the parrot will be confused about background noises.  Speak a little bit slowly first. But don't feel frustrated if your parrot won't say it right. Don't shout at your parrot. It might take some time. You can continue training it the next day or you can just keep trying.  Reward your parrot for all its hard work.  

decide what you want your parrot to say, but make it basic.  if you want, you can make it say simple but funny things.  you should go to a nice and quiet room.  to start teaching it, repeat what you want it to say many times.  if you do get your parrot to say it correctly, then you've succeeded! 

 In order to potty train your bird, you need to pay attention to how it behaves right before it goes to the bathroom. You should also take note of how often it uses the bathroom. This way, you will know when to and how often to carry your bird to the bathroom area.Most parrots will squat down slightly and flick their tails up when they're ready to go to the bathroom. Watch your bird to see what precise movements it makes when it's getting ready to go. Also, keep track of how often your bird defecates. Parrots can defecate as often as every 15 minutes. This way, you'll know roughly how often you'll need to direct your bird to the bathroom area.; , You want a command to reinforce the behavior. You want to be able to say something when you see your bird squatting that will alert it that it needs to go to the bathroom area. Pick something simple, like "Go potty" to teach your bird where to use the bathroom., You should have an area in your parrot's cage where it can go to the bathroom. Most people use something like a waste basket or lay down paper towels or newspaper in a certain portion of their home. You can also use paper plates. Make sure you pick a space the bird can easily access on its own., Watch your bird when it's out of its cage. Remember the natural behaviors you noticed that indicated the bird needed to use the bathroom. If you see the bird doing things that indicates it needs to go, like squatting or flicking its tail, immediately move the bird to the bathroom area.At first, you will need to use the "step up" command to get your bird to climb on your arm or finger. Then, take your bird to the potty spot and hold it over the spot until it goes to the bathroom., Watch your bird closely. When it defecates, say your command. This will help your bird make the connection. It will realize it's supposed to go to the bathroom in the bathroom area.Some people use commands like "Hurry up" if their bird is taking a while to relieve itself. For example, if your bird has been standing on the potty area for a while, you can say something like "Hurry up!" and reward your bird as soon as it goes to the bathroom.  Each time the bird goes in the bathroom spot, give it a reward. Parrots respond best to positive reinforcement. Offer a treat and praise when the bird successfully goes to the bathroom in the right spot. Choose a specific treat your parrot only gets for using the bathroom so the parrot understands what it's being rewarded for.You can also reward your bird by letting it out of the cage for a few minutes each time it goes to the bathroom in the proper spot. Then, put it back in its cage until it goes to the bathroom in the right spot again.  Watch your bird closely both inside and outside of its cage. As soon as your bird begins squatting, take it to the potty spot. Do this for a few weeks until your bird knows where to relieve itself. Always say the command and reward your bird for going in the right spot.Be patient. It can be time consuming to be moving the bird to the bathroom area every 10 to 15 minutes, but most birds will eventually learn the behavior.  If you just got a parrot, it will need time to adjust to your home. Potty training, or any kind of training, can be overwhelming if done too early. Spend some time letting your bird adjust. Once your bird is calm and friendly with you, you can begin training.How long your bird needs to relax depends on the temperament of the bird. Some birds come around right away while others need a lot of time.  You cannot expect a bird to learn right away. It will take time and consistency for your parrot to be toilet trained. Even then, you can expect some occasional accidents. Keep these expectations in mind so you do not get angry or frustrated while training your parrot., Scolding or striking your parrot will not result in it learning faster. In fact, this will only stress out your bird. High levels of stress can cause behavioral problems. Even if your bird is not behaving how you want, you should never hit or scold it. 

observe your bird's natural behavior.  choose a command.  create a potty spot.  move your bird to the potty spot when he needs to go.  say your command when your bird defecates.  reward the behavior.  take your bird to the potty spot as often as necessary.  do not train a new bird too early.  keep your expectations realistic.  do not scold or hit your parrot. 

 When it comes to making a beekeeping suit, the shirt is the trickiest part. It's helpful to have a shirt that opens in the front so you can fasten it securely around your veil, but you will need to alter it so bees can't crawl into the holes between the buttons. Look for a shirt with the following qualities:The fabric is thick; look for a heavy cotton or denim. The color is white or another very light color. Bees feel threatened by darker colors, which remind them of bears. The fit is loose. Choose a size or two larger than what you normally wear, rather than getting a shirt that's skin tight. That way if a bee inserts its stinger into the fabric, it won't be right against your skin.; , You'll need to make a few alterations along the collar, sleeves and opening in order to create a tight seal that will keep bees from crawling in. It helps to have a sewing machine, but if you don't have one, you can certainly make the alterations by hand. Here's what you need:A roll of one-inch wide white velcro. Stick-on velcro works fine, or you can get the type that doesn't have adhesive backing. You need enough to line the shirt opening, the collar and the sleeve openings, so you may want to take measurements before purchasing velcro. A needle and white thread (or a sewing machine, if you have one). A measuring tape and scissors.  Use a small pair of scissors to snip off all the buttons. Take care to snip the threads just underneath the buttons without cutting a hole in the shirt. Snip the buttons from the opening of the shirt, the collar and the sleeve openings., Thread your needle and tie a knot at the end of the thread. Insert the needle from inside the shirt near the edge of a buttonhole. Stitch the buttonhole tightly closed, then finish it off by tying another tight knot. Repeat until you've sewn every buttonhole closed, including those around the collar and sleeve openings.   You might want to double-thread the needle if you're working with thin or weak thread. Neat, invisible stitching is not the goal: just make sure the buttonholes are tightly closed and won't pop open when you're handling bees.  Measure the length of the shirt opening. Place the measuring tape along the edge of the shirt's opening. Measure the length of the opening from the tip of the shirttail to the bottom of the collar. Write down the measurement, then use it to cut two pieces of velcro that will stretch the entire length of the shirt opening on both sides.  Remove the adhesive backing from the velcro pieces. Sew a piece of velcro over the length of the opening where you cut off the buttons. Sew another piece of velcro along the underside of the opening where you sewed up the buttonholes. The two pieces of velcro should seal firmly together when you close the shirt.   If you have a sewing machine, you can quickly sew down the velcro strips to secure them in place. Stitch the entire length of the velcro to hold it down. You can stitch along the edges of the velcro or make one long stitch down the middle. If you're sewing by hand, make tight, neat stitches so that the velcro does not come loose while you're wearing your bee suit.  Use the measuring tape to measure around the collar. Cut a length of velcro according to your measurement, and sew it around the inside of the collar. Cut a second length and sew it around the outside of the collar. This will allow you to adjust the collar to make it tight enough to keep bees out. Use the same method to add velcro to the sleeve openings.   Again, a sewing machine makes it easy to quickly sew down the velcro strips to secure them in place. Stitch the entire length of the velcro to hold it down. You can stitch along the edges of the velcro or make one long stitch down the middle. If you're sewing by hand, make tight, neat stitches so that the velcro does not come loose while you're wearing your bee suit.  A cowboy-style hat with a wide brim makes the perfect base for your beekeeping hat. It will keep the veil from touching your face as you work, making it easier to see and less likely that a bee will get close enough to your skin to sting. Look for a hat with these qualities:The fabric is thick enough to keep out bees, but thin enough to pierce with a sewing needle. Felt and tightly-woven straw hats work well; leather can be too thick. The hat is lightweight enough that you won't overheat. You'll be doing most of your beekeeping in the summer, so keep that in mind when you choose your hate. The brim is stiff, not floppy. It should be firm enough to keep the veil several inches from your face.  You can use stiff nylon mesh, tulle, or wire mesh to make the veil. You need enough veil fabric to fit around the brim of the hat and fall at least five inches below your shoulders. One yard should be sufficient.   Be sure to use a clear or white fabric so that you'll be able to see through it easily. If you find a thin tulle you want to use, you may need a double layer to make sure your veil keeps the bees away.  Measure around the brim of the hat, then cut your fabric about an inch wider. You'll need a bit of overlap to make sure the bees can't get through the seam. Make sure the fabric is long enough to drape down five inches below your shoulders.  Overlap the edges by half an inch. Stitch the edges closed to create a large tube of fabric with the same circumference as your hat's brim. Make sure the tube is sturdy enough to keep out bees before moving to the next step. It doesn't hurt to add an extra row of stitches along the seam.  Working by hand, carefully sew the top edge of the veil around the brim of the hat. If you are hand-sewing, be sure to use small whip-stitches to keep all openings too small for the bees to enter and get underneath the mesh. Continue until the veil is tightly secured to the hat.  Your bee-tight shirt and hat are the most important parts, but in order for your suit to work, you'll need a few more items. Remember that everything should be white or light in color:Thick white sweatpants or work pants. Make sure they have tight elastic around the waist and ankles. You can also wear white workout pants if sweatpants are too hot. Tall socks. Thick gloves. Dishwashing gloves work just fine. Some beekeepers prefer to be bare-handed. Sturdy work boots. Look for boots that are ankle or calf length and made of leather or other durable material. There should be enough room around the opening of the boot so you can tuck the bottom of the pants into them.  Set the hat on your head and drape the veil down over your shoulders, bunching it around your neck. Pull up the gloves so that they cover your hands and wrists.  Put it on so that the end of the veil is tucked under the shirt. Secure the shirt opening by pressing the velcro closed. Secure the velcro around the collar and sleeve openings. Check to make sure there are no gaps.  Make sure the elastic on your pants is tight around the bottom of your shirt.  Pull the elastic at the bottom of your pants over your socks. Put on your shoes, and tuck the bottom of your pants into your shoes before tying them. You are now ready to handle bees.  This option is more expensive than making a suit out of a shirt and pants, but some find it easier to have a one-piece suit. make sure the coverall you purchase is white or light in color.   Dark colors can aggravate bees since these colors remind them of their predators, like bears and skunks. Make sure the coverall fits loosely in order to keep the material from directly contacting the skin. This helps to avoid stingers that might pierce the fabric.  Measure elastic to fit the neck hole and wrists, then cut the elastic to the correct measurements. Sew the elastic pieces around neck opening and wrist openings.   This is important to prevent bees from gaining access to the inside of the coverall. Don't make the elastic too tight, but it should be tight enough to offer protection from bees.  When putting on the beekeeper's suit, put the hat on first, then the coveralls. Make sure the mesh of the hat is securely tucked in at the neck of the coveralls. Add gloves, socks and boots to the ensemble.  

choose a white button-down shirt.  gather other supplies.  remove the buttons from the shirt.  sew the button holes closed.  cut velcro to line the shirt opening.  attach the velcro to the shirt opening.  cut and attach velcro around the collar and sleeves.  choose a wide-brimmed hat.  gather supplies to make the veil.  measure and cut the fabric.  bring the edges together and sew the seam.  sew the veil to the brim of the hat.  buy the remaining beekeeping suit essentials.  put on the hat and gloves.  put on the shirt.  tuck the shirt into your pants.  put on your socks and shoes.  purchase a light-colored, long-sleeved coverall.  attach elastic to the neck hole and wrists.  put on your suit. 

 The easiest way to tell the queen bee apart from other bees is by her size. Queens mated with drones are the largest bees in the hive, both longer and wider than other bees, while queens who have yet to mate, or virgin queens, are smaller than mated queens but larger than either worker bees or drones.   The queen bee's larger size, as well as her ability to lay eggs, is due to eating protein-rich royal jelly, which is secreted from glands on the heads of young worker bees and mixed with pollen to form a whitish milk or mush. All bees are fed royal jelly for the first few days after hatching, but only queen bees are fed royal jelly until reaching physical maturity. Royal jelly not only enables queen bees to mature sexually, it also enables them to reach physical maturity sooner (after 16 days as opposed to 21 days for worker bees) and contributes to their extended lifespan. Virgin queens are reared in the event the mated queen becomes old or incapacitated. They are kept separate from the mated queen and each other; if 1 virgin queen encounters another, she will attack and attempt to kill it.; , A queen bee's larger abdomen is noticeably more pointed than the abdomens of either worker or drone bees.  Worker bees' stingers are barbed; once they sting a target, the barb catches and pulls the stinger from their abdomen, killing the worker. Queen bees, however, have no barbs on their stingers, enabling them to sting a target repeatedly.  Necessary because of her greater size, keeping her legs splayed apart, like those of the bug in the game of Cootie, enables the queen bee to move quickly through the hive.  As long as the queen bee is healthy and productive, worker bees are notably deferential to her, getting out of her way when she moves forward and standing at attention facing her when she stops.  

look for a bee larger than the others in the hive.  look for a bee with a pointed abdomen.  using a magnifying glass, look for a bee without a barb on its stinger.  look for a bee that stands with its legs splayed apart.  watch the way the other bees act subserviently around her. 

 The period may be hours or days.; , If bees have been killed by something toxic or by something in the hive, they will still be present.  She will often still be present with a very reduced number of workers.  With CCD, this is unlikely to happen (robber bees). There may also be an unusual delay before wax moths invade the dead colony.  

look for a major or complete desertion of the colony by all adult bees over a short period of time.  look for bees.  check for the queen.  check for another colony moving in. 

 When working with a horse’s hooves it's important to move the horse's foot into position in a way that doesn't surprise the horse or irritate it. Make sure the horse is aware of your presence by gently patting it on the rump. To get your horse to lift her foot, run your hand down her leg. Then, squeeze the tendon above the ankle and lift the hoof. The horse should shift its weight to its other three feet.While you work, hold the foot in place by tucking your hip against the horse's hock (the large joint on the hind leg) and gaskin (the muscle above the hock). Use the inside of your knee to pull the foot out slightly and up between your legs so that the sole of the hoof faces up towards you. Support the horse's toe with one hand. This position locks the horse's foot in place, making it difficult for the horse to kick or put its foot on the ground before you're done working. Make sure that you reward your horse with praise for cooperating and waiting while you clean her hooves. Saying, “good girl” or “yes” after she lifts each hoof for you will help to reinforce your horse’s good behavior.; , To remove a horseshoe, first, "break" (straighten) the nail clinches (the bent tips of each nail that holds the shoe on) with a clinch cutter and a hammer. Work the blade of the clinch cutter under the clinch, then hit it with a hammer to straighten the nail. Then, use a pair of metal pull-offs to loosen and remove the shoe. Close the jaws of the pull-offs around the outside heel of the shoe and use an outside to center rocking motion, working towards the toe to loosen the shoe. Repeat for the inside heel and proceed in this fashion until the shoe can be pulled off.Several alternatives exist for breaking the nail clinches. In a pinch, you can use a rock and a flat head screwdriver to bend the nail tips upwards, or, if you're careful not to wear a hole in the hoof wall, you can even use a rasp to file the nail clinches away.  For your horse's health and safety, you don't want dirt or debris trapped between its new shoe and its foot. Before shoeing your horse, use a hoof pick to remove any compacted dirt, mud, rocks, manure, etc. from your horse’s foot. Use downward strokes from heel to toe. Follow the hoof pick with a wire brush for added cleanliness.Take care around the frog - the triangular portion in the middle of the hoof. This part of the hoof is extra-sensitive.  Typically, before a horse is shod, the dark, hard, outer layer of each hoof's sole is removed to reveal the softer, whiter material underneath in a process roughly equivalent to trimming a human's toenails. Take care not to cut too deep, or you risk hurting the horse or even rendering it temporarily lame - the same as if you'd cut a person's nails too short.This process is easiest if you keep your hoof knife razor sharp. But use caution. It's easy to accidentally slip and cut yourself while working.  The hoof wall - the edge of the hoof - should extend about 3 inches (7.6 cm) to 3 & 3/4 inches from the hairline above the hoof itself. If it's any longer, use a set of nippers (essentially giant nail clippers) to trim the edge of the hoof to a suitable length.You should see a ridge where the hoof wall extends beyond the sole. Do not cut into the sole with the nippers, or you may injure the horse.When you trim the hoof with nippers, be sure to keep the trimmed edges of the hoof uniformly straight and level so that they'll sit flush with the ground. Trim from each side of the heel to the toe.  The exception to this is in cases where a horse's gait wears its hoof unevenly - in this case, you'll want to take slightly less hoof material off of the side that the horse favors. Use caution when making this distinction and, if unsure, consult an experienced farrier.  The very last thing that must be done to prepare the hoof for its shoe is to ensure the bottom of the hoof is smooth, flat and level. Use a rasp to gently file any uneven spots on the bottom of the hoof, taking care, as always, not to wear the hoof too short or irritate the frog. Then using your knife, pare away slightly to bevel the sole away from the hoof wall. Contact of the sole on the shoe can cause the horse discomfort., As with human feet, horse feet come in many different sizes and, thus, different horses will require different-sized shoes. Before proceeding, ensure that the shoes you have available are the correct size for your horse's feet. Note that a horse's front and hind feet are differently-shaped, so you will need different shoes for each.most horses have a size smaller in the back then the front, but not always.   If you have to choose between shoes that are slightly too big and shoes that are slightly too small, choose the bigger shoes. These can be bent, shaped, and ground down to a smaller size, while too-small shoes can't be made bigger. Too long a shoe in front will cause the horse to step on the exposed heel of the shoe and pull it off.  Often, even if horse shoes are the correct size, they will not fit a horse's foot without adjustments. Like human feet, horse feet can be asymmetrical or uneven. There are several ways to custom-shape horseshoes.   If you're a knowledgeable metalworker, you can heat the shoe until the steel can be bent to the size of the hoof. Or, you can cold shape the shoe on an anvil using a hammer and tongs. Some farriers do neither, opting instead to grind their shoes down until they fit with a rasp or grinding machine.  Well-fitting horse shoes should align well with the edge of the hoof. Keep in mind that it may take some time to get a shoe to the perfect size for your horse.  Align the shoe so that it sits perfectly against the edge of the hoof, then drive nails through the holes in the shoe to fix it to the horse's foot. When doing this, care must be taken so as not to hurt or hobble the horse.   Drive the nail through the hoof at an outward angle so that the nail tips go through the top of the hoof wall.  Never drive nails into the sensitive inner portion of the hoof. To make this easier, use hoof nails that have a bevel on one side to guide the tip through the hoof wall.With these special nails, the manufacturer's stamp on the side of the nail head should face the center of the foot (towards the frog) - this ensures that the bevel is facing the right direction. Some modern horseshoes use glue, rather than nails, to hold the shoe in place.If you're worried about hurting your horse, you may want to try this alternative. Note that application methods for glue-on shoes can vary - consult the manufacturer or an experienced farrier for more information.  Once each nail has been driven, use the claw end of your hammer to bend the tip of the nail over against the hoof wall. Then, twist off the tip or use a pair of nippers to bend and clip the tips off. Try leave about 1/8" of the tip bent over the edge of the hole formed by the nail pointing towards the toe. This ensures that the nail will hold the shoe in place without the sharp tip hurting you or the horse.  Set a clinch block under the nail on the outer hoof wall, then set the nail in the hoof (or "clinch" it) by hitting the nail head once again with the driving hammer. This gives the nail a firm grip in the horse's hoof, ensuring the shoe stays in place. You may use a sturdy metal tool, like your nippers, in place of the clinch block in a pinch.   Another option is to use a special tool called a clincher. With this tool, all you need to do is align the jaws of the clincher over the nail tip and squeeze the handles.  Finally, give the outside of the hoof a once-over with a rasp, smoothing out any uneven spots and giving the hoof a nice clean finish. Pay special attention to the clinched nail tips, which can also be filed smooth.When finished, you should be able to draw a cloth over the hoof wall without it catching.   You may also notice that excess hoof material protrudes over the edge of the shoe. If this is the case, use a pair of nippers or pull-offs to remove it.  Remember that the front and back hooves will require differently-shaped shoes and that even the two front and back feet may not be perfectly symmetrical with each other.  

lift the horse's foot.  remove any shoes that are already on the horse's feet.  clean the bottom of the hoof.  use a hoof knife to remove excess, flaky sole from the bottom of the hoof.  trim excess hoof wall with hoof nippers.  use a rasp to flatten and level the the sole.  size the shoe to its hoof.  make minor adjustments to the shape of the shoe, if needed.  secure the shoe in its place with nails.  bend and remove the nail tips.  clinch the nail.  file any rough spots on the hoof wall.  repeat process three more times until all four hooves have been shod. 

 Consult the documents related to your property and look for the size of your yard. A typical city-sized lot is about one-tenth of an acre and can accommodate one bee colony. Make your determination of how many colonies to have based on the size of your yard.Ensure your space has a clear flight path for the bees so that you or your neighbors don’t interrupt their ability to build the hive.; , Ask local officials, a county extension, or a beekeeping association about ordinances that govern hosting a colony. They may include regulations about how many hives you can have and the minimum amount of space between hives and your property line. This can prevent violating city codes or having to pay fines.Find your local beekeeping association at http://www.beeculture.com/. County extensions have offices in every state of the United States. You can find your local county extension at http://npic.orst.edu/pest/countyext.htm.  Bees’ behavior is entirely dependent on climate. Use the fall and winter to consult books on beekeeping, gather your supplies to build the hive, and find a source for your bees. Introduce your bees to the hive in the spring as the early flowers appear. A springtime start allows your bees to collect nectar and pollen to build a strong ., Find a local supplier that sells the three types of beehives: top bar hive, Warre hive, and Langstroth hive. Each type of hive has advantages and drawbacks based on your expectations. Determine the type of hive best suited for your needs by asking yourself the following questions:Can I lift 40 pounds? If not, a top bar hive that weighs less than 10 pounds may be best for you. How many hives do I want? If you only want a couple of hives, a top bar or Warre hive are good options for you. If you want many hives, the Langstroth is a good choice for you. How much maintenance do I want to do? A top bar hive is optimal if you want to spend more time with your bees. For occasional maintenance, the Warre or Langstroth are good options. Do I want to watch the bees? I you are exited to see your bees in action, select a Warre hive.  Purchase a hive stand or build one with concrete blocks to keep your hive off of the ground. Measure that the hives are at least 18 inches off of the ground. This can protect them from critters such as skunks or raccoons as make it easier to check the hives as you need. It also protects your back from having to lift a heavy hive., Having basic protective clothing and tools such as a smoker can help you optimally maintain your colony and protect yourself. Consider getting the following hive tools:Bee suit with gloves or simple hat and veil and lightweight jacket Smoker to calm the bees when you’re working in the hive Hive tool, which is a mini pry bar specific to beekeeping  , Select a local beekeeper, gardening or pet store to purchase your bees by January or February. This can ensure that you have bees when you start the hive in spring.,, Open the top of your hive and pull the bees out of their package. Release them into your hive and let them settle in before covering it. This allows your bees to get to work., It may take time in the spring for nectar to start flowing. Add some food to your hive if the local flora blossoms later than usual. Fill a quart jar with a 1:1 mixture of water and sugar. Punch holes in the top of the hive and hang the jars from them., Check the hive as often as you like. This could be once between spring introduction and fall harvesting or every day if you prefer. This can ensure your hive is flourishing and building a strong comb., During your check-ups of the hive, look for signs of illness, parasite infestation or other animals accessing your hive. This can help you nip potential problems in the bud before they affect your hive. Some signs of issues with your hive include:Misplaced bars Weakened colony Visible hive beetles or wax moths on the comb Lack of larvae Deformed wings  

consider your yard size.  check local laws.  start in the spring.  purchase your hive.  construct a hive stand.  get hive tools.  figure out your bee source early.  purchase a “nuc.” ask your supplier to provide you with a “nuc.” this is a queen bee and a bunch of workers that are ready to place in the hive once spring starts.if this isn’t an option, buy a confirmed queen bee and about 10,000 individual workers, which equals about three pounds of bees.  introduce your bees to their hive.  feed your bees as necessary.  monitor the hive.  watch for potential problems. 

 You should only harvest the honey if the bees will survive without it. Generally, only harvest the sugarbag honey this way if:   You have had the hive for 12-18 months, long enough for them to collect ample resources You live in an area that does not go/rarely goes below 18 degrees Celsius, even in winter. This is because the bees will not be able to fly and collect resources, and so they need the stored food. It is probably not a good idea to harvest the honey if you live in Sydney. Your hive is a 3-part OATH hive; , Using a hive tool, split the top box from the bottom two., Invert the honey super. Press a bed of nails tool through the propolis pots, until the sugarbag honey sits on top of the squashed pots., Place the honey super face down on a container to allow all of the sugarbag honey to drip out of the super. Leave it for around 10 minutes., Take the drained honey in the container and pour it through a sieve to filter out any dead bees and other impurities. Seal the container you filtered the sugarbag honey into., Seal it using duct tape or plastic strapping. The bees will reuse the propolis that was left in the honey super, converting it back into more honey pots! 

consider whether you should harvest the sugarbag honey.  separate the honey 'super' from the 2 brood boxes.  pierce the sugarbag pots.  drain the sugarbag honey.  filter the sugarbag honey.  place the honey super back onto the top of the hive. 

 If possible, use your guinea pig's current cage to reduce stress. If that is not possible, buy a small-animal carrying/travel cage - it should be made of plastic or cloth, not metal, and none of it should be made of mesh. Make sure that you fasten the seat-belt around the cage so that it doesn't jolt around.   Two guinea pigs can be placed into one cage, but if you are taking more guinea pigs then you will need more cages for safety reasons.; ,, Never use a loose bowl as it could slide and harm your guinea pig.  Make sure that it is attached to the cage securely so that it does not fall as this could injure your guinea pigs.   Make sure that the cage is level to stop the water from leaking - if your guinea pigs become wet then they could become cold. Fairly large water bottles are good for longer journeys as, particularly if your car is quite warm, your guinea pig will drink a lot. ,,, If there is no room on the seats then place the guinea pigs in a footwell. Never put the guinea pigs in the boot.  Make them feel safe. Say something like, "(guinea pig's name), you are going on a trip to (wherever) with me!"   Try not to start by speeding off, begin slowly and then build up the speed so as not to scare your piggy.  Use that time to pet your guinea pig and refill their food supplies.   If possible, take out your guinea pigs normal hutch/cage for them to run around in for a few minutes and stretch their legs. If you have more than two guinea pigs then let them in together so they can say hello.  A carrying cage is not suitable housing for a guinea pig, even if it is "just for a few nights."  

get a small-ish guinea pig cage that will fit in the backseat of your car.  fill it with a thick layer of newspaper or a waterproof sheet and cover with a soft fleece or towel bedding.  ,  place an attachable ceramic bowl in the cage and fill it with your guinea pig's favorite food before hooking it to the cage.  hook up a water bottle and fill it up to the brim.  put a few handfuls of hay into the cage.  ,  give your guinea pig a toy or two as long as they are light and small - you don't want them to slide and hit your guinea pigs.  ,  put some veggies your guinea pigs like into the cage.  ,  put your guinea pigs in to the cage and put the cage in the car on a seat with the seat belt done up.  talk to your guinea pigs whenever you get the chance.  try to pull pull over at a rest stop every hour.  when you have reached your destination, move your guinea pig into a proper hutch or cage, away from direct sunlight. 

 If you suspect you may have an allergy to guinea pigs (or any other potential allergen), the first thing you should do is visit an allergist. An allergist can help you determine whether or not your guinea pig is the problem and advise you on how to limit/avoid exposure and treat your symptoms.Allergists treat both allergies and asthma (especially asthma induced by an allergic reaction). Your allergist will most likely conduct a round of tests, which may include skin exposure tests, to confirm that guinea pigs are the source of your allergies. See an allergist right away if you experience prolonged allergy symptoms, coughing/wheezing, shortness of breath, or any other quality of life issues associated with a suspected allergy. In rare cases, extreme allergies may cause anaphylaxis, a potentially fatal reaction. If you experience vomiting, diarrhea, a sudden drop in blood pressure, difficulty breathing, a swollen tongue or throat, loss of consciousness, or severe hives or skin redness, go to an emergency room immediately.; , Antihistamines are one of the most commonly-taken allergy medications. They are available over the counter or by prescription, and they come in tablet, syrup, or nasal spray forms.Antihistamines reduce your body's immune system response to allergens. An antihistamine can help reduce itchy skin, sneezing, and runny nose. Common over-the-counter tablets include fexofenadine (Allegra), loratadine (Claritin, Alavert) and cetirizine (Zyrtec). Common prescription tablets include levocetirizine (Xyzal) and desloratadine (Clarinex). Frequently-prescribed nasal sprays include azelastine (Astelin and Astepro) and olopatadine (Patanase).  Decongestants reduce nasal swelling/inflammation, which can make it easier to breathe if you're experiencing sneezing or stuffy nose. They are often sold as nasal sprays, and can typically be acquired without a prescription.Some over-the-counter allergy medications pair antihistamines and decongestants together in one oral tablet. Decongestants aren't for everyone. They can have serious negative side effects for some individuals, including elevated blood pressure. If you currently have high blood pressure, glaucoma, cardiovascular disease, or an enlarged prostate, do not take decongestants unless your doctor has told you it is safe to do so.  Corticosteroid nasal sprays are inserted into the nostril, sprayed, and inhaled. This class of medicine is typically administered in low doses and tend to have far fewer side effects than oral corticosteroids.Common nasal sprays that are available without a prescription include fluticasone (Flonase), mometasone furoate (Nasonex), and triamcinolone (Nasacort AQ). If over-the-counter nasal sprays aren't enough, ask your doctor whether prescription-strength corticosteroids might help your symptoms.  If you're experiencing an allergic reaction to guinea pigs in your home, you may find it helpful to use an air filter or purifier.These products help remove allergens from the air, reducing respiratory problems and potentially reducing contact of airborne particles with your skin.   If you purchase an air filter/purifier, make sure you use a high-efficiency particulate air (HEPA) filters and air purifiers. HEPA filters and purifiers have been shown to reduce airborne allergens in some environments.  If you or a family member are experiencing guinea pig allergies, make sure your guinea pig is not permitted to roam freely around the house. This can help limit or even eliminate exposure to the allergens, which may make it easier to live with a guinea pig in the home for some individuals.Keep your guinea pig's cage in a designated area that can be avoided. Do not put it in common areas like the living room or kitchen, or in/near your bedroom. The room where you keep your guinea pig should ideally be uncarpeted for ease of cleaning. Wood, tile, linoleum, or vinyl flooring materials are much easier to clean and will not harbor allergens like a carpet would.  If you're allergic to guinea pigs, it's important to remember that the protein responsible for that allergy is mostly found in the animal's saliva and urine. However, that protein can be transferred to the guinea pig's coat or skin during grooming or passing waste, and may be transferred to your skin if you handle the guinea pig or its bedding. Therefore, the urine, saliva, hair, and skin dander should all be considered potential sources of allergen exposure.Exposure to these allergens can cause symptoms immediately, or after numerous days, weeks, months, or even years of exposure. If you are unable to avoid being around a guinea pig for whatever reason, make sure you avoid contact with these sources of allergens. If contact cannot be avoided, make sure you take protective measures.  Protective equipment may allow you to handle guinea pigs and their bedding or simply be around guinea pigs without experiencing allergic reactions. Protective equipment may not be enough, though, and you may need to take some type of allergy medication for extra safety.Wearing a dust mask can help prevent bronchial irritation and asthma-like symptoms, if you've experienced those symptoms in the past. Gloves and long-sleeved shirts can help reduce your skin contact with guinea pigs, especially while handling the animals themselves or cleaning their cages. Do not wear the long-sleeved shirt you wore while handling your guinea pig for other purposes unless it's been washed since the last time you came into contact with the guinea pig or its bedding.  Any time you've handled a guinea pig, cleaned its enclosure, or handled any materials from inside that enclosure, make sure you wash your hands as soon as possible.It's important to follow proper hand-washing techniques to ensure that your skin is clean and free of allergens to reduce or prevent a reaction.Get your hands wet under the faucet with clean, running water. The temperature doesn't really matter, since the point is to wash away allergens and not germs. Apply enough soap to adequately cover both hands with the lather. Work the soap between your hands, between your fingers, on the backs of your hands, and under your fingernails. Apply soap to any other part of your body that may have come in contact with allergens (wrists and arms, for example). Scrub the soap on your skin for at least 20 seconds. A common way to keep time is by singing or humming the "Happy Birthday" song twice in a row while you scrub your skin. If you've been bitten or scratched by a guinea pig, wash the site of your injury with soap and water for 15 minutes or longer to ensure that you remove the allergens from the wound. Rub your hands under the tap to wash away any traces of soap, which should also remove the allergens your skin came into contact with. Use a clean, dry paper towel to wipe your hands dry. Discard the paper towel when you are finished.  Depending on your situation, you may be able to find someone else willing to take on guinea pig duties for you. Ask others you live or work with if they would be willing to take over these responsibilities.If you work at a pet store, let your supervisors know that you've experienced allergic reactions to guinea pigs and request that you be excused from handling, feeding, or cleaning them. If your guinea pig is a pet at home, ask a family member or roommate to take over guinea pig duties. If you can't find anyone willing to do this, you may have to consider giving your guinea pig to a home where allergies won't be a problem.  Though it's always difficult to part with a pet, you may not have a choice if your allergies are severe. Talk to pet stores and adoption agencies in your region to see if they can help you find a new home for your guinea pig. You should also make sure that any home your pet ends up in is safe by talking to the prospective buyer/adopter and asking about his or her previous pet ownership and animal care experience.  If you're experiencing allergies around a guinea pig, there is a slight chance that it may not be the guinea pig itself causing your reactions. An allergist can help you identify whether you're allergic to some environmental factor, like hay/straw used for the animal's bedding.Hay and straw often cause asthma-like reactions, including difficulty breathing, increased production of mucus, and congestion in the chest.Many people experience dermatitis symptoms as an allergic reaction to skin contact with hay/straw.Dermatitis is usually characterized by red, itchy, or inflamed skin. It may look like a rash on the skin, usually at the point of exposure., Some people experience allergic reactions to wood shavings that are commonly used as guinea pig bedding. Talk to an allergist, or try out a different bedding material that's free from any potential allergens.Even if wood shavings themselves aren't the problem, many people experience allergies to the various coloring, fragrances, and oils added to guinea pig bedding. Eucalyptus oil and Manuka oil are common additives to guinea pig bedding. Make sure your wood shavings do not have any of these additives, or try a different bedding material altogether.  If bedding isn't the issue, there is a slight chance you may be allergic to the food you're feeding your guinea pig. Handling food or treats that contain an artificial color or other additives could be what's causing your reaction, though only an allergist can confirm this for sure.Artificial coloring agents that begin with the letter E, such as E110, are commonly added to dried food and treats. These coloring agents have produced allergic reactions in some individuals, though again, it's more likely that you're allergic to the animal itself or its bedding. Talk to an allergist to determine the source of your allergies and find ways to treat or avoid those allergens.  

schedule an appointment with an allergist.  take antihistamines.  consider taking decongestants.  use corticosteroid nasal sprays.  use high-efficiency air filters and purifiers.  confine your guinea pig in one part of your home.  protect yourself from the most common sources of allergens.  wear protective equipment when handling your guinea pig.  wash your hands after any allergen contact.  ask someone who's not allergic to handle guinea pig duties.  consider finding a new home for your pet.  rule out hay/straw allergies.  check if wood shavings are the problem.  try out other guinea pig foods. 

 Guinea pigs need a cage that is at least 7.5 square foot and even bigger for three. The bigger the cage the better! Guinea pigs love to run around (often called zoomies) and popcorning. They can't do this in a tiny amount of space. A large cage is essential for exercise too., Hutches are typically suited for the outdoors. You can purchase a simple one-story hutch with an opening and built-in hut or opt for a two-story hutch with a ramp. Two-story hutches provide more room but they are still limited. Hutches that expand outwards can also be bought., These cages cannot be kept outdoors and must be positioned indoors. C & C caging has become increasingly popular for it's large sizing, simple DIY, cheap material and easy expansion and access. If you would like an indoor cavy, a C & C cage is the one for you., Coops are just as good as a normal hutch. Coops can actually be a better alternative to a hutch as they're often bigger to fit a flock of standard chickens. Some have attached runs to enable your guinea pig to have access to the lawn., These are another satisfactory cage to buy but don't fall into the trap of getting a cage that's too small for your guinea pig or has a wired bottom. Purchase one that is at least 7.5 square feet.  Don't buy wired cages that are designed for mice, rats or hamsters. Guinea pigs are completely different to these smaller rodents and cannot withstand the same living conditions.  Runs provide a lot of beneficial space, but they aren't the safest or best of cages to use. They don't have much coverage from predators and cannot protect your guinea pigs from harsh weather conditions.  A run is best used for guinea pigs on sunny days to provide exercise and fun time for your cavy under your supervision.  Many pet shops tend to sell their customers cages that are way too small and are just not suitable for a guinea pig to live in. Most don't meet the minimal requirements of 7.5 square feet and are more designed for small rodents such as mice and hamsters rather than cavies., This is a once popular option (and still is) for those who don't put in the time to research the requirements of a guinea pig. These types of caging don't allow for proper air circulation or provide enough space., The cage you purchase should have a flat, solid bottom. Guinea pigs have sensitive feet. A wire bottom will promote the growth of bumble foot which will then require medical care., If you have cats and dogs or other wild predators in the area it's your job to ensure that your guinea pigs cage is safe and secure. Make sure that there are locks to the cages, a roof, solid floor and strong wood/metal.  A wired cage or C & C cage will not suffice outdoors. They aren't stable and don't provide protection from predators.  If you live in a very cold or hot climate, you should consider keeping your guinea pigs indoors or at least have a back-up indoor cage for your guinea pig to stay when the colder/hotter months peak. Guinea pigs are sensitive to temperature fluctuations and must eat a lot more to keep warm.  Ideally, the guinea pigs should be kept in a room that is approximately 65-75 degrees Fahrenheit. Guinea pigs don't do well in humid locations such as sheds and garages on hot days. Humidity encourages bacteria to grow and can cause a fungal infection. Guinea pigs have sensitive hearing so shouldn't be placed in an area that is prone to loud noises such as right beside televisions or loud stereos. If you have young children, place your guinea pigs cage in a room where you can monitor them and supervise any small children at the same time. As much as it's popular, keeping your guinea pig outdoors isn't suggested as they don't like being confined in solitary. Make your guinea pig feel a part of the family. Keeping them in your bedroom should also be avoided as it's another way for them to be forgotten.  If you're buying a cage that requires a ramp, or already comes with one, make sure the ramp you acquire is suitable for your guinea pig. The ramp mustn't be too steep where your guinea pig is prone too falling and it should have a good grip on it so that your guinea pig can go up and down with no problems., There are many types of bedding to avoid when it comes to choosing the perfect material for your guinea pig. This includes certain brands and even certain wood.  Never use cedar or pine shavings. These type of wood are toxic to guinea pigs and can cause serious respiratory problems. The oils in them get stuck in their lungs. However, pine can be used as long as it's aired out. Never use sawdust. Again, the dust that is inhaled by guinea pigs is a major cause of respiratory disease and sneezing. Never use corncob bedding. Corncob has a tendency to mold and is hard on their feet. Since guinea pigs have sensitive feet you should steer clear of corncob.Never primarily use newspaper. Although newspaper is perfectly fine itself and can be used as lining at the bottom of the cage, it isn't absorbent enough to use as your main bedding. Never use straw. Straw is tough and can easily cause eye injuries. It isn't absorbent enough to be used as bedding and can also be expensive.  Many guinea pig experts suggest to stay away from wood shavings as a lot of risks are involved with the use of this material such as oils that dry the skin, dust that ultimately causes respiratory problems and possible eye irritation., Fleece is a popular choice to use as bedding as it seems to have little to no problems at all. However, keeping your guinea pig on fleece will require more regular cleaning including spot cleaning daily and an overall clean weekly., Shredded bedding can be purchased from pet stores or you can shred your own. It's quite absorbent and soft on your cavies feet without any toxins in it. This makes it a safe material to use. However, it will absorb their urine and make the smell linger., CareFresh helps eliminate odours and is soft on the guinea pigs feet. However, some tend to avoid unnaturally scented or colored bedding to lessen any risks., Aspen is another popular choice as it contains no toxic oils, unnatural scents or dyes. It's completely natural and safe to use. You can buy this specific kind of bedding at pet stores., Hay can be quite absorbent, natural, safe and help control odours. However, it's quite pricey if you don't buy it from the right place. Pet stores are notorious for overcharging when it comes to hay. But you can easily purchase hay from equestrian centers or farm stops for approximately $5 a bale., You can opt for a water bottle or a water bowl which are completely different to each other. You can always buy both if you have more than one guinea pig.  Water bottles keep bedding, food and hay out of the water if your guinea pig is living in a smaller area but they're notorious for leaking and soiling the bedding. Water bowls don't leak and are a more natural way for your guinea pig to acquire water. But they can get messy if you use wood shavings as bedding or keep their food/hay nearby.  The guinea pig pellets should be kept inside the bowl for hygienic reasons and to keep them from spoiling. You can purchase two if you would like to keep their vegetables in a bowl also or even more if you have two guinea pigs (or more) that require 1 cup of vegetables each., Guinea pigs are prey animals; their instinct is to hide when in fear. You need to have at least one or two hide-outs for your guinea pigs as a safe place and a relaxing centre. One of the worst things you can do is stress your guinea pig out, and with the option of seeking refuge in a hut, you can reduce stress levels., Toys help stimulate the mind and encourage exercise and, of course, promote fun and enjoyment! Toys are a great way to reduce boredom, depression and even loneliness. However, don't overcrowd their cage with toys. Guinea pigs need space to run too!  Toy obstacles can promote exercise whilst chew toys can help prevent dentistry problems as guinea pig teeth are forever growing.Consider toys such as igloos, tunnels, bridges, wood blocks, cat toys (with bells on them), cage accessories, hammocks, cosies, etc. Don't buy wood toys that splinter, wire balls or any toys that can be a choking hazard.  Hay racks can help bundle the hay together and keep it in place, making the overall space of the cage cleaner and more hygienic. However, avoid wire hay racks and opt for cotton bags/sacks instead. There are a number of incidences of guinea pigs getting their heads/bodies stuck in between the wires., Guinea pigs need their cages cleaned at least once a week and sometimes daily if you decide to spot clean (especially if you're using fleece bedding). You will need a brush, cloth, gloves, pet-friendly antibacterial spray, scooper, bin bags, etc., This is optional and most apply to long-haired breeds such as peruvians and shelties. However, you can choose to have some grooming products set aside for whenever you need it. You could also optionally book an appointment with a professional groomer.  Purchase a soft bristled brush. Long haired guinea pigs require daily grooming to prevent knots and matting from forming in their fur. Purchase clippers. Long-haired breeds such as Shelties have constant growing fur that require clipping annually (or perhaps every few months). Buy nail trimmers. Occasionally you might have to purchase nail trimmers to clip your guinea pigs over-grown nails.  Unless you got your hutch home already assembled on a trailer it will require assembling, including store-bought hutches. Hutches are quite easy to assemble providing that you have the instructions and all the parts to it., Your hutch should be out of direct sunlight and preferably in a weather proof area under the roof of the house. The area should be well ventilated, secured away from predators (and other pets) and not too cold or too hot., Straw or wood shavings is recommended for hutches. Ones that go directly on grass will only need bedding in the inside area. Consider lining the hutch with newspaper first and then your main bedding. Guinea pig urine can stain bottom of wooden hutches. The newspaper should catch any leaks.  Hutches are best without the use of fleece.  Water bottles can connect to the wire bars of the hutch or you can opt towards a water bowl instead. Keep your water bowl a short distance from the pellets to prevent mess., Guinea pigs benefit with at least two shelters to escape to when in fear, especially in an outdoor hutch where many wild animals can scare your guinea pig., Avoid overcrowding the hutch and keep most of the toys outside at the bottom level if it's a two-story hutch. Cosies can be kept in the inside area but to a minimum., Most hay racks can be pitched up between the wires of the hutch, even cotton hay racks. The hay rack would be best positioned on the bottom story of the cage or away from the water bowl.  Remember, guinea pigs will make a lot of mess when it comes to hay. They like to hide in it, pull it out and sleep in it.  The ramp shouldn't be too steep but should have a good grip on it so your guinea pigs can move up and down without any struggles or slips. It should optionally have juts to make the grip better., Firstly connect the grids which should be able to snap together easily with connectors. Then you will have to set the coroplast at the same length as your grids.Make sure the opening of the cube grids aren't too big/wide enough for your guinea pig to fit it's head through. If it's head can fit through then it's body will fit through too.  C & C's are not outdoor cages as they aren't secure or weather proof at all! Keep it in a room where you can supervise any young children but also keep it away from pets and loud noises. However, do not isolate the cage. The guinea pigs should feel a part of the family not placed in solitary confinement., Your bottom layer should be lined up with newspaper for extra absorbency and to catch any leaks, and then your primary bedding. Fleece is best suited for C & C cages, but it doesn't limit you to the choice of many other types of bedding such as wood shavings or CareFresh., Water bottles can be hooked onto the grids and your bowls can be positioned beside your water source (unless you're using a bowl). Don't place the pellets directly under the water bottle as bottles have the tendency to leak which will spoil the feed., In an open cage without a lid, you should have plenty of coverage with the use of huts, bridges, shelters and hide-outs to help your guinea pig feel safe and secure and to give them a place to run to when in fear. At least two should be satisfactory for your guinea pig - the more guinea pigs the more hide-outs!, A spacious C & C cage could benefit with some toys for your guinea pigs entertainment. You could add various tunnels, hammocks and toy balls., You can hook the hay rack onto the grid or, if you don't have one, place a pile of hay in the centre of the cage. Most hay racks can be purchased online or in pet stores. Avoid wire racks however., Coops are very similar to hutches but most are a lot bigger than guinea pig hutches. You can assemble them in the same manner. They should come with instructions and all the necessary parts to assemble., Coop best dwells on grass, which will save you on bedding expenses. There's no need for lining the bottom layer with bedding as long as the coop is resting on grass. Most coops can go in direct sunlight as their construction and frame offers permanent shade for your piggy, but keep it under the shade of a tree on hotter days., Coops can go on grass so it saves you spending a fortune on bedding. But the nesting box/area still needs to be lined up with bedding. It's suggested to line a bottom layer of newspaper and then shavings/hay., Like other cages, the bottle can grip onto the grids/wiring. However, keep your pellets away from the edges of the cage as sudden rainy showers can spoil the unprotected food. Keep it under the nesting box/ramp., The ramp shouldn't be too steep and should have a proper grip via soft sandpaper or juts in the ramp structure. If your guinea pig is slipping or struggling to go up and down the ramp, you might need to make some adjustments as the ramp is designed for chickens rather than rodents., Guinea pigs still need a place to escape to even in a protected coop. If your guinea pigs live outdoors it's important for your guinea pigs to have a quick place to hide, especially on the lower level., Tunnels, cosies, toy balls and wood blocks can all make the coop seem a lot homely and friendly to your guinea pigs. Avoid adding too many toys, however., The hay rack should be able to clip onto the grids of the coop. Opt for cotton hay racks instead of wire hack racks which are proven to be dangerous to your guinea pig. You should place it at the bottom of the cage., Wired cages are just as easy to assemble as hutches and C & C caging. They're actually very similar to C & C cages and can be set up the same way., Wired cages aren't suitable to go outdoors and should be kept inside your home. The cage offers no protection from predators or harsh weather conditions thus why it should be kept inside of your house where the guinea pig can get plenty of family interaction., The type of bedding you use is very similar to C & C cages. Fleece is the most popular options, however you can still use any other bedding choice available. You should line newspaper at the bottom to ensure extra absorbency and so that you can catch leaks., As usual, the bottles can be hung up by the grids whilst pellets should be placed in the bowl and away from the water source to prevent leaks into the food., You should provide at least two huts for your guinea pig, however keep it at a minimum as the space is limited., Space availability in wire cages can be limited, so keep the toys to a minimum. The maximum might be three or four. Remember to add various toys such as tunnels, wood blocks and hammocks for your guinea pigs to play with., As mentioned in the steps above you can hook the hay rack to the cage, but avoid using wired hay racks with can pose a potential hazard to your guinea pig. 

consider the size of the cage.  consider a hutch.  consider a cubes and coroplast cage (or c & c).  consider a chicken coop.  consider wired cages.  consider a guinea pig/rabbit run.  do not fall for flimsy pet store cages.  refrain from buying aquariums for your guinea pigs.  don't purchase a cage with a wire bottom.  make sure the home is predator proof.  place the cage in a satisfactory location.  purchase a suitable ramp.  steer clear of toxic materials.  be aware of reviews on wood shavings.  consider using fleece.  consider the use of paper bedding.  consider carefresh.  consider aspen.  consider the use of hay.  purchase a water bowl or bottle.  purchase a food bowl.  buy huts, bridges and shelters.  consider optional toys for your guinea pig.  purchase a hay rack.  purchase cleaning products.  purchase optional grooming products.  assemble your hutch.  place it in a suitable location.  line it with bedding.  position a feeding and drinking station.  place your huts/shelters in the hutch.  add any toys and cage accessories.  set the hay rack in the hutch.  make sure your guinea pigs ramp can be safely used.  assemble your c & c cage.  place your c & c cage in a suitable location.  line up your bedding.  position the feeding and drinking station.  place your huts/shelters in the cage.  add toys and cage accessories.  set the hay rack in the cage.  assemble the coop.  find a suitable location for the coop.  add bedding.  position the feeding and drinking station.  ensure the ramp is fully accessible.  place huts/shelters in the coop.  add toys to the coop.  set the hay rack in the coop.  assemble the wired cage.  find a good location for the cage.  add bedding to the cage.  position the feeding and drinking stations.  place huts/shelters in the cage.  add toys to the cage.  set the hay rack in the cage. 

 Guinea pigs can be housed in three different types of cages; C & C, hutches or runs. You can purchase these from warehouse/pet stores or build your own. The cage must be at least 4 square feet for each guinea pig housed in it (the more the better) or at least 8 square feet for two.  Don't fall into the trap of buying inappropriate sized cages from pet shops that do not hold enough space for guinea pigs. If you want to keep your guinea pig indoors then a C & C cage is recommended. Hutches are recommended if you're keeping your guinea outside. The cage must have a solid floor. Don't purchase one with a wired floor as guinea pigs have fragile feet. Wire flooring can and will easily cause bumble foot. Most C & C cages do not have lids. If your cage is going outdoors, you have small children or dangerous pets in the house then you will need a lid on your cage. Do not use an aquarium for a cage as the glass sides don't provide good ventilation and most are terribly small.; , You will need two layers of bedding to ensure extra absorbency as guinea pigs tend to wee a lot. Your first layer should be either newspaper or puppy pads which will take in any leaks and protect the flooring. The second layer should be either wood shavings or fleece lined on top of the first layer.  Fleece is more suitable for indoor cages such as C & C cages but will require more regular cleaning and possibly spot cleaning. And cleaning the fleece is a bit more difficult as you will need to shake off and vacuum the fleece before washing it. Wood shavings require less regular cleaning and is generally easier to clean. It's also less smelly and more absorbent.  You will want to keep the cage in an area where it's safe, secure and away from any toxins or dangerous pets. Guinea pigs like somewhere that doesn't get too stressful or too noisy - somewhere that gets light traffic.  Keep the cage out of direct, constant sunlight. Morning sun is adequate for guinea pigs but they prefer to keep out of constant sunlight. Keep the cage away from any dangerous pets and small children. Dogs and cats will easily scare your guinea pigs as would small children who aren't supervised. Do not keep the cage in a garage where toxic fumes are given off from cars. This could be fatal to your guinea pigs.  Water bottles are less messy but some do leak. However bowls don't leak and are more natural to the guinea pig but if you use wood shavings expect to see some mess.  Some guinea pigs prefer to drink from bottles whilst other like bowls as a more natural instinct. Ask the previous owner of the guinea pigs to see which one they use. Remember to never add vitamin supplements to your guinea pigs water as it isn't effective and your guinea pig could refuse to drink.  Your guinea pig will need somewhere to eat. Purchase two bowls - one for pellets and one for vegetables. You should avoid chucking their food on the ground as it's unsanitary., Guinea pigs will need pellets and plenty of vegetables every day. Pellets should be unlimited however whilst they need 1 cup of mixed vegetables a day (each). So make sure to plan ahead!  Make sure to purchase plain pellets rather than a guinea pig mix. Guinea pigs will pick out their favourite treats out of a mix which results to them not eating what they actually need. You can also optionally purchase commercial treats if you plan on training your guinea pig. However, treats should be kept to a limit due to the high sugar content.  Guinea pigs need an unlimited supply of hay as they are grazing animals. If they aren't constantly chewing on something their digestive tracts can shut down.  Purchase a reliable, good quality manufacture of hay such as oxbow and/or timothy hay. Alfalfa should only be fed to guinea pig pups and nursing or pregnant sows.  An hay dispenser will lessen the mess of hay and make it last longer rather than scattering the hay on the floor. You can purchase a hay dispenser from a pet shop or use a small paper bin instead., A main criteria that needs to be met for guinea pigs is entertainment and comfort through toys and tunnels.  You should have at least two huts/tunnels or one hut/tunnel per guinea pig. Guinea pigs like being hidden and need a place to run to when scared or in conflict. You can build a critter-safe hut or find one at a pet store. Some log tunnels even act as a double as they import into bridges due to their flexibility (if tied together with string). Toys are a great boredom buster for guinea pigs but make sure the toy you purchase is safe and has no negative reviews. Some toys can be dangerous so watch out. Something as simple to chew on could be a great and beneficial toy for your guinea pig and help grind down their large teeth.  

purchase or build a cage.  line the cage up with absorbent bedding.  choose where to keep the cage.  decide on water bottles or water bowls.  purchase a food bowl.  purchase food prior to the arrival of your guinea pigs.  choose your hay.  purchase a hay dispenser.  purchase huts, tunnels and toys for your guinea pig. 

 Monkeys are in the order of primates, which is divided into families of New World primates (smaller, tree-dwelling monkeys from South America) and families of Old World primates (larger, ground and tree-dwelling monkeys from Asia and Africa). Each type of monkey has unique characteristics that affect how they fare as pets. Before you decide which type to get, conduct a lot of research on its characteristics. Read books, talk to owners, and get to know as many monkeys as you can in person.   Squirrel monkeys, capuchins, spiders, and macaques are all types of monkeys people keep as pets. Some are more social, while others can be on the nervous side. These monkeys all have the same general care requirements, though larger monkeys will need more space than the smaller ones. Apes, such a chimpanzees, gibbons and orangutans are not monkeys and should not be kept as pets. They are much stronger than humans and can become quite dangerous in a domestic situation.; , Bringing a monkey into your home is almost as big a commitment as deciding to have a child. Monkeys require attention all day, every day, and unlike cats and dogs, they cannot be left at home for extended periods of time. Once your monkey bonds with you, he will want to follow you wherever you go, and if you try to leave him by himself he will become bored, depressed and aggressive. Monkeys can live for 20 to 40 years, so bringing one home is a commitment to spend a significant portion of your life providing for your monkey's needs. Before you decide to get a pet monkey, ponder the following facts about life with a monkey:   The monkey may become aggressive. When monkeys are babies, they are dependent and sweet, like baby humans. But when they reach sexual maturity, which happens around age 3 or 4, their behavior can become unpredictable. Monkeys are wild animals, and unlike cats and dogs, they have not been socialized to live with humans over thousands of years. Even a monkey who has bonded with a human as a baby may unpredictably bite and attack his owner or become quite difficult to live with as an adult. You'll have to say goodbye to your free time. Monkeys cannot be left to their own devices. They need constant attention and care, or else they can end up hurting themselves or someone else. And since they tend to bond with just one person, it's difficult to find a good monkey-sitter when you need some time to yourself. Your monkey may prevent you from having relationships you want. Monkeys tend to bond with just a few people. Having a monkey might prevent you from getting intimately involved with potential partners to whom the monkey has a negative reaction. Monkeys don't get along well with children, so having a monkey could keep you from starting a family. All that said, if you are one of the unique people with the temperament and discipline it takes to devote your life to the safety and care of your monkey, you may be rewarded with an amazing experience. Monkeys are intelligent, endlessly entertaining, and sometimes incredibly affectionate. Many people who share their lives with monkeys embrace the challenges and wouldn't trade their time with their beloved pets for anything.  It is illegal to have a pet monkey in many states, and more states will probably pass laws against the practice in the future. For this reason, it's difficult to move to a new state or travel across state lines when you own a monkey. It's illegal to bring a monkey into the US, so that means you can't travel abroad with your monkey and then try to bring him home.   Some states allow monkeys to be kept as pets, but have strict regulations as to the conditions under which the monkeys should be contained. Regulations regarding pet monkeys are different in countries outside the US. Look into the laws in your jurisdiction to find out whether there are any restrictions on which animals you can keep as pets.  When you've decided that it's time to get a monkey, do research in your area to find a dealer or breeder with an established reputation as someone who can be trusted. They should have a USDA permit number, which is required of all breeders in the United States.   Ask the dealer or breeder for the contact information of someone else who has bought a monkey from them. That way you can check into the monkey's health and behavior.Expect to pay upwards of $1,000 for a monkey of any species. A baby squirrel monkey can cost over $8,000. Older monkeys are less expensive, but much more difficult to handle once you bring them home. Before you make a purchase, visit with the monkey you'd like to buy and make sure you have a connection and can see yourself living with the monkey. Never purchase a monkey from outside the country. It's illegal to ship a monkey from outside the United States.  Before you bring a monkey home, it's important to establish a relationship with an exotic animals veterinarian. A regular veterinarian will not have the necessary expertise and equipment to care for a monkey. Monkeys are prone to catching some of the same illnesses that humans have, as frequently as humans, so you can expect that your monkey will get sick from time to time. An exotic animals vet will also be a good resource for you when you have questions about your monkey's needs or behavioral issues., Your pet monkey might spend time out of his cage, but he'll need a place to stay at night and during times when you aren't available to play. A monkey's cage should be quite large, the bigger the better.Monkeys need plenty of room to run around, explore and play, especially if they're going to spend more than an hour or two at a time in the cage. If the cage is too small, the monkey will become agitated and potentially aggressive.   You can purchase a monkey cage, but many owners prefer to build their own so they can customize them to their personal space. Wooden or steel poles and chain-link fencing make good materials for monkey cages. You may want to have an outdoor monkey cage as well as one indoors, or build a monkey cage attached to a heated outdoor shed that will provide shelter for the monkey. Be sure to follow your state's regulations regarding the dimensions, entryways and locks on monkey cages. In some cases the regulations differ according to what type of monkey you own. Monkeys like to climb, so provide a cage with plenty of height. Add branches, hanging ropes, and other features that will allow your monkey to climb around the cage.  Most monkey owners allow their pets to spend time around the house, rather than just in their cages. Monkeys are curious, intelligent creatures that will get into everything available to them, so you'll need to take the time to remove items that could cause them harm or suffer damage. Since monkeys can climb, your monkey-proofing will have to be more extensive than baby-proofing would be.   Don't let monkeys have access to anything with a cord. Make sure all electronics are out of their reach. They'll tear down curtains, knock over lamps and chew on furniture. Put away any items you aren't comfortable letting them destroy. You might want to have one or two designated "monkey rooms" that the monkeys are allowed to play in, and have the rest of the house be off-limits. Remember that monkeys can turn doorknobs and open windows, so if you're planning to let the monkey stay there unsupervised, you'll need to make sure the room is as secure as a cage would be, with locks and bars on the windows.  Monkeys keep their own bodies clean, but they leave a mess wherever they go. They aren't easy to house-train, and they excrete whenever and wherever they choose. Some people put diapers on baby monkeys, but this isn't usually possible once the monkeys mature. Rather, you should plan on cleaning up after your monkey at least once a day to maintain sanitary conditions in the cage and in your home.  Monkeys should always have access to fresh water that they drink from clean water bottles. You can use baby bottles for this purpose. Some monkeys may prefer to take their water from a dish, and some might like to have both options. However you administer the water, make sure there's no chance the monkey will run out.  Monkey biscuits, or commercial monkey food, should be fed to your monkey every single day. These biscuits contain the right combination of vitamins and minerals to meet your monkey's needs. In addition to monkey biscuits, monkeys enjoy cut up fruit and fresh or steamed vegetables.You may also feed your monkey grasshoppers, mealworms, cooked chicken (with no spices), hard boiled eggs, yogurt, rice, grain and nuts. Do not feed your monkey anything that is considered "junk food" for a human. Sugary treats, ice cream, baked goods, snack foods, fast food, and raw meat should never be fed to a monkey. Depending on the type of monkey you have, you may also need to supplement his diet with extra vitamins. Monkeys kept inside may need extra vitamin D to account for the lack of sun exposure.  Monkeys need a lot of variety and stimulation in order to be happy. In the wild, they spend most of their time climbing around trees and looking for food. Simulate that experience in your monkey's cage and around the house by providing lots of interesting things for the monkey to play with and pull apart.   Try hiding the monkey's food inside a box, or in a container with small holes that the monkey can reach one hand into. The monkey will have fun trying to figure out how to get to the food. Give the monkey stuffed animals, balls, and other toys to throw around and play with. Switch out the toys frequently so the monkey won't get bored.  Monkeys are social creatures, and when they're left alone for long periods of time they grow very unhappy. Spend a few hours playing with your monkey every single day. As you bond with your monkey, he'll start trusting you enough to climb up your body and give you hugs or even kisses.   If you have more than one monkey, less social time is necessary. Many monkeys are happier living with others of their kind. If you can afford more than one, they'll live happily together in the same cage.  Hitting or yelling at a monkey will cause him to become afraid of you. It's also completely ineffective if you want to control your monkey's behavior. Remember that monkeys are wild, and they simply can't be trained to do exactly what you want them to do. From time to time they'll exhibit behaviors you might not like. Punishing them will only hurt your relationship.   The best way to deal with negative behaviors is to make sure the monkey isn't lacking something that he needs to be content. Does he have enough stimulation every day? Is he getting plenty of exercise? Are you playing with him enough? Monkeys that are afraid or agitated might bite from time to time. Again, you can't deal with this by punishing the monkey. Instead, get to know his moods and learn to leave him alone when he might be in the mood to bite.  It's not a good idea to take your monkey out in public, or invite people to your home to play with him. Monkeys are too unpredictable. Your monkey can get taken away in an instant if an accident happens. If your monkey so much as scratches someone, an Animal Control officer has the right to confiscate him to test him for rabies. When exotic animals are confiscated, they are often euthanized, since there is no law requiring a quarantine period for exotic animals (as there is for domesticated animals like cats and dogs).   If you have to go out of town and leave the monkey in someone else's care, make sure it's someone the monkey has met many times and has come to trust. Leaving the monkey with a total stranger could be stressful for him and lead to dangerous consequences.  Say his name when you feed him or offer them a toy, so he'll begin to learn it. When he responds, give him a treat and praise him. Teach him commands by showing him how to act. For example, if you say "dance," start hopping around and dancing. When he learns a trick, give him treats and praise him.  

research monkey species.  be ready for a huge commitment.  find out if it's legal to own a monkey in your state.  find a dealer or breeder with an excellent reputation.  find an exotic animals veterinarian nearby.  build or buy a monkey cage.  monkey-proof your house.  keep the monkey's space clean.  provide clean water bottles every day.  feed him monkey biscuits, fruits and vegetables.  give the monkey plenty of toys and stimulation.  play with the monkey every day.  never punish a monkey.  do not let the monkey play with strangers.  have fun communicating with your monkey. 

 It is most likely that monkeys will be attracted to residential areas if they think they can access food easily. Before you think about installing any alarms or security devices to repel moneys you should make sure you are not encouraging them to enter your neighbourhood. The first thing to do is check that there are no open or inadequately secured bins which monkeys can gain easy access to.Use monkey-proof bins which can be properly secured and will not attract monkeys. You can secure bin lids with an elastic strap or bungee cord.Tie all refuse bags with a double-knot and make sure that no food waste is left lying around, or spilling out of the bins. Having easily accessible food in rubbish areas will encourage monkeys to move further into residential areas and even enter houses.; , As well as ensuring that food waste and rubbish areas are closed off and monkey-proofed, it is essential that you and your neighbours do not feed monkeys in the area. If the monkeys get fed they will come back looking for more food. You can try to cut off their access to human sources of food so they continue to forage in their natural habitat not in urban areas.Do not feed monkeys or any other wild animals or you will attract them to where you live and make repelling them much harder.Preventing and discouraging the monkeys from entering human settlements is the most important first step. Once monkeys know there is a food source they are likely to visit every day., If you have fruit trees around your house or in your neighbourhood don't forget that these are a potential food source that could attract monkeys. You should harvest any fruit trees as soon as possible in order to reduce the chances of monkeys finding the fruit.If this is a consistent problem, consider whether you should continue to cultivate fruit trees.   If you are growing vegetables in the ground, be sure to cover them with a strong wire mesh that is designed to resist primates., As well as securing all the bins, it is also important not to make it easy for monkeys to enter your house to look for food. To do this, ensure that all windows are secured. You can simply close the windows, or monkey-proof them with a mesh covering.Meshing a window and keeping food out of sight will discourage curious monkeys., If you have monkeys in the area you should avoid using plastic bags as much as possible when you are walking around. Put any plastic bags inside canvas bags instead. Monkeys are curious and will snatch plastic bags which have food in and forage through rubbish bags. They can easily tear through the plastic so ensure they do not have the opportunity., If you live in an area that borders the edge of a forest where monkeys live, it's important that you make sure your neighbours understand what to do to discourage monkeys from entering your residential area. If you secure the bins, close windows, and don't feed the monkeys, but other people aren't so vigilant the problem won't be solved. Be sure to speak to your neighbours and explain how discouraging monkeys is the most effective way to deal with it.   Education and awareness raising are essential for long-term solutions to be successful. You need everyone to buy in and take responsibility. 

use fully secured bins.  don't feed monkeys.  pick the fruit from your trees.  monkey-proof all the houses.  avoid the use of plastic bags.  spread the word. 

 It also can't hurt at all to floss thoroughly. There's nothing worse than kissing someone with bad breath, or someone who still has leftovers stuck between her teeth.; , Your guy may want to kiss you, but may be nervous to do so in front of other people. The only prompting he may need to kiss you is to be alone with you. If you are with a group of friends or at a party, make up an excuse that leads to the two of you being by yourselves. Walk up to him, touch his arm, and tell him you want to speak with him. Or, grab his hand and ask him to come with you--he’s your boyfriend after all!   Stay close to him when you two are alone. If you're not that close to him or you keep something in between you two, he may think you don't want to kiss.  You don’t have to lay out a candlelit dinner to make a moment feel romantic. Anything that involves physical contact is good. If you can cause a bit of sexual tension, even better.   Invite him over to watch a movie or show. Let him sit down on the couch first--you could even make up an excuse to go make popcorn so that he settles in first. When you come back, slide in right next to him, leaving no room for him to chicken out and move away. Chances are, he will put his arm around you--a stepping stone on the path to kissing. Have a picnic somewhere secluded. When you two are picnicking, cuddle up close to him and hold out a strawberry or grape, suggesting with your actions that you want to feed it to him. Move your eyes from his eyes to his lips, and back up. When you feed it to him, let your fingertips lightly brush his lips.  If your guy is shy, he’s probably looking for a subtle way to get close to your face, so give him a reason to do so. Come up with a clever reason for the two of you to get close to each other. When he leans in, give him your best ‘smoldering-temptress-wanting-to-be-kissed’ look. Your ruse may create the moment he has been looking for to kiss you.Tell him that you want to get a better look at his eye color, or that you think there is something in your eye and you’d really appreciate him looking. You could also pretend that there is a crumb on his face--lean in when you ‘wipe’ it off and look up into his eyes.  Touch his elbow, hold hands, brush his hair out of his face or gently put a hand on his knee. Tearing down this barrier will help the both of you get past some of the hang-ups that you may have about physical contact.   Once you've broken the touch barrier keep on breaking it. When you laugh, place your hand on his arm. When you walk, grab his hand and hold it. Hopefully he will meet you halfway and begin grabbing your hand too.  Cuddling lets him know that you like physical contact, and that you are really comfortable with him. It is one of the biggest clues you can give him--and cuddling often leads to kissing.   While you are cuddling, lean your head against his shoulder. Entwine your fingers with his and lean back contentedly. All of these physical clues will tell your guy, “I love being close to you, now kiss me you silly boy!”  , Getting your guy’s full attention on your lips will make the idea of kissing you unavoidable. Do everything you can to keep his attention on your lips. A classic approach is to bite your lip gently while looking at him.Apply lip balm to your lips (and let him watch you do it.) Just keep in mind that lip gloss can be sticky, and thus make your kiss sticky. Use a lip balm or chapstick if you want to avoid a sticky situation. Run an ice cube over your lips if it's hot out. Not only will this look seductive, it will also give your lips a shiny look similar to balm. Lick your lips as if you’re eating something juicy. If you are eating watermelon, ice cream, or something that is drip prone, let a little get on your lips and then slowly lick it off. Just be careful to avoid looking like a slob when trying this--you are going for temptress, not ‘girl in serious need of a napkin.’  , Eye contact is a big part of clueing your guy in on the fact that you want to be kissed. Look him in the eyes and smile gently. Smile with your eyes. Glance from his eyes to his lips a couple times, perhaps adding a flirtatious batting of your eyelashes.   Here is another way to flirt with your eyes: when you two are looking at each other, especially when your faces are close together, hold eye contact for a moment, then drop your eyes bashfully. Look down for a moment, and then glance back up.  If you are hoping for a good night kiss, this is particularly important. When you are saying goodbye, hug him close and kiss him on the cheek. After kissing him on the cheek, look into his eyes. Even if he doesn't kiss you right then, you will have shown him that you are perfectly fine with kissing and physical contact.   When hugging him, you could place your head on his chest so that he holds you closer. If you do this, make sure to have some irresistible perfume on--he won’t be able to help but notice how delicious you smell.  Just because he is your boyfriend already doesn't mean you should stop flirting. Flirting keeps a relationship light and healthy--plus it will show him that you’re still very into him. Play coy and tease him (but not too much.) You could even tease him about not kissing you (which is a pretty direct way of saying ‘I want you to kiss me!’)   Send him flirty text messages when you guys aren't together. Flirtatious, funny texts are a great way to be cute with him even when you’re not around him. Just keep in mind that you don’t want to overload him with texts--that can be a turn off.  Guys like to feel like they are the big, strong men in girls’ lives--so make your guy feel that way. Even if you don’t necessarily need him to open a tightly-lidded jar, it's a nice confidence boost for him when you say something like ‘ooh! Look at those muscles!’ This is, of course, another form of flirting, but it is the kind that will boost his confidence--hopefully giving him the confidence to then lean in and kiss you!  , Being direct has its ups and downs. The ups are, you will most likely get results immediately, and it will show your guy how confident you are--which is very sexy. The downside is that the results you get immediately might not be the ones you want. He may still need some time to overcome his shyness, or he might not be as into it as you thought. No matter what, you will get results--and you are taking the pressure off him by telling him exactly what you want.   You can make your request sexy and still direct. When you are hugging goodbye, lean in close so that your lips brush his ear and whisper something like “Kiss me” or “I want to kiss you.” Chances are, your words, and that little brush of your lips, will be enough to make him lose any shyness he might have and go right in for the kiss.  

brush your teeth and tongue well before you meet up with him.  get him alone.  do something romantic.  create a clever ruse to get him close to you.  break the touch barrier if you haven’t already.  cuddle up with him.  work on your pucker.  flirt with your eyes.  give him some serious clues when you are saying goodbye.  flirt with your words.  make him feel confident.  be direct and ask him to kiss you. 

 While dogs and cats have lived with humans for thousands of years, capuchins are wild animals and not domestic pets. As a result, you should not hold them to the same standards as traditional pets, expecting them to be tame and quiet.If you want a quiet pet, a capuchin might not be the right choice. While capuchins might seem docile, calm, and friendly as infants, they often become louder, unpredictable, and sometimes aggressive as adults.; , The more you know about capuchins, the better you will be able to recognize what sort of behaviors or noises are normal and which ones might be an indication of a medical or emotional problem.Capuchins communicate with each other (or their human companions) using calls and vocalizations, which convey fear, excitement, happiness, and other emotions. Learn about their behavior in the wild and in captivity so you will be better able to interpret and understand these vocalizations.  In the wild, capuchins live in large, noisy groups of 10-35 primates.Since capuchins make noise in the wild, it is unreasonable and unfair to expect them to be quiet or silent in captivity. When kept in captivity, they are often more content in pairs., If your capuchin’s needs aren’t being met, they might become very loud. Here are a few basic guidelines to keep in mind:Make sure they have large spaces to exercise, both indoors and outdoors. Capuchins also need a lot of mental stimulation, so provide them with toys and puzzles that you change out regularly so they are not bored and acting out. Ensure they have a varied and balanced diet. In addition to primate food, offer them fresh fruit and vegetables, nuts and seeds, eggs, and insects. 

respect the differences between a capuchin and more traditional pets.  educate yourself about capuchins.  recognize that capuchins were not meant to be quiet and isolated animals.  consider your capuchin’s needs to address why they are being so vocal. 

 Let’s face it. It may be hard to get complete privacy in middle school, but you have to do the best you can to make sure that you and your girlfriend can step away from your friends to get some time together. You could step outside during the school dance, find some solo time during a party, or even go out on a date together. Just do the best you can to make sure that there’s no chance that your friends can barge in and start making fun of you and ruin the mood.   Avoid trying this in school for the first time. You’ve got to find a slightly more romantic location. This doesn’t mean you should try to kiss your girlfriend the second you’re alone together. The moment has to feel right, and privacy isn’t the only requirement for that.; , If you’re ready to kiss your girlfriend, then your breath better be ready, too. You don’t have to make dramatic gestures and eat ten breath mints, but you should brush your teeth if you know you’re going to see your girlfriend soon. And if you’ve both just eaten a meal, just quickly chew a piece of gum. Don’t make a big deal about it or she’ll know that you’re self-conscious about kissing her.   You can also put on some lip balm a few hours before to soften up your lips, but don’t use it right before you make a move or your lips won’t feel too pleasant.  Once you’ve got her alone, you can’t just swoop in for the kiss or it will feel a bit forced. Instead, you have to show your girlfriend that you care about her by making her feel special. Give her a compliment, like, “You look so pretty tonight,” or say something nice like, “I’ve had so much fun with you today.” You don’t have to try too hard to show her that you really do care about her. Turn off your phone, look into her eyes, and show her that she has your undivided attention.   If you want to kiss your girlfriend, then she has to feel like you really like her for who she is, and that you see her as more than just a person to kiss.  Before you kiss your girlfriend, you have to make sure that you’re on the same page. This is probably your first kiss, and it may be her first kiss, too, so you really want her to feel ready to make this move with you. Though you don’t have to think of kissing her as a huge deal, it will be something she’ll remember, so you have to see if she’s into it. See if she’s moving closer to you, looks happy to see you, looks at your lips, and self-consciously touches her face or plays with her hair. This is a sign that she’s interested in kissing you and that she may be a little nervous.   If she’s always trying to pull away when you’re alone together, and moves further and further away from you, then she may not be ready to take it to the next level with you. This doesn’t mean that she doesn’t like you, but it does mean that she’s not ready yet.  You shouldn’t go from standing two feet apart from your girlfriend to planting a big wet one on her face, or she’ll be caught off guard. Instead, move closer to her and make some physical contact. If you’re sitting, you can sit closer to her, put your hand on her knee, or play with her hair. If you’re standing, you can also touch her hair or her face, brush a hand along her waist, or just give her some kind of physical closeness to show that you’re ready to make a move.   This will also be a good time to see if she’s ready. Does she respond well to your touch, move closer to you, or even initiate some touching?  , If you’re kissing your girlfriend in middle school for the first time, there are a few things you may want to avoid:    French kissing. This is not for everybody, and most people don’t start French kissing until high school. For your first kiss, keep the tongue out of it, or your girlfriend may be unpleasantly surprised. If you come out of the gate with a French kiss, it’ll be too much, too soon. The roaming hands. Just because your girlfriend is ready for a kiss doesn’t mean she’s ready for you to start creeping all over her body. You can touch her in safe, PG areas to show her that you care, but you don’t want to creep her out by suddenly touching her in a place where she’s definitely not ready to be touched. The sneak attack kiss. Avoid just jumping in and kissing her without any indication of what’s going to happen. Though some element of surprise is nice, you don’t want your girlfriend to not know what’s going on when you make your big move.  Once you’ve made physical contact, all you have to do is move a bit closer to her until your faces are very close together. If you’re sitting, then you’ll both have to turn your bodies a bit. If you’re standing, you can put your arms around her waist and move closer to her. This should happen slowly and naturally, and you can make eye contact while you get closer.   You can lightly lick your lips a bit to soften them, if you’re not too obvious about it.  You don’t want to kiss your girlfriend head on, or your noses will get in the way. You should tilt your head slightly in one direction and she should tilt her head slightly in the other. Don’t worry if you don’t get it perfect the first time, or if you both don’t tilt your heads that much. This isn’t so crucial for a regular kiss, so don’t overthink it and tilt your head too much.  Here’s your big moment! Just lean forward a bit and make the connection, touching your lips to hers. Your lips won’t align perfectly, and you don’t have to worry about it. Relax your lips instead of puckering them, and just gently kiss your girlfriend’s lips. You can hold the kiss for a few seconds, or for as long as you both like.  This is something you can do while you kiss your girlfriend, if you don’t think it requires too much coordination. Just lightly run your hand over her cheeks or her hair while you’re kissing her. This can be something you do during Round Two, if you go in for another kiss after the first kiss is over.  While you’re kissing her, you can place your hands on her waist, her upper back, or her knee or shoulder if you’re sitting down. As long as you’re not touching her anywhere inappropriate, a little bit of touch can help the girl feel more in the moment. Don’t overwhelm her, though. If she’s not touching you except with her lips, only a bit of a light touch on your end will be enough.  This sounds silly, but it’s important. You may be so nervous or excited about finally kissing your girlfriend that you may forget to perform one of the most basic functions of the human being. That means breathing in and out, just as you normally would, while you’re kissing her. If you only kiss for a few seconds, breathing before and after is OK too.  After a few seconds, you can slowly pull away, while continuing to look into your girlfriend’s eyes. Don’t instantly pull away like you’ve been scorched by a flame. Instead, look at her, smile, and gently move away. You can brush her face or hair for an extra touch.  Let’s face it. Middle school can be awkward. Kissing for the first time can be weird. But you should do the best you can to make your girl feel comfortable, and to say something like, “That was nice,” to let her know it was a special moment for you. Don’t just take her hand and walk away to join the party and pretend it never happened. It can be hard for guys to express their feelings, but just do the best you can to make the girl feel special and to let her know you had a great time.   And hey, nobody’s stopping you from going in for that second kiss! If the first kiss went well, it’s okay to pull away and to go back for more…and more again!  

get some privacy.  freshen your breath.  make her feel special.  make sure she’s ready for a kiss.  make physical contact.  avoid the common kissing pitfalls.  lean toward her until your faces are almost touching.  tilt your head slightly.  kiss her.  caress her cheeks and hair.  use your hands (a little bit).  don’t forget to breathe.  slowly pull away.  end on a good note. 

 This may sound silly, but practice pursing your lips. When you kiss, you don’t want them to be tightly pursed, as though you were kissing your grandma. On the other hand, you don't want them to be too relaxed either.   Ideally, the first kiss will be soft but firm and passionate.; , Having a clean, healthy mouth will make you more kissable. Having visibly dirty teeth and bad breath will likely keep people from wanting to kiss you.   Make sure you brush twice each day, and floss at least once. It is good to get in this habit not only for your first kiss, but for your own health as well. Have breath mints handy so you can toss one in your mouth if you end up eating or drinking before the time you plan to kiss the other person. Don’t chew gum. Although it will give you fresh breath, having gum in your mouth during your first kiss can make it more difficult to enjoy the moment because you will have to worry about where the gum is in your mouth.  If your lips are chapped and dry, the kiss will be less comfortable for both of you. Use a lip moisturizer, such as vaseline, regularly.   If you are a girl, avoid sticky lip glosses. The person kissing you may find it weird and unenjoyable if your lips are very sticky and messy.  This is probably the hardest part of any first kiss. However, if you want to kiss the person you are with, look for signs that he or she wants to kiss you, too. Often, a good time is if you’ve been spending some time together alone, having good conversation.   Are they making a lot of eye contact? Obviously, this doesn’t always mean they want to kiss you, but if they make a lot of eye contact, they at least find you interesting. If they want to kiss you, often they will be staring into your eyes or looking at your lips.What does their body language say? If they have their arms folded across their chest, then they probably don’t want a kiss; however, if they have their body angled towards you, are sitting or standing close to you with arms open, then it’s likely a good bet.Remember that this moment could be planned or it could happen spontaneously. Try to stay calm and go with the flow. There are certain moments where it is more likely. For example, if it is the end of the night just before you both go home, or if you are alone in a quiet moment.  Although it is OK to take a quick peek every now and then, it is usually better to keep your eyes closed. If your partner realizes you have your eyes open, he/she might feel uncomfortable.It will also help you to relax if your eyes are closed.  When the kiss happens, don’t immediately try to stick your tongue in his/her mouth. Instead, start out by gently kissing with just your lips, and if the kiss continues to that, proceed slowly. There is no need to rush when it comes to kissing.  The worst thing you can do is to over think your first kiss.Remember that no matter what happens, it is only one kiss, and there will be many others. Once you get the first kiss out of the way, you can practice getting better at it.   Enjoy the moment! You only get one first kiss, and you will likely remember it for your entire life. Be present during the kiss. Don’t start thinking about how you can’t wait to tell your friends or write about it in your diary. Simply enjoy it.  Think about why you want to experience your first kiss? Is it because you think you have to in order to be “cool”? Or, is it because you feel that you actually want to have this experience?   There might be many reasons you want to experience your first kiss, but in general it is a good idea to wait until you feel ready for it.  Choose someone that you feel comfortable with, and who wants to kiss you back. Typically, this will be your boyfriend or girlfriend, but in some cases it may also be a close friend who wants to have the experience too. Whoever it is, it will be more enjoyable if it is someone you trust and feel comfortable with.   Although the cutest girl or boy in school might be an obvious choice, it doesn’t mean they are the best choice. You should choose someone you find attractive on the inside as much as the outside.  Ask trusted friends about their first kiss, and how they prepared themselves. Ask them what advice they can give you. If you feel comfortable doing so, you can also discuss it with your parents.   Don't be afraid to ask questions. Almost every one can remember the nervousness and worries they had before their first kiss.  It's likely that you will be worrying about all the things that could go wrong during your first kiss. Ignore these thoughts.Instead, let yourself think only positive thoughts.   For example, you can think about how you've taken good care of your lips and mouth, making you very kissable. You can think about how into you the person you will be kissing is, and how romantic it will be.  Although you will be nervous, remember that you deserve to be kissed! Believe that the kiss will go well, and although it may not go perfectly, it will all be OK.   Remember that even if it doesn't go perfectly, it is only the first of many.  Nearly everyone feels nervous when kissing someone for the first time. This is a biological reaction to our excitement, and doesn’t mean anything bad.Remember that this also goes for the person kissing you back. It can sometimes be a comfort to remember the other person is also nervous. If you do your best to act relaxed about the kiss, it will help your partner relax too, and you can both enjoy it.  Often, the first kiss will be everything you hoped it would be despite the fact that it didn't go "perfectly". However, if things aren't turning out so well, don't get angry. Instead, pull away from your partner, and smile. It will help both of you relax, and you can try again if you want to.  

practice kissing.  practice good oral hygiene.  have moist lips.  find the right moment.  keep your eyes closed.  avoid rushing.  relax.  decide that you are ready.  decide who you want to kiss.  talk with trusted friends.  ignore negative thoughts.  be confident.  understand that it is normal to be nervous.  keep a sense of humor. 

 If you do find a monkey has entered a residential area you shouldn't panic, but you should be prepared. Keep some big sticks, a hose, or another water spraying device handy at home. If you see a monkey you can scare if off without harming it. Monkeys will quickly learn that your neighbourhood is not a good place for them to return to.Do not approach the monkey directly, do not stare at it, and do not try to corner it. Identify an exit and encourage the monkey to leave by hitting the ground with a stick. Never hit a monkey. A strong jet of water directed toward the monkey can also encourage it towards the exit.If there are juveniles in a group of monkeys be especially cautious. Lower your head, keep your distance and move away., In extreme circumstances, it might be necessary to construct an electric fence around your settlement to stop monkeys from entering. This is not a straightforward task, and you should ensure you have taken the less dramatic steps of securing all bins and closing off any food sources before considering this. There is evidence that electric fences are effective at containing monkeys, and are unlikely to harm the animals if done correctly, but you will need expert help for this.If you think your monkey problem is this serious, contact a local government representative and ask them about electric fencing. If will not be cheap and in no circumstances should you attempt this on your own.  Increasingly, places and institutions frequented by monkeys are turning to ultrasound repellent devices to ward off the monkeys. These devices tend to be used where there are lots of people coming and going and it is hard to ensure that no rubbish or food waste is left accessible to monkeys in the area.   The sounds cause stress and discomfort for monkeys in the area, who will move away and avoid the sound. The impact on the monkey's health and well-being is uncertain, and the preventative methods should be used in the first instance. 

scare them off.  build an electric fence.  deploy an electronic sound repellent. 

 When they receive the physical exercise they need, capuchins will be more content and quiet.Capuchins need sufficient space to walk around in, climb, and jump. Provide them places to sit so that their tail hangs below their seat without dragging on the floor. Their cage size should be larger than 4ft. x 6ft. x 6ft, but if you have the space, an entire room would be more appropriate for your capuchin. “Cat trees” that you purchase at pet stores also make excellent monkey trees.  If your capuchin is loud and seems unhappy, it might be lonely and need companionship. Capuchins are social animals and they live longer, happier lives in captivity if they are not isolated.   Consider adopting another capuchin to keep your pet company.Capuchin monkeys also get along well with other species such as squirrel monkeys, so this is also an option for a companion. If you have to leave your capuchin alone, turn the television on and they will be less lonely and noisy while you are gone., Your capuchin might be vocalizing and acting out because it is bored and needs mental stimulation. To occupy and quiet your capuchin monkey, try out these toys or objects.Tire swings and climbing ropes provide them with a lot of entertainment. Capuchins like to handle things and tear them, so give them soft items such as cardboard. Make sure the toys do not have sharp edges or hazardous coatings. Capuchins like things that are bright and shiny.  Like other primates, capuchins are known to spend considerable time playing with their reflections in a mirror. This will provide great entertainment for your pet and help keep your capuchin quiet.Use a metal mirror instead of glass so your capuchin is not hurt if the glass breaks.  Provide your pet with food that doubles as entertainment and keeps them occupied.Give them fruits, seeds, or nuts that they have to crack, peel, or separate. A piece of fruit frozen in ice or a cob of corn will entertain and stimulate your capuchin, making him or her less likely to be noisy. For a fun treat, hide peanut butter and honey in a PVC pipe or box and give your capuchin a straw or stick to retrieve it. They will spend time focusing on this task instead of acting out.  It’s possible that your pet capuchin is being rowdy and noisy because it wants your attention.   Take time every day to play with your capuchin.  

make sure you have ample space so that capuchins can burn off energy and be less noisy.  find your capuchin a friend.  provide your capuchin with interesting toys and puzzles to keep them occupied.  give your capuchin a mirror to occupy their attention.  offer your capuchin foods that take time and attention to eat.  make time for your capuchin. 

 The success of training a capuchin to be quiet will depend on whether or not your capuchin respects you and bonds with you. Here are a few important things to keep in mind to increase the strength of your bond.Every time you go near your pet’s cage, stop and speak to your monkey. Call it by name. Offer it food or a treat. Make sure you care for your capuchin’s needs and play with them daily. Be patient because capuchins are known to be wary of strangers. Don’t expect to bond with them and train them overnight., To get your capuchin to listen and follow your commands to be quiet, you need to show your pet that you are in a dominant position.   Feeding, caring for, and playing with your capuchin will show them you are in charge of their care, and they will depend on you. Be kind, but firm. Do not use physical force to emphasize your point because your capuchin might respond aggressively and lose trust.  When your capuchin is quiet and calm, make sure you offer positive reinforcement in the form of a treat or praise.Marshmallows, yogurt covered raisins, mealworms, or another favorite food works well. You can also use a new toy or object your capuchin will find interesting.  If your capuchin is behaving badly and won't be quiet, put your pet in their cage, and walk away. Do not look at your capuchin or interact with it for about 15 minutes.This teaches your capuchin that their behavior is unacceptable. Because capuchins are social creatures, they will find this time out upsetting and try to avoid it in the future.  Physical punishment is not effective since capuchins often interpret this as a threat and respond aggressively.Taking these actions jeopardizes your relationship with your pet. Physical discipline often results in more negative, and violent behavior such as biting. If you feel yourself getting frustrated with your capuchin, it’s best to take a break so you don’t lose your temper., Use the same commands or words with specific actions so that your capuchin will associate the action with the command.   For example use “Quiet” when you want your capuchin to be quiet. Don’t change things and start using the command “Silent.”  , If your efforts to quiet your capuchin don’t seem to be working and they are unusually loud, it’s a good idea to ask for help from an expert.   Get in touch with your veterinarian to make sure your pet is not ill or injured. Contact an animal trainer. Although specialized trainers might be difficult to locate in your area, it is worth researching online. For additional resources and communication with experts, join the Simian Society of America, a nonprofit organization established to improve the welfare of primates in captivity. 

bond with your capuchin.  demonstrate that you are in charge.  reward your capuchin’s good, quiet behavior.  use time outs to punish your capuchin when they are loud.  do not resort to physical discipline to quiet your capuchin.  be consistent with your commands, especially when you want them to be quiet.  ask an expert for help. 

 Before you approach your crush, you want to ease into the dance and get comfortable. Talking with your friends is a great way to spend the first part of the dance. It also can show your crush if they are watching that you are a social and friendly person.; , Even if you are nervous at the prospect of talking to your crush, try to have confident body language from the beginning of the dance to the end of the night. Stand up straight, smile, and don’t try to hide yourself. People naturally attracted to confident and positive body language, and if your crush sees you looking uncomfortable or worried they might not want to dance.Even if you feel nervous, smiling and standing up straight can actually trick your body into feeling calmer and more confident. That’s why even if you are nervous, you should fake it till you make it. Try not to cross your arms or use other closed body language that hides your body. Also try not to hang your head; instead keep it up with your chin level. Also try not to fidget or anxiously tap your feet, as this will make you look nervous.  If you are comfortable dancing, dance with your friends at the beginning of the dance. This will show your crush that you like dancing, and may be open to the idea of dancing with them.Try not to dance with another guy or girl. If it seems like you like someone else, your crush will be less likely to dance with you.  If you see your crush looking in your direction, look at them and smile. Only do this if your crush is nearby or if they are looking at or near you. If you stare at them intensely, that might come across more creepy than cute.Making this non-verbal contact is a good first step because it opens up the window for them to come over and say hello, or even ask you to dance!  

hang out with your friends.  have confident body language.  dance with your friends.  catch your crush’s eye. 

 Most of the kissing that happens in middle school happens either between kids who are dating, or kids who are playing kissing games. To find a boyfriend or girlfriend:   Think about people you already know that you might have some special feelings for. Telltale signs that you like someone include being nervous or shy around them, getting excited when you think about that person or see them in the halls, and wanting to spend lots of time together.Sometimes people don’t find love interests among their friends, and if this happens to you, be open to trying new activities where you might meet new people, such as after-school activities, youth programs, and camps. If somebody asks you out, don’t be afraid to say yes, even if you aren't sure you like the person. Sometimes it just takes getting to know somebody to find you have a real connection.; , It’s not necessary to know this, but it can be a real confidence booster if you think the person you like feels the same way. It will also make it a lot easier to ask someone out if you think they like you too. If somebody likes you, that person might:Act nervous around you Show off in front of you Find common interests with you Like lots of things you do on Facebook and Twitter Message and text you often Steal glances at you in class, in the halls, or when you're out together  , You can't always wait around for love to find you, and sometimes you have to go out and grab it by the horns. If the person you're interested in doesn’t happen to ask you out, take the initiative and do the asking. This can be a really scary thing to do, but sometimes putting yourself out there is the only way you'll get what you want.   Chew some gum or pop a mint in your mouth before you ask so that your breath is minty and fresh. Find a time to ask the person when you two have a moment alone together, and that way neither of you will feel pressure from friends. Keep it casual, don’t be nervous, and don’t make a big deal about it. Say something like, “Hey, I was wondering if you would like to see a movie together sometime?” Or, “I was thinking that maybe if your free we could possibly hangout?!” Make sure you ask in person: don’t send a note, and don’t make a friend ask for you., Getting a boyfriend or girlfriend can be as easy as saying yes when someone asks you out or asking someone out who says yes. But once you get together with somebody, it’s important to start out slow. This means:   Taking time to talk and learn new things about each other. Holding hands sometimes. Doing things together a couple times a week, like going bowling, playing together at recess, or having lunch or dinner together.  Knowing when you're ready to take big steps in life can be hard, and kissing someone for the first time is one of those big steps. If you're wondering if you're ready to kiss someone, ask yourself:Do you think about kissing this person a lot? Do you have strong feelings for this person? Are you comfortable around this person? Does the thought of kissing this person make you happy and excited? If you answered yes to all or most of these questions, you’re likely ready to kiss that special someone!  , When you're ready to experience a kiss with your partner, there are two things you can do: either wait to be kissed, or initiate the kiss yourself. If you'd rather wait to be kissed, there are ways you can show that you're ready, including:When you hug, hold on a little tighter than usual, and rest your head on your partner’s shoulder Make lots of eye contact Smile a lot Try to find excuses to get close Touch your hair, as this is a sign of flirting  , You can also choose to initiate the kiss yourself, and there are signs you can look for that will demonstrate that your partner is ready to kiss as well. These include:Making eye contact with you Making excuses to get close or touch you Complimenting you often Blushing or laughing a lot around you Chewing gum all the time  , Sharing a kiss is something that most people like to do in private, so finding the right time to kiss can be important. For instance, when you pass in the hall in between classes probably isn't the best time to do it! There are lots of places where first kisses happen, including:Bowling alleys At the movies A school dance On a school trip At camp On the bus  , Kissing somebody can make you really nervous, but it’s important to stay as calm as you can, in order to avoid sweating excessively, throwing up, or getting too scared and not going through with it. Ways you can keep calm are:   Have a plan about when and where you're going to do it. Don’t rush yourself. If you aren't actually ready, you might feel extremely nervous before a kiss, and this could be your brain’s way of saying you aren't ready. Don’t make too big a deal out of it. When you're going to do something that scares you, it can be easy to make it seem like a much bigger deal than it is, and this can make you even more nervous! Have your plan ready and then keep your mind off the kiss until you're ready to do it.  Figuring out what another person wants based on signals is hard, and it’s easy to misinterpret what people want just based on body language. To avoid making a mistake, simply ask your partner before going in for the kiss.   You can say something like, “May I kiss you?” or “How about we kiss now?” Don’t worry about thinking that asking might ruin the mood. Your partner will appreciate that you're being respectful and considerate, and that you want the moment to be special for you both.  When the time comes and you're both ready, just go for it! Sit or stand close enough that you can reach your partner without straining. Look your partner in the eye and tilt your head to one side. If your partner tilts to the other side, close your eyes and lean in for the kiss.   Pucker your lips slightly, and with your mouth closed, press your lips against your partner’s gently but firmly.You want to close your eyes before the kiss because keeping your eyes open can give the impression that you're dishonest.  Playing a kissing game at a party can be a good way to get a kiss. This method also works if you're trying to get a kiss from a crush that you don’t think feels the same way about you. To play spin the bottle:   Gather a group of at least four to six people, and get everyone to sit in a circle. Place an empty bottle in the center of the circle.Draw straws, pick the oldest person, or find some other way to determine who goes first. The person who goes first will spin the bottle. When the bottle stops the tip will be pointing at someone, and the spinner has to kiss that person. The person who got kissed spins next, and so the game continues.  Seven minutes is another kissing game, but in this one, the two people selected to kiss are sent to a closet alone together for seven minutes. During their time in the closet, it is expected that the two people will be kissing.   Sit everyone in a circle and place a bottle in the center. Have somebody spin the bottle. When the bottle stops, the tip will be facing one person and the end will be pointing to another. Those two people are sent to the closet for seven minutes. When they emerge, the bottle is spun again and the game continues.  In this game, a piece of paper is passed around a circle from person to person via the mouth, and nobody is allowed to use their hands. To play this game:Sit all the players in a circle. Usually, players arrange themselves in a boy-girl-boy-girl pattern. Take a small piece of paper, such as a business card. The player who starts will press the paper up to his or her mouth, suck air in through the mouth to hold the paper in place, and remove the hands. The player with the paper then turns to the person on the left, and presses the paper onto the mouth of that person. As they connect, the person passing the paper exhales to release the paper, and the person who’s accepting the paper sucks air in to secure the paper to the mouth. The paper gets passed around the circle in this way, and the idea is that when the paper gets dropped by accident, the two people passing it will end up kissing.  

think of someone you might want to be your boyfriend or girlfriend.  figure out if that person likes you back.  ask the person out.  start slow.  figure out if you're ready to kiss.  signal that you're ready to be kissed.  pay attention to your partner’s signals.  find the right time and place.  muster your courage.  ask your partner for a kiss.  kiss your partner.  play a game of spin the bottle.  play seven minutes in heaven.  play suck and blow. 

 Talk to each other. Take it easy if your crush is shy. Talk about each other's interests, favorite movies, video games, music, etc.; , Once you've become friends, start partnering up in science class, trying to be on the same team in gym, playing sports together at recess, or just hanging out at the park to do some studying or skateboarding. It's always important to do something your crush likes to do, without making it seem like a date. Do not try to give hugs or affectionately touch each other in any way. You guys are just friends at this stage.  Once you think your crush likes you, start doing more activities together. When going to a field trip, go to interesting spots together. When you think you want to be more than friends, and you are ready, try asking the other to go out. Don't tell your friends what you're trying to do no matter how trustworthy they may be. They will find a way to embarrass you in front of your crush. Keep what you are doing together a secret; it's your personal business.  You really need to let your special someone know that you're cool. Don't be up in their face or act weird. They'll start to like you.  Once you guys are real good friends, go in for the big step. Ask them out. Make it simple. Don't go all crazy with the drama and flowers and all that crap. Just make it sound like your asking what the day's home work was.   Say something like: Would you mind going ____________with me on Friday? Or: Do you want to go to __________ with me next weekend?   Keep it really simple. If you make it too sudden or harsh, they may take it the wrong way.  If they say yes, good for you, you have a date. If they say no, don't go all big with the cold shoulder and drama. Maybe your crush just wanted to be friends. Treat that as a compliment––you don't know the future, so stay good friends instead.  They will get the wrong message. Keep your secret a secret until you know both of you want the whole school knowing. Once you tell one person, it just zooms like lightning everywhere.  

get to know each other.  start doing stuff together.  take it one step further.  play it cool.  ask them out.  deal with their response.  avoid pestering your crush. 

 If your crush is on the other side of the room, move to the general vicinity they are in. If they are sitting down, go sit down at a nearby table with some friends. If you and your friends are friends with your crush, join them where they are sitting, and try to make sure that you are sitting next to your crush. If they are dancing, dance with a group of your friends either in a group next to your crush, or join their group of friends.Hanging out near your crush before you approach them makes going up and talking to them less abrupt and more natural.  Say hello to your crush and ask them how they are doing. Say something like, “Hey Jamie, how are you?” or “Hey, what’s up?” If you’ve never talked to your crush before, introduce yourself.If at this point, your crush’s friends and your friends are hanging out together, it should be easy talk to him or her. If your crush is with his or her friends, approach them with some of your friends. This will make approaching your crush easier and won’t put you on the spot. While your friends talk to your crush’s friends, you can talk to your crush. If you and your friends don’t know your crush’s friends well enough to talk with them, wait to talk to your crush when they are alone getting food, checking their phone or coming back from the bathroom.  Giving your crush a compliment is a good way of keeping the conversation going. Since it’s a dance, your crush probably put a lot of time into their appearance, so complimenting them will make them feel happy that someone noticed.Say something like. “You look nice” or “I like your dress.”  , If you don’t know what else to talk about with your crush, just talk about the dance!   You could ask them how they are enjoying the dance by saying something like, “So are you having fun?” You could also talk about something specific about the dance by saying something like, “I really like the decorations that they put up!” or “Have you tried the punch? It’s really good.”  , If you and your friends are on the dancefloor near your crush and you start talking to your crush, don’t go on and on. A lot of people talk on the dancefloor while dancing, but the dancefloor isn’t the right place for a long conversation, since your crush might be more in the mood to dance than to talk.   If your crush seems like they are into the conversation, by all means keep talking. However, if you are doing most of the talking, keep in mind that your crush may be more in the mood to dance.  If you are talking to your crush while you both are sitting down, allow for pauses in the conversation and look over to the dancefloor as you pause. This is a non-verbal way of indicating that you are interested in dancing. You can also tap your feet or move a little to the music to show that you like the song. If your crush wants to dance with you, they may pick up on these cues and ask you to dance.If you are talking to your crush while dancing, a pause is also a good way to give them a window to ask you to dance. Giving non-verbal cues is a good method for girls to use if they don’t feel comfortable asking a guy to dance. Since the societal norm is for boys to ask girls to dance, girls may prefer to use this method of non-verbally communicating that they want to dance.  

get near them.  say hi to your crush.  compliment your crush.  talk about the dance.  keep the conversation short if you’re dancing.  give non-verbal cues that you want to dance. 

 If your crush hasn’t already asked you to dance, it may be time to take matters into your own hands. If you are sitting and talking to your crush, wait until a song comes on that you want to dance to before asking them. For example, you may wait for a slow song or a song that has a good rhythm.If you are already dancing, you may not have as big of a window to ask them to dance, since your conversation may be shorter. If you absolutely hate the song playing, or you feel like it’s too fast to dance to with your crush, try to keep the conversation going until the next song comes on.  When a song comes on you like, ask your crush, “Do you want to dance?” Keep the tone of your voice light and casual, and make sure to smile as you ask them.Always ask, even if you are dancing near each other. Unless your crush starts dancing close to you, don’t go up and start dancing in front of or against them. Asking them is cute and polite, whereas starting to dance up in their space can be pushy and creepy.If you’re a girl, don’t let society’s norms stop you from asking your crush to dance! There’s a good chance that they will say yes, and be flattered that you asked.  Many people get nervous about dancing, so your crush may be hesitant to dance even if they like you. If they say something like, "I'm not really good at dancing", offer to teach them some moves that are easy to follow. Even showing them over-the-top moves like "the sprinkler" is a good way to be goofy and get them comfortable. Your crush will feel less pressure if they know that you aren't expecting them to look suave or cool.   School dances often play songs that have specific steps. If your crush doesn't want to dance to regular songs, wait until one comes on like the electric slide that follows a routine, and offer to show them how to dance to it. If you don't know any specific moves or dance steps, you can also just say, "It's ok, I'm a terrible dancer so I won't judge." This is a good way of making your crush feel more at ease and willing to dance.  If your crush says yes, start dancing with them. However, don’t get too close. If you are slow dancing, keep about a foot between yourselves. If you are dancing to a fast song, still try to keep some space between you two., Try to see if your crush is enjoying the dance and wants to get closer. For instance, your crush could close some of the distance between the two of you, or if you are slow dancing they could wrap their arms to hold you closer. They also may look you in the eye and smile, which would be a good indication that they want to get closer., You’ve been dancing at a respectful distance. However, you may see that your crush is enjoying the dance and seems like they would be comfortable getting closer. If you are slow dancing, hold them a little closer to you. If you are dancing to a fast song, move and inch or two nearer to them., Once the song ends, see if your crush wants to dance for another song. If they stay close to you, or start dancing as soon as the new song comes on, it means that they would like to keep dancing. If they move away or give you a hug, it could mean that they enjoyed the dance, but they want to take a break.You can always ask, “Do you want to keep dancing?” if you’re not sure how they are feeling.  

wait until the right song.  ask your crush.  encourage them if they are nervous.  keep a respectable distance at first.  read your crush’s body language.  get closer.  assess the situation at the end of the song. 

 Confidence shows a boy you’re fully committed to engaging with him physically. Boys can be lazy, so showing a certain amount of confidence and effort can go a long way in improving the quality of a kiss. You may not realize it, but you have a lot to offer that particular boy you’re aiming to kiss, no matter how awesome or cute he is.   Appreciate all your qualities, not only your looks. This can range from your vocabulary and social skills to your passions and hobbies. If you feel confident on one particular aspect of yourself more than others, use that as a starting point and expand.; , A great way to inspire and maintain confidence is to wear an outfit you’re more than proud of. Pick out a top and bottom you think you could wear anywhere, whether that be a fancy restaurant or over to a friend’s house.   It’s easy to dress to the point that it appears as if you’re trying too hard. Don’t dress in your Sunday best or Prom ready, but wear an outfit you’re sure will grab his attention. Boys rarely dissect what women wear, they only know if they like it or not.  Style your hair in a way that makes you feel confident. Maybe you like to frame your face with bangs? Maybe you feel the most confident with straightened hair? Pick the one you feel the most confident in.   Like clothes, guys will rarely nitpick your hair and notice small imperfections. They’ll only know that it looks good or bad, so a little effort goes a long way.  Rock a luscious lip balm, lip-gloss or lipstick to make sure he notices how kissable your lips are. Pick a color that suits your skin tone and clothing selection. Maybe a deep, full red helps brighten your eyes or a light pink really suits the top you’ve picked out. Again, make a selection you're confident in.   These cosmetics will also help smooth – or at least bring attention to – any sort of chapped portions of your lips. The last thing you want to do is be ready to go in for the kiss and notice how rough and cracked they are.  Freshen up your perfume and breath before you intend to meet your potential kissing mate. Smelling nice – both in and out of your mouth – goes a long way in creating an inviting, welcoming persona. One of the most memorable features in people is their specific aroma – make sure yours is a good one.There’s a chance your boy will not take this into consideration when it comes to breath. It’s always helpful to pack some gum or mints before meeting up with your new kissing mate. If needed, you can have one and even offer one to the boy you intend on kissing.  Nothing says you’re interested like a little flirtation. If you’re confident, interesting, look the part and have created a welcoming moment, flirting can even open the possibility of your boy going for the kiss himself.   Smile. Nothing creates a friendly persona like a smile. A smile indicates you’re happy and interested to be talking. Boys need all the positive reinforcement they can get, so a smile can go a long way. A smile will also subtly draw his attention to your mouth, something he’ll hopefully become intimate with! Make light contact. Subtly touching your boy will drop an even larger hint that you’re interested. Lightly touch his arm, shoulder, hand, or chest during conversation or even lightly, “accidentally” bump into him while walking. Even minimal contact will draw his attention and let him know you’re flirting. Plus, when you’re ready to move in for the kiss, the touching “barrier” between the two of you will already be broken. Pay him compliments. Guys, like girls, need all the positive reinforcement they can get. Complimenting features you find attractive or beautiful, be it his hair, personality, sense of humor, eyes, muscles, or intelligence, can go a long way in letting him know you want to take things to the next level. , Ask your boy out on a date or a group date. If you don’t think he’ll go for that, meet up with him while he’s with his friends or while you’re with your friends. You can also suggest meeting up at a party. In any case, it’s important to eliminate as many spectators as possible to create a more intimate, “kiss worthy” moment.   Make it easy for him to get you alone. Try not to include your friends if you’re meeting up. Guys are often leery about making contact with a girl when her friends surround her, as they often do not share the same opinion about a particular boy. Remember, guys need as much positive reinforcement as possible. Girls can often serve as static to this situation, one you’d prefer to be crystal clear. Suggest the two of you go for a walk together. There’s nothing like spending some time outside, be it outside of a party or just enjoying the day. A walk provides the perfect opportunity to create a kissing environment and utilize your flirting abilities. Offer to help with tedious chores or errands. If your boy is buying groceries, grabbing a cup of coffee, cleaning or paying bills, offer to be his copilot. This situation will not only demonstrate interest, but offer a perfect chance to be alone.  Make sure your body language is open, welcoming and reinforcing. How you carry yourself will send either the right or wrong signals to your kissing mate. Make sure your shoulders are facing him if sitting next to him, that you’re visibly interested in what he’s talking about (smiling and nodding are good for this), and that you’re maintaining light contact.Avoid crossing your arms, tightly crossing your legs, twiddling your thumbs, or constantly clasping your hands together. These indicate you could be bored with the conversation, anxious to leave, or that you’re generally not enjoying yourself. This is the last thing you want to do when you’re trying to kiss a boy. Don’t be afraid to show how nervous you are. A healthy bit of nervousness can show your boy how excited you are to be around him. The most obvious signs can act as positive reinforcement and physically articulate how much you like him and are enjoying yourself.  Do not force the situation, especially if you’re not sure if your boy is ready to be kissed. When the time is right, chances are he’ll be doing the exact same things you are to ensure a kiss will happen.   Be prepared to create more opportunities to be alone. Your first get-together with your potential kissing mate may not go as planned. Do not be discouraged – your boy may need more obvious hints or efforts to fully comprehend what’s going on. Remember to stay confident and patient.  It’s important that you lock eyes with your intended kissing mate. Not only does eye contact create an intimate moment, it can also drop the hint that you’re ready to do more than talk.   Locking eyes can create that particular romantic moment you’re looking for with your boy. Such a moment can break the barrier and change a meet up from casual to ideal for kissing. , Find a reason or excuse to be close to your boy. If you’re out walking, say you’re cold. If you’re sitting somewhere, use the same excuse! When you’re sure the moment is right, find any excuse to be close to your boy’s lips.   Being close to your boy can serve as an indication of how interested or ready to kiss he is. Be prepared to maintain your patience if you don’t get the reaction you desire. He may need a bit more time.  If you’re unsure whether or not your boy is ready to fully smooch, break the kiss barrier with a kiss on the cheek. The way your boy reacts may indicate whether or not he’s ready to kiss you, be it later on in the night or the next time you see him.   Make sure he knows it’s not just a friendly kiss. Instead of simply pecking him on the cheek, linger a bit during the kiss. Make sure your lips feel soft against a good spot on his cheek. It’s important that even this kiss is memorable, so do it somewhere close to his ear or near his mouth.  After you’re close and have maintained eye contact, your boy should get the hint that you’re ready for a full-on smooch. Make sure your lips are light and soft, welcoming him to take the lead if needed. Line up your nose with his nose and turn slightly to the right or left to avoid collision. In any case, a light kiss will be much more welcoming and enjoyable to your boy over a hard, deep kiss. A good technique to use is to lean in, and right before your lips meet his, hold off a bit. This will create a sense of longing in your boy and allow him to close the gap. This way, you’ll know for sure that the situation is mutual. If you make your lips into a tight pucker, you may send the wrong signal. This may indicate you were not ready for a full kiss or that you’re generally not enjoying it and uncomfortable with what’s happening.  You can put your hands to great use and indicate – and even increase – the level of enjoyment by letting your hands roam. Run your hands along the back of his head, lightly caress his neck, or even let your fingers run through his hair during the kiss.   Your hands can also pull your boy in closer to heighten the level of the kiss and make it easier to maneuver around each other’s faces. Make sure you’re not too rough or forward when caressing his neck, back or hair, as it may send the wrong signal. Remember, you’re just at the kissing stage with your boy. Other sorts of affections will come later and when you're ready.  After you’ve initiated the first kiss, you can also add more variety to the situation by changing the way you kiss. You can begin by lightly changing the intensity and speed in which you’re kissing. The trick is to keep the kissing interesting and enjoyable rather than long and tedious.   You can significantly up your kissing game by lightly sucking on your boys lower lip. If he likes it, chances are he’ll return the favor. This technique can heighten the experience for the both of you and make the situation that much more memorable. Remember, never make it too intense, as you don’t want to make the situation memorable in an awkward way.  Nothing makes a kiss more memorable than transforming it to a French kiss. A French kiss is reminiscent of all those black and white Hollywood hits and has really become the standard when it comes to romance.   To French kiss, you open your mouth slightly – only enough to ease your tongue through – before lightly touching his lips with it. Don’t let your tongue linger for too long. If your boy returns the gesture, he’s ready to French kiss. The rest of the kiss involves turning your head slightly to the side to avoid nose and teeth collision. Move your tongue into his mouth and lightly caress his tongue with yours. Chances are, he’ll be doing the same thing. Remember to keep your tongue moving, otherwise it will simply be resting inside his mouth! Be sure to change the pace and intensity while French kissing. Like a normal kiss, the moment can quickly move from passionate and romantic to boring and tedious if kept too routine.  Make sure you leave your boy wanting more. If you’ve utilized your hands, tried a few kissing techniques, and let the kiss linger, chances are it was a fun and enjoyable experience. If your boy enjoyed it, he’ll want to do it again and soon. Let him wonder when the next encounter will be!  

become confident in yourself.  dress to impress.  style your hair in an interesting way.  highlight your lips.  smell nice.  flirt your way into his heart.  create an opportunity to be alone.  keep open and positive body language.  be patient.  maintain eye contact.  get close.  break the kiss barrier.  go for the kiss.  reinforce the situation with your hands.  change it up.  initiate a french kiss.  end the kiss before it becomes boring. 

 Either strike up the courage to ask him yourself, or get the information from someone else.   Make sure you are aware if he is single or not.       You may want to get someone else to ask him for you, or ask one of his friends that you trust and are comfortable with. Make sure it's not obvious that you're interested in him, or there may be trouble! If you find out that he already has a girlfriend, immediately back off. If his girlfriend suspects that you are trying to win him over, or she believes that he is cheating on her, there could be plenty of trouble, and you wouldn't want to get mixed up in that!  Your crush could also misunderstand your intentions, and think less of you.     Scope out where he usually sits, and who he usually sits with.       Familiarize yourself with his likes and dislikes.       Know his taste, and what types of girls he is interested in.      ; , When you pass by him in the hallways, smile softly, and greet him with a simple, "Hey." If he smiles and greets you back, that's a good sign. If he ignores you, keep trying for a little bit, then stop if it's obvious he isn't interested in you.   Not only does this step ensure that your crush is aware of your existence, but it will also begin your relationship with him!       Make sure you don't overuse this step, as it will get a little creepy!       When you smile, don't smile widely, or you'll appear a little freakish. A soft, small but noticeable smile will make you look pretty, and he'll think of you as an approachable, friendly person.  On all of your social networks and websites, label yourself as "single". Include casually that you're single in all of your profile pages. Go even further, and - if possible - wear a single bracelet!  , You don't have to completely change it just for him, but try playing around with hairstyles and clothing till you find a good balance between what you feel comfortable in and what he likes to see girls wear.   For example: If your crush likes sporty girls and/or sports, wear a baseball cap or shirt (his favorite team, if possible).       Try to connect your style with his likes so that you form a link!   If he notices your clothing, and either compliments and/or asks you about it (ex: "Are you a Steelers' fan?"), play it cool, and act like it was a coincidence that you wore what he liked. However, try not to lie or make a habit of it.  You don't need to go overboard, and stock up on all the perfumes and take a shower every hour that passes, but be clean and show him that you take good care of your body. Follow the steps below for good hygiene:   Take a shower every single day, using lukewarm water and an effective, nice-smelling soap. Spend no more than six minutes each time you take a shower, and make sure you scrub, not soak.       For soft skin, moisturize your entire body exactly fifteen minutes after you take your shower. This will enhance your skin very well!   Wash your hair no more than three times a week with an effective shampoo and conditioner, making sure they contain the proper, natural ingredients your hair type requires. Washing your hair too frequently can cause it to become oily, stinky, and dried up. No guy likes gross hair! Beware of washing your hair too few times as well.       If it appears that your shampoo and conditioner aren't working as well on your hair as you would like them to, try switching to a different brand or type that suits your hair type well.   Brush your teeth in the morning and at night with an effective toothpaste. Use mouthwash in the morning before you leave for school, and make sure you floss every day at night.       If you wear braces, make sure to take extra good care of your teeth!   Use a body and hand lotion that uses natural ingredients with no harmful chemicals in it. This will help make your skin smoother and softer, tempting your crush to want to feel how nice it is (he may or may not, depending on his personality and confidence).       Cleanse your face with a good cleanser twice a day - morning and night. Make sure your cleanser isn't too strong, or you'll experience more frequent outbreaks of nasty pimples. Rinse well with lukewarm water. Follow with toner and moisturizer.       Don't deprive your pimples of moisturizer, as they actually need plenty of moisture in order to heal effectively and quickly. However, be careful not to use too much moisturizer on them!    , You can either casually ask him ahead of time what classes he is planning to take, get a friend to ask him for you, or ask one of your crush's friends that you trust and are comfortable with.   Again, make sure it isn't obvious that you're interested in your crush, or word could get out and you'll be embarrassed!       Make sure you don't appear in every single class of your crush's. As tempting as the idea is, it'll freak him out and/or he'll become suspicious and perhaps withdrawn from you. Appear in at least three or more so that he'll notice you enough.  If he is the confident type, he'll enjoy talking about himself. Make sure to put in some information about yourself as well, but limit it so that you sound a little mysterious, leaving him wanting to know more about you.   Don't blab out every bit of information about you, but give out just enough so that he has a basic knowledge of your personality and life.       Let him do most of the talking, unless if he seems uncomfortable with it. If your crush is the shy type, you may have to do most of the steering in the conversation, and try not to intimidate him. Be gentle, and talk softly enough so that he is comfortable with the volume of your voice.       Don't wait for your crush to start the conversation. At this point, you may have to start most of the conversations till you become a part of his daily life, and he'll begin to start the conversations when he recognizes you as that.       If you keep silent, and wait for your crush to come up to you and start the conversation, the chances of that happening is extremely low, unless if he is very interested in you and possibly curious enough to try to find out about you. It's okay to be shy, but there is a limit to how shy you can get. Break out of your shell, or you'll never be able to make any progress in your relationship with your crush! Build your confidence, and tell yourself you can do it. If he is the right guy for you, you'll win him over. If he isn't, don't let him get to you, and simply move on with life.  Make random appearances here and there. If your crush or your crush's friend(s) question you, be ready with plausible excuses such as: "The other tables were full" or "My friend was sitting here, so I came to sit here too". Bring a trustworthy friend along to sit with you so that it doesn't seem awkward.   If your crush sits at an all-guys table, it's probably best to keep to your own tables. Sit near enough so that he notices you, but not in your crush's table if this happens to be the case.       Don't sit alone, or he'll think you're a loner and not be interested.   Keep in mind that once you become good enough friends with your crush, your friendship with him can be the key to unlock the borders blocking you from his all-guys table. Just make sure to bring a friend along if you're uncomfortable about sitting with all-guys. Plus, it could look suspicious to the students if you're the only girl at your crush's table.       Your crush may unexpectedly walk up to you, and invite you to sit with his table even if you two aren't close enough friends yet. Although this may be unlikely, it could happen, but don't wait for it to happen! Make it happen. , 

before you do anything else, find out a little more about your crush.  make sure your crush is aware of your existence.  make yourself available.  tweak your style to perk your crush's interest.  take care of your hygiene.  make sure you appear in several of the classes in your crush's schedule.  start friendly, comfortable conversations with your crush, and ask nice questions about him that will help you get to know more about him.  slowly start to sit at your crush's table.  at this point, if you've become good enough friends with your crush so that you're a part of his daily life and attention now, your crush should be naturally starting conversations with you instead of you doing all the starting.  ,  finished.  

 Do they seem to like your crush? Have you caught them looking at your crush often (even briefly)? How often have you seen the popular guy or girl talking to your crush? If they seem to like your crush, then you will have to work even harder, especially if your crush seems to be liking the popular kid back.; , Are you shy but they're outgoing? You may see shyness as a disability, but shyness can have a cuteness to it that an outgoing personality just doesn't have. Embrace and bring out the cuter part of your shyness by blushing and doing other cute things that shy girls/boys usually do naturally. If it's vice versa, then be bold, strike up conversation and don't be afraid to lightly tease the guy/girl you like. Are you usually rebellious but the popular kid is usually more mild? Let the rebel in you show as rebel girls/guys can be hot and fun. Show them your wild side (appropriately mind you) by not being afraid to dance and have fun at parties and ignoring the popular kids if they try to insult you or, even better, coming up with a sassy, clever comeback to say to them. If it's vice versa, then try to show him the sweetness of a mild, more simple personality by doing nice little things for him like being there for him when he's upset and befriending him. Basically, use whatever qualities you have against the popular kid in your flirting.  This basically means trying to incorporate their personality into your personality. If you're a rebel and the other person is mild, try toning down your wild side and being a little less intimidating and reckless and looking before you leap. However, don't kill the rebel in you either and remember the last step! If the other person is more of a rebel than you, then try being a little more rebellious yourself by being less afraid of risking embarrassed and being able to laugh embarrassment off, taking a few risks (as long as they don't endanger your life and aren't too extreme), and standing up for yourself and others boldly. Just remember to still be mild and simple, yet interesting. If you're a shy guy/girl, try being a little more outgoing and making some small talk with your crush, even if it is sprinkled with shyness. You could also flirt a bit more boldly by catching their eye and winking, but then blushing and turning away shyly or teasing them lightly but then acting a little embarrassed and laughing a little to add some of your shy style to your flirting technique. If you're more of the outgoing, bold type, be a little bit shy as well. If you're an outgoing girl, try shyly playing with your hair, giggling, or biting your lip. If you're an outgoing guy, try looking away from them a little more quickly if they look at you and even laughing nervously sometimes. Just make sure that you still talk to your dream guy/girl often and stay bold.  Most of the time popular girls won't befriend their crushes (they'll just flirt) however, popular guys will usually befriend them so this method might not work as well for the guys. However, it can't hurt to be a friend to your crush either way. This can help your crush to feel closer to you and less intimidated by your attempts at flirting and/or breaking the touch barrier. This can also possibly make them more open to hugs and such.  This can usually be a point where you have an advantage over a popular kid because since they are so popular and they have a lot of attention, they don't have much time to just hang out with their love interest and are busy with other people as well. This doesn't call for being clingy and never leaving your crush alone, but it does call for being there for your crush when they need it and just spending time getting to know your crush. He/she will really appreciate it and it may make them think all the more about you. If you're worried that your crush will be uneasy with spending time with you, become their friend (see last step) or just "happen" to end up sitting with them in class or at lunch.  Don't do it non-stop or you'll appear creepy and it'll seem like you're stalking them. Just a simple "hey. How's it going?" and a smiley face will do.  Just say something like, "Hey, can I ask you something?" Then say, "I was wondering if we could go out sometime." If they don't answer, say something like, "You can get back to me on it if you'd like, okay?" If they decline the offer, say "That's fine. Let's just keep being friends then, if that's alright." Stay calm and cool and don't stay as casual as possibly.  

look at how the popular kid acts around your crush.  think of some qualities that you have that the popular kid doesn't have.  try being a little bit like the popular kid.  befriend them.  spend time with your crush.  text your crush.  when you're ready, ask them out. 

 This will help distinguish you from the crowd, as well as show your crush that you have a cool sense of fashion. It may impress them and perhaps even be the opening for a conversation. Be sure that your clothes complement your body type and that your colors match. Although you don't have to wear expensive clothing, make sure that you have ones of good quality.; , It's important to seem as appealing as possible so that your crush may take an interest in you. Take care of your personal hygiene, such as showering, brushing your teeth, and washing your face to get rid of grime. Add a subtle but pleasant scent by using deodorant, cologne, or body spray. Be sure that your hair is styled neatly, but make sure that you don't add too much product; otherwise, it'll weigh your hair down and give it a false or grimy appearance.  Be sure to adjust your body so that you appear open and inviting. Make sure that you're not positioned in a manner that may seem closed off or discourage your crush from talking to you (ex: arms crossed). You could also show some "subconscious" indications that you're interested in your crush.  Confidence can completely change a person's appearance and help them seem more attractive. It shows that you're proud of who you are and that you aren't afraid to be unique. Although you should avoid being cocky, be sure that you give off a confident, cheerful air.  

wear a unique outfit.  be physically attractive.  research body language tricks.  be confident. 

 They may be able to give you advice on how to approach your crush, as well as help you make plans. Although you shouldn't completely accept their words, it's nice to have some people that you can rely on.  If you spot your crush nearby, talk with your friends about a topic that your crush may like. For instance, if they're obsessed with lacrosse and your friend happens to play the sport, ask your friend some questions about it. Your crush might jump into the conversation. If you're focusing on subjects that you're unfamiliar with, be sure to do your research beforehand so that you have the right facts.  It'll not only help you gain information about your crush but also show that you can get along with people. However, it's recommended that you form authentic relationships so that you don't appear fake. Otherwise, people might feel that you manipulated them for your own benefit.   Avoid simply using them. Treat them as if they're your friends, and they might invite you to hang out with them.        

tell your trusted friends about your crush.  talk with your friends about your crush's interests.  form friendships with your crush's friends. 

 Put your saddle on a sawhorse, saddle rack, or something similar to hold it up while you clean it. This keeps your saddle stable and easy to adjust while you clean.   Once your saddle is stable, remove any add-ons such as stirrups. These should be cleaned separately.; , Getting loose dirt off before wetting your saddle makes the rest of the cleaning faster and easier. Use a dry cloth to remove any loose dirt and dust before wetting your saddle.Avoid grinding dirt into the saddle while dusting. Use a gentle hand to swipe over the surface of the saddle. Be sure to use a clean cloth or soft-bristled saddle brush with nothing on it.  Dip a double-sided kitchen sponge into a bucket of warm water. Gently wring it out and lather it up with saddle soap.   Be sure the sponge is damp enough to create your lather, but not dripping wet. Excess water may cause the leather to dry slowly and could lead to warping or distortion. You can also use a loofah glove to apply and lather the saddle soap. Loofah gloves make cleaning stirrups and reins easier.  Place the soaped sponge on the saddle and rub vigorously in small circular motions. Cover the entire smooth leather surface of the saddle, including the underside and beneath flaps.Avoid suede, specialty leathers, or rough areas of the saddle. Rinse out your sponge and re-lather it with soap any time the sponge starts to dry or becomes too dirty.  Use a clean, damp sponge or a damp towel to wipe off any excess soap. Rinse the sponge or towel and repeat until all soap residue is gone .   Pay close attention to folds and seams on your saddle. Use a toothbrush or cotton swab to remove soap residue from tight areas.  Use a dry towel to wipe away any excess water. Then, allow your saddle to dry naturally before conditioning.   Keep your saddle out of direct sunlight while it drys, and do not apply any direct heat such as a blow dryer. Let your saddle dry most of the way before conditioning, but try to condition before it is completely dry. You do not want your saddle to feel moist when you condition, but it should still be cool to the touch.  Use a soft towel to apply a light layer of conditioner or oil over the entirety of the saddle. Allow the conditioner to absorb into the saddle for one hour.Use a purpose-made leather conditioning cream or neatsfoot oil to condition the saddle. Avoid products that are petroleum-based, as they could dry out the leather. Re-apply oil or cream to your towel as necessary to ensure even coverage. Uneven coverage may cause discoloration.  If your saddle has any rawhide elements, condition them separately. Use a conditioning cream meant especially for rawhide.   If you are unsure of what conditioner to use on each part of your saddle, it’s best to ask someone at your barn or the tack store. Using the wrong conditioner can cause your saddle to dry out or become deteriorated, distorted, or discolored.  Use a soft, dry towel to remove any excess oil or cream. Then, buff your saddle with a smooth cloth to give it a nice finish.   Once your saddle has been buffed, it is clean and ready for use.  How often you need to clean your saddle will depend on how often you ride, as well as the type of riding you do. Make sure your saddle is getting cleaned regularly, but not so much that it dries out or damages the leather.   If you ride daily, you may need to clean your saddle every two to three months. If you ride once a week or less, your saddle may only require cleaning twice a year. If you ride in environments where the saddle is frequently exposed to dirt, mud, salt, or sweat, you will want to clean your saddle whenever it gets noticeably dirty or starts to feel brittle. If you are about to store your saddle for a long stretch, such as a full season, clean and condition it before you store.  Every leather is a little different, and saddles differ from maker to maker. That is why it is a good idea to check with your saddle’s manufacturer to see what they recommend for your particular saddle.Check any printed materials that your manufacturer may have provided to look for recommended products, as well as products that might damage the leather. If you are unsure about a product, call the manufacturer directly to ask, “Will this damage your leather saddles?”  , Your saddle should be conditioned soon after it is cleaned. Make sure you have everything you need to fully clean and moisturize your saddle. You will need:   A bucket of water Towels Sponges A bristle brush Saddle soap Leather Cleaner Leather conditioner or neatsfoot oil  

stabilize your saddle.  dust your saddle.  prepare a lather.  soap your saddle.  rinse the saddle.  dry your saddle.  condition the smooth leather.  condition any rawhide areas.  remove excess conditioner.  decide if it is time to clean your saddle.  check with the manufacturer.  gather your supplies. 

 Saddle soap can be used to clean horse tack and other leather products such as shoes and boots. However, saddle soap should not be used on every leather-based product.   There are a variety of different types of leather used in products. Different types require different cleaners and the only way to know whether saddle soap is okay is to consult the manufacturer's directions.If you don't have the directions handy, you can google the product name and find information online about cleaning and care. If you see any warnings about saddle soap, it might be better to go with a different cleaner.; , Lye is a highly caustic compound found in many commercial brands of saddle soap. If lye is listed as a primary ingredient on the brand of saddle soap you've selected, you might want to ditch that product and look for an alternative brand.   Lye's caustic nature mean it's particularly hard on leather products. It absorbs moisture quickly, which can dry out leather causing it to crack, split, and otherwise deteriorate faster.Saddle soap made with lye also has a high pH level, which causes leather to harden and darken. It can be difficult to get lye-heavy saddle soap out of cracks and crevices if you're cleaning tack, resulting in a crusty white residue.Opt for making your own saddle soap or try to buy homemade saddle soap from a local farmer's market. While such products do use lye, they tend to use it in reasonable amounts that will cause minimal damage to leather., You can make inexpensive saddle soap in your own kitchen. This might be a better option than buying commercial saddle soap, as the products used can be harmful to leather.   Use protective gloves throughout the cooking process. You'll be handling lye, which is a pretty heavy-duty material. You want to make sure you avoid burning your skin. Use an apron to cook, as lye should not come into contact with clothes you wear regularly.Get your ingredients. You'll need two pots, made of stainless steel or heat-resistant glass, a stainless steel spoon, and some kind of jars or boxes to store the concoction. You will also need beeswax, pure flake lye, castile soap shavings, water, and pure gum turpentine. These products can be purchased at grocery stores, hardware stores, and health food stores.In one pot, combine 6.25 parts beeswax, 10 parts pure flake lye, and 10 parts water. Boil the mixture for 5 minutes, stirring constantly.Get the second pot. Melt together 2 parts castile shavings and 10 parts water. Once the soap liquifies, add it to the first mixture.Move the pot away from heat and add 15 parts turpentine. Pour the mixture into containers, cover, and store the saddle soap in a cool and dry part of your home. The soap does not have a shelf life, so you can wait as long as you want to use it.When you finish, clean your kitchen thoroughly. Keep your protective gloves on during this time. Lye can be harmful if ingested, so you want to make sure your kitchen is clear of lye before you begin cooking and eating again. 

read the manufacturer's directions.  avoid lye heavy products.  make your own saddle soap. 

 Before you begin cleaning bridles and saddles, you need to get them ready.   Undo any buckles on the tack and remove steel components, like those found in stirrups and bits. You do not want to get soap, saddle or otherwise, on the bit especially. Saddle soap can be harmful to your horse if ingested.Dip a soft cloth in warm water. Wring out the cloth until it is damp but not wet and wipe the saddle off. Allow it to dry completely before beginning the cleaning process. This opens the pores of the leather for a deeper clean. It can also prevent the leather darkening associated with saddle soap use., After your saddle has dried, you can begin the process of cleaning it with saddle soap.   Use a sponge that's been soaked in warm water. Do not use hot water, as this can damage the saddle. Aim for lukewarm.Apply a small amount of saddle soap to the sponge. Scrub down the saddle, scrubbing in a circular motion. If your saddle has a lot of hard-to-reach places, use a toothbrush in addition to your sponge.Using a clean and dry cloth, wipe the soap residue from the saddle. Make sure you get all the soap off, as you do not want white, crusty residue to surface after the saddle dries., Once you're saddle has dried after the application of saddle soap, there are a few more steps to the cleaning process.   To condition the leather and keep it moist and shiny, invest in a high quality leather conditioner. Neatsfoot oil is a good option. However, use oil sparingly as it can seep into padding under the saddle and cause damage. Consult the directions on the bottle before application to get a sense of how much you should use.Metal parts of the saddle, like stirrups, should not be washed with saddle soap. Instead, use warm water and dish soap. 

prepare your tack for cleaning.  clean the saddle.  finnish up cleaning. 

 While saddle soap can be great on many leather shoes, it can be harmful to some. Cordovan shoes should not be shined or washed using saddle soap. If you're uncertain about using saddle shoes on your footwear, consult the manufacturer's instructions., Snow, water, and salt can cause significant damage to leather. Saddle soap can be used as a protective agent on leather boots.   If you've recently worn your boots, you'll need to let them dry before using saddle soap. Do not attempt to dry your boots by setting them next to a heater. This can cause damage.Wait for the boots to dry. This should take about an hour. Using a damp cloth, remove any dirt or debris on the boots.Take a wet cloth and rub it in saddle soap until it begins to lather. You do not want to rub saddle soap onto your boots until it lathers, so add more water if the soap remains as is.Rub the lather all over one boot. While that boot dries, rub down the other. Once the lather is dry, wipe off both boots using a damp cloth.Repeat this process frequently to keep the boots protected, especially if you're using them during a harsh winter., Saddle soap can be used to shine leather shoes. Applying a small amount to a wet cloth can leave shoes glistening and clean.   Change into old clothes and lay out old newspapers or magazines on the floor.Using a wet cloth containing saddle soap, wipe all the dust and dirt off of the shoe. Pay special attention to areas like the heel and sole.If you intend on shining your shoes, let them dry for 5 minutes before beginning the shining process. 

avoid saddle soap on certain shoes.  protect your boots for the winter months.  clean your shoes with saddle soap. 

 Always approach the horse from the front and slightly to one side, where the horse can see you coming. Stand next to the horse's head, facing the same direction as the animal.   If the horse turns away, click your tongue until the horse faces you. You may convince it to turn around with a food reward instead, if the horse is trained and gentle.; , Whenever you're near a horse, always move in calm, easy motions. Move your hands up slowly to take the rope, then coil it loosely in one hand.  Reach up to the horse's face and hold the halter at the bottom of the noseband, near the middle ring. Confirm that the halter is securely fastened.   Never hook your finger through the halter, or the rings. If the horse pulls away abruptly, you could injure your hand. If the horse is not wearing a halter, skip down to the section below.  Let go of the halter and take up most of the slack in the rope, so the horse knows you've attached it. Avoid pulling hard or holding the rope too close to the horse, as this may cause an inexperienced horse to panic. A very skittish horse may even rear if you pull down or forward on the rope.   A trained horse should yield to pressure on the lead rope, and move forward. A green horse may pull back. If the horse pulls back or backs up, follow it. Don’t get into a tug-of-war. The horse will win.  

approach the horse from the front.  loosely coil the lead rope in one hand.  grasp the halter.  gently take up the slack. 

 Before you strap a saddle on your horse, it's important to ensure that your horse's hair is clean, and that he does not have any sores on his skin.   Use a curry comb to detangle dirt, mud, and any other debris that might be matted in your horse's hair. Do not use the curry comb over any bony parts of the horse's body, as these may be more sensitive and could be injured by aggressive combing. Do not curry comb the neck and face. Use a stiff-bristled body brush, also called the dandy brush, to continue dislodging hard-to-remove debris and remove the debris you've already dislodged. You can use this brush on the neck, chest, and legs. Use a soft brush to gently flick away the debris removed by the curry comb and the body brush. Use this brush to do the face and legs.Finish things off by gently wiping down your horse's face and body with a clean grooming cloth.; , Inspect the saddle and pad for any foreign objects that could cause irritation to your horse., It's important to position the saddle pad properly, as this will be the barrier between your saddle and the horse's skin.   Put the saddle pad on the withers (shoulders), slightly forward of where you want it to end up. The saddling process will inevitably drag the saddle pad back, so starting slightly forward should allow the saddle and pad to end up where you want them. Never slide the saddle pad forward on your horse's back for you will cause the hair to go against the grain and make it uncomfortable for the horse., Lift the saddle in such a way that none of these attachments will get caught under the saddle., If you have a hard time lifting the saddle, you may need to request assistance during this step.   Stand next to your horse's left shoulder. Keep your feet shoulder-width apart, with your left foot near the horse's left hoof and your right foot slightly behind your left.Swing your torso and hoist the saddle up, so that your right arm ends up draped across the horse's back. This should land the saddle right on the saddle pad, on your horse's back., Allow them to hang down across your horse.  Snug the front cinch (also called a girth). This should be done on your horse's left side, and should snug your saddle into place., It's important to keep the back cinch tight, as this will keep the saddle from lifting up during riding. (Some saddles do not have a back cinch. Despite what the picture depicts, please assure that the girth is hooked on before you start with the other cinches), There are a number of different types of breast plate, and each one will require different assembly instructions.   Ensure that the breast collar's center cinch strip is aligned with the center of your horse's stomach. Thread the latigo from the left side through the ring on the end of the cinch and D ring twice. Pull tightly, then thread the latigo around the back of the D ring to the left, around front then back through. The end should then come through the middle of the D ring, and thread down behind the loop made (like tying a tie), pulling tightly again.  One way of doing this is by gently bending your horse's front two legs at the knees, stretching out the belly and freeing any flesh that may have been caught in the cinches., Be sure that your saddle is properly attached before you untie your horse.  Most horses are accustomed to being mounted from the left, and may become frightened if you attempt to mount from the right. Before mounting, ALWAYS check the tightness of the cinch (or girth). 

groom your horse.  check your gear.  set the saddle pad on your horse.  grab the cinches, straps, and stirrups.  lift the saddle onto your horse.  lower the cinches and stirrups.  make the horse put his front hoof forward to avoid causing sores in the girth area on your horse where there are wrinkles in the horse's skin.  tighten the back cinch.  attach the breast collar (if you use one).  pull out any skin that may have gotten trapped under the cinches.  untie your horse.  remember to mount from your horse's left side. 

 Clip the end of the lead rope the middle bottom rung on the halter.  Approach the horse from the front, making sure it can see you. Stand on the left side of the head, since this is where the halter will buckle. Face the same direction as the horse.  Place the loose lead rope high up on the horse's neck, just behind the draw. Pull the other end down under the neck so you can hold the loop closed in your right fist. This will keep the horse in place.  Hold the halter by the side ring on the noseband closer to you. Open the top halter buckle.  Let go of the lead rope, and use that hand to reach under the jaw and put the back of the halter over the neck, behind the ears. Buckle the halter snug, but not tight. The end of the lead rope should still be over the horse’s neck. Reward the horse with a pat or a nice scratch, so it associates haltering with a reward.   To keep the lead rope from falling down, you may place it over your arm. Never loop it around your neck, or around your arm, or the horse could injure you when it moves. If the horse is tall, you may need to flip the halter up above the neck.  Check that the halter is secure and comfortable. There should be at least two fingers of space between the noseband and the horse.  

clip the lead rope to the halter.  stand on the left side of the horse's head.  loop the lead rope around the horse's neck.  open the halter.  slide the halter over the nose of the horse.  adjust the halter. 

 If the horse is inexperienced or untrained, it's best to attach the lead rope in a round corral. This is an easy space to handle the horse where it still has some room to walk away.  If the horse is not used to ropes, let the animal sniff and investigate it first. It may help to rub the rope against your body, demonstrating that it is not harmful. Let the horse chew on the rope, and rub it gently against its nose. Praise the horse when it relaxes.   If the horse doesn't calm down, raise your arms and calmly shoo it away. Once the horse calms down and starts chewing or dips its head, turn your body and invite it to approach. Repeat the exercise with the rope until the horse calms down.  If the horse presses its ears back or tries to back away, calmly stroke the horse and speak in gentle tones. Be gentle and patient until the horse relaxes and lets you put on the halter or clip on the rope. Always convince the horse to cooperate instead of forcing the halter on; you're never going to win a contest of strength with a horse.  If the horse is not fully relaxed after you've clipped on the rope, unhook it again and let the horse move away. Call it back to you, quickly snap the rope on again, and praise the horse if it stays calm. Repeat until the horse accepts the rope without pulling away.   Do not chase after the horse in this situation. It's easier to develop trust if the horse comes to you.  If the horse will still not relax during this process, try attaching a very short rope instead, that the horse can't step on while grazing. Let the horse walk away with this short rope attached, then once they've calmed down, remove the rope and let the horse walk off. Repeat until the horse is no longer scared of ropes.  

bring the horse to a round corral.  let the horse investigate the rope.  soothe an agitated horse.  repeat the attachment many times.  try again with a short rope. 

 It is also known as the horse's "blind side". The horse doesn't kick mostly when you stand on the left side for saddling or patting a new horse.  Whether it be on a saddle stand or a nearby fence, have it ready to be put straight on the horse so you do not have to make the horse wait any longer than necessary., Also make sure the top of the saddle pad is covering the horses withers. (Note: When saddling a horse English style, there may be two saddle pads. Put on the first one, and then the second.), You don't want more saddle pad on one side than the other!, The front of the saddle should be about 2 1/2 inches away from the front of the saddle pad. Make sure that the saddle in even on both sides of the horse and not lopsided., (If you are unfamiliar with the saddle, the billet straps are what the girth attaches to and they are located under the flaps on the side of the saddle.), Tighten accordingly making sure you can fit your hand above the girth. Do not tighten the girth too quickly because this tends to lead to a horse learning how to 'bloat' himself to make the girth loose when being saddled.,, 

note that saddling normally mainly takes place on the left side of the horse.  have the saddle pad and saddle ready.  place the saddle pad on the horse's back so that the straps on the side are inline with the back of the horses shoulder.  check from the front of the horse that the saddle pad is even on both sides of the horse.  gently lay the saddle on top of the saddle pad evenly.  get the girth and feed the non stretchy side through the straps on the right side of the horse and attach it to the first billet hole.  on the other side of the horse, pick up the girth and attach it to the first billet hole on that side as well.check and make sure the girth is not pinching the horse anywhere.adjust your stirrups to the right length before riding. 

 The most common knots used to tie a horse are quick-release knots, of which there are several varieties, and the bowline knot. Quick-release knots are easy to tie, and while they will tighten up if the horse pulls against the rope, are still easy to release with a quick tug of the trailing rope. The bowline is a bit less convenient to tie and untie, but will not tighten up if the horse pulls on it. Also, some horses are quite adept at untying quick release knots. If you are going to leave your tied horse unsupervised or know that he has untied a quick release in the past, the bowline is the safer option. Practice tying these knots ahead of time, before you use them with an actual horse.; , This quick-release knot should not tighten if your horse pulls against it, and is very easy to untie.   First make a fold in the rope (called a ‘’bight’’) and fold it over the pole you are tying to, or through a ring. Then make another bight in the part of the rope that leads to the horse (called the “standing end”). Pull the second bight through the first bight. Then with your other hand, make a bight in the loose end of the rope, and pull this through the second bight. To tighten the knot, pull on the standing end. To release the knot, simply tug on the loose end.  This quick-release knot is easy to tie and untie, and can be finished off in a daisy-chain fashion to take up extra rope, and prevent your horse pulling or tripping on the loose end. First loop the rope over a pole, or through a ring. Then twist the loose end of the rope to form a loop. Hold the loop in your left hand, and with your right hand, wrap the loose end over the standing end. Fold the loose end over into a bight, and pull the bight through the loop in your left hand. Pull on the standing end to tighten the knot. Pull on the loose end to release the rope. To create an extra-secure knot that is harder for your horse to untie, create another bight in the loose end of the rope, and feed it through the last loop. Repeat this daisy-chain process as many times as needed to use up the loose end of the rope.  This is a secure knot that will not tighten if the horse pulls on it. You can untie it quickly, but your horse cannot.   First take the standing end of the rope in your left hand and wrap the loose end over the pole. Then twist a loop in the standing end, and feed the loose end through the loop. Then wrap the loose end back over the standing end, and through the loop again going the other way. Pull firmly on both the loose and standing ends to snug the knot., Never wrap a rope around your hand or finger, or put your hand inside or through any loop or bight while tying up a horse. If the horse were to jerk quickly, the loop could tighten on your hand and cause serious injury. Be careful to avoid doing this while you practice tying knots to avoid learning unsafe knot-tying habits.  

learn the best knots for tying up a horse ahead of time.  learn to tie a quick-release knot.  learn another quick-release knot.  learn to tie a bowline knot.  use caution when tying knots. 

 You should only tie a horse up with a rope connected to a well-fitting halter. Tying a horse up by the bridle, either directly to the bit or to the reigns, can cause the horse pain and serious injury., Only tie your horse to a solid object that the horse cannot break or pull over. Horses are very strong and can pull with tremendous strength when frightened. If you tie your horse to a fence or railing, inspect the poles or rails and be sure to choose one that is not damaged or corroded. Make sure the area in the immediate vicinity of the horse is clear of dangerous objects the horse might step on or run into.If you must tie your horse to something the horse ‘’could’’ break, tie a loop of string around the object and then tie the horse’s rope to the string, instead of the object itself. If the horse does decide to make a break for it, this will minimize property damage.  Make sure to tie your horse up far enough away from other horses that they cannot fight. It is best not to tie your horse up around other horses at all, until it is used to being tied., Do not tie the horse to an object on or near the ground. The horse could step on the rope, trip on it, or get tangled up on it, and potentially suffer serious injury. You can tie a horse to something higher than his head., Leave about 2 to 3 feet (0.6 to 0.9 m) of rope between the horse and the object it is tied to. This is enough rope to allow the horse to comfortably move his head. Leaving more rope can lead to injury., If your horse will be tied up for a number of hours, be sure that there is food and water available, and that the horse is sheltered from the elements. Tying your horse to a sturdy fence post under the shade of a tree might be an option, or to a sturdy post or gate inside a barn.Check on the horse frequently, especially if it is new to being tied up.  It is always a good idea to carry a knife, in case the horse manages to pull the knot tight and you need to release it in a hurry. Cut through the rope between the post or ring and the knot. Be sure to hold the knife so the blade is facing away from both you and your horse, so that no one is injured if the rope abruptly gives way., Never step over or under a tie rope, and remain well out of kicking range when walking behind the horse. Speak to your horse softly before approaching it, to avoid startling it, and keep your hands on the horse as you walk alongside it., Untie the horse and turn the horse to where you want it to go before you remove the halter. Quick-release knots should be very easy to untie. For the bowline, simply untie the knot using both hands. 

tie your horse by its halter.  choose a safe place to secure your horse.  tie your horse up away from other horses.  secure the horse at eye-level or higher.  leave the right amount of slack.  shelter a horse that will be tied for a long time.  keep a knife handy for cutting rope in emergency situations.  use caution around tied horses.  untie the horse before removing its halter. 

 If you put on a harness, make sure it is loose enough. You should be able to put a finger or two between the harness and the guinea pig. If it's too tight, it could harm the guinea pig's back over time and chaff under his armpits.It may not be a good idea to put a harness on at all. Some owners have had trouble with harnesses harming guinea pigs' backs after they've worn it several times.; , If you insist on using a leash, make sure you just do it in the yard. That is, you can use a leash to keep your guinea pig from wandering too far. However, you need to supervise the guinea pig the whole time. A leash isn't license to leave your guinea pig alone outside.Also, don't tug on the leash. Just let your guinea pig roam about. Make sure the leash is always loose, and your guinea pig doesn't get tangled in it.  While you can put your guinea pig in a harness, it's not a good idea to walk it on a leash. The tugging sensation can harm the guinea pig's delicate spine very easily. In addition, most guinea pigs won't take to walking, meaning they can't be trained to walk beside you on a leash.In addition, guinea pigs can easily slip out of harnesses, so they can escape before you can catch them. Therefore, trying to walk a guinea pig in a street isn't a good idea. It could get away from you and be harmed.  

make sure the harness isn't too tight.  use leashes just for the yard.  don't walk your guinea pig. 

 You don't want to give guinea pigs the full run of the house because there are too many hazards. In addition, guinea pigs can get lost in the shuffle or be scared by loud noises.Consider picking a single room that doesn't have too many places for the guinea pig to hide. A hallway or bathroom works well. Places like the kitchen have too many places for the guinea pigs to hide or squeeze into. Also remember that guinea pigs like to chew. If you love the furniture in a particular room, you may not want to put your guinea pigs in there. Another option is to use a wire pen or cage that you set up in a room.  Guinea pigs are happy to chew on electrical cords if you give them the chance. Make sure any cords are up out of reach of the guinea pigs or that you pick a room that doesn't have them near the floor., Move any plants and other hazards out of reach. Plastic bags, for instance, can pose a suffocation hazard. Make sure to also pick up any dead leaves, as many houseplants are poisonous to guinea pigs., If you have larger animals in your home, they should not be in the same room as the guinea pigs when they are out. They could attack or injure the guinea pigs by just following their instincts., That way, they won't rush into the room without checking to see where the guinea pigs are. In addition, if guinea pigs are underfoot without the family's knowledge, they could easily be stepped on.You could use a note or sign on the door to help family members remember. This step also warns your family not to let other pets in.  Try to provide at least 3 hours outside of the cage a day if the guinea pigs are in a cage that isn't large enough for them.That means that if your guinea pig has less than 7.5 square feet, you need to provide this time out of the cage every day. Otherwise, your guinea pig could get bored.  If you let your guinea pigs out of their cage for extended periods, don't forget they still need food and water. If they can't go back to their cage, make sure you have food and water out for them. 

designate one area for guinea pigs.  hide electrical cords.  put hazards out of reach.  separate the other pets.  let everyone know the guinea pigs are out.  give them enough exercise time.  don't forget to provide food and water. 

 Outside, create an enclosure or fenced in area for them to play in. You can use a wire fence or cage, as long as it doesn't leave gaps that your guinea pigs can escape through., Guinea pigs can stand too much heat, so make sure you keep them cool when they go outside. For one, you should always provide them with shade, so they can cool down. In addition, only let them out during cooler times of the day in the summer.Guinea pigs prefer temperatures between 65 and 75 degrees Fahrenheit. While they can stand a bit more variation, you don't want to go too much colder or warmer., Damp grass can give your pig a chill, and that's not good for them. Also, make sure you aren't setting them down on grass that has been sprayed with insecticides or other chemicals, as that can be damaging for your guinea pig., Once again, you want to be sure to always provide your guinea pig with food and water. Water is especially important when your guinea pig is outside because it can easily get dehydrated when it is warm out., Guinea pigs love to chew on any plant in their vicinity, which is fine when they're munching on grass. However, some plants are poisonous to guinea pigs, so you want to make sure they don't have access to those.Use a database like Cornell's http://poisonousplants.ansci.cornell.edu/index.html to look up poisonous plants in your area. Many common plants like daisies and buttercups are poisonous to guinea pigs. If you keep your guinea pigs just on grass without weeds, you should be fine.  You do not want to leave your guinea pig unattended outside. For one, if your enclosure doesn't have a roof, your guinea pig could easily be carried off by a predator. It could even happen if your enclosure does have a roof.In addition, you want to make sure your guinea pigs don't wriggle out and escape. Also, because guinea pigs are susceptible to heat stroke, you want to keep an eye on them while outside. Signs of heatstroke include lethargy, a limp body, trouble breathing, a rapid pulse, and a wet chin. Your guinea pig may also feel hot to the touch. Check the ears to see if they feel extra warm. If you notice signs of heatstroke, bring the guinea pig indoors. Use tepid water (not cold because it can cause shock) to dab around the ears and feet. You can even dip its feet in water. Once the guinea pig seems cooler, take it to the vet. 

place them in an enclosure.  keep your guinea pigs cool.  don't let them go out on damp grass.  provide food and water.  check for poisonous plants.  stay outside. 

 A large cage is important because it gives your guinea pig a large area to explore. The larger the cage is, the better off your guinea pig will be. At a minimum, each guinea pig should have 7.5 square feet of cage.That's a cage that's approximately 3 by 2.5 feet. If you can, go for a bigger cage, so your guinea pig will need less exercise outside of its cage.  You can buy a cage for a guinea pig. However, most cages that are labelled for guinea pigs are not big enough. You can find ones meant for other animals, though, that will work for guinea pigs. Pick one that has metal bars on the side, not wood, as guinea pigs can't chew through metal.Also, make sure it has a solid floor. Guinea pigs' feet are easily damaged by floors that are made of wire, so it needs to be solid to protect your guinea pig. Go for a larger floor space rather than one that has many levels. Floor space is more important.  Another option is making your own. You can make your own cages out of wire fences on the floor with other materials underneath. One option is to use corrugated correx or corrugated coroplast, available from sign making shops.Start with cube grids. Cube grids can be reconfigured to any size to make an outward "cage." Cut the correx or coroplast to fit. You can use the material as a floor, then use more of it to create a border around the floor. Tape it together from the outside. Add newspapers and hay for your guinea pig to complete the cage.  

buy a large enough cage.  buy one commercially.  build your own. 

 Like most pets, guinea pigs can learn to come to you when called with a little practice and motivation in the form a treat. Make sure you use your guinea pig’s name often and address her by name when you feed her and give her treats.   You can also practice getting her to come to you when called by taking her out of her cage and placing her a few feet away from you. Call her by name and hold out one of her favorite treats. Your guinea pig should be motivated to run to you. When she does so, give her a treat as a reward. Practice this at least once a day and over time she should come to you when called by name outside her cage and inside her cage.; , This is another simple command you can teach your guinea pig using a treat.   Hold a treat above your guinea pig’s head so she has to stand on her back legs to get to it. Say the command “Stand up” and then let her have the treat once she is on her back legs. Repeat this command once a day on a consistent basis. Over time, your guinea pig will stand up when you command her, even when you are not holding a treat.  You can practice this command with your guinea pig when she is in her cage or outside of her cage.   Hold a treat in your hand and let your guinea pig approach you. When she is in front of you, move your hand so you make a circle, and say the command “Circle”. Your guinea pig should follow the motion of your hand, with the treat, and make a circle. Once she makes a circle, give her the treat. Repeat this once a day until she can circle on command, without the treat.  Use a ball that is not too heavy and not too big, like a tennis ball, so your guinea pig can maneuver it easily. You will also need a treat that is long and flat, like a carrot stick.   Place the carrot stick on the ground and then put the tennis ball on top of the carrot stick. Encourage your guinea pig to try to push the ball off the treat so she can access the treat and say “Push the ball.” Repeat these steps and over time you should be able to remove the treat so she learns to push the ball on her own, without the treat.  You will need a hoop that is about 6” - 10” in diameter, or you can use pipe cleaners to form a hoop that is close to that size. The top of an ice cream tub, or a tennis racket without the strings would also work. Make sure that whatever you use as a hoop, there are no sharp edges or anything your guinea pig can get stuck on as she learns to jump.Begin by holding the hoop so it touches the ground or the bottom of your guinea pig’s cage. Hold a treat on one side of the hoop, or have someone help you by holding the treat as you hold the hoop. Call your guinea pig’s name and make sure she can see the treat on the other side of the hoop. Say the command: “Through the hoop”. You may need to give your guinea pig a nudge or a gentle push to convince her to jump through the hoop. Over time, she will be motivated enough by the treat to jump through the hoop and get it. Praise her and give her the treat when she goes through the hoop. Repeat these steps until your guinea pig starts to go through the hoop on her own, without the motivation of the treat.  Many guinea pig owners teach their pets to go to the bathroom in a litter box. However, this takes a lot of patience and practice. When you are first litter box training your guinea pig, be prepared for some accidents and do not scold or punish your guinea pig if this happens. Your guinea pig will respond more to positive reinforcement and acknowledgement.To litter train your guinea pig, place a litter box in the spot in her cage where she goes to the bathroom often. Place a handful of hay in the box and a few fecal pellets. When you notice your guinea pig using the litter box, give her a treat as praise. Over time, she will understand that using the litter box is a good thing that leads to treats and she will start to use it on a regular basis.  

train her to come to you when she is called.  practice the stand up command.  do the turn in a circle command.  train your guinea pig to push a ball.  teach her to jump through a hoop.  practice litter box training. 

 Before you put a litter box in your guinea pig's cage, you need to watch her to see where she normally goes to the bathroom. Guinea pigs like to scent mark their territory, so your guinea pig will likely scope out a corner of her cage to pee and poop in regularly.   Although there is one corner where she will go most often, this does not mean she will always go in this corner. Just pick the place she frequents the most.; , Once you have figured out the best location for your guinea pig's litter box, you need to buy a tray that will fit nicely in that corner. Pick one that is the right size for the cage as well as one that will be comfortable for your guinea pig. You don't want it to be too small because then she won't have enough room to sit and go to the potty.   You can buy small litter trays at your local pet store that are for small rodents. You also need to put in brand new bedding. Otherwise, she will smell her old pee and might want to go there., The litter tray needs to be filled with the same kind of bedding that you keep in your guinea pig cage. Although it is called a litter tray, the substance used for the tray is not what is typically considered litter but is actually just the same hay or straw that you keep in your guinea pig cage. You should take a handful or two from the cage where she has already pooped and peed and lay that in the litter tray at first. Then you should set the try in the cage that you picked earlier.   Using hay at first that has already been soiled will lead her to the tray because her scent will be all over it. The kinds of bedding that work great for guinea pigs are aspen, wood pulp, hay, and straw. There are also different varieties of litter pellets and bedding that have been vet recommended as well. Never buy cedar or corn cob for your guinea pig because they are toxic. Don't put her food and water near or in the litter box. She will not like to potty where she eats.You can also put a little bit of eating straw in her litter tray as well so she will feel comfortable in there and might be able to munch a little while she goes to the bathroom., Once you place the try in her cage, watch to see if she uses it. Since it smells like her and is in a familiar location, she should use it most of the time. If you find that she doesn't use it, you might have to take it out and try again. There might be something wrong with the tray that is deterring her from using it.When you see her using her litter box, give her a treat. This will encourage her behavior and make her want to use it more so you will give her more treats.If the sides on the litter tray look too big for her, you should use sharp scissors or a small saw or knife and cut the excess edge off. This will make it short enough for her to get into the tray.  You should only clean out the litter tray every three days or so. You can dump out what is in the litter tray and replenish it with new litter. You should only wash the tray every other week. This will make sure that her smell will remain on the tray and she will likely go back to it.You should use litter that is best for guinea pigs. If you aren't sure what to use, ask at your local pet store or vet's office.  Although most guinea pigs will learn to use a litter tray most or all of the time, there are some guinea pigs that might never learn to use it. Keep trying to get your guinea pig to use the tray, but even if she only uses it half the time, that is that much less you have to clean up out of her cage.Never punish your guinea pig or yell at her. She doesn't understand why she needs to go to the potty in the same place all the time. Encourage the good behavior, but don't try punishment. It doesn't work on guinea pigs., Once you have trained your guinea pig in her cage, you may want to train your guinea pig outside of her cage during play time. Start somewhere small. It needs to be an area that you can control easily and where you can keep an eye on her. You should make sure there aren't any small vents that she can run into without getting out.   A bathroom or hallway is a great place to start. They are small, have few wires that are close to the ground, and have very few places for your guinea pig to hide. This will help keep her safe and help you keep track of her while still allowing her to exercise., You need to pick a dark, out of the way corner of the room to place her litter tray. This will encourage her to seek that corner out and use it to potty. Since this will be the only thing that has her smell on it, she will be able to find it, not matter which corner you put it in.   Try to leave some litter in it that has already been used. This way it will feel like her territory. If you want, you can let her loose for a little while first to see which corner she prefers to go to the potty and then place her litter tray there., Guinea pigs like to use the potty in dark corners away from other things, just like they do in their cages. To help persuade your guinea pig to use the corner where you placed her tray, you need cover up the remaining corners so she cannot run there to potty.   If she has no other dark corner to pee or poop in, she will be more likely to use her litter tray in the other corner. If you want to, you can also place newspaper around the room in case she has an accident. This will make it easier to clean up., Once your guinea pig gets used to the area, you can expand it a little at a time. Since she should already know where her litter tray is, she should use it even though her play area is bigger. Just make sure you keep wires off the floor and hard to reach hiding spaces covered so you don't injure or lose your guinea pig.   Just like with training in the cage, do not scold her if she uses the bathroom somewhere else. You can reward her when she goes in her litter tray, which will be a positive reminder to use the area. 

observe your guinea pig.  buy a litter tray.  prepare the litter tray.  watch her behavior.  keep up the litter tray.  be patient.  start small.  lay out her litter tray.  cover up the remaining corners.  expand the area. 

 The first step to litter training is watching your guinea pig. Most guinea pigs have a certain area of their cage where they eliminate. If you set up a guinea pig's litter box in this space, it's more likely to use the box.Watch your guinea pig for a few days. Take note of where it tends to eliminate. You can also pay attention when you're cleaning the cage. You may notice a lot of droppings and urine in one area of the cage.; , You can buy a litter box online or make one yourself. Make sure the litter box is easy for your guinea pig to get in and out of. Place it in the corner of the cage where your guinea pig usually eliminates.Make sure the box you choose is large enough that the guinea pig can fit its entire body in the box. Make sure the sides are low enough. The guinea pig should be able to climb in and out of the box with ease.  Go for organic paper-based litters. Wood litters can sometimes cause respiratory problems. You can find guinea pig litter online or purchase some at a local pet store.If you can't find a litter box that works for you, you can always place litter in the corner of the box.  Some guinea pigs have more than one corner where they eliminate. If this is the case, they are less likely to start using a single litter box. If your guinea pig eliminates in more than one corner, set up a box in each corner the guinea pig tends to use., For the most part, litter training is fairly hands off. Some guinea pigs will take to the litter box and others will not. When starting out, try to see if the guinea pig approaches the litter box on its own.Many guinea pigs will realize they're supposed to eliminate in the box. With luck, your guinea pig will take to its litter box right away.  If your guinea pig is unsure of the box, place a small amount of hay in the box. The guinea pig may be enticed to enter the box by the hay. If it smells any lingering feces or urine, it may then realize its supposed to eliminate in the box.Some people advocate leaving food in the box. The guinea pig will eat and then eliminate. This method is only likely to work if you've seen your guinea pig defecate or urinate near its litter box before. Many guinea pigs will not eliminate near a food source to avoid contamination., If your guinea pig starts using its box, change the litter regularly. Try to change it about every three days. A guinea pig will not eliminate in a dirty litter box.Only wash the box every other week. You want some of the scent to remain intact so the guinea pig knows to use its litter box.  Clumping cat litter can be dangerous for guinea pigs. Guinea pigs may eat clumping cat litter, and can choke on it. Clumping cat litter also contains chemicals meant to reduce scent, which can be toxic to a guinea pig.It may be a good idea to ask your vet about safe litters before choosing a litter for your guinea pig.  Never scold a guinea pig for failing to use its litter box. Your guinea pig is unlikely to understand why it is being scolded. Scolding will not encourage your guinea pig to use its litter box. It will only create stress.You should also avoid other forms of punishment, especially physical punishment. You should never hit your pet.  Not all guinea pigs take to a litter box. As guinea pigs are less domesticated than other household pets, they're difficult to train. Despite your best efforts, a guinea pig may never learn to use its litter box. Do not try to force a guinea pig to use a litter box if it seems unwilling.If your guinea pig does not tend to eliminate in a single corner, it is less likely to use its litter box.  

observe where your guinea pig tends to eliminate.  set up a litter box.  choose a quality litter.  place multiple litter boxes in the cage, if necessary.  see if your guinea pig approaches the litter box on its own.  try encouraging litter box use with hay.  change the litter regularly.  do not use clumping cat litter.  avoid scolding your guinea pig.  accept your guinea pig may not always use its litter box. 

 If you recently adopted your guinea pig, you must give it time to settle into its new home. This is a long process, and can't just be done overnight. If your guinea pig is in a rowdy environment, or if you negatively interact (scream, hurting it etc.) with your guinea pig, it can be very difficult to get their trust again. Guinea pigs are easy pets to take care of, but they can also be very stubborn! , A sick guinea pig isn't a happy guinea pig! Always take your guinea pig to the vet, even if you don't suspect it's sick. Regular vet checks are always a good idea.  Take your guinea pig to the vet immediately if your guinea pig has a hunched poster, crusty eyes, patchy hair loss or overall just looks like it's in pain. Guinea pigs hide sickness very well, that's how guinea pigs defend themselves in the wild because the predators can sense when a guinea pig is vulnerable. Don't forget to take care of your guinea pig's hygiene. You might need extra services like grooming, nail clipping, or other special procedures, like neutering. If this is your first vet visit, your guinea pig's veterinarian should tell you during your first visit if there needs to be extra services involved. Never cut your guinea pig's nails on your own. Guinea pigs and other animals have a vein called a "quick" which if cut, can cause extreme pain and bleeding. So always have a licensed vet cut your guinea pig's nails.  For example, if your guinea pig is in a hut, stick your finger close to the hut. A healthy guinea pig that trusts you will investigate by sniffing your finger for a couple of seconds before quickly returning to the hut., Guinea pigs don't want to be trapped in a cage all day! Remove all wires, plants, and other objects a guinea pig shouldn't have access to. Make sure the area is clean, and has plenty of fresh air flow (not cold air!). Cover the spot where your guinea is laying in with a fleece (avoid using an overly fluffy blanket) blanket or a towel. Fence the area in with a gate. Don't forget to throw in some of your guinea pig's favorite toys! Your guinea pig will be have plenty of space to exercise and play in, and it might show its appreciation by popcorning or oinking!  Don't forget to get supervise your guinea pig!  , This might sound like it won't work, but giving a guinea pig fresh food is actually another great way to get your guinea pig to popcorn! Guinea pigs are huge food fans, just like us humans. They will sometimes squeak when they hear a cabinet or a refrigerator opening! Make sure you supply your guinea pig with fresh hay everyday.  Don't overfeed your guinea pig. Obesity is a common problem, and can cause many problems for guinea pigs. A quick test to see if your guinea pig is underweight is to run your hands down its body, if you can feel its ribs easily its underweight. If you just feel fat and no ribs, your guinea pig is overweight.  Don't feel bad if you never see your guinea pig popcorn. Guinea pigs have other ways of letting you know they love you, such as oinking and purring.  If your guinea pig is older, it is less likely to popcorn. Popcorning is mostly seen in younger guinea pigs. There may be plenty of other reasons your guinea pig isn't popcorning, but if you are really concerned, talk to a guinea pig behavioral specialist or visit the vet.  

bond with your guinea pig.  take your guinea pig to the vet.  do a quick test on your guinea pig.  set up an area for your guinea pig to get play in.  feed your guinea pig.  if all else fails, just be a responsible and loving guinea pig owner! 

 The saddle blanket protects the horse's body from friction from the leather saddle, and is vital for a safe ride. It also keeps the saddle clean from the horse's body which will sweat and froth with the exertion of a ride.If you don’t have a blanket, you need one to properly tack your horse.   You can get a saddle blanket at any farming supply or agriculture store. You can choose a traditional woven blanket which is folded in half for use, or you can buy a felt or cotton pad which is less likely to bunch under the saddle or catch burrs if you ride in a field.Be sure you brush the horse and ensure there are no burrs in its coat or any injuries to its skin.Position the blanket slightly over the horse's withers (the ridge between its shoulder blades). First put the blanket down a bit too far toward the neck, then pull it back toward the horse's tail until it's in the correct position. This method smooths the hair under the blanket so that it lies flat and doesn't itch or bother the animal.; , This process might seem cumbersome and can take some practice before it becomes easy, especially if you're used to the English saddle which has less straps and other things dangling down.   Stand next to the horse's left shoulder and keep your feet shoulder-width apart. Hook the right stirrup up over the saddle horn so that it won't get caught under the saddle as you lift it, then swing the saddle up and over the horse's back so that your right arm is across the horse's back.Be sure to practice good lifting techniques to avoid injury to your back or leg muscles; saddles can weigh from 10-35 pounds and swinging it without proper posture could injure your muscles or joints. As you put the saddle over the blanket, be sure that you grab the stirrups (the leather loops for the rider's feet), cinches, and straps (any leather hanging down) and hold them out of the way so that they don't get stuck under the saddle.The process of getting the saddle and blanket in the right place might cause them both to slide too far back; in that case, start over with the blanket first.  This is the side you have been standing on to put the blanket and saddle on.   You can keep the left stirrup up over the saddle horn (the knob on top of the saddle for the rider to hold) for better access, but bring the tie down to the horse's side.  

put a saddle blanket or pad on your horse's back.  position the saddle on the blanket.  position the stirrup, cinches, and straps on the left side of the horse. 

 Most saddles have a removable leather strap called a girth or latigo that attaches with buckles to the tie on the horse's right side (some have a girth attached to the tie, in which case you can skip this step).Buckle the girth securely to the tie that hangs down by the horse's front leg on the right side of the horse. Walk in front of the horse back to its left side, and then reach under the horse's body and pass the girth underneath the horse's chest.  The girth should be pulled up to the buckle on the left side of the horse's saddle, where it should be fastened much like the other side using a buckle.   Cinch it tightly but gently (don't force it to go tighter than feels snug and secure). You should wait until the horse exhales to cinch it, because if you tighten it while the horse has its lungs full of air it will be too loose when the horse exhales to be safe.Some horses intentionally take a deep breath right before you tighten the girth. When they do that they get bigger around, so when they breathe out the girth is too loose - just the way they like it! This is called bloating, and some horses do it because a girth doesn't fit them or their skin is being pinched under the girth. If your horse does this, you might want to check that the girth itself is long enough for your horse and not causing irritation or pain.You can secure the additional length of the tie by passing it through the D-ring at the top of the tie, wrapping it around the tie and pulling it through at the top (like a men's necktie). This will keep it up and out of the way of the horse's legs even if the horse runs.  Before you mount up, be sure you didn't forget anything.   Be sure the stirrups are down on either side. Double-check that everything is tight because if it's loose and you get on you'll slide right off! Be sure that the bridle is on correctly. Now mount up and ride! Don’t forget to mount from the left side. 

attach the girth.  cinch the ties.  put the finishing touches on. 

 If you feel that you are having to lean to one side to keep your balance or keep upright, it's probably because the saddle was either placed on incorrectly or has shifted because it is loose. You can know for sure by looking at the pommel (the horn that you hold with one hand while riding). If the horn (or pommel, the knob that sticks up on the saddle for the rider to hold) is not in perfect alignment with the horse's mane, the saddle has shifted off-center.The saddle may have shifted because it was too loose, or it may have shifted because you are putting too much weight on one stirrup and not evenly distributing your weight (this happens all the time, especially to new riders, and especially if you're riding the horse in circles). You can try to shift the saddle back by putting your weight on the opposite side stirrup, but if the saddle moves too easily it is probably too loose.Dismount and adjust it.  While you might do a lot of bouncing out of the saddle if your horse is trotting or cantering, the saddle itself should never leave the horse's back. If it's moving up and down as the horse moves, it will injure the horse's back.If the saddle itself seems to leave the horse's body as you trot, you must immediately dismount and tighten the girth.  If you're not sure if the saddle is on properly, don't keep riding, even if you're worried that others will think you don't know what you're doing. Every rider has to adjust the saddle sometimes, and no one will think less of you for putting your horse's comfort and your own safety first.   If someone is with you, they can inspect the cinch for you. This is more reliable than doing it yourself since your weight in the saddle will cause more "give" to the girth and make it looser. Have the person check to see if they can pull the girth itself an inch or more away from the horse's body while you are in the saddle. If they can, it's too loose., You most likely will not have to repeat all the steps again, but you will need to loosen the tie and unbuckle the girth from the horse's left side to re-tighten.   Make a note of what position the buckle is in before you remove it, and then ensure that you tighten it to the next notch (or two, if the saddle was very loose) as you re-cinch it.  

watch out for a shifting saddle.  notice if your saddle seems to bounce up and down.  dismount and inspect the cinch.  tighten the cinch before mounting. 

 To do this, put your guinea pig in a safe area-such as its cage-and click the clicker (or say the verbal marker). A second or so after clicking the clicker, give your guinea pig a treat. Repeat this several times until you think your guinea pig understands what the click, or marker, means.   Occasionally, this will take a long time. To see if your guinea pig is properly conditioned to the clicker or verbal marker, act normal for several minutes, talking and playing with the guinea pig, and then, suddenly click the clicker or say the marker clearly and firmly. If your guinea pig looks at you, expecting a treat, they have been properly conditioned and you can move on with training. If they keep about their business, they do not yet understand what the marker means and need to be worked with on conditioning a bit more. Don't be discouraged if your guinea pig does this.  Skittish, hyper, stubborn, or impatient guinea pigs will be more difficult to train. It takes a lot of patience to get your guinea pig to learn a trick, and often times they will respond to a hand motion rather than a word-for example, if you were teaching your guinea pig to stand up, it would be easier for them to grasp if you held your finger over their head as an indication to do the trick in contrast to just saying "stand up!".   Many people, before beginning to train their guinea pigs, work on targeting. Teaching targeting to a guinea pig is quite simple-to do so, hold a finger or some kind of long stick somewhere a few inches away from your guinea pig and wait. As soon as they get near the finger or stick and touch it, click or say the marker and treat. Do this about twenty or thirty times, or until your guinea pig touches it efficiently several times in a row. This may make training much easier.  There are several different methods, and some are easier than others. Try to get your guinea pig out for at least one 5-10 minute session each day. If either you or the pig become frustrated, treat and put them back in their cage for a little while.   Keep in mind that guinea pigs' brains work differently than a cat's or dog's, so they may not process information as quickly as a larger animal. Patience is key.  

condition your guinea pig to the clicker or verbal marker.  once your guinea pig is well conditioned to the clicker or verbal marker, begin to slowly ease them into performing basic commands.  begin teaching your guinea pig. 

 Ensure that there is nothing to pose a danger to your guinea pig, or you, and that there is nothing that your guinea pig can crawl under, save for a hidey house for them to retreat to if they feel the need.   Training inside the cage works just as well in the beginning, if your guinea pig is more comfortable in their cage. It will become harder to train inside the cage, however, as you move on to more advanced tricks that require equipment, such as climbing over things. Keep in mind that anything you do use for a trick, such as a hoop, must be adjusted to fit the needs of your piggy. Remember that not all guinea pigs have the ability to focus on one task for more than a few minutes at a time, so changing up the training routine may help a guinea pig to learn more easily and not become bored.  Make sure that you are not holding it impossibly high, as the idea is to make your guinea pig stand up on its hind legs to receive the treat. Don't keep it too low either, or your pig may stand up, snatch the treat, and get away with it without learning anything. This could happen with any trick.  Praise your guinea pig as if they just did the hardest thing in the world, and then repeat.   Try to time the click or word so that the moment they drop back down, you perform the action. This will eventually lead to the mindset of your piggy being like this: Trick-->Click/Marker-->Treat-->Praise. It may take time for the guinea pig to realize this, but when they do, training is much easier. When your guinea pig does this trick, make sure they do not stand up for too long, and allow them to lean on your hand for support if needed.  The guinea pig may stand up on its hind legs without you giving them the motion, which is good-it shows that the guinea pig understands what it has to do to get the treat. However, it is important for them to wait for you to give the signal. If they stand up, just watch quietly, and when they finish, put the treat or finger over their head again. This part may take a while, and it may cause some confusion, but it is essential for your guinea pig to learn to wait for your command, and when they do, it's very rewarding.  

place your guinea pig in a piggy-proof area that both of you are comfortable in.  hold a treat - or, if your pig has learned targeting, a finger - above the guinea pig's head.  once your guinea pig stands up on its hind legs, allow it to drop back down to all fours, and then click or use the verbal marker and treat.  continue to do this until your guinea pig does it correctly every time. 

 It can be any color, and any type, as long as it could not potentially harm your guinea pig. Set it in the area you will be training in.   Be sure to turn it upside-down, so that your guinea pig will not knock it over as you begin to teach the trick. A garbage can that may have contained anything that could be harmful should not be used.  Gently lift them out of their cage and set them down near the garbage can/other object. Allow the guinea pig to sniff around if they feel the need. Some may ignore it, but this does not mean that they won't do the trick-have patience.  Hold out one of the treats and lure your guinea pig towards the garbage can. Move it slightly, further away and around it, until your guinea pig has completed a quarter of the circle. Click and treat.   Do this three or four times, until your guinea pig becomes comfortable with moving around it a bit.  Every time the guinea pig moves forward a few steps, reward them with a click(or verbal marker) and a treat. Gradually increase the amount of steps they take before receiving the treat.   Hopefully, your guinea pig will soon discover that moving around the garbage can does not go without rewards. Many will figure this out within a few minutes of doing that same thing, but if they don't, go back to luring and go on from there as many times as your guinea pig needs it.  Some guinea pigs will pick this up faster than others, and that's okay. No piggy is perfect, no matter how intelligent they may be.  The hand motion can be whatever you see fit, but I have found that holding a finger above the object, where the guinea pig can clearly see it, and moving it around in a circular motion. Saying the command "Around!" or "Spin!" may help as well, but verbal commands are more for the trainer than for the animal themselves.   From this point on, only treat your guinea pig when they walk around after your hand motion. If they do it without your motion, just sit patiently until they are done and ask them to do it afterwards. If they do it, treat and praise them immensely. It takes many guinea pigs a long time to understand this, but, if the trainer is persistent, it will be very rewarding in the end.  Once the guinea pig is very good at walking around the garbage can on your hand motion, put the can up somewhere and do the motion. This can be very easy, or very hard, depending on the piggy.  

get a small garbage can or round, cylinder-shaped object of some sort.  place your guinea pig in the general area.  use a treat to lure your guinea pig to it.  stand back and see if the guinea pig will try to go around on its own.  eventually, begin only treating your guinea pig when they make a full circle around the object.  begin enforcing a hand motion.  take the garbage can away gradually. 

 Avoid sticking your fingers through the bars of the cage. If your guinea pig feels threatened, it will lash out and your fingers will be the perfect target. Don’t give it the chance to do any damage.; , You will inevitably come into contact with your guinea pig. Wash your hands to get rid of any odors that the guinea pig may not like such as, dog and cat scents. Guinea pigs have a keen sense of smell and an instinctual fear of scents they associate with danger. Since cats and dogs can pose a threat, they might react negatively to those smells.On the off chance that your guinea pig has an insatiable appetite, make sure that you wash your hands to remove any food odors. You don’t want your guinea pig to confuse your fingers for their meal. You might consider wearing gloves until you are confident that your guinea pig won’t bite you.  Biting results primarily from fear, but there are several other biological and environmental reasons for such behavior.   Pain can cause biting. You might be hurting the guinea pig or there might be a deeper physiological issue.Sometimes, guinea pigs will bite you when they mean to nibble on themselves. This can be an indicator of mites or fleas. If discomfort or pain is a concern, contact your veterinarian for an exam right away. If your pig is nibbling/biting while you are holding it, it may need to get down to urinate. So, if that is the case, put it back in the cage and watch what it does next. If the pig urinates, you have your answer.Non-neutered male guinea pigs may show dominance by biting more than females or neutered male guinea pigs. Consider neutering your guinea pig. However there is no guarantee that neutering will stop the biting completely.Dominance is not solely based on testosterone levels.If your guinea pig is biting the bars of its cage, it could mean that the animal is lonely and wants attention. It might not be exhibiting menacing behavior, but calling out for attention. Approach carefully. 

keep yourself safe.  wash your hands.  understand a guinea pig’s reasons for biting. 

 If you're experiencing crushes frequently, try to take a step back. Think about how you would view your behavior if you were an outsider in the situation. Give your feelings an objective assessment to see if they're healthy.Look at your past and present crushes and relationships. Are you drawn to a particular type of a person? Do you tend to bounce from one crush to another? If you've ever had a relationship with your crush, was it healthy? Do you tend to have crushes even if you're in a committed relationship? Own up to whether or not having crushes is detrimental to you. Avoid feelings of blame, directed towards yourself or others, in favor of simply addressing your own behavioral patterns over time.; , Having a crush on someone is a normal part of life. However, because crushes can be so powerful on an emotional level, they can become obsessive. If you've noticed you have a tendency to obsess, try to figure out how to refrain from letting that tendency take over. Try to reduce the amount of time spent dwelling on crushes in the future.Thinking about your crush while you are trying to work or do something else can be a sign that you're focusing too much on them. Do you usually allow your feelings about a crush to distract you from work, school, or other relationships? If so, try consciously changing your focus if you notice your mind dwelling on crushes too much. Bring your attention back to whatever it was you were doing before you started thinking about your crush. Try taking 90 seconds to take a series of deep breaths, focusing only on your breathing. This can help you get thoughts of your crush out of your mind and return your brain to the present., Continual crushes can bring up powerful emotions, causing you to constantly dwell on one potential romantic partner or another. To avoid this, it can be useful to stay focused on other things you enjoy instead of fixating on a string of crushes. Keeping your mind busy with other things can be a good way to get over a crush. Try thinking about your plans for the future, work that you have to get done, movies you want to see, or other things that you find engaging. Try to do activities that take up your attention. Avoid doing something that might let your mind wander back to thinking about your crush. Remember, it is normal to have crushes. It's okay to occasionally indulge in a lighthearted crush. However, if having crushes is becoming a problem, keeping busy can help you from letting your feelings get out of control.  Spending time with other people can be a great way to get your mind off of a crush. If you're having a great conversation with someone or doing something fun together, it's easy to forget about your crush. Try doing something fun with your friends or family to help get over a crush quickly.Your friends and family can be a great support system if you are having trouble dealing with a crush. Try talking with them if it feels overwhelming. If your crush is part of your group of friends, try hanging out with your friends individually for a while. Sometimes, the need to have crushes can be due to a lack of emotionally intimacy in other areas of your life. Working on building strong relationships with friends and family members may reduce your need to develop crushes.  If you're keen on the notion of lessening intense crushes, have a game plan in place. Think about what to do if you start develop too strong or too intense of a crush in the future. Have a way to break the pattern in mind.Does having crushes make you feel less lonely or sad? If so, find other ways to deal during those moments. Try to, say, strengthen a plutonic bond you have or work on a hobby or skill of your own. Feeling more secure about yourself and your relationships may lessen your need for strong crushes. It may be hard to stick to a plan at first, especially if you're used to having a lot of crushes that get out of control. Know going into your plan you may feel sad and frustrated at times. However, try to also acknowledge these feelings will be worth it long term, as you won't allow crushes to get out of control.  Even though you might not want the feelings that a strong crush on someone can bring, it's important to accept them for what they are. It's perfectly fine to have a crush and take notice of it, without engaging it. People have small crushes throughout their lives. People even have crushes when they're already in stable romantic relationships. Just because you have a crush, doesn't mean you need to act on it or let it make your choices for you.Do not feel guilty about having a crush, even if it's on someone who's not available. You cannot control how you feel. If you have romantic feelings for a married co-worker, for example, you may feel guilty. However, you are not choosing to have these feelings. The only you can control is your reactions. How people react to feelings defines their morality, not the feelings themselves. Try to say something to yourself like, "I have a crush on Brandon but he's married. It's not wrong to feel this way. I can't help it. I'm not going to act on it, so I don't need to become overwhelmed with guilt."  , When you have a crush on someone, it's all too easy to focus only on the good things about them. If you're prone to intense crushes, you may have a tendency to put your crushes on a pedestal right away. Imbalanced views can create unrealistic images of others. Try to change your focus and find things that you might not like about your crushes as they arise. This can help you get over crushes faster, and may reduce the number of crushes you have.   It can be challenging. However, keeping a balanced opinion of your crush can help you cope. You don't need to be mean, but finding things you don't like about someone can help you stay neutral in your opinion of them. Remind yourself your crush has flaws, and the fantasy relationship you're spinning is unlikely to work out as well in reality.  Although having a crush can bring on intense and overwhelming feelings, crushes don't last. It can help knowing that the crush won't be a permanent feeling and that things will eventually return to normal. This can keep you from allowing your feelings from becoming obsessive. You will see this more as a fleeting feeling than a long, life changing relationship. This can be particularly important for crushes accrued when you're already in a committed relationship.Remember, most crushes last for around four months. If you tend to have one crush after another, they'll probably be in the four month range. Remind yourself your feelings may have an expiration date to help keep them in check. Crushes will fade in time, generally leaving you with thoughts like “I don't know what I saw in them to begin with”. Remind yourself of this when you start obsessing over the person.  Oftentimes, people enjoy the intensity of a crush. There is nothing wrong with allowing yourself to enjoy the happy feelings a crush brings, even if they're fleeting. However, these feelings can get out of control. Continually remind yourself that you are in control of your own happiness.You may find that, after awhile, you rely on small gestures of attention or care from your crush to feel happy. This can easily backfire on you, leaving you reeling. Remind yourself that, while it's nice to have a crush, only you can make yourself happy. You will have to learn to rely on your own hobbies, interests, and passions for happiness rather than another person.  Having a crush can be tough. Crushes can make you feel hurt, confused, frustrated or any number of painful things. Since it can be so difficult to have a crush, it's important that you take care of yourself. Try doing something fun, getting your feelings out by writing or drawing, or giving yourself a small treat once in a while. Taking care of yourself until the crush fades can help make things a lot easier on you., If you believe your continual crushes are becoming a problem, admit this. Being honest with yourself about negative behavior is an important step to overcoming these behaviors.Think about what your crushes are doing to you emotionally. Are you neglecting school work to obsess over various crushes? Do you have a new crush each week who you cannot live without thinking of constantly? Acknowledge that crushes are causing you more unhappiness and anxiety than anything. This can help you recognize you need to acknowledge underlying issues that drive your need to have frequent crushes.  Be realistic about each new crush you have. This can help you figure out if this really a meaningful, important crush or if your'e just feeling something to feel it.Would you truly act on this crush and, if so, what would happen? There are often many reasons not to act on a crush. You may have a crush on someone from work. You may already be in a relationship. Thinking about what would happen if you acted on your crushes can help you trace patterns. Maybe you always develop crushes on unavailable people. This could say something about larger romantic patterns in your life. Maybe you crush on people you can't have to avoid true intimacy.  Crushes can represent real feelings that should be acted on. However, if you constantly have crushes, something else may be at play. Crushes may represent a need that's not being met elsewhere in life.Think about your lash crush and what they represented to you. Consider the circumstances of your life at the time. Think about past crushes. Did they represent similar things? For example, maybe your last crush was on a married co-worker. The crush before that was on your boss, who office policy forbids you from dating. What did these people represent? In this case, your crushes are on people who you cannot really be with. Did you experience a bad breakup in the past? Maybe developing crushes on unobtainable people helps you feel romantic feelings without having to risk actual intimacy.  If you seem to have obsessive crushes often, you may suffer from a condition like love addiction. If your crushes are interfering with your daily life, to the point you're unable to complete basic tasks, make an appointment with a therapist. A qualified therapist can help you learn to identify the triggers for intense crushes and how to better regulate your emotions. 

step back and observe your behavior.  step away when feelings become obsessive.  chanel your energy elsewhere.  spend time with others.  make a game plan.  accept your feelings.  keep a balanced opinion of your crushes.  remember crushes do not last.  be responsible for your own happiness.  take care of yourself.  own up to your unhealthy habits.  keep the consequences of acting on a crush in mind.  interrogate what your crushes represent.  seek professional guidance. 

 They may not be ready for it yet.; , The best relationships start on friendships.  Trust me, don't change yourself for a guy. I liked this one guy and it just wasn't me. You want this person to like you for the person that you really are.  Ask him if he can invite some of his friends to the mall with him (for example). Then get some of your friends, then all of you agree to meet somewhere and then just hang out. That way, you aren't rushing into things, but you still get to hang out.  Guys admire girls with confidence.  Use makeup at a moderation. Go for natural colors and colors that go best with your eye color, skin tone, etc. Don't glob stuff on your face, it will ruin your skin. Use perfume or body mist on your neck and wrists (for now).  There will be plenty of guys out there for you that will like you.  Just remember to take things slow.  Choose something fun for your age, like rollerskating. That way, the most you can do is hold each others hands.  

don't think you can just go out with him/her if you ask them.  try befriending the person.  show this person the real you.  organize "group dates.",  believe that you're beautiful.  pretty yourself.  don't fear rejection.  if he likes you back, great!,  be careful what you choose for a first date. 

 The guinea pig’s cage should be kept in a quiet area of the house to minimize stress. If your guinea pig bites, it is most likely that it feels threatened. Turn the TV down or off. Put other pets, if you have any, in another room. You want the guinea pig to only focus on you. Then when you act nicely, your guinea pig will associate you with a pleasant experience, not stress.  If you’ve just brought home your guinea pig, it will take a while for it to get used to its new home, its cage, and the room the cage is in. Let the guinea pig acclimate. Don’t immediately start playing with the guinea pig. Open the cage and let it investigate the opening. It is important to let your guinea pig explore. Once it knows its space and where the good hiding places are, it will feel more comfortable. As the pig gets more relaxed, place an exercise pen around the cage on the floor, and give the guinea pig time to explore. Do this when it is quiet — make sure there are no loud noises and no other pets around. Place fresh greens at the edge of the cage door and outside the cage to encourage exploration. Don’t push. Every guinea pig is different and this will take time.  Hang out without trying to engage your pig at first.Sit next to the cage. Talk quietly to the pig. Place tasty greens like parsley or dandelion greens in its space. Wait for the pig to get more comfortable before reaching out to pet it. Eventually, you can stick out a finger and let it explore your scent. Do not make contact until the guinea pig feels comfortable.   Just sit and read or watch TV (quietly) next to the cage, while the pig gets used to your presence. Loud noises will frighten the guinea pig, so hang out together when the house is quiet and no dogs or cats are around.  Make physical contact for short periods. Do not grab and hold your guinea pig against its will. Once the pig accepts your hand in the cage, gradually and gently pet the guinea pig for a few seconds at a time. Try petting it behind the ears and on the top of the head at first. Only after it is comfortable in its setting and with you petting it, should you pick it up. Lift it up from under the chest just off the ground and then place it back down immediately. Work on this to get it used to being picked up.When you pick up a pig, use one hand to pick it up around the chest and the other to support the hindquarters. The guinea pig needs to feel completely supported so it doesn't worry about being dropped. Start by sitting on the floor. Pick it up and pet the it. Keep calm. If the pig gets agitated, put the pig back down before it feels the need to defend itself with their teeth., Remember that nibbling/biting is the guinea pig's way of expressing itself. If the guinea pig feels uncomfortable being held by a child and resorts to biting, tell the child to put the pig down immediately.   Under your supervision, have children sit down on the floor with a towel, a “Critter Cuddler Blanket”, or “Cuddle Cup” to hold the guinea pig.This way, there is a barrier between the child and the guinea pig to protect them both. Have the child pet the guinea pig gently and allow the guinea pig to wander away, so it does not feel trapped.  Don’t reward bad behavior. If it seems that the guinea pig is biting to get your attention, do not reward the behavior by giving attention. Come back later and pet the pig when it is calm. You will have to read the pig’s body language and if it seem calm and accepting, pet it and reward that behavior. If you attempt to abate its biting with treats, it will associate biting and bad behavior with tasty treats.  After a few months of living together, you will start to notice the guinea pig’s patterns. Avoid bothering the pig when it is napping, for instance, to decrease the chance of an adverse reaction to your attention., This can injure the pig, but it will also teach the pig that it needs to defend itself against you - leading to more biting.It might be your gut reaction to lash out at a guinea pig after it bites you. Don’t give in to this instinct. Think about why the guinea pig resorted to biting and change your behavior.   If someone held you against your will and you were afraid, had to urinate, or were hungry, would you consider biting? You don’t have another way of communicating, so you probably would sink your teeth into their hand too.  

reduce other factors that cause anxiety.  let your guinea pig explore its space.  slowly introduce yourself into its environment.  gradually work towards holding your guinea pig.  teach children how to hold guinea pigs properly.  give treats to reinforce good behavior.  learn your guinea pig's personality.  do not hit your guinea pig! 

 The celery stalk should be twice as long or longer than the carrot. Take some celery leaves off the stalk to make it tastier for the guinea pig.   Remove the celery veins; these can present a choking hazard.; , Break or cut the celery in half, and slide the carrots in one of the halves. Then put the other carrot on top of the enfolded carrots to make a capsule-like treat, covering the carrots inside.  Some guinea pigs like the leaves, some like the stalks, others like both. You'll discover this by watching your own guinea pig as it eats. Put as much variety in the treat as you can.  Watch your guinea pig munch away on this treat. Success!  

gather a celery stalk and a carrot.  slide the carrot inside the celery stick.  put some leaves under the carrot to make it tastier.  serve. 

 You can cross-tie your horse if they're available at your stable, or use a quick-release knot.  Clean out his hooves with a hoof pick, and clean his coat with a curry comb, dandy brush, and soft brush. Be careful to clean his back, girth, and head; dirt underneath tack can rub and irritate your horse's skin.  

tie up your horse.  groom your horse. 

 Before you saddle your horse, you need to tie her so that she stays put. Check out this helpful wikiHow article to learn how to tie proper knots to keep a horse secured; cross-ties are preferred but not a must.   If you tie your horse with the lead rope, it's always a safe idea to use a quick-release (or “slip”) knot. Consider slipping the tail of the lead rope through the quick release knot’s loop if your horse is knowledgeable about untying knots.; , Horses can become very irritated and sore when ridden without being groomed properly; for both your safety and the horse’s you should never skip this step.   Brush your horse’s body. Use a curry comb to remove any caked mud and then a stiff brush to remove the dust and hair brought up by the curry comb. Finish with a soft brush. Pay special attention to the horse’s back, belly, and girth area. Dirt or burrs underneath tack can irritate your horse to the point of misbehaving and even bucking. Remove tangles and burrs with a mane and tail comb. Be careful when brushing the tail; horses can and will kick. Clean the horse's hooves and check for lodged stones. Be careful or you may be kicked; you should not do this alone unless you are experienced.  Don't place a saddle over a wound.   Check the horse for lumps, bumps, swelling, sores, and heat that could mean your horse is unsound and unfit for riding.  Your horse needs this to protect its back and keep the saddle in place. Place the saddle pad or blanket on the horse’s back.   Put the pad a bit higher on the withers, then sliding it back into place just behind the mane. This ensures that the hair on the horse’s back lies flat beneath the pad and saddle. Make sure the blanket or pad is even on both sides.  At this point you will place a saddle depending on whether you ride Western or English style. This will likely be determined by your training or by what tack is available.  A Western style saddle is designed for utility, since it was designed for a cowboy or rancher to use on the job. It has a saddle horn and a high back, making it a more comfortable seat for long hours on horseback.An English style saddle is sleek and small with no saddle horn and a low back. It is best for formal riding and show riding., Stand on the left side of the horse, and flip the right-side cinches and stirrup over the seat of the saddle to keep them from getting caught beneath it. Then, swing the saddle over the horse. Rock the saddle back and forth into position and unfold the cinches and stirrup.   Don't do this if you're working a young or unknown horse; it hurts to be hit in the head by a heavy stirrup if the horse acts up.  Line up the center line with the spine of the horse.   Check that the stirrups hang equally on both sides, make sure that the front of the saddle sits just behind the withers, and not on top of the shoulder blades  , You should be able to slide two fingers under the gullet (the curve of the saddle just under the horn) without cramping, and have 3-4 fingers-width of space between the horse’s forearms and the cinch.   Don’t use a saddle if it doesn’t fit properly. An ill-fitting saddle can cause a horse to bolt or buck, and also can make a horse sore and cause bad habits.  This is a key step; you won’t be riding without a cinch! However, keep in mind that you should always cinch up a cinch gradually; you don’t want your horse to become cinch-sour.   Pull the cinch under the horse’s belly, towards you, and slip the latigo strap down through the cinch buckle. Pull it all the way through and make sure neither the cinch nor the latigo strap are twisted. Lift the latigo and slip it through the saddle’s D-ring, from outside-in and leaving the ring angled towards the left. Make the cinch snug, but not overly so. Repeat the process once or twice more if you have a lot of length left in the latigo strap. Straighten the secured part of the strap so each layer is on top of the one beneath it, then gradually pull down on the tail of the latigo to tighten the cinch. Don’t tighten it all the way; that’ll come later. Move the tail of the latigo horizontally across the secured latigo and bringing it up through the saddle’s D-ring again, but from the right side. Now slip the tail down through the loop created and fasten the knot. This can be confusing; best to have an experienced saddler help you. Walk the horse around for a minute or two. This will let the horse relax to the saddle and stop bloating (a strategy many tricky horses will use to keep you from putting the saddle on too tight). Finish tightening the cinch. Do this pulling the top layer of latigo strap (not the tail) upwards. Keep the tightening a gradual process; don’t rush things. Re-tighten the knot. Done!  , There should be two fingers-width of space between the horse’s belly and the bottom of the cinch.   This process is similar to that of securing the front cinch, but instead of ending the process with a knot you’ll use the buckle.  This ensures the skin under the cinch isn’t wrinkled, to keep the horse from being pinched while riding.   You can also gradually stretch each front leg forward for a few seconds; this also works to reduce tension in the horse's skin.  Do this by latching it to the saddle’s cinch and front D-rings.   This will keep the saddle from slipping backwards and is especially helpful for on the trail  , With your saddle in place, you are ready to mount (from the left side, of course!)., That's a fancy way to say you need to move the stirrup up higher and secure it in place so that it will not dangle down in your way; you do this by sliding the metal foot stirrup up and tucking it under the saddle.   This keeps the stirrups out of the way, so that they won’t hit the horse as you lift the saddle over the horse’s back  , You will put it back on in a moment, but taking it off keeps it from dangling while you try to position the saddle.   Alternately, you can fold it over the top of the saddle, leaving it attached on the right-hand side.  If you are using a contoured pad (a common English style, which is shaped like the outline of a saddle), there should be about an inch of pad all the way around. For a square pad, be sure to leave at least one inch around the front edge of the saddle.   The saddle should not be so far forward that in makes the shoulder movement hard.  Stand on the left-hand side of the horse, place the saddle on the pad on the horse's back with the pommel of the saddle just in front of the horse's withers.   The arch of the pommel should be directly over the highest point of the horse's withers. The saddle will nestle in behind the horse's shoulder-blades.  Now that the saddle is in place, you need to replace the girth so that you can tighten the saddle and secure it in place. Attach the girth to the girth billets on the off side (the horse's right), then bring it up to the near side (the horse's left).   As a guideline, the girth should come under the horse just behind its front legs. If you can see a gap between the elbow and the girth, the saddle is too far back. Fasten the girth securely. You should be able to get your hand between horse and girth, but it should be a snug fit.  Now you're ready to mount!  

tie your horse.  groom your horse.  check for any sores or wounds that may cause discomfort under the saddle area.  put on a saddle pad or blanket.  proceed to saddle the horse.  put the saddle in place.  make sure the saddle is positioned properly.  make sure the saddle fits correctly.  secure the front (main) cinch.  loosely secure the back (bucking) cinch.  lead the horse forward five steps.  attach the breast collar if you use one.  mount up!,  run up the stirrup irons on the stirrup leathers.  detach the girth (or cinch) and set it aside.  make sure the pad is lined up properly.  place the saddle.  replace the girth.  drop your stirrups before mounting. 

 The bridle should be draped over your non-dominant arm, ready to be put on the horse.The bridle holds the bit in place. The bridle includes the reins, which is what you use to guide the horse, by pulling on them to move the bit.   Depending on the type of bridle you have, you may need to unbuckle the nose strap to make it easier. You'll need to unbuckle English bridles, for instance.; , The first part of a bridling a horse is taking its halter off. The halter is what fits over the horse's face so you can lead it around when you are not riding it. You usually take it off to ride, though some people do apply a bit and bridle over the halter.Unbuckle the strap, and pull the halter down off the horse's face. If your horse is accustomed to being bridled, you can take the halter completely off. If it's not, you should buckle just the strap around the horse's neck. That way, you can hold on to the horse if it tries to move away.  To put the bridle on, you'll need to bring the horse's head down. To bring its head down, use your hand between its ears to guide its head lower. You also want to move its head towards you if possible.Sometimes, the horse will need some convincing or will seem nervous. Don't try to shove its head down. Rather, keep gentle pressure on its head until it relaxes its head and moves it down., Make sure the bridle is going the right direction, facing outward. When it's facing the correct way, put the reins over the horse to get them out of the way. Draping them is easier than having them drag on the ground., Now, put the bridle in your dominant hand. Your dominant arm should be next to the horse, and you should be facing the same direction the horse is, except maybe turned slightly towards the horse. The top piece (crown) should be in your dominant hand, so you can pull it over the horse's head., As you pull the crown up the horse's head, make sure the curb chain or strap is separate from the bit. Only certain types of bridles have curb chains, so yours may not have one. The curb chain goes under the horse's chin, which is why you need to separate it from the bit. Don't bang the horse's teeth with the curb strap., No, you don't ask the horse with words. You tell the horse you want it to open its mouth by inserting your thumb into its mouth, behind the teeth.The teeth sit to the front of the horse's mouth, leaving a space behind them for the bit. Basically, you want to aim for the back edge of the mouth, along the side of the horse's head.Use your non-dominant hand to stick a thumb in the horse's mouth, as you're holding the crown with your dominant hand. If the horse seems reluctant, try moving your thumb around. Lightly touch the horse's gums. Doing so will tell the horse it needs to open its mouth.  Once the horse's mouth is open, slide the bit in. As you do, make sure you guide the bit between the horse's teeth. Be careful of the horse's teeth. Try not to touch them at all with the bit. Keep moving it gently back until the bit is in the back of the horse's mouth. At the same time, pull the crown of the bridle up over the horse's head, sliding the bit into place.The pressure should come from the crown moving up, not you pushing the bit with your left hand.If the bridle has a curb strap, be sure to guide that with your left hand, too. The bit goes over the horse's tongue, not under it., Make sure to move the ears forward first. Don't smash them down, just use your hand to move them one at a time. As you do, pull the crown over each side until the bridle is in place to complete putting the bridle on.Some bridles have a brow band that stays across the forehead. Others have loops that go over the horse's ears., Fasten the buckle around the neck, called the throatlatch. Make sure you can put about four fingers underneath it. After that, buckle the chin strap, leaving two fingers worth of space underneath it. In addition, you may need to buckle the curb strap.If you have an English bridle, you'll need to buckle the nose piece into place.  Once again, you'll use the halter to keep hold of the horse by strapping the halter around it's neck. Right now, it's not completely on. You're just using it as a way to steady the horse as you take the bridle off., Now, do all the straps in reverse. Unbuckle the chin strap and the curb strap, if the bridle has one. Unbuckle the nose piece, if the bridle has one. Also, undo the throatlatch. In other words, make sure all the buckles are undone in anticipation of pulling the bridle off., Using your dominant hand, take hold of the crown, and pull it over the horse's ears. Try not to smash the horse's ears as you pull it off. The horse should naturally release the bit, but as you pull the bridle off, use your non-dominant hand to guide the bit through the horse's teeth., Once you've pulled the bridle off and away, unbuckle the halter from the neck. The halter goes on much like the bridle, except without the bit. Instead, you just have the headstall instead of the crown and a nose band instead of a bit. Slide the headstall over the horse's head as you pull the nose band over the horse's nose, making sure you don't smash the horse's ears or poke the horse in the eye. Buckle or clip the throatlatch into place around the horse's head.The lead line should be attached to the halter, so you can lead the horse back to the stall or wherever you want it to go.  If the horse doesn't want to take the bit or it seems uncomfortable with the bit, you should have the horse checked by a vet. Problems with the mouth, tongue, or teeth, including ulcers, can lead to problems with the bit because they will make the bit uncomfortable for the horse. If the vet doesn't find anything, try a horse dentist instead., If your horse is always chewing on the bit, it can cause problems with the bridle set up, stretching out the leather, among other issues. One way you can help your horse is to slowly train it to become used to the bit without chewing by letting the horse wear it for a certain period each day.Start by putting the bit and bridle on the horse while its in its stall, making sure you don't use one that can catch on things in the stall. Also, take off the reins and nose band before putting it on. Stay with the horse will it has the bridle on. Leave it on for about an hour. Keep doing this training everyday until the horse seems comfortable and doesn't chew anymore. Next, try it on the longe line with a halter over the bridle. Work with the horse a little everyday until it seems comfortable without chewing the bit. After that, you can try riding the horse.  Some horses don't like certain bits, and they won't respond how you'd like to your rein movement. Bits put pressure on the tongue, so sometimes a bit that doesn't put as much pressure on the tongue can be helpful if your horse is sensitive. For instance, some curve across the tongue instead of going straight across.See if anyone you know has bits you can borrow to try on your horse. That way, you can see which one works the best. A different bit can also help retrain your horse not to put its tongue over the bit if it has picked up that habit.  If your horse keeps putting its tongue over the bit and you've tried other options, you can add a tongue port. It fits over the bit, and a rubber part hangs down. The rubber bit makes it harder for your horse to move its tongue over the bit. 

have the bridle ready.  take off the halter.  bring the horse's head down.  drape the reins over the horse.  change hands with the bridle.  separate the curb chain.  ask the horse to open its mouth.  put the bit in.  pull the crown over the ears.  fasten the buckles.  place the halter around the horse's neck.  unbuckle the straps.  pull the bridle off.  put the halter on.  check the horse for medical problems.  train the horse to stop chewing on bits.  try a different bit if your horse seems uncomfortable.  try a tongue port for tongue problems. 

 This includes apples, oranges, strawberries, and so forth. If you want, get some lettuce as well. , Try not to mash the pieces together, or it won't taste as good for the guinea pig.  You may have already put some apples and oranges in your salad, but this will help bring out the flavor. This step is optional.   Note: By natural, this mean squeezing the juice straight out of the orange or apple. Do not use the orange juice or apple juice you would usually drink. 

gather all of the fruit you can.  cut the fruit into small pieces.  ,  mix the fruit pieces together.  add some freshly squeezed orange juice and/or apple juice as dressing.  serve the fruit salad to your guinea pig and watch your guinea pig enjoy.  

 You can use peppers, tomatoes, celery, carrots, and so on. This will be best with lettuce included. , Do not mash. Smoothly mix the vegetables together.  This one isn't very complicated, it is just a vegetable salad!  

gather as many vegetables as you can.  cut the vegetables into little pieces.  ,  mix the vegetables together.  give it to your guinea pig. 

 Place it in front of the withers, and slide it a little bit back until it's two or three inches in front of where you'll place the saddle. Remember not to slide the saddle pad forward, since this irritates your horse's skin.   Always use a clean, soft, dry saddle pad, not a dirty or stiff one. You should launder your saddle pad about once every week.; , Be careful to put the saddle on gently. Check that it sits comfortably on the horse, and isn't too far forward or too far back on either side. You can feel along your horse's shoulder bone to check that it isn't too far forward or pinching. Finally, attach the straps on the saddle pad to your saddle's billets.   After saddling your horse, pull the saddle pad up into the gullet of the saddle. This secures the pad and prevents it from rubbing uncomfortably against the horse.  The girth should be snug enough to hold the saddle on and in place, but not so tight that it's pinching or restricting your horse. A well-fitted girth should have enough space to snugly fit two fingers (flat) in between the girth and the horse.  Remember to attach the girth to the first and last billets of the saddle.       Some horses "blow up," or suck in air so that the girth won't fit tightly. If your horse does this, lead him to the arena and tighten the girth again before mounting.        

put on your horse's saddle pad.  pick up the saddle and set the saddle on horse's back.  attach the girth. 

 There are multiple methods for doing this:  The safest and most secure method is to unbuckle your horse's halter, take it off his nose, and slip it over his neck, with the halter still attached to a lead rope or one cross-tie.       You can also simply put the reins over the horses neck before removing the halter.  Before bridling, check the bridle is straight and neat, and that the noseband and throatlash are unbuckled. You can then guide the bit into your horse's mouth. There are two methods for doing this:  Hold the crownpiece at the top of your pony's head, holding it in your right hand. Guide the bit in with your left hand.       You can also hold the bridle underneath the browband, with your right arm reaching underneath your pony's head. Guide the bit in with your left hand.       If your horse will not take the bit, you can squeeze the side of his lip, or slide your finger in his mouth and press at the part of his mouth without teeth. (If you aren't sure where this is, ask someone to help you!)        , Slide it gently over one ear at a time, being careful not to bend them too hard.  The throat latch should be loose enough to fit your fist between the latch and his throat. The noseband should be loose enough to fit a finger between it and the horse's skin.  Check that all your horse's tack is snug, clean, and in good condition (don't ride with broken or very dirty tack!). Ensure that all straps are in their keepers, and aren't too loose or too tight. Run up your stirrups before mounting. Before you mount, tighten the girth.  If you're an inexperienced rider, always ask your instructor or another experienced rider to give you a safety check before riding.       Remember to take the reins over your horse's head before leading him. 

ensure that your horse is securely tied before bridling him.  bridle your horse.  slide the crownpiece over the ears.  attach the throat latch and noseband.  do a final safety check.  you're ready to get on and ride your horse!  

 If your guinea pig is losing weight, it's imperative that they see a vet. Unless you've actually seen other guinea pigs blocking them from food and you're certain this is the only cause of loss, get them checked by a vet to ensure there are no other problems.   If the pecking order has changed, and there is another bottom pig, the previous lightest cavy may begin gaining weight while the new bottom pig loses.; , If the guinea pig is being bullied at veggie time, chances are it's happening with hay, pellets and even water too.   Have the same number of bowls, hay racks and bottles as guinea pigs - even if bullying is terrible, each pig can only hog one at once. Space these evenly around the cage (eg. in opposite corners) to that cavies cannot block access to all of them at once.  It's awfully inconvenient to do this with any kind of temporary enclosure, because you're going to have to set it up every single day (or twice a day if you feed vegetables mornings and evenings). Put this cage near to the main cage, so that they're still within earshot of the other guinea pigs.   If you're only separating them for a short time, such as 20-30 minutes, you can have a small cage with bedding and a bowl for vegetables. If the separation is longer, they will also need a water bottle and possibly a larger cage. Add any other needs such as pellets and hay if you're also separating for equal access to those.  It's easier to put separate vegetables on a smaller plate when you're preparing them, rather than trying to divide it all up at the cage.   If the guinea pig's access to veggies has been severely restricted, their main problem will be vitamin C deficiency, so focus on high vitamin C foods like capsicum (bell peppers). The guinea pig will likely be nervous at being put in a separate cage, so include some of their favourite food to entice them to start eating. Now is a good time to review How to Feed a Guinea Pig, to make sure you're giving them a good diet.  It's good to get all guinea pigs interested in dinner before you separate, so give them a good look at the food and perhaps a tidbit each now.  As gently as possible, remove the guinea pig from the cage and place her in the separate cage.  Place vegetables and/or hay and pellets into each cage.  Leave the guinea pigs for a while unless they are very comfortable eating around you.  When you return, check what the separated guinea pig has not eaten. You can also check their cage for poops at this stage, to ensure their digestion is working normally.   If the guinea pig has been in the cage for half an hour, they should have gone to the bathroom at least once in this time.  There may be a small amount of rumbling among the cavies when they are reunited.  

ensure that bullying is the cause of weight loss.  set up the cage to optimise feeding opportunities.  set up a separate, smaller cage to accommodate feeding.  prepare the vegetables.  take the food to the cage.  separate the chosen cavy.  put in foods.  go away.  check on the cage.  return the guinea pig to the main cage. 

 Confidence is one of the most attractive qualities a person can possess. You don't have to be super sexy or built like Chris Hemsworth, either. All confidence requires is a firm belief in your own self-worth. If you believe it, that girl you like? She's going to believe it, too.It takes time and a little effort to build your confidence, especially if you're starting from a low point. Even if you don't believe in yourself, pretend like you do. Faking confidence actually tricks your brain into believing that you are confident!Stand up straight when you're walking, like you matter. Take up space like crossing your ankle across your knee when you're sitting. Leaning nonchalantly against a nearby surface. Avoid crossing your arms across your chest, or not making eye contact when you talk to people. Both of these are defensive gestures.; , Part of being confident is being yourself and being okay with who that is. Trying to change yourself to be someone else isn't going to work with her. She's going to see that you're not comfortable with yourself and that you're lying about who you are and she won't be pleased.   Show what makes you unique and why you're interesting. You don't have to walk around wearing a pocket protector (do people do that anymore?), but you don't have to hide that you're interested in computers. She will accept you and if she doesn't.. she's probably not worth your time! Don't try to be someone else, especially if you're trying to be the person you think she wants. If she isn't interested in the person you are, she's not the girl for you.  It's hard to attract the girl that you like when you overwhelm her with your smell and your greasy hair. Try to shower at least a couple times a week and use soap. Wear clothes that have been recently laundered. Reusing jeans and trousers is fine, as long as they aren't super dirty, but change your shirt each day.   Be careful about using aftershave or cologne. A little goes a long way! You don't want to approach the girl you like in a cloud of cologne. Keep it down to a little spritz if you have to do wear it. Make sure to smell the deodorants before you buy them so you know how strong they smell and what they smell like. Again, you don't want to overwhelm her with smell, but a little deodorant (especially if you've just played a game like soccer or basketball) will make you seem much more put together.  Another incredibly important thing to remember is that you need to have your own life. Don't only focus on this one girl and try to be around her 24/7. It won't win you any prizes with her. In fact, you'll come across as needy and pathetic and she'll be far less likely to be interested in you.   Pursue your own interests. If you're into soccer, join a team and play games. You could even (if you're feeling brave) invite her to come watch a game or to kick around a soccer ball with you. This will mean you have your own friends to hang out with, even if your groups overlap. Do things with your buddies rather than doing things only when you know that she'll be there, or doing things only with her. This doesn't mean that you ignore her completely. Of course not. When you see her around (either at school, or at mutual events), ask her what she's been up to and mention some of the things you've been doing (like teaching yourself a language, going rock climbing, kicking butt on Call of Duty).  

build your confidence.  be yourself.  maintain good hygiene.  have your own life. 

 People will often express themselves through their body language. These signals can range from being obvious to subtle, requiring you to pay careful attention. Try to look out for some of the following examples of body language to determine if a girl might be interested in you or not:Standing or sitting close to you can be a sign of interest. If she makes eye contact often and smiles or laughs a lot she might be interested in you. Lightly touching your arms or shoulders can be a show of affection. If she crosses her arms, looks distracted or avoids contact with you she is probably uninterested. Some people may differ in regards to how they use their body language. These signs won't always apply.; , Does she always come find you at lunch? Does she stop by your locker after school? Does she regularly visit you at work? Has she taken an interest in your activities? If she makes an effort to be around you, she obviously likes spending time with you. That may not mean that she is interested in you romantically but if she treats you different than all other guys there is a good chance she is.   Many say that this is the best way to find out if someone is interested in you. Ask yourself if it seems like she wants to spend time with you. If the answer is yes, she probably likes you., If she is willing to make eye contact with you, that is a good sign to begin with. Our facial expressions are great indicators of our feelings. If the girl gives you a warm welcoming look and a smile when you see her that is definitely a sign of positive feelings. However, sometimes people might fake smiles. Learn some of the following traits of genuine smiles and fake smiles to accurately gauge interest:Genuine smiles will involve the eyes. A person who is smiling will close their eyes and should have “crows-feet” wrinkles appear. Fake smiles will generally not involve the eyes at all. There won't be any closing of the eyes or “crows-feet” appearing with a fake smile. In a genuine smile, you shouldn't be able to see the persons bottom teeth. Fake smiles will likely reveal both the top and bottom rows of teeth.  If you think she likes you, there’s a pretty good chance she likes you.Try not to spend too much time thinking about it. It’s natural to be nervous about something like this but thinking about it constantly isn’t helping anything. Take stock of the information that you have available to you and decide on a course of action. It would be better to decide to ask her out or decide to do nothing then to keep torturing yourself.   None of these clues guarantee that she is into you, but if you’re noticing two or three of them it is probably a good sign.  

read her body language.  take note if she wants to spend time with you.  pay attention to her facial expressions.  trust your gut. 

 Most guys are taught that they don't need to be respectful to women and act accordingly. Don't be one of those guys. Being respectful does not mean being a doormat or being "whipped" but it does mean treating the girl you as if she's an actual human being (which, surprisingly enough, she is).   One way of showing respect is to stop doing something when she tells you to stop. For example, if you two were having a tickle war and she says "Stop it!" you stop, even if you think she's kidding. If she is kidding, she'll let you know and you can continue. Showing that you respect her right to say "no" in minor instances, will show that you are willing to respect her boundaries in more important instances. Be respectful to other people when you're around her (and in general). Don't talk about your ex as "that weirdo" or use language like that. Don't degrade women, or call guys "pussies." You'll come across as disrespectful to women and you'll come across as immature.  While a lot of guys say that women's body language is a mystery, it's really not that hard. Remember, you can tell when your sister is upset with you, or your female friend is trying to ignore you. The girl you like isn't going to be any different to understand.If she spends most of her time not making eye contact with you, or giving you short, one word answers, she either doesn't want to be around you, or she's upset with you. It's probably best to back off. A girl who wants you to stick around is going to be pretty obvious about it. She'll be turned towards you. She'll be making eye contact and smiling and laughing at the things you say (not derisively). She may even touch you (like on the arm when she's making a point).  It turns out that making eye contact is one of the biggest ways to flirt with someone that you're interested in. This is a good one that you can use in class, if you're sitting in the right spot, or even across the room if you're at a party.You can do this a couple different ways. A good way to do this is to make eye contact if she's across the room, catch her eye and hold it. Now, if the two of you are having a conversation, make sure to look deeply into her eyes. For some reason, that intense, long look can cause butterflies in the other person. Smile when you're looking at her, especially as you're making eye contact. A little smirk can be even better than a giant grin.  A girl's friends are incredibly important to her. She will listen to their opinions, even if she won't always follow their advice. If they don't like you it will cast a niggling bit of doubt in her own mind about you. To keep that from happening, you need to make sure that her friends like you.   Learn some of the things that they like and ask them questions about those interests. For example, if her friends are super into a t.v. show, ask them a little about it (what's their favorite thing about the show, favorite characters, favorite episodes, things that irritate them about the show or the fandom). If you're having a conversation with the girl you like and her friends are around, make sure to include them in the conversation. You can still give her the long, heart-felt, languishing looks while making sure that her friends don't feel like you're ignoring them completely. Don't flirt with her friends, however. You don't want to come across as a player who is out to get whichever girl responds to his attentions. The girl you like won't think you're interested in her if you're flirting with all her friends, too.  

be respectful.  read her body language.  make eye contact.  don't ignore her friends. 

 When you're talking to the girl you like, you want to make her feel special. People like it when others take an interest in them and the girl you like is no different. Showing that you care about her thoughts will make her more interested in you, as a result.   Ask her opinion on things, even if it's something silly. For example: say you're wearing a shirt that your friend doesn't like, ask for her opinion on whether the shirt is silly or not. Tell her she's the final judge. It'll make her laugh and feel important. Pay attention to the things that she does and says, so you can ask questions about it. For example, if she mentions going rock climbing, ask her how she got started rock climbing and what she enjoys about it. People like talking about themselves, so before you jump in with stories of your own, ask her another question about what she thinks.  In this day and age people have really lost the skill of listening (Really listening) to one another. Real listening is when you take the time to absorb what someone is saying rather than thinking about the next thing you're going to say or what you're going to have for dinner.   For example: even if you're at a loud party, when you're having a conversation with her, maintain eye contact, ask questions and if your mind strays, ask for clarification (you can use the loud party as an excuse: "Sorry, it's really loud in here. Can you repeat what you just said?"). To this end, when you're having a conversation with her, don't fidget with stuff, or keep looking all around the room, or keep checking your phone. She'll feel that you don't really care what she has to say.  Laughter is a great way to bond with someone. This doesn't mean that you need to be the class clown (Actually, it will probably work best if you aren't). All this means is that you make her laugh and say a few entertaining things. Now, everyone has a different sense of humor and you know her best, but if you're not sure there are a few things to do that rarely fail.   Gently poke fun at yourself. You don't have to do a big self-deprecating speech (in fact that will make you seem not confident), but a few jabs at yourself will get her laughing and show that you don't take yourself too seriously. For example: talk about how you got hit in the head with a soccer ball that day when you weren't paying attention, or that time you went to the wrong class because you forgot what day it was. Bring up something funny that you saw that day (or within the previous week). It should be something a little out of the ordinary and funny. For example: ask her if she's ever ended up entangled with a bunch of zombies and then tell her about the zombie walk you accidentally ended up in the middle of.  Flirting can be very hit or miss and is to be used with caution. Since everyone is different, there is no one-size-fits-all approach to flirting with someone. Humor and eye contact are the two big ones, but you can subtly flirt in other ways.   Unless she's made it explicitly clear, flirting really obviously can be off-putting to some girls. Keep that in mind when you're hanging out with her. If you aren't a good flirt, eye contact and humor will probably be your best bets. Flirting over text, however, can be a great, non-threatening type of flirting. Of course, you want this to be only supplementary to your interactions in person. Keep texts short, sometimes a picture is worth more than a hundred words (especially a funny picture; do NOT send explicit pictures unless she has actually asked for them!). It's good to have a reason to text. You could say something like "saw this and thought of you" (and then send a picture).Giving her the right compliment can be a great way of expressing interest and flirting. Don't do something basic like "you're the most beautiful girl I've ever met" (it comes across as insincere). Instead, say something like "Did you realize your sweater matches your eyes? it's a beautiful color," or "of course you aced that test, you're super smart!"  , In the end, the best way to act around the girl you like is to tell her how you feel. She might otherwise never know. It can seem super intimidating or scary to bare your feelings like that (and it is a very brave act!). But, otherwise you both will be in this uncomfortable holding pattern.   Don't do it in front of everyone. Choose a time and place where you're both sober and in your right mind. Simply say "Hey, I really like you and I was wondering if you'd like to go on a date sometime." Don't do this over the phone or text or social media, because you will come across as a coward and most girl's don't find that a particularly attractive quality. Respect her decision, even if she says "no." It can hurt when someone says no, but remember that it isn't about you as a person, it's simply that your proposal didn't work for her (because she isn't interested, or because she already has a boyfriend, or she's into girls, etc.). You can ask why if you must, but if she simply says "Because I'm not interested" that's your answer and leave it at that. If she says "yes," then yay! Now you two can get to planning a super fun first date. The relationship might not work out, but you proved your bravery by asking her out and your worth by treating her with respect.  

ask her questions.  listen.  make her laugh.  flirt with her.  tell her how you feel. 

 A girl who is interested in you will laugh more often and her voice may rise in pitch.She might even say flirtatious things, like complimenting you on how you look today. If she is more willing to talk about personal topics with you, such as your plans for the future, she might be interested romantically.If you’re lucky, she’ll even give you helpful hints for dates like mentioning that she loves a particular band or wants to go dancing. Giving you a compliment such as “Oh I love your shirt! That band is one of my favorites.” can indicate interest. If she asks you about what you are doing later on in the week she might be subtly asking you to spend some time with her.  If the person is constantly interrupting you or doesn’t seem focused on the conversation then they are probably not romantically interested in you. Try to pay attention during your time together for signs that she may not be interested in you:   Interruptions are rarely a result of a girl being shy, which makes it a good indicator. Gauge the responses you get during a conversation. For example if you were just explaining how well your garden is growing and she responds with “Uh-huh....” she is likely not interested. Silence can be a good indicator that there isn't a good connection.  Some studies propose that humor is one of the best indicators of romantic interest.If you are having humorous exchanging and laughing at one another’s silly jokes, there may be a romantic spark in your relationship. Humor is a way to test the social watersand figure out if you are a good fit with the person.   For example, you might both playfully imagine a silly situation and discuss what you think would happen. Joking around can let you know if your sense of humor is similar with hers. You might enjoy puns and she might hate them. While this may not prevent you from liking each other, it's good to know how best to make one another laugh.  Playful behavior can be a sign of personal interest and is also a trait that is commonly valued in potential partners. You can also show your own interest and make yourself more appealing by being light-hearted and playful when spending time together. Keep an eye out for playful behavior and try to be playful yourself to learn if a girl likes you.Playful people are more likely to be perceived as attractive by those who are not. Both men and women find playfulness equally important and attractive.  When a girl likes you she may display signs of jealousy when you are interacting with or talking about another girl. This can be a good sign that the girl you are with has an interest in you. Pay attention for any signs of jealousy to gauge her level of interest in you.She might respond coldly or dismissively if you compliment another girl. This may indicate jealousy. Avoid trying to make her overly jealous. Once you notice jealousy, stop trying to bring it out in her.  

pay attention to how she talks and what she talks about.  notice interruptions.  look for humor.  notice playful behavior.  look out for jealousy. 

 The simplest way to find out if she likes you is to ask her out on a romantic date. Make sure she understands that this date goes beyond just being friends. For example, a dinner and a movie will seem more serious and romantic than grabbing lunch together.  You need to tell her how you feel if you expect her to tell you how she feels. If you think she may not understand where you are coming from when you ask her out on a date, try telling her how you feel first. Explain that you have romantic feelings for her and tell her the reasons why. Once you’re finished, you should ask her how she feels.   If she says no that’s okay. Don’t take it personally. It may hurt your feelings but at least you went for it. That requires a lot more bravery than most people can muster.  Letters are pretty neat. Everyone likes getting a letter. If you don’t want to talk to her in person, write her a letter telling her your feelings  , This is sort of a childish way to figure out if a girl likes you, but it may work. If her friends know the girl likes you and that she is waiting for you to ask her out on a date they may be inclined to tell you.   If the girl wants to keep it a secret she may tell her friends to stay quiet. Take what her friends say with a grain of salt.  

ask her out on a date.  describe your feelings to her.  write her a letter.  ask her friends. 

 One of the first things that might stand out to you, making you curious if a girl is interested in you, is her desire to be intentional with you. Is there a girl in your life who is really trying to get to know you or spend time with you? A girl may be interested in you if she's asking you personal questions, showing that she cares about your life and wants to know you more.Don't confuse this with a girl who is just being friendly. Some girls may just be really good at initiating conversation with people or may have a knack for small talk. Look beyond that to the girls who seem to be going out of their way to learn more about you and develop a relationship with you. When a girl spends time getting to know you and learns about your hobbies and interests, you may begin to see her taking interests in those things as well. She may be doing this so that you two have more in common or so that you find her more interesting and inviting.; , Not only might a girl who is interested in you seek out ways to get to know you, she may also become more vulnerable around you. If you are unsure if a girl likes you, pay attention to how much she is opening up around you. If you ask her somewhat personal questions and she seems offended or taken aback, it may be a sign that she's not interested in you. But if she seems willing to open up and tell you things she wouldn't tell everyone, she may be interested in you.Girls can be complicated and there is no perfect formula for understanding them, so don't assume that just because she is opening up to you she must like you. On the opposite end, don't assume that just because she is more closed off or quiet that she dislikes you. Some girls feel more comfortable being vulnerable with people while others take more time to show their entire self to people. Be patient with girls and if you feel that one may like you, try to be vulnerable with her and see if she is vulnerable back. Overtime if you continue this she should open up if she's interested in you.  Girls often like to drop hints to people that they are interested in so that they don't have to be the first one to make a move. These can range from sharing their interests, or explaining that they want to do something and don't have someone to do it with. Look for signs that a girl is obviously trying to show you that she wants you to initiate.   Hints can be difficult because they are just that -- hints -- and it can hard to know what the girl is actually communicating. If she says she's been wanting to see a certain movie but no one has wanted to go with her, she may be hinting to you that you should ask to go with her, or she may just be stating a fact. As always feel out the situation to figure out what she's really trying to say. In this case, you may just have to be bold and ask her what she's really trying to say, or initiate with her and risk the chance that she wasn't hinting anything to you. Another way a girl might drop a hint is explaining she needs help on something. This is the opportunity for you to offer to help her! Even if she really just needs help and isn't trying to hint at anything, you haven't lost anything by offering your help.  If a girl is interested in you and has told her friends that she likes you, you may be able to see a reaction from all of them when you approach them. Some girls are subtle and are good at hiding their emotions, while others may be surrounded by a group of friends that start giggling or acting strange when you walk up to them. Changes in behavior in a girl when you approach can be a helpful sign to show she likes you.  If the two of you are involved in the same organization or have the same group of friends, pay attention to how she is spending her time in group settings. Is she spending time with a particular group of friends the whole time, is she jumping from group to group, or is she spending most of her time with you? If you find that she is giving you extra attention over others, it may be because she's into you.If you two are already close friends and she would normally spend more time with you, this probably isn't helpful. But, if you are in this situation and you find that she's spending a lot of time with someone else instead of you, it may be a sign that she is interested in that other person and not you. If you are in a room with a group of people and she's across the room, try making eye contact with her. You may notice that she's already been looking at you or when she notices you looking at her she may smile shyly or show that she's happy to see you. Watch the expression that comes on her face whenever you make eye contact with her. It could be a sign that she likes you.  Some girls will use social media as an outlet to show others what is going on in their lives, and so if you are a big part of her life you may see that she has several pictures with you that she's posted. She also may be very attentive to your social media pages, liking your pictures and statuses. Any of these things could be a sign that she's into you.   As always, some girls won't use social media to broadcast your relationship, especially if they are insecure or aren't sure that you like them as well. Just because a girl doesn't have pictures of you on her Instagram or Facebook, doesn't mean she's not into you.  Because relationships and people are complicated and can't be put into a box, you may meet a girl who is crazy about you and doesn't show any of these signs, or you may meet someone who has no interest in you and does all of these things. With that being said, try not to overanalyze her behavior. Be patient, get to know her, and over time you may be able to have a conversation about it rather than just depending on her actions for complete confidence that she likes you.  One of the common ways to tell if a girl likes you is when she flirts with you. A girl may be interested in you if she laughs a lot when she's around you, if she initiates physical touch, like touching your shoulder or giving you hugs, or if she playfully argues with you. Because every girl is different, flirting doesn't always mean a girl is interested, but it's a good beginning sign to know if she sees you as potential.Some girls don't realize they are flirting, or their natural way to interact with others is by being somewhat flirty and playful. Others won't flirt at all for fear of rejection, so don't place girls in a box when it comes to flirting. On the other hand, a girl may be interested in you, but not flirt with you because she is shy or nervous. So, in this case pay attention to the less obvious signs of flirting. Look to see if she blushes when she's around you, if she laughs nervously at your jokes, or she shifts her clothes or hair while she's talking to you. These could all be signs that she's into you, but doesn't feel comfortable outright flirting with you. As she walks away, look to see if there's still a smile on her face. This could definitely be a sign that she likes you, because you've left her feeling giddy after she's talked to you.  Body language is a great way to feel out a situation, and figure out if a girl is interested in you. If you are with a girl and she seems distant, or her arms are crossed in front of her, and she's not making eye contact with you, it may be a sign that she's not interested. But, if she is being intentional about making eye contact with you, moves closer to you as you two talk, and tenderly smiles at you, she may like you.   Watch how she holds herself, too. If there is a girl who really wants to get your attention, she may look more confident when she's around you, because she wants to show you that she's worth looking at. She may do this around you and engage with you, or she may show confidence but act like she's preoccupied with other things. This may be because she's trying to play hard to get, or she wants you to be jealous. Sometimes, a girl can feel distant because she is nervous, uncomfortable, or doesn't know how to act around you. It doesn't always mean that she isn't interested in you, so in this situation the best way to make her comfortable is to show her that she can trust you. Cozy up to her and look into her eyes, instead. She may feel uncomfortable but eventually she may decide opening up to you physically is worth the risk. As with flirting, don't believe that just because a girl makes eye contact with you it means she likes you. You really have to feel out the situation with girls and observe how she acts around others as well. If she seems tender and open with everyone else, she may not be acting that way around you because she likes you. However, if she seems more closed off with others, but with you her body language shows she is more at ease or flirty, then it may be evidence that she likes you.  If a girl is trying to impress you, she may spend more time on her outfit, hair, or makeup. She wants you to notice her and think she's attractive, so whenever she knows that she's going to be around you, she's likely going to primp herself more than she usually does. If you notice that she suddenly looks more stylish or done up than she used to, it may be a sign that she's into you.   This could be difficult to tell if the girl you think is interested in you has always looked really nice. If this is the case, continue to pay attention to see if she does something different. This will require you to be more observant than you might have been. See if she changes her hair color, tries out a new style of clothing, or wears a new perfume. As with all of the other tips, don't expect that every girl is going to dress nicer for you when they are interested in you. It's really a girl's personal preference, and some won't see the need to make you notice them by their looks. Some girls may feel confident enough to just be themselves. Also, don't get confused if a girl is dressing up, but she's really doing it for someone else. Try to pay attention to who she is dressing up around and when she's dressing up. For example, if you see her with a group of her friends, and she wasn't expecting to see you, look to see if she is dressed up. If she seems to be dressed rather casually and hasn't done anything special to her hair or makeup, but she looks much more dolled up when she's around you, it may be because she's interested in you.  While a girl may try to get to know you better because she likes you, a great way to understand her feelings and intentions is by getting to know her better yourself. As you spend time with her and talk with her, ask her questions about her life and pay attention to how she relates to you and to others.This is the step where you can also begin to talk about your relationship, if you are relatively confident something is going on between the two of you. While this is similar to looking for intentionality and vulnerability, it's different in that you play bigger role. You want to make her feel comfortable and that she's in a safe place. And, if you like her too you should have the desire to understand who she is and how she works.  If you are unsure if a girl is interested in you, the best way to find out is by asking her to spend time with you. A girl who is interested in someone will almost certainly say yes to this, and someone who isn't interested in you may or may not say yes, but it will take you one step further to figuring out how she feels about you.   Ask her to hang out in a casual setting, that way if she's actually not interested you haven't placed yourself in an awkward position. If she is interested it will give her a comfortable, relaxed environment to open up to you. Observe her throughout the night to determine if she seems like she just sees you as a friend or if she's looking at you as more than that.  Maybe you've looked for all of the other signs that a girl likes you, but are still unsure. Now is the time where you can seek out information and insight from her friends and others. Talk to other people who have been in relationships and ask them how they knew the other was interested. Ask her friends if she is interested in anyone or, if they already know you are interested in her too, ask them how you can best approach their friend.Don't use her friends as an excuse to not be bold and take risks yourself. You don't want her friends to be the messengers to her, and you definitely don't want to tell her you are interested in her through her friends. Use her friends as helpful advice on how you can better act in this situation, and if you are absolutely clueless they may steer you in a good direction.  Some girls will flirt no matter who the person is, but others won't flirt unless they have first been flirted with. If this is your girl, and she seems shy and uncertain, try flirting with her, speaking tenderly with her, laughing with her, and giving her hugs. If she's interested in you she may flirt back, and if walls still seem to be up it might be a sign that she's not into you.  This is not always a great idea, especially if you are unsure if a girl is interested in you. But if you feel like you've had some time to "read the signs" and are pretty confident that she's into you, then you can try asking her boldly if she likes you are is interested. Do this in a gentle way, and only if you plan to take the relationship further.   If you don't plan to ask this girl out or develop a relationship with her, asking her if she likes you and then doing nothing may come across as hurtful or insincere. So, if you don't like her then just leave it at that -- there's really no reason for you to know if she likes you. But if you do like her and want the relationship to move into something different, than ask her if she's interested in you and explain that you feel the same way. A gentle way to approach this would be by first explaining to her that you are interested in her and then leaving her the option to tell you how she feels about you. This creates a safe zone for her, which allows her to be vulnerable but with the knowledge that it's not in vain.  

see if she's being intentional with you.  pay attention to her vulnerability with you.  look for hints.  notice how she interacts with her friends.  pay attention to her actions in group settings.  look at social media.  don't overanalyze.  watch for flirting.  observe her body language.  see if her wardrobe/look changes.  make the effort to understand her.  ask her to hang out.  get information from her friends or from others.  initiate flirting with her.  ask her boldly. 

 But, you must be careful not to seem like a stalker. Today, that is a huge turn-off for any girl. Don't make it feel "mysterious" or "freaky" like you're watching her. Try simply and subtly explaining your feelings, and make an attempt of writing your name.For example, write something like this:Hi, (name here). You are one of the prettiest girls in school. Remember that and don't believe anyone who says you're not.Sincerely, (write name in pen and scribble out, or maybe erase if in pencil, to let her know you are genuine and thought about telling her your feelings and you're not just a stalker)This is a great way to let a girl feel great. With this one little sign that some person is out there and is willing to love her and thinks she's pretty will leave her smiling for days.; , Just be careful not to put it in a really weird place that will make her feel uncomfortable. Alternatively, you can get your friend to give it to that person.  Write "see you in chemistry" or "see you on the bus" to leave her guessing.  Like in a class you both share, especially if she's next to you. If she is thrilled to get a secret admirer letter and happy someone feels this way, she will tell you everything, which is a good sign. If she acts annoyed, you probably have gone too far and should stop. Don't stop immediately, or she will get tipped off.  If she's happy, trust me, this is a good sign. Whether she likes you or not, she will appreciate the special little steps you took in order to make her happy and feel loved. If she looks annoyed, it's a good idea to stop gradually. Try apologizing in one of your last notes and watch her reaction while she reads it. If she likes the extra attention, she will try very hard to find out who you are, but if she looks relieved, you have gone too far in her mind and you should forget about the notes. If she tells her friends right away, she is happy and wants to find out more.  Be careful not to give it away. If she doesn't feel the same way she will try to ignore you or tease you and make fun. If she does, she will first try to see if you are serious. One of a girl's biggest fears when she gets a note is if the "secret admirer" really likes her or not, or if he's just trying to get her hopes up just to watch her fall.  

start off by writing a simple note.  find out where her locker is and slip it in there, or be creative and slip in one of her books.  leave subtle hints that it's you, don't leave her hanging.  try leaving the notes in places that you are in.  try to see her reaction.  if you see she is trying really hard to find out her secret admirer, leave her a note saying "meet me here(then time and place)"don't come out and say your name. 

 In particular, see if there’s a change. If you two used to hang out all the time alone, and she’s suddenly reluctant to do that, it’s possible that she has a crush on you and is feeling nervous about it. On the other hand, if you usually only hang out in a group, and she starts seeking out time alone with you, she may have a crush on you.   A tomboy may be more willing to make it clear that she is seeking out time with you than other girls would. Boys are often socialized to ask directly for what they want instead of being coy. It’s likely that she’s modeling her behavior on more masculine flirting, so she may be very direct.; , This one is a little tricky, because good eye contact could also just mean good social skills. If you observe that she’s making eye contact a little longer than what seems normal, that’s a good sign that she’s into you. Alternatively, if you notice that she’s refusing to meet your gaze (especially if this is different from before), this may be a sign that she’s feeling shy about looking at you because she likes you. , Particularly if it seems like you’re flirting with someone else, does she look put off or angry? Does she tend to avoid you or act aggressively after she sees you do this?   Especially if you have a crush on her too, don’t flirt with other people just to make her jealous. This is confusing (and mean) both her and the person you’re flirting with. Just interact normally and see if a normal interaction makes her appear jealous.  Is she “accidentally” touching you a lot? For example, does she bump into you with her elbow at the lunch table when there’s plenty of room to avoid you? Do her fingers brush against yours when she hands you a pencil? If so, there’s a good chance she’s “accidentally” touching you on purpose because she likes you.   Touch is often key in tomboy flirting style, because masculine flirting tends to include more touching than feminine flirting. Does she hit you more than usual? Unfortunately, one way that boys are socialized to show affection is through wrestling and punching. A tomboy or girl who emulates more masculine behavior might do the same thing if she has a crush on you. If this is the case and it makes you uncomfortable, it’s okay to discourage this behavior or tell an adult if you think it’s gotten out of hand., In particular, does she laugh even when your jokes aren’t even that funny, or when other people don’t seem to even notice you’re joking? This is a pretty good sign that she’s into you, especially if she hasn’t always laughed at your jokes or given any indication that she thinks you’re funny. In particular, pay attention her reactions to some light teasing. Don’t hurt her feelings or be mean. Just tease her enough to let her know you’re paying attention to her, and see if this causes a bit of blushing or extra laughter.  Leaning toward someone is a sign that you’re engaged and paying attention. Particularly if the two of you are part of a larger group of people, if she leans in toward you, there’s a good chance she’s inviting further conversation with you, because she’s interested in you. On the other hand, she could just be having a hard time hearing what you’re saying, so be look for other signs of attraction too.  Blushing is a sign that she’s either nervous or excited, either of which can be a good indication that she likes you. In particular, if this girl has been your friend for a while, pay attention to whether she has recently started blushing when you talk. , Head tilting indicates that a person is paying good attention to what you’re saying and that they’re engaged in thinking about your conversation. This action, combined with other signs of attraction, can be signals that she likes you. Of course, if you’re talking about her favorite sports team, it’s possible that she’s just engaged in the conversation and doesn’t actually have a crush on you. Are there any other signs of attraction also present?  , Does she mess with her hair a lot? Adjust her clothing? Touch her face? Some of this could be nervousness, which may be an indication that she likes you and is feeling shy. This could also indicate that she wants to be sure she looks okay in front of you. Particularly look out for preening that seems out of character. If this girl rarely cares what her hair looks like (which may be common for tomboys) but is suddenly invested in smoothing out her ponytail all the time, that’s could be a clue that she wants to look nice for you.  Some studies have shown that if a person points their feet in your direction while you interact, they are attracted to or at least interested in you. If a person points their feet away from you, particularly in the direction of an escape route, it’s less likely that they’re attracted to you. One interaction won’t necessarily give you all of the information you need here. If her feet are pointed toward the end of the hall instead of toward you while you’re chatting at your lockers, it’s possible that she’s just in a hurry to get to class. Take some time and observe her feet in several interactions.  Does she ask you a lot of questions? Does she seem overly interested in what you did this weekend or what you had for breakfast? Though it’s possible that she’s just being polite, there’s a good chance that she’s just trying to keep talking to you for longer because she thinks you’re cute. , Are there lots of jokes that you two would make a cute couple? Have any of them asked you if you have a crush on her? Do they bring her name up to you a lot? It’s possible that she has confessed to some of her friends that she likes you, so listen up.   Tomboys tend to have friends of all genders. Be sure to pay attention to each group of friends she hangs out with.  If this girl has been your friend for a while, you’ll probably notice when she’s acting differently all of a sudden. Ultimately, if you suspect that she has a crush on you, you’re probably right.  If she likes you, she’ll respond positively to some light flirting. Bring up an inside joke, “accidentally” touch her elbow with yours, laugh at her jokes, or just smile at her more than you usually would. If she reciprocates, she might have a crush on you.  If you’re on a sports team together or tend to join the same pick-up basketball game after school, this is a great time to get in some low-stakes flirting.  A single elbow bump at your lockers might not mean that she has a crush on you. But if she bumps elbows with you more than once, always angles her body toward you when you talk, laughs at even your dumbest jokes, AND seems worried about how her hair looks in front of you, then that all may add up to a crush! , When all else fails, if you really want to know if she likes you, it’s time to ask. Try to ask her in private, because you might feel embarrassed if you ask in front of others, and she might be too embarrassed to tell the truth.   Beware that asking could put a strain on your friendship if she says no. That doesn’t necessarily mean that if she rejects you, you can’t be friends anymore. It just means that you will have to work extra hard to bring things back to normal. Take the risk if you’re pretty sure she likes you! If you like her too, the payoff of having your friend become your girlfriend would be worth it.  Particularly if this girl has been your friend for a long time, it’s possible that her attention to you is nothing more than a sign of friendship. If you have a crush on her, if you think she might also have one on you, and if you want to pursue it, give it a shot! Just beware that things could be a bit awkward between you if it doesn’t work out.  

notice the amount of alone time she seeks out with you.  watch for eye contact.  pay attention to her reaction to your interactions with others.  pay attention to the way she touches you.  notice whether she laughs at your jokes or not.  watch for the lean in.  notice the blush.  look for a head tilt.  look out for preening.  pay attention to her feet.  listen to what she says.  pay attention to what her friends say.  listen to your gut.  flirt a little.  tomboys are pretty interested in sports.  put it all in context.  ask.  accept that she might just want to be your friend. 

 You want to be the best that you possibly can be, in order to not only attract your crush but also to increase your chances of a healthy relationship and make you happier with yourself. Improve yourself by doing some of the following steps.; , Do the things that you want to do and that interest you. Pursue your dreams. When you do this, you will find you pick up many attractive qualities, like passion, a strong work ethic, and a positive outlook.  A strong work ethic, determination, and passion are very attractive qualities. People like other people that get really into what they're doing and work hard. No matter what ignites your passion, throw yourself into your work to show others that you are not some lazy bum!  , If you have bad habits or problems in your life, don't sweep them under the rug. Take the problem head on and fix it, before it drags down a relationship.  Your crush should love and accept you for who you are, so if you do make changes to yourself, be sure it is because you want those changes for your own happiness and not because they might make someone else happy.  Eat healthy and get exercise, because this will leave you feeling energetic and strong. When you feel good and comfortable in your own skin, this shows to other people and they will find you more attractive.  Keep your body clean by showering regularly and washing your hair and body. Wear deodorant and clean clothes as well. If you still find that you smell a bit off, try cleaning your room or changing what you eat.  In addition to keeping everything clean, you might want to try making yourself smell extra nice by wearing a little bit of cologne or perfume. Don't go over the top! Only a little bit is necessary. Try to wear a scent that you feel matches your personality.  Wear clothes that look nice and look nice on your body. This can be really different for different people. Don't wear anything too tight or too baggy, wear colors that compliment your natural skin tone and hair, and try to wear clothes that fit with the current trends. Look at fashion magazines or websites to get ideas.  Act confident to make yourself attractive in a totally different way. Most people are attracted to confidence, so either increase your confidence or fake it until no one notices the difference.  Don't hide in the corner....let your crush see the new you! Get out and do things and try not to blend into the furnishings so much. You don't even have to talk to them. Just be in the same room and see you interact with other people.   You don't need to go out of your way to attract attention. Don't be loud and crazy. Be yourself.  Support them, like a friend should. This is an attractive quality, because it shows how much you care and how much you can add to their life. Listen to them rant about that teacher you both hate, watch one of their games, or surprise them by dropping in on their concerts. Say "Hi!" to your crush as you pass by them. If they aren't feeling well or are upset about something, help them out and comfort them as best as you can.  You don't need to spend time alone with them, but you do need to spend time together. You can hang out in groups and do things like watch movies or go to a great local music venue. Just give them the opportunity to start to get to know you.  Learn more about them and get to know them for who they really are, rather than just the basic facts that anyone could tell you. People like to feel a strong connection and that the person they're with really understands them as a whole, so if you know your crush well, they'll be more likely to take your feelings seriously.   You can get to know them by talking about things that are important to them, like their hobbies, their life goals, their family, and their beliefs.  They should also get the chance to learn the same things about you. Be open to discussion and inviting. Don't try to compete with them when you discuss your life; just let them see you for who you are.  Find out what things you share in common, in order to help build a lasting foundation for a relationship. No matter how cute they are, if you have absolutely nothing in common, you're not going to have a very good time together. Find out what they're into and share your own interests with them.   Relationships work best if both of you are geeky about the same thing. And believe us, everyone is geeky about something. Even if that something is football.  You don't necessarily have to enjoy what they are most passionate about, but it will help a lot if you can understand and follow along with what they love. Immerse yourself and give it time. And especially ask them for help: it's a great bonding experience.  People that are reluctant to get into relationships are usually reluctant because they worry about what that relationship will mean for their free time or who they are as a person. Show your crush that they don't need to worry about that with you by letting them be their own person. Don't be clingy. Encourage them to go out and do things they enjoy. And in the mean time, show your independence by spending time on your own and with your own friends.  Make sure your crush knows you're single and looking for someone to date. Mention it off-hand in a related conversation. However you do it, they need to know that you are in fact looking for someone to date.Ask them out for a movie or dinner  , Tease them gently using a little bit of sarcasm or a wink and a nudge. Be playful, like poking them on the arm occasionally or punching them lightly on the arm or shoulder. This will begin to show them that you're interested in them.  Touching is a much more clear indicator of your feelings. Give them a light touch on the shoulder or the arm, always with a reason or excuse (out-of-context touching can be creepy). When you're a little closer, try touching their hand too.  Sometimes people just need things spelled out for them. Tell your crush that you like them but don't put any pressure on them to respond. They might need time to absorb the idea and examine their own feelings.  You can skip the previous step in favor of going straight for this one, or you can proceed to this one if they haven't done anything to respond to your previous confession. If you're a guy, you're probably going to have to ask your girl out. Girls shouldn't be afraid to take the lead though.   Don't worry about rejection. If they don't want to date you, that's their loss and you're better off finding someone who really appreciates you.  

be the best possible version of yourself.  pursue your interests.  work hard.  tackle problems head-on.  only change for you.  take care of your body.  keep clean.  smell great.  look great.  be confident.  let them see you.  be a good friend.  spend time with them.  get to know them.  let them know you.  find common ground.  share their passions.  let them be them.  flaunt your single status.  flirt with them.  introduce touch.  tell them that you like them.  ask them out. 

 You don't have to corner her at her locker or follow her home from school. If you see her talking with a group, join the group. If she looks bored or is sitting by herself, go over and chat. She'll think you're friendly and nice.; , Rush to her aid if she drops her books in the hall. Retrieve her pencil sharpener if it rolls off her desk. Lend her pencils, help her with her home work, offer her your snacks. Just don't become her slave!  , Flirting includes: smiling at her, brief eye contact, laughing at her jokes, etc. It does not include: staring for minutes on end, pick up lines, or wrapping your arms around her. If you do this, she's bound to think you're creepy and desperate.  Compliment her sweater or drawing for art class. If you are both talking in the same group, focus your attention on her. Walk her to her locker. Show that you care about her and are interested in her. Try not to talk to other girls besides her so she knows you only have eyes for her.  They are usually very keen on helping out you out. They might have useful information you can use to win her over, like her favorite foods, movies, what she likes in a guy, (heck, you might even find out she has a crush on you!) and if she happens to already have a boyfriend!  , Don't change yourself for a girl, ever. After all, you want her to fall in love with you not some made up personality. If she really is the girl for you, she'll like you for exactly what you are!  , Shower. Comb that hair. Roll on the antiperspirant. Wear clean, well fitting clothes. No girl wants to date some smelly guy who has his pants around his knees. Also, don't overdo it on the Axe. A little is fine. A lot will make her eyes water and her stomach turn.  Now that you know a bit more about each other and she's aware you like her, confirm it officially. Take a deep breath and walk up to her when she is alone, not surrounded by friends. Chat for a bit and then bring up the next school dance, or ask what she's doing this Friday. If she declines full on and tells you she just wants to be friends, smile and agree its for the best. If she says she's busy, and seems like she means she is busy, not just avoiding dating you, than tell her to tell you the next time she's available. In the meantime, continue being her friend. You never know what might happen next.  

talk to her.  do her favors.  flirt, but not desperately.  make her feel special.  talk to her friends.  be you.  take pride in your appearance.  ask her out! 

 Peripheral vision is what you can see from the side of your eye without looking directly at someone.Use this tactic to look at your crush without tipping them off to the fact that you're looking at them.   You can pretend to get up and do something else, like sharpen your pencil, while keeping your crush in your peripheral vision. This is an excellent method to use when you are sitting next to your crush. You may have a harder time seeing details in your crush with your peripheral vision.; , The further away you are, the less likely that your crush will notice you staring. This is especially true in public places where there are a lot of other people around. Try to keep an eye on them from a distance so that they don't notice that you're watching them.   If you are watching them in a parking lot, you can position your car facing the opposite direction and use your rearview mirror to look at them.If you are far away and can't see them, use your phone and use the zoom function. Just make sure it looks like you are texting or writing an e-mail.  Bring a book or look at your cell phone so you have a decoy if your crush looks in your direction. You can even have conversations with friends while watching your crush in the background. The goal is to try to look like you are paying attention to something else while still being able to keep an eye on your crush.   You can also draw in a pad or do schoolwork while watching your crush.  You can glance at your crush while they are preoccupied with another activity. Some good examples are while they are taking a test, talking to someone else, or while they eat. If your crush looks in your direction, avoid eye contact and look in another direction.   If they are involved in sports, you can watch them while they play without them noticing. If your crush is just sitting around and daydreaming, it's more likely they will see that you're staring at them since their attention isn't anywhere specific.  If you share classes with your crush, see if you can sit behind them. Try to find a good angle on your crush so that you can see the side of their face but they can't see you without looking behind them. This may give you the opportunity to watch them the entire class without being detected. If you already have regular seats, see if a classmate would be willing to switch with you.   If your crush looks back at you, pretend that you were staring at something off in their direction but not them.  Humans are creatures of habit, and there are many things that we do the same on a daily basis.If you go to the same school, figure out when their classes are so you can watch them in the hallway. If they are a coworker, memorize their work schedule.   If they have a regular schedule to attend church or go to the grocery store, you can go at the same times. Do not follow them home because this could be considered stalking.  

use your peripheral vision to look at them.  watch them from afar.  use a decoy so that they don't notice.  watch them while they are distracted.  sit behind them in class so you can see them, but they can't see you.  figure out their schedule so you'll know where they'll be. 

 Social media is a great way to watch a crush and what they're up to and doing without them noticing. Friend them on platforms like Facebook, Tumblr, Twitter, Instagram, and Snapchat. Some platforms will allow you to create an account anonymously. If you don't want to be noticed, use a username that they won't recognize.   Instagram and Snapchat are great apps to use because you can see when they upload new pictures. Even though you aren't where they are, you can feel like you are through photos. Looking at the posts they like or share will also give you a better sense of their personalities, or at least how they want to be perceived by others., Many social media sites now use algorithms that will determine what ends up on your timeline, wall, or page. This means that even if you are connected to your crush, that you may not see when they make new updates. In this case, turn on their notifications, so you get updated when they make new posts.There are apps like Snowball and Alternion that help you track all your social media notifications in one place.Set up your social media notifications to have a different sound so that you can keep track of your crush's updates.  If you are using an anonymous account, you may be able to interact more with your crush on social media. However, make sure not to comment too frequently or they may become suspicious of who you are. Do not comment, post, share, or like on any social media accounts attached to your actual name like Facebook. Part of watching your crush secretly is staying unknown.   If your crush uses Foursquare and regularly check into locations you can figure out where they like to hang out. 

friend or like them on all your social media accounts.  turn on notifications, so you know when they make an update.  do not like, repost, or comment on any of their accounts. 

 If you've watched your crush and have gotten to know their personality, choose conversation topics that interest them. Think about the things they like such as their favorite show, a sport they enjoy, or a musician that they listen to. If you don't have any ideas, then ask them about themselves or talk about an event that's coming up in your town.   You can also compliment your crush, but don't make it sexual. You can say something like, "Hey, the noticed that you were listening to the new Drake album. I was thinking about picking it up. What do you think of it?"  , Make eye contact with your crush and approach them with a smile. If you've never talked to them before, tell them your name and ask them for theirs. Even though you'll probably be nervous, make sure that you introduce yourself with confidence. Don't look away or mumble because it's a sign that you're insecure.   To appear more confident make sure to speak clearly, keep a straight posture, and use your hands to gesture.Keep the conversation light and try to be humorous. Don't be overly serious or personal when you first approach your crush., If you had a good conversation with your crush, it's important that you keep it going so you don't have to watch them without being noticed anymore. Ask for social media usernames or their cell phone number. See if they would want to hang out in the future or go on a date sometime.   If the conversation went poorly, your crush may not want to give you their contact information. In this case remain respectful and back off.  If you feel overwhelmed and can't talk to your crush directly you can try to become friends with your crush's friends first. Try to find someone in their circle of friends that share mutual interests with you, and make it a point to talk to them or hang out with them socially. Once you feel like you are good enough friends, you can ask them to introduce you to their crush.   When a mutual friend makes the introductions, it can relieve stress on both parties. Long term relationships are often started by introductions made by mutual friends. 

prepare conversation topics.  introduce yourself.  ask for your crush's contact information.  get to know your crush's friends. 

 On the other hand, if she starts the conversation too often, she might not be interested, either. When a girl likes a guy, she will likely try to show her interest without being too obvious or looking too needy. As a result, she will start at least half of your conversations if not most, but probably won't start all of them. If a girl does start all of them, it could be a sign that she is not worried about seeming needy because she only sees you as a friend.; , Even if the girl is tempted to hang on your every word, most girls will resist the urge. If anything, a girl who likes you is more likely to end a text conversation first in an effort to show that she is interesting and has an engaging social life even without you. When a girl ends most texting conversations with something like, "Gotta go, I'm heading to movie with my bff," she could be interested. If, however, she just stops texting instead of saying good-bye, she is probably not interested.  A formal count is not necessary, of course, but make a mental note of how often she uses emoticons and which ones she uses most. The most often used emoticon a girl will flirt with is the winking face. The more often she uses an emoticon wink, the more likely it is that she has a thing for you. Standard smiles may or may not mean the same thing, but large smiles are another good sign. A blushing emoticon and a "kiss face" emoticon may also frequent her texts if she likes you  , If she quickly turns the conversation to herself, she might not be interested. Similarly, if she gives super quick answers like "K" or frequently leaves the conversation with little more than a "brb," she probably is not very interested. If she regularly jokes back with you when you say something funny, though, or asks you questions to keep the conversation, it demonstrates that she wants to keep talking to you for as long as possible. , If most of her texts are practical, such as question about assignments, then she may not be interested. On the other hand, if her texts are personal and ask about your personal life, she might be interested. This is especially true if she recalls specific details you previously mentioned to her about your plans. Another promising type of text is the random question. Look for something of no significance, like, "Would you rather live on nothing but your least favorite food for a year or give up your favorite food for the rest of your life?" These questions are fairly unimportant, and if she asks a bunch of them, it could be a sign that she is looking for an excuse to talk to you because you are on her mind.  Specifically, look at how often she uses exclamation points. More exclamation points indicates more excitement at the opportunity to talk to you, which could signify that she likes you. A "Hey you!" is infinitely more promising than a simple, "Hey."  , Not every girl does it, but many girls add extra vowels and consonants onto words. For instance, she might text words like "heyyyy," "riiiiiight," "pleeeeeaaassseee," "hiiiiii" or "byyyyeee." The idea is to mimic the elongation of words often used in real-life flirtatious banter.  Any text laughter is a good sign, but there are some that are better signs than others. Standard abbreviations like "LOL," "ROTFL," or "LMAO" can be sent to just about anyone, friend or crush alike. A "haha" is a better sign, because she wants you to actually imagine her laughing. A "hehe" or "teehee" is even better. These two forms of text laughing are the equivalent of a real-life giggle, rather than a loud laugh, and a girl is more likely to text you a "giggle" if she wants to sound cute.  A common hint dropped via text is the invitation to meet in person. An actual invite to a party is good, but an even better invitation is the random “on the fly” sort, in which she casually mentions something like, “I think I’ll head to the pool. Meet me there?” These messages may seem casual, but in actuality, they usually indicate that she wants to see you and only you, and now. A strong desire to see you is a pretty good hint that she is interested.  

pay attention to how often she starts the conversation.if initiating the conversation always falls on your shoulders, odds are, she is not very interested.  see if she is usually the first to say goodbye.  count the emoticons.  determine how interested she is in what you have to say by her replies.if she has good, thorough responses to your comments, it shows a higher degree of interest in your thoughts and, by extension, a higher interest in you.  be encouraged if she starts to tease you.texts like, "you should be wishing you were here right now..." or "if you were here right now..." are usually meant to tease you into wondering what the rest of the sentence would read, especially when they end with the "..." they are mildly suggestive without being too over the top, implying that she wants to get you to think about her and wonder about her feelings and intentions a little more.  ,  note the content of her messages.  pay attention to punctuation.  look at how many of her words are unnecessarily long.  watch out for text giggles.  ask yourself if she frequently drops any hints. 

 Body language can be the "big tell" when it comes to discerning if that guy fancies you enough to date you. Interestingly, body language experts believe that while females have around 52 body language tells to show a guy that they're interested, guys show around only 10.If you subscribe to this theory, this should make your guessing a little easier! All the same, you still need to know what to look for, as well as being sure that you're not mistaking innocent gestures for calls of love––the latter mistake could prove embarrassing. Some of the signs of body language to watch for include:   He looks at you a lot. His eyebrow may even lift as he watches you ("the eyebrow flash" that lasts a fifth of a second). He might not even be really conscious he is watching you as much as he is. Notice how much he looks at your face and makes eye contact. He leans towards you a lot. Personal space invasion is a sign of major interest. Check the direction of his hands, feet, legs, toes, etc. If they're pointed toward you, it's a subconscious indicator of his interest in you. He starts grooming himself. He pulls at his tie to straighten it or he readjusts the fit of his sweater. Perhaps he runs his hands through his hair in attempt to tidy it or he reaches down to tie his shoelaces. Doing this repeatedly is similar to the actions of a male bird preening up his feathers for a display! Check out how he's sitting. If you see rather manly gestures, such as sitting with open legs or placing his hands on his hips, he's trying to impress. If he likes you, you may see that he rarely turns his back to you, often leans towards you, and also looks at you a lot. If he slouches his shoulders when near you, he's romantic and cares about what you have to say. If he points his shoulders and pelvis towards you while sitting, he is definitely feeling something for you.; , As already noted, a guy who is interested in you will look at you a lot, even if covertly. He may try to catch your eye or, if he's shy, he may suddenly turn his head away if you catch him checking you out. To test his interest, scan his face for four seconds, then look away (don't look any longer or it becomes awkward). Then look back––if he maintains or increases eye contact with you, he's interested. If his eyes wander to your mouth, he's definitely interested. If you feel like you have held eye contact just a fraction of a second longer than you would with anyone else, or if he looks away quickly, then there is something there. On the other hand, if he breaks eye contact with you and starts looking around the room, he's not interested in you.   A gaze that has him looking left, then sweeping over your face, then looking right is a sign he's very attracted to you.Be careful not to confuse a shy guy's darting retreat from eye contact with a guy who is clearly disinterested. A shy guy who is interested will continue to steal glances at you. Be patient! If you don't like the guy, it can be uncomfortable to maintain eye contact; break it off quickly and scan the room yourself, as if looking for someone else. When he's around you and he says or does something funny and everyone around laughs, his eyes will flicker towards you for a second to see if you laughed too––this means he's keen to make a good impression on you. His pupils may dilate if he likes you, but this is quite hard to pick up on, and you might come across as acting strangely by looking that closely into his eyes. If you're around him for a long time, it could be easier to pick up on gradually.  If he likes you, and he's nervous or anticipating the chance to get closer to you, he'll probably start talking about himself. Many times, guys feel the need to prove themselves, especially if you talk about another guy in his company.   Gauge his interest in what you have to say. It really doesn't matter what you say, it's how you say it that can tell you a lot about his level of interest. So, try this: Lean in and whisper, with your shoulder barely touching his and say something softly. To heighten the impact, steady yourself gently by brushing your arm across his back. If he moves his head closer toward you and either touches you back or maintains eye contact, he's interested in you. If he isn't interested, he'll probably step back or be very unresponsive. A really disinterested guy might even try to shoo you out of his personal space!  , Touch is an important sign of interest in a developing relationship and you can assess interest both by observing how he touches you and how he reacts to you touching him. If he's keen on you, he might put his hand on yours when he laughs, he might gently brush his leg against yours but won't move it away again, or he may hug you for small things, such as greeting you, expressing emotions when telling a story or just because you "look like you need a hug." On the other hand, consider touching him to see what happens––a gentle brush of your hand against his neck, a hold of his forearm with your hand, or running your fingers across his hand after joking with him about something. He's interested in you if he responds to it and doesn't flinch away or if he moves his hand to stay on yours or on your arm or leg. On the other hand, if he tenses up or moves his hand away, he's not interested.   If he is a shy guy, he may jump a little because he wasn't prepared for you to touch him. That doesn't necessarily mean that he doesn't like you, watch his actions carefully afterwards. Obviously, playboy guys (bad boys) might be very keen to spread their touching gestures around; be sure that he has more substance than this by observing how he interacts with other women in your group. See if he uses any of the tricks in How to touch a girl, and see if he uses them more with you than with anyone else.  If he's really interested in you, he may start to behave protectively toward you, or in a "gentlemanly" fashion (at least to the extent that he interprets his behavior as such). Look for signs like shifting his chair closer to yours, putting his arm around the back of your chair, leaving his jacket on the back of your chair or even going so far as to place the jacket around you to ward off your complaints of being cold.   Be aware that some guys flirt with other girls to get your attention. It gives him a chance to see your reaction, and helps him know if you really do like him or not. (Yes, it's an odd sort of logic, especially since you might end up so offended or confused that you just give up on him!) However, you can usually spot a "get-your-attention" flirt if, in the middle of his flirting scenario, he keeps taking the chance to look at you, seeking out your response. You can also try a quick trip to the bathroom and find yourself a sneaky observation point to check out how the flirting is proceeding. If he stops the moment you've left, it's you he's serious about, not her. Alternatively, ask a friend to do some observing for you while you're away.  For example, if you like a certain genre of music that he doesn't know as well, he may ask you to suggest bands or artists for him to listen to. Or, he may have gone to the trouble of finding out that a favorite band of yours is playing next weekend and mention to this, with or without a request to go and listen together. And, if you introduce him to a TV show that he didn't really know about and that becomes his new favorite thing, that can potentially be a sign that he likes you, especially if he goes out of his way to catch up with you to discuss the show's unfolding plot.  Signs of nervous laughter, sweaty palms, deep breaths, fidgeting, or possibly even looking away quickly when you notice he is watching you, can all be signs of an attraction towards you. If he is nervous about making an impression on you, it means he's trying hard and you are probably very close to being able to start making moves.  If they know he's interested in you, they might tease him subtly when you're around, hint to you that he likes you, or even try to find out if you like him. Study their reactions to your presence––do they smile? Do they turn to him? Do they smirk in a way that suggests they know something that you don't?   Be careful if a friend of his makes suggestions that a guy likes you but all of the other indications tell you otherwise. Sometimes friends have reasons of their own for ensuring that any chances of you getting together are ruined, including catapulting you into making a fool of yourself.  Mirroring each other's actions is a sign of mutual like and generally, it's subconscious. If you notice that he has been copying your gestures frequently, there is a high probability that he fancies you. You can test this by mirroring his actions too, for example, touch your hair when he touches his, brush your face when he brushes his, sit the way he is sitting, etc. The subconscious signals will be screaming "I like you too!"   Following you can be another sign; for example, if you buy lunch and sit at a table and he edges as near to, or even on the same, table as you, he is probably trying to get closer to you. Just be sure you're not confusing this action with there being a lack of space to sit anywhere else!  , If a guy teases you in a friendly and fun manner, it could indicate his interest, especially if he's young. Provided this isn't his modus operandi with every girl he flirts with, it's a sign that he's singled you out for attention and is trying to use his wit to charm you, in that awkward way of using humor to cover up true intentions. Of course, if he says something unkind or unfortunate, don't feel you have to excuse it––point it out if he offends you; it's best he knows now that you won't take nonsense than to discover it later.   Some guys make fun of their crushes in a slightly mean way. If this goes too far, he may need a reminder to act more mature.  A guy may gently hit or punch you on the arm as a covert, "manly" way of getting to touch you without making it too obvious what his intention is. If he finds that you don't pull away too much when he does this, he might find the courage to proceed to more gentle ways of touching you. Of course, this doesn't mean you need to sit there in pain if he actually hurts you––be assertive enough to point out that it hurt! You can salve his pride by saying something about not minding him touching you but to please watch out for your sensitive bony bits! And if you're the kind of girl who finds the play punching a bit of fun, give him a playful knock right back.   Play punching can send mixed signals. It could mean "I treat you like one of the boys" and signal friendzone antics only. Check out whether he does this to other girls in your mutual group. Moreover, if he continues to think that play punching you is a fun way to hang out, you might be dealing with someone who is never going to get past this immature display of affection; don't let it go on indefinitely. If you don't like it, say so immediately. You are entitled to ask someone not to harm you, even if the gesture is well intentioned.  If you do your hair or makeup differently one day, and the guy notices, that's a very good sign that he likes you. Most guys won't notice, or if they do, they won't be bothered to say anything unless they're totally into you. Anything like, "You look nice today," "I like that shirt," or even "Did you do your hair differently today? It looks nice," are all indicators that he could be interested in you.   Note: If this guy is a good friend of yours, compliments won't necessarily be indicators of romantic interest. It could just be him being a truly good friend. Not all guys are this straightforward about compliments, so don't be worried if he doesn't compliment you.  For example, some of your dad's aftershave rubbed off on you when you hugged him. Your crush may say "is that aftershave on you?" Noticing this can indicate that he thinks the scent comes from another guy (and not your dad!), revealing some vulnerability about losing you out to someone else. This could also apply to having, carrying or wearing things that he might think belong to another guy.  After all, when online there are many things competing for his time, like games, connecting with mates and checking out sites that might not be so interesting to you… Of course, he could also just be talkative, friendly, or even bored, so don't assume he's into you just for chatting––this should be treated as one extra indicator along with some of the others outlined above.   If he puts an 'x' sign on the end of everything he says to you, don't assume it means he likes you. It could just mean that he perceives you both as good friends or that he's just used to ending his chats that way. If he says, "I know something you don't know," then this could mean that he likes you and is playing a little guessing game. Or it could just mean he's doing the usual social media thing of spreading information for fun, like the discovery of a new planet or finding the cure to cancer, etc. Use the context to judge the import of any such online personal game playing.  If he suddenly seems to be in certain places at certain times of the day where you wouldn't necessarily expect to see him, it may be that he's taken to deliberately "finding" opportunities to bump into you. If it happens a lot in a short space of time, it's probably no coincidence but a concerted effort to catch up with you as much as possible.  If he shows genuine interest in you, (for example, he smiles at you a lot whenever the two of you pass each other or he goes out of his way to say hello to you), be friendly and polite back. If you've already decided that he's someone you'd like to date, don't let it go too long before facilitating an opportunity for the two of you to get together to talk in a quiet place. On the other hand, if he's not your type or you've changed your mind about flirting any further, be honest and let him know that you're flattered but you're not available.  

examine his body language.  notice his eye contact.  listen to what he's saying.  notice his interest in touching and being touched.  watch his actions to see if he treats you differently from the rest of your group.  watch for him showing a sudden, previously unexpressed interest in things that you like and do.  check for signs of nervousness.  pay attention to his friends.  look to see if he imitates you.  pay attention to gentle, friendly teasing.  if he hits you or playfully punches you on your arm, this may mean he likes you.  acknowledge any compliments that come your way.  watch for him noticing 'masculine things' on you.  if he chats to you often on a social networking site, it may mean that he likes you.  watch to see if he has suddenly developed a habit of turning up where you happen to be.  be receptive to his signals. 

 If you want that special guy to start noticing you, you're going to have to put yourself out there. It's hard, but it's worth it. Look your best, work that smile, be friendly, and be yourself—he'll start wishing he knew you in no time.    Dress to impress. If you're that kind of girl, wear a floral dress when it's hot out, or a cute black sweater when it's cold. Wear clothes that accent your features. Get a friend's advice on what looks good on you, or ask your parents. You want him to notice how well dressed you are every time he sees you. Don't dress in something you will not feel comfortable in. Dress the way you want to but, make sure that you at least look cute. If your school has a uniform wear a color or style that looks good on you.  Be clean and have good hygiene. Shower at least once a day. For example, if you practice on a soccer team or exert yourself after school, be sure to shower afterwards to get all that sweat off of you. Wash your face in the morning and at night; you don't want pimples to attack your pretty face. Also, don't forget to brush your teeth! You only get one set of adult teeth. Look after them because bad breath can really push him away, and everyone else, too.  Smile. Smile when you talk to him, or when he's around. Smiling lets him know that he makes you happy. Glance at him during class, if you happen to lock eyes, smile, and hold his gaze without blinking for as long as possible. Let him digest the fact that you're thinking about him, and then look away like nothing has ever happened. Don't overdo it, though—that shouldn't be done more than once a day.; , It's not really necessary, and lots of guys like natural anyway, so go for a natural look when it comes to makeup. If you feel like you have to use makeup, be subtle with it. Don't go overboard because that will make him not like you.    Wear minimal makeup. Makeup is not for covering up your best features but making them pop. Consider going for the natural look, too. Some guys just want to see your face not your makeup! Too much makeup can lead to teasing and not the flirty type! If you really want to wear makeup, just use some lip balm, foundation, and even mascara if you like. If you wear makeup keep it simple because cake faces are a real turn off. Play around with your hairstyle. Be yourself, don't ever decide how you want your hair to look just for some boy. Consider trimming your bangs, straightening, or curling your hair if you think it suits you. Alternatively, play with wearing your hair or makeup in a different way one day.  Act casual, but be yourself. If you're having trouble, pretend like you don't have a crush on him and that he's just another person. That gets rid of the tension that can make a conversation awkward. Practice on other boys like his friends. Get his number so you can text, which is a lot easier.   Talk about friends in your class, something strange that happened to you, or a social event you both plan on attending. If you're having trouble keeping the conversation going, be sure to ask him lots of questions. Not so much because he might get annoyed.  Make good eye contact with him throughout. Your eyes are the window into your soul, and definitely one of the most attractive parts of your body. Make sure he sees them! Focusing your eyes on him will tell him he's got your undivided attention. But don't stare at him all the time, this will make him think you're creepy. Look into his eyes when he talks to you; if you look at his feet, you don't look confident. Laugh at his jokes. Doing so will make him feel appreciated. That being said, don't force yourself to laugh because it will sound fake. If it's a joke indicated at you, make a subtle one back at him. It's all playful.  Don't make fun of him, but joking around is okay. Play around with him, and if you want to get flirty, ask him to arm wrestle you. That way, you could hold his hand and it won't seem weird or awkward.  Some people don't like being touched as much as others. Making physical contact with your crush is important because it tells him you like getting close to him. Subtle is best here: you don't want to claw at him and invade his personal space. Give him hugs when you see him.   Gently touch his arm or bump your knee against his. Rub shoulders with him when you ask him to explain that science problem you both had for homework. School related work is the best to get in-touch with someone, it's a perfect excuse. When he tells a funny joke or teases you (in a flirty way), lightly hit him on the shoulder. Your body language is telling him that you actually enjoy his attention. If you're really brave, let your hand crawl up his arm onto his shoulder or play footsie with him, you can also sit on his desk before class starts. Also blow him kisses in a playful way. Tickling is also a great way of flirting. Because a lot of guys don't like being tickled, however, you would be better off at the receiving end. Mention being ticklish and make your ticklish spots vulnerable. It's good to start with a spot like your feet and build up to being touched on the ribs and sides. You would let him tickle you. Play with his hair. Don't over-do it, though, or it will look strange, and he will want to stay away from you.  Boys his age are easily influenced by their friends, so if you're friends with his friends, he'll realize that you're "cool." If you're part of the same group, the two of you can hang out more often without feeling awkward. Make sure you don't become "one of the bros" because boys don't date their best friends.   If you feel uncomfortable around his friends, that's fine. Don't avoid them or leave when you see them coming. Use your siblings. If both your siblings are close in age, you automatically have something to talk about! Even better, if his siblings and your siblings are friends, suggest that the two of you take your siblings to the movies or amusement park together.  Talk to him about his interests, his family, music tastes, etc. Find out if any of his interests and your interests overlap.   Don't forget to actually listen! Bring up details he said later on in conversation to prove that you're a good listener. (Don't overdo this or you'll seem like a stalker.) Try to find things you have in common. Do you both play guitar or love the same bands? Suggest that you jam together! Do you both play sports? Ask him to play a pickup game sometime.  It may take a bit of practice to know what makes him click, but stick with it. Take the things that he likes to do and be sure to make an appearance.   Does he do sports? Go to his games or tournaments and cheer him on. Ask him when it's going to be, and wish him luck if you can't come. See if he tries to spot you in the stands! Encourage him when he is down: All guys have some down moments, so cheer him up. Showing him that you care will make him more likely to care about you. Do not say another boy is "hot" or go on about someone else. He might think you like the other boy and not him. If you like multiple boys at the same time, decide on which boy which you want to pursue and only go after him. Or, have a lot of friends and don't focus on one boy! It's not like you are going to get married! It's fun to have a lot of friends and not have to worry about treating anyone one of them differently because you don't like them all the same. If your crush finds out that you like two guys at the same time, he might not feel that he was special in your mind.  If there's a subject you excel at and he's struggling with, offer to help him. If the opposite is true, ask him for help. This will lead to more one-on-one time and an overall better relationship with him.   You probably already know this, but don't plan on getting a lot of work done during these study sessions. Your attention is going to be spent elsewhere, and that's okay! Just prepare for your exam a day or two ahead if you can.  There are a couple different ways for you to tell whether a boy likes you or not. Here are some tricks to find out without coming out and asking him.   Ask him to carry your backpack to class. Tell him it's heavy and he looks strong enough to carry it easily. If he says yes, it probably means that he likes you enough to do favors for you, and likes that you think he's strong. If you want to tell one of your friends something when he's there, tell him to close his ears or to step back a little. This will make him want to hear what's going on even more, and you'll know that he cares.  Be sure he does not already have a girlfriend. Double check to make sure that none of your friends like him. You don't want to stir up a lot of drama with your friends, because you might lose a friend and scare your crush away.   If one of your friends does like him, you should discuss who "gets" him. If you can't come to a fair agreement (such as who liked him first, he chooses, etc.), both of you should move on. If you decide to let your friend go after him and they get together, don't hold it against her. Stay friends with her. Be happy for them and realize that there will be plenty of other boys in your future.  If you don't get the person you like, don't get sad. Be confident in who you are deep down inside and love yourself from the inside out.   Sometimes, after a boy realizes you like them that way, they start to see you in a different light. Even if he says no, he may start to subconsciously think about the characteristics that he likes about you or why you would make a good girlfriend. Shy boys don't always have the courage to tell other people how they really feel, or they don't know how to. If you like a shy boy and he doesn't seem interested, it could be because he gets nervous around you and doesn't know what to do. If he is shy, keep trying to make him feel comfortable around you. Definitely hang out with him in places where he is most comfortable.  It's definitely tough being a middle-schooler, but you're beginning to learn how to balance out all the work and drama in your life. Don't be too over-committed or you won't have time to hang out with him and remember that there's more to life than middle school and it won't be long before you're not even sure what you ever saw in that boy!   If he feels he can't keep up with you, he might get too nervous and think that you're out of his league. If you are very socially active, invite him to come along one day with you and some of your friends. This will give him a chance to be around you outside of school and in your natural state. Don't make him feel like you're never around. If you bring him along make sure he feels comfortable. Likewise, don't under-commit or you could seem like a loser. You want to surround your life with interesting activities and friends regardless of whether he likes you. If he does like you, your life just got that much better. If he doesn't like you, your life is fun and meaningful without him!  , This means being comfortable in your own skin, doing what you want to do, and saying what you want to say. The people who don't love and respect you for who you are truly aren't worth fighting for.   Don't try to be somebody you're not. He'll like you just the way you are. You may even have some things in common.  Let him know you're interested, but not desperate. If you're not sure where he's at, be careful about following these steps; they might not turn out the way you had hoped!   Ask him, "Hey, would you like to hang out with me sometime?". If he says yes, you've done your part. Smile and tell him you have to go. Then walk away without looking back. Now the ball is in his court. Suggest going to the movies or a school sports game together. Asking him to the movies would be a little more formal of a date, but you could also suggest going with friends. Asking him to a school sports game doesn't have to be a "date." It could just be you two hanging out. Ask him out to Sadie Hawkins dance, if these are ever held where you live. Sadie Hawkins is when the girls ask the boys out for a dance. Pile up your courage and ask him whether he'd want to be your date. If he says yes, he definitely likes you.  If this still isn't impressing him try some love letters. Make a cute flirty playful letter from a secret admirer and leave it in his locker. Leave a secret code word like "flower" at the end of every note saying if he finds out who you are to say this word to him. After the first week start dropping hints that it's you by writing about things in the letter that he likes and then talking to him about them. Once he sees your common interests he is sure to give you a chance.   Don't write anything that you would be embarrassed about if anyone else read it. Letters can get misplaced. If someone else finds your letter, you could both be in for some teasing!  

wow him.  don't cake on the makeup.  start up a conversation.  tease him.  break the touch barrier but always remember to respect people's personal space.  get close to his friends.  find out things about him.  support him.  study together.  test him.  make sure the coast is clear.  don't give up.  balance out your life.  be yourself.  if you think that he might like you, try to be a little more forward with him.  send him a love letter. 

 As you move forward in the letter, be upfront about your feelings. A love letter is not the place to be shy. Tell the girl why you admire her and what qualities about her most intrigue you. Go into specifics when possible. You may not know a lot about this person, but mention small things about her that you love. For example, maybe you think the buttons she has on her purse are hilarious. Maybe you notice she listens to a particular band on her headphones that you also enjoy.   Be upfront about why you've never approached her in person. While many people enjoy anonymous love letters, there is always the risk of coming off the wrong way. You don't want the recipient to feel like she's being watched. It can help if you assure her, at some point, you're a relatively normal person who happens to feel more comfortable expressing feelings in writing.There are a variety of reasons you may prefer writing a love letter. You could be shy, for example, and find expressing yourself easier in words. Maybe you only see her when she's at work and don't want to bother her. Whatever you reason, make sure you state it early on. You want to make sure the recipient understands why you chose a letter over simply talking to her. This way, you can help avoid potential confusion or discomfort.Returning to the example of the girl you know in algebra class, you may hesitate to approach her because you're shy. You could write something like, "I always want to talk to you in person. However, I'm very shy by nature. Now that we're halfway through the semester, I'm worried I'll never get the courage together. So, I decided to write you a letter."  , Oftentimes, people end up inadvertently talking about themselves in a love letter. While you should certainly talk about your own feelings, make sure to focus primarily on the recipient. As you write the letter, express what you like about this person. If you admire that she's always listening to Elliot Smith on her headphones, say so. However, do not go on a 3 paragraph anecdote about your own admiration for Smith.Use specifics when possible. If you're writing to a relative stranger, specifics may be hard. However, small things go a long way. Do you love the coconut-like smell of her shampoo? Do you enjoy how she laughs to herself during downtime at the coffee shop? Do you remember a comment she made in class that was particularly insightful? Let's return to the algebra class example. You could write something like, "I notice you're always listening to Elliot Smith. I am a big fan of his as well. I'm impressed by how drawn in you seem to the music. You seem to have an intense appreciation for art."  , You don't have to write in a lofty, elevated style if it doesn't come naturally to you. The primary purpose of a love letter is to express your feelings in a way that makes the recipient feel good about herself. The best way to do this is to simply be yourself and use your own words. This will sound more authentic and sincere when expressed in a way that feels natural to you. Do not get hung up on inserting elaborate metaphors or dramatic declarations of your admiration into your writing. Instead, focus on simply being yourself and speaking in your own voice., As you near the end of your letter, tell the person how their presence has affected you. The girl you're writing to may be flattered to know she made an impact on your life. Talk about how she makes your days better and why you appreciate her.This may be something small, as you don't know this girl yet. However, even a small impact can be flattering. For example, maybe you always look forward to your 8AM British Literature seminar simply because you enjoy the contributions this girl makes to class. Returning to are example, you could write something like, "I know it sounds silly, but getting to see you each day makes me a bit more enthusiastic about going to algebra. I've never been a math person, but seeing you is a small treat that makes class more bearable."  

state exactly how you feel.  focus on the recipient.  use your own voice.  say how this person has affected you. 

 As you begin to conclude your letter, reaffirm your feelings briefly. Say something like, "I will continue to look forward to my morning algebra class as it give me a chance to be close to you." You want the recipient to know you're feelings are serious and not fleeting. You can also briefly summarize what was said in the letter to help you reach your concluding thoughts., It can be difficult to do, but you should try to end on a single sentence that sums up the gist of what you're saying. This is an elegant way to end a love letter. It can reiterate your feelings and leave a lasting impression on the recipient.It may take a few tries before you find the right sentence. You may want to grab a piece of scrap paper and write down a few sentences before settling on one to include in your letter. It's okay to be a little cheesy. Love letters are often somewhat overwrought but infatuation itself is often dramatic. Don't be afraid to use language that sounds somewhat hyperbolic or ridiculous.In our example, try something like, "You really do light up my mornings Mondays, Wednesdays, and Fridays with your spark, passion, and enthusiastic nature."  , If you want this letter to lead to a possible date, provide some contact information for yourself. You can say something like, "If you're interested, text or call the following number." You could also include your e-mail or a link to a social media profile  , Once you've finished your letter, find a way to deliver it. This can be tricky if you're writing to someone you don't know.  #*If you know the person's name, it might be a good idea to write her name on a envelop and place the letter in there. Then, leave the envelop where she will see it. For example, if you're writing to someone who works at a coffee shop you could leave the letter on your table or where drinks are set down.  If you have an e-mail address for the person, consider e-mailing your letter. If the two of you have a mutual friend, see if that friend can deliver the letter. Do not try to send the letter in the mail. Getting a letter in the mail from a stranger can be scary. You do not want to come off as creepy.  

reaffirm your feelings.  end on a single sentence summing up what's been said.  give her information on how to contact you.  find a way to deliver the letter. 

 One of the first impressions a guy has of a girl is her physical appearance. Make sure you look good every day, as you're never sure of when a good chance to approach your guy might pop up. Clothes are a part of looking good, but also make sure to be clean and appear sociable.; , This is the hardest and most nerve wrecking part of starting a friendship, but it's got to be done sometime! Look for a good chance to introduce yourself, perhaps when he's alone or walking down the hall. Your first talk can go anywhere from a simple "hey," or the start of an entire conversation!   If you guys have mutual friends, you can have them introduce you two.       If you don't know any of his friends, it's generally not a wise choice to interrupt him when he's with his mates. That will be awkward and he won't be able to focus on getting to know you better.  Once you've said hi to your guy, don't just leave him hanging there! Find opportunities to talk to him again and introduce yourself a bit more. Look and see if he's in any of your classes, and talk to him about the subject or about random things. If you're lucky, you can exchange phone numbers or MSN, AIM, Skype, or OoVoo screen names. Keep in touch!   If you guys share a class, talking about your teachers or the subject is an easy way to start a conversation. From there on you can find out a few more things about him.  Notice who your boy talks to. Try to make friends with them too. This will bring in chances for you and your guy to go out with a bunch of friends and get to know each other more. Besides, he will definitely appreciate you for being nice to his mates.  Just like how all girls are different, all guys are different as well. Some guys are sensitive and need to be treated carefully, some are out loud and jokey. Make sure to treat your new guy friend as a real person, not just as another boy. Talk to him, get to know his hobbies and his problems. Share some of yours as well.  He likes sports? Mention something sportive you do and show off once in a while. Acting is his thing? Feel free to dramatize in a funny moment! Show an interest in what he likes and maybe join a club with him. Remember that to share a hobby, you don't necessarily have to participate in it as well. Just appreciating his liking is enough.  Share a few funny moments between the two of you and keep it going as an inside joke. It'll entertain the both of you and make it feel like you're keeping a secret; always something good to have!  , Once you know him as a friend, stay in contact. A friendship is a long-term thing; like wine, it ripens with old age. Be a good friend!  

look your best.  go up and say hello.  look for chances to talk to him again.  make friends with some of his friends.  notice his personality.  share some hobbies.  develop some inside jokes.  keep the friendship going! 

 The first step in getting a boy to kiss you is to have utterly kissable, irresistible lips. Nobody want to kiss dry, cracked lips so get a good lip balm and apply it frequently for perfectly hydrated lips. Before the actual kissing, you should apply a light layer of lip balm so your lips are smooth and perhaps delicately flavoured. You should avoid bright lipsticks and sticky lip glosses however, as these can get messy and even ruin your kiss.   For moisturization, petroleum jelly or a lip balm stick will work well. You can also try exfoliating your lips by gently rubbing them with a damp washcloth or toothbrush. This will get them extra smooth. If you have a date planned, try preparing your lips a couple of days in advance. Otherwise you should keep some lip balm in your purse for emergency situations.; , Always try to look your best around the boy you're hoping to kiss. You'll feel way more confident if your hair looks good or you're wearing your favourite skirt, and confidence is super important when it comes to kissing. Try wearing a top that brings out the color of your eyes, or apply a little mascara to show off your long eyelashes.   Just be aware that looking your best doesn't mean you should go over the top. You don't need to wear a ton of make-up and you certainly don't need to wear skimpy clothes. Guys tend to go for girls who are natural and feel comfortable in their own skin, so try to let your natural beauty shine through. Smelling good also helps - if you have a date planned, make sure your hair is freshly washed and apply a little of your favourite perfume (though nothing overpowering) on your wrists and behind your ears.  This probably goes without saying, but you should always try your best to have fresh breath whenever there's a chance of kissing. You can do this by brushing your teeth as often as possible, especially after eating. You should also keep a little tin of breath mints in your purse, so you can pop one as soon as things look promising. Don't be afraid to offer him one either, he might take it as a hint, which is exactly what you want!   Try carrying a travel-size toothbrush and toothpaste in your purse if you're planning on grabbing a bite with the boy you like. That way you can pop to the restroom for a quick refresher after eating. If possible, use a little mouthwash as well. You should also try to avoid eating foods with a lot of garlic, anything too spicy or anything that might make you burp (not attractive) before or during a date.  You want to remember your first kiss with this guy as romantic, right? Then make sure to choose an appropriate location. Large, loud parties in front of all your friends are not a good idea. You'll feel under way more pressure and it'll definitely make things awkward. Instead, try going somewhere private - but not secluded - like a park, the pier or the corner booth in a cafe.   You want to be somewhere that you can talk and see each other (so he can pick up on all the "kiss-me!" signals) so a movie theatre isn't the best option. If you're already pretty close, you could invite him over to watch a movie together - just make sure that no parents or siblings are likely to barge in at any moment, awkward!  , You shouldn't work yourself up about the kiss too much. Of course, it's normal to be nervous, but too many nerves can cause you to act jittery or distracted, which might send him the wrong signals. Kissing should be a fun, enjoyable, natural thing, not complicated or terrifying at all. But if those butterflies are feeling more like carnivorous moths, there are a few last-minute relaxation techniques you can try:    Take a few deep breaths. If you feel the panic rising, take several deep breaths, inhaling through your nose and exhaling through your mouth. Focus on the breathing and nothing else and you will immediately feel calmer, as deep breathing is associated with decreased production of anxiety-inducing chemicals like adrenaline and increased production of relaxing and mood-boosting endorphins.Ask yourself "what's the worst that can happen?" Really - think about what could possibly go wrong with a simple kiss. Are you afraid that you're not a good kisser? Or that he won't like you any more if it's bad? Remember that kissing is a natural thing, so it's very unlikely that you'll be bad at it, especially if you like him and he likes you. And even if the kiss isn't so great, if that's enough to turn this guy off an otherwise amazing girl, then he's not worth your time anyway.  Laugh. They say laughter is the best medicine, and that goes for nerves too. Laughing will immediately make you feel more relaxed and happy and make the whole situation less awkward. Try cracking a joke (even a bad one), making a funny face or whipping out some silly dance moves to break the ice and get both of you laughing. Things will progress much more naturally after that.  

prepare your lips.  dress your best.  have fresh breath.  choose the right location.  relax. 

 If you know he's staring at you then look up slowly at him, hold his gaze, and then slowly smile and look down at your bible or the teacher/preacher.; , If you're feeling confident, sing a solo during the offering or if your church has a choir, then join it. Use your talents to your advantage and make sure you create a positive image of yourself.  Get to know him better! You can do this by starting with small talk. Ask him little things such as 'how has your week been?' or if you already know a bit about him, ask about something he is passionate about (this also opens doors to you complimenting him about his interest or something he does well in).  Use this time to express your true feelings and be honest.  Don't make fun of him but joke around with him, get to know him, have inside jokes, and if he jokes with you then punch him lightly on the shoulder. It's a great way to make physical contact and to show you're interested.  Ladies, don't be scared to take the lead/charge in the relationship.  After all, being yourself and staying true to your personality is what's going to make him attracted to you and hopefully create a long-lasting relationship. Wear clothes that cover more skin than they show, try a longer skirt and a nice top. You can still look gorgeous without showing lots of skin and he will notice you for it! Finally, watch your language. Avoid using vulgar or offensive words around him and others (if you say something, he might find out and you could potentially create a bad image of yourself in his mind).  

if you are in the same class/group as him, then give him a few signs that you like him.  make it almost impossible for him not to notice you.  if you know he likes you, try to be his friend before taking your "relationship" to the next level.  if you are feeling confident and believe he likes you also, then ask him to stay after teen class so you can be alone.  the couple that plays together, stays together.  girls can make the first move too!,  remember to a) stay modest (in your language and image), b) natural and c) true to yourself! 

 Talk to the boy you like and figure out some details about his personality. Be careful not to sound as if you are trying to gain information. Instead, try to be interested and join in; ,   Does he like frat boy humour or does he enjoy a drier wit? This will be easy to discover as you spend more time with him and get to know what his favourite TV shows or movies are. Having a night at his or your house is the perfect way to do this. Once you get a feel for his sense of humour, cracking a joke or preparing a witty comeback should be met with a hearty chuckle. Don't do this too often or it will start to look a bit weird. If he likes mean jokes then you can do some but be careful not to hurt other's feelings.    Nothing lights up a person's eyes more than a conversation about their favourite interests or hobbies. A few of these should get you going! Though you may not know much about cars, entering a conversation with him about it and showing a genuine interest in it will surely bring a smile to his face. This is perfect and even if you get bored let him stop the conversation rather than yourself.  Laugh at his corny jokes. Compliment him on his new shirt. Making him feel good about himself will be one of many reasons he'll want you around and often. Be careful not to do this too often as some men might grow tired of constantly being complimented  , Make him feel like you enjoy his company, and he will begin to enjoy yours. ,, Lightly touching his arm during conversation or holding his hand is a way to express your interest. , Letting him know that you trust him and have feelings for him gives him an opportunity to reciprocate those feelings.  This tells him that you are thinking about him.  When he talks, be active in the conversation. Show that you care about what he's telling you.  You have nothing to lose. Smiling at a boy is the best way to show your interest, and you can tell pretty quickly if he is also interested. , 

getting to know the boy you have a crush on will help you understand what makes him smile.  find out what he finds funny, again don't sound as if you are looking for something.  find out what his passions are and what he likes to do best.  stroke his ego.  make sure that you have positive interactions with him.  always give him compliments about the things you like about him. ,  flirting with a guy lets him know that you are interested in him, and will bring a smile to his face.  ,  physical contact is a great way to flirt with a guy.  as always, complimenting a boy and joking around with him are also great ways to flirt.  ,  confide in the boy you like.  text or call him every once in a while when you aren't hanging out.  listen to him.  don't be shy.  whether you're alone with him or on the other side of the room, catching his eye and showing off your pearly whites is a surefire way to receive a smile in return.  ,  smiling at a boy or laughing with him are the best ways to make sure that he smiles back.  

 Once you have prepared yourself and decided that tonight's the night, it's time to start sending out the "kiss-me" signals. Giving the boy a compliment is a great place to start. He'll feel great about himself and it'll make him like you even more, making the possibility of a kiss ever more likely.   Say something flattering yet honest, like "I love your eyes" or "you're one of the coolest people I've ever met" or if you want to be even more obvious, you can tell him that you love his lips!  , Guys are attracted to happy, confident girls, so show off these winning personality traits by smiling a lot and looking him directly in the eye. Smiling a lot will make you seem happy and carefree, while laughing at his jokes will flatter his ego. Making eye contact will let him know that you're interested and that you're not afraid to get what you want.   Don't bat your eyelashes, but try looking at him directly for a few seconds, then smiling and looking away - he'll be hooked!  , Drawing attention to your lips will get his attention in a not-so-subtle way and make him think about kissing you. Try not to be too obvious about it, you should make it look like you're doing it without thinking.   Try applying your lip balm in front of him or gently biting your lip when you know he's looking. You'll soon have his attention right where you want it.  Sometimes boys can feel awkward or unsure about making the first move, but just by making physical contact you're letting him know that it's okay to kiss you. Try giving him a playful push, brushing your fingers through his hair, holding his hand or giving him a spontaneous hug. He'll immediately feel more comfortable around you and hopefully get the message that you'd like to take things to the next level.  Use an excuse to get up close and personal with the guy. Pick some imaginary fluff out of his hair, challenge him to a staring contest or tell him that you're cold and ask if you can snuggle closer to him. The close contact will let him know that you're interested and make it much easier for him to lean in for a kiss.  Boys can be a little dull sometimes, so if he's not picking up on any of your oh-so-subtle signals, it may be time to give him a more obvious hint. You can just go for it by making eye contact as you lean towards him, or you can try giving him a playful kiss on the cheek, challenging him to go a step further.   If you're feeling extra confident, you can try a cheeky comment like "you can kiss me now" or "what are you waiting for? Kiss me!" He'll probably think all of his Christmases have come at once!  

compliment him.  smile and make eye contact.  draw attention to your lips.  make physical contact.  use a ruse.  give him a hint. 

 It's important to get your kissing technique right for the first kiss. Start by slightly tilting your head to one side, just enough to ensure your noses don't crash. Tilt in the opposite direction to him - if he goes right, you go left.   If he's taller than you, you should also tilt your head upwards slightly to make sure he can easily reach your lips. Just don't tilt your head too much, or it'll look like you have a crick in your neck.  Closing your eyes when kissing makes it a much more romantic and sensory experience. However, you shouldn't close your eyes until you're sure you know exactly where you're going - if you close your eyes too soon you may end up kissing his nose or chin! Try to keep your eyes closed for the duration of the kiss - if you open your eyes and he opens his it can be a little creepy and might ruin the moment.   Sometimes closing your eyes will come naturally, but other times you will have to remind yourself. Leave your eyes closed for a second when you pull apart, then smile gently and open.  Don't be an aggressive kisser, at least not for the first kiss. Your first kiss with a guy should be soft and slow - you want to avoid the washing-machine effect. Try not to pucker your lips, rather work your bottom lip in a slight up-and-down motion. Remember to breath through your nose and try to stay relaxed!   There's no pressure to French kiss first time round, but if you do you should try gently massaging his tongue with your own. If you're still unsure, just try to follow his lead.  Make the kiss more intimate by putting your hands on his shoulders, in his hair or around his neck. Keep your bodies as close as you feel comfortable with. If he wraps his hands around your waist or cups your face in his hands, he's definitely into it.  The first kiss shouldn't wear out his jaw, you should always leave him wanting more. Try to keep it around the 20 second mark - long enough to get into it, but short enough that he'll be eager to do it again. Don't be afraid to pull away if you're not into it or if it's going somewhere you're not comfortable with.  Remember that he was probably as nervous about kissing you as you were about kissing him, so once you've pulled away, ease his nerves by smiling and confirming that you enjoyed the kiss. Just say something simple like "that was fun" or "you're a great kisser." He'll feel happy and relieved, while also feeling much more confident about leaning in for round two. Now you have him exactly where you want him!  

tilt your head.  close your eyes.  be gentle.  hold him close.  keep it short and sweet.  compliment him again. 

 This will help you to figure out what you want him to notice about you. Maybe you like how smart you are or you’re proud of the way your treat people or you appreciate your creativity. Figure out these things for yourself. You don’t have to wait for him to tell you that you’re awesome! Instead, you have a chance to share with him the wonderful things about you, whether he appreciates them or not.If you aren’t sure, try making a list of at least three things that you appreciate about yourself. It can include anything at all! If you are struggling, ask a good friend or family member to help you. Sometimes seeing yourself through the eyes of those who love you can be quite illuminating.; , Before he can see what’s on the inside, initially he can only see your outer appearance. Take advantage of this to express yourself and make a statement about who you are. This can be accomplished by developing your own sense of style. The way people dress says a lot about them. Someone in sweatpants has a very different demeanor than someone in a dress. You certainly don’t have to wear a dress unless you want to, but find a style that feels true to you. This way, even what’s on the outside will be able to tell him something about what’s on the inside.If you don’t know where to start, look at the styles of other people around you and think about what they are communicating through what they wear. If you find someone wearing something that you like, make a mental note of it. To develop your own style, go to a few stores and start trying on clothes. Step outside of your comfort zone and try new styles. For feedback, you can bring along a friend. Once you try on a bunch of clothes, you should have a better idea of what works for you. You could even take pictures of your top three outfits. Make sure that you feel comfortable and confident and keep in mind what you are communicating.  When you respect yourself physically, mentally, and emotionally, you will naturally be more attractive and vibrant. This means eating well, getting enough sleep, exercising, and staying hydrated, but it also means monitoring negative thought patterns, validating your emotions, and surrounding yourself with people who bring out the best in you. When you take time to respect all aspects of yourself, you teach others to do the same and people will instinctively take notice of this.It can take a lifetime to truly master this, but don’t let that deter you. Aim for progress, not perfection. Start with one change you can make today. Maybe you usually eat junk food for dinner. You can easily replace this with a healthy salad and some grilled fish. If are very hard on yourself and you catch yourself being negative, replace this with a word of encouragement, such as “You did a great job writing your paper today.” Perhaps you have a friend who always seems to cause conflict and trouble. Try spending less time with this friend and more time with someone who treats people well.  When you know your own worth, he will naturally take notice. Take ownership of what you think and how you feel and don’t be afraid to communicate this. You’re the only one who can share this with the world and you have a worthwhile, unique perspective to contribute. If you have been afraid to share your thoughts and feelings in the past, start with something small. For example, if your friends ask where you want to eat and you would usually just say, “I don’t care. What sounds good to you?” try replacing that with something you want, such as, “Mexican food sounds great right now.” Practicing speaking up for yourself to develop confidence. This will allow you to share your true self with the guy you like.To cultivate confidence, spend time pursuing your interests and growing your talents. When you’re doing what you’re good at, you will feel more confident. Even if you’re not feeling particularly confident, you can fake it ’til you make it! Present yourself well by using confident body language. Stand tall with your shoulders back and make eye contact with people. You will instantly appear more confident regardless of how you feel.  This will help you to be well-balanced so that there isn’t too much riding on whether or not he notices you. Plus, when you are in your element, doing what you love, you are more likely to catch his attention anyway. Maybe you love playing an instrument or excel at a sport. Pursue these passions so that you grow as a person.If you aren’t sure what makes you happy, pick an activity that interests you and give it a try. Don’t worry if you’re a complete beginner. Maybe you’ve thought that painting looks fun, but you haven’t had the chance to try it. Simply buy some paper, paint, and a paintbrush, and get going! Look for tips online or sign up for a class. Maybe you're happiest when you spend time with your friends. Being around loved ones and building strong relationships is a great way to improve your happiness. Make sure to invest time in the people you love. It can be very rewarding to give to people and help others. If you aren't sure what makes you happy, try volunteering somewhere. You could spend some time reading to seniors at a retirement home or spend time giving out food to the poor. When you see how you positively impact others, you will feel happy too.  This is the first step in forging a connection. It signals your interest and is sure to get his attention. Guys are much more likely to notice girls that show their interest in this way. To start, try to catch his glance and then maintain eye contact for a couple of seconds while smiling. This shows that you are friendly and available, and will make you much more approachable. Don’t be surprised if he strikes up a conversation with you., This is a great way to casually signal interest. Follow him on your social media accounts. You could even send him a casual message, like, "Hey, it was great seeing you at the game today.” People also often tell a lot about themselves over social media, so this is a good way to learn more about him. Knowing about his interests is a great way to strike up a conversation with him the next time you see him., This will help you to relate to him. Even if you don’t have much in common, you can probably find some common ground. If you don't know very much about him, simply ask him a question to find out more, such as, “How long have you been swimming for?” This shows your interest and starts a conversation with a subject that he is interested in. He is sure to enjoy and notice this. Most people like talking about themselves!, This is a good way to “accidentally” run into him. Maybe he plays in a band each weekend, or maybe he has a sporting event every Wednesday. Grab a few of your friends and go to one of these. When he sees you there, he will be likely to notice you because you are sharing an activity.  Guys tend to like girls who like them. You don’t have to overdo it, but just tell him something that you like about him.For example, if you are at his football game, you could go up to him afterwards and say something like, “You played great today! I enjoyed watching your game.” This will make him feel good and allow him to see that you appreciate him. It is also a good way to start a conversation with him., This will help him to notice you as more than just a friend. There are many ways to flirt, so choose the ways that feel natural to you. Try gently touching his arm while you are talking. Physical contact has been shown to be a powerful way to get someone’s attention. Just don’t overdo it. If you come on too strong, you might scare him off!, Happy people tend to be more noticeable. They stand out. Show off your sense of humor and laugh at his jokes. This will allow you to show your beautiful smile as well. Try to make him laugh too. Use a goofy pun or tell him a silly joke. If he tells you that you’re a good listener, say something like, “I’m sorry, I can’t hear you.” If he feels happy around you, he will surely take notice of that., If you’re doing your best to allow him to notice you but he still isn’t getting the hint, you can always speed things up a bit and simply tell him how you feel. If you’re not very comfortable confessing your feelings to him, you can do so more casually by saying something such as, “I’ve had so much fun hanging out with you lately. I really like spending time with you.” You can then see how he responds. Maybe he feels the same way, but wasn’t sure how to bring it up., A girl can only wait so long! If he still isn’t noticing you, try making the move yourself. If you feel confident asking him out on a date, go for it! If you’re not ready to formally ask him out, you could try something more easygoing by saying something like, “A few of my friends are going to see a movie this weekend. Would you like to join us?” This takes the pressure off, yet still allows a chance for you to spend more time with him. If he agrees to go, make the most of it and try to show your interest and get to know him better., If you go through these steps and he still isn’t taking notice, it’s time to move on. There are plenty of other guys out there. Make sure you are content regardless of who notices you. Your happiness is your responsibility. When you are happy and confident, even if the guy you like doesn’t notice you, the right person will someday.A good way to practice contentment is to count your blessings. It can be challenging when you don't get what you want, but you still have a lot of other great things and people in your life. Make the most of what you have right now instead of waiting for something in the future. Then when you finally do find the right person, you will be in the right frame of mind to enjoy it. If you are struggling with this, try making a list of all the great people and things in your life. Instead of dwelling on the one person who doesn't notice you, take notice of each person who cherishes you and spend time with them. They will help you get past your disappointment. Try to practice positive thinking instead of allowing negativity to cloud your mind. Replace thoughts like, "I feel awful that he doesn't like me. Why does this always happen to me? I'm never going to find someone!" with, "I have such an amazing friend who does notice me. I'm so fortunate for what I have. We always have a great time together." This will help you to appreciate what you have instead of dwelling on what you don't have.  

decide what you like about yourself.  express yourself visually.  take care of yourself.  be confident.  find what makes you happy.  smile and make eye contact.  use social media.  pay attention to his likes and dislikes.  go to a public event where you know he’ll be.  give him a compliment.  flirt.  laugh.  be honest.  ask him out.  be content whether he notices you or not. 

 When you love someone, the other things in your life become a little less important in your mind. If you love a guy, you may find yourself thinking about him often — even when you don't really want to. If he's the first thing on your mind when you wake up, and the last thing you think of before you go to sleep, this is a sign that you have serious feelings about him.   However, infatuation (puppy love) can have the same effect. Since just thinking about someone often isn't enough to say whether you love that person, use the other steps below to help make your decision.; , The person you love shouldn't be someone you're shy around. Love means that you're extra-comfortable around this guy — you like hanging out with him because he makes you feel like you can be yourself. On the other hand, if this guy still makes you feel nervous, antsy, or insecure, your relationship may not have made it to "love" territory yet.   If you still get the butterflies around this guy, don't worry. You can eventually love him — you just need to spend more time together and grow more confident around each other.  People who love each other tend to enjoy thinking about the rich, rewarding time they've already spent together. If you sit down and think of the things you've done together, do you find yourself feeling warm, happy, or nostalgic emotions? If so, you may have a good foundation for love.   If you don't feel an attachment to your memories together, you may not be there yet. If you don't have any memories together, you probably haven't spent enough time with this guy for love to develop.  It's natural to have some fantasies of the future when you have a crush — running off together to a tropical retreat, exploring the world, etc. However, when you love someone, your fantasies tend to be a little more realistic. You may find yourself thinking things like, "I wonder if we can live together when we finish school?", "I wonder whether we could get a dog together," and so on. If so, this can be a sign that you are excited for a realistic future with your partner, which is evidence for love.  The person you love should make you happy most of the time when you're together. If he can cheer you up no matter how angry you are, this is an even better sign. If you find yourself smiling whenever he is around, this is best of all. Your smile should be open and genuine, not forced.   A friend can help you see whether you smile around him or not. Tell your friend to watch your face when you're hanging out him in a group, then give yourself a few minutes to forget you told your friend to do this. If your friend notices your face light up whenever he talks to you, you may be feeling something for this guy.  Loving someone usually means they will naturally work their way into your conversations simply because you're thinking about them so much. If you find yourself gushing about the latest developments with this guy even when the conversation has nothing to do with him, you definitely have an attachment to him. You can ask your friends to help you here — ask them whether they notice you talking about him a lot.   For obvious reasons, this isn't a good choice if you tend to get shy when talking about romance. In this case, you may avoid talking about your relationship even if you do love him, so use the other recommendations in this article.  Today, the internet gives people who are in love plenty of opportunities to check on each other. If you are constantly checking this guy's Facebook, Twitter, AIM, Instagram, etc. to get the latest updates or catch a new dreamy selfie, you have at least a serious crush. Even things as simple as checking to see if your guy will be online to talk to every night can be signs of attachment.   Of course, this on its own isn't a sign of love. Looking at someone's profile pics every night may simply mean you think he's good-looking, so use this tip along with the others in the article to get a complete picture of how you feel about him.  The way you carry yourself around your guy when you're hanging out with other people can help tell you whether you love him or not. If you find yourself focusing on everything he says or snapping to attention whenever he opens his mouth, you may have serious feelings for him. If you find yourself more interested in what he has to say than what anyone else does, this is an even better sign. Being in love with a guy means valuing him for what comes out of his mouth instead of just the way he looks when he's talking.  As noted at the top of this article, when you're in love with someone, everything else seems a little less important. If you find that you want to spend time with this guy even when you have lots of other male friends, he's definitely important to you. You may even have multiple crushes and prioritize this guy over the rest (it's OK to find multiple people charming or attractive — just date one at a time).   This doesn't mean that the more time you spend with someone, the more you love that person. Even if you love this guy, however, you shouldn't spend all your time with him. People who love each other let their partners spend time with friends and family members.  

see how often you think about him.  judge how badly you want to be around him.  see whether you find yourself thinking about shared memories.  do you think realistically about your future together?,  see whether you naturally smile when you're with him.  listen to how often you talk about him.  check how often you look at his social media.  check how you act around him in groups.  see if you prioritize him over other male friends and crushes. 

 If you're asking yourself whether you have a crush on a guy and care enough to do some research on the topic, then chances are, you probably do. You may be second-guessing yourself because the guy is an old friend, or an unlikely target for your affection, or because you're just plain confused.   But don't overthink it -- having a crush on someone doesn't mean you want him to be your soul mate. It just means you like him and want to spend more time around him.; , This is another easy way to tell if you have a crush on him. Why would you spend a lot of time thinking about a guy if he wasn't special to you? If you find yourself thinking about the guy every few hours, or just wondering what the guy is up to all the time, then you probably have a crush on him. Here are some ways to tell if your thoughts say you have a crush:   If you catch yourself daydreaming about the guy in class. If you think about the guy as you drift off to sleep. Bonus points if you ever dream about him, even if it isn't in a romantic way. If you find yourself always wondering what the guy is doing or what he's up to. If you're always wondering what the guy would think about certain things. What would he think of your new dress, your new haircut, the movie you just saw, or the restaurant you just tried? Notice how often you think about the guy each day. Once a day? Maybe not. Once an hour? Probably a crush.  A lack of concentration is another sure-fire sign that you have a crush on a guy. If you're completely focused on yourself, your grades, and your friends, then you don't have time to think about a crush. But if you can barely read a page of your book for homework because your thoughts keep drifting to him, then this is a sign that you are crushing hard.   If you're feeling so distracted by the thought of your guy that you can't even hold a conversation with one of your friends for more than five minutes, then you have a crush. If you can't read more than a paragraph of your homework assignment without picturing your guy's face, or wondering if he did his homework, then you have a crush. If you find yourself drifting off with thoughts of your guy in the middle of a movie, or even during a thirty-minute TV show, then you have a crush. If you're so distracted that you can't focus on taking notes in class and find yourself doodling the guy's name, then you are definitely crushing.  Chances are, this isn't your first crush, so think of another guy you've crushed on in the past and compare it to that. Though no two relationships or crushes are the same, if you've thought about a different crush the same way before, then chances are, this guy is your new crush.   Try to remember if you thought about a different crush this way before. What kind of thoughts did you have? If you're having similar thoughts about a new boy toy, then it's likely that you have a crush. Know your crushing style. Were you also in denial when you were falling for your previous crush? If so, then this is a sign that this is your way of easing into a crush. If you've never had a crush, then you may not have anything to compare your crush to. If this is the case, then you probably do have a crush and just don't know what it feels like!  

if you think you have a crush on him, you probably do.  notice how often you think of him.  notice if you can't concentrate.  notice if you've thought about another guy this way before. 

 If you're excited to be around your guy and only feel your excitement build after you spend more time together, then chances are, you have a crush. If the guy made you feel too relaxed instead of excited, then this would mean that you're comfortable around him but probably don't see him as crush material.   If you can't stay still when you're around him, then you may have a crush. If your hands shake, or you can't stop talking, or you just keep gesturing when you speak, then your energy level is higher than usual because you have a crush. If you're so excited that you laugh at everything he says even if it's not that funny, you probably have a crush. If you like the guy, you're more likely to think that every word that comes out of his mouth is hilarious. If you're so excited that you can't sleep at night because you keep thinking of the guy or replaying your conversation in your head, then you have a crush. If you feel a jolt of excitement and your heart races when he greets you, texts or chats you, or even just when he says your name, then you have a crush.  If you have a crush on the guy, then you won't feel completely comfortable around him. Instead, you would feel nervous because you're worried about what he thinks about you and don't want to say the wrong thing. If you're nervous, it means you care what he thinks about you, and if you care what he thinks about you, then -- you guessed it -- you have a crush.   If your hands tremble, your knees shake, or your voice wavers when you're around him, then he's making you nervous. If you're so nervous that you keep rambling when you talk to him or just completely clam up because you can't think of anything to say, then you have a crush. If you're so nervous that you bump into things around him, walk into tables, or drop all of the contents of your purse in front of him, then you have a crush. If you're so nervous that you always feel embarrassed, or constantly blush when you're around the guy even though there's no reason for it, then you have a crush.  If you have a crush, then it's natural for you to not want the guy you like to be dating, talking about, or maybe even hanging out with other girls. If you're cool with him having a girlfriend or flirting with a lot of girls, then you probably don't have a crush on him.   If the thought of the guy dating other girls makes you cringe, you probably have a crush. If the thought of the guy just hanging out with other girls makes you feel squeamish, then you definitely have a crush. Just try not to make this a problem in the future or you may be facing some jealousy issues. If he has a girlfriend and you think he has a great relationship and are happy for him without any complications, then you probably don't have a crush.  

notice if you're excited.  notice if you're nervous.  notice how you feel about the guy being with other girls. 

 The things you say to the guy, or even the things you talk about when you're not around the guy, can be a big indication of whether or not you have a crush on the guy. Here's how to know if the things you say mean that you have a serious crush:   If you find yourself always teasing the guy. If you always end up poking fun at the guy without meaning to, it means you have a crush. If you talk really fast or stutter when you say anything to the guy, it means you have a crush. If you're careful about not saying anything that might make you look like a ditz or dumb in front of the guy, then you have a crush. And if you feel like everything you say to him does make you sound like a ditz, then you probably have a crush. If you can't talk to one of your friends for more than ten minutes without mentioning the guy, then you have a crush. If you have a crush, your friends may be able to pick up on it before you do.  You can learn a lot about whether or not you have a crush on the guy based on how you act around him, or even how you act when he's miles away. Here are a few ways to know if your actions mean you've been bit by the crush bug:   If you go out of your way to hang out with him, then you have a crush on him. If you've never watched baseball in your life but are suddenly going to all the school games because you know he'll be sitting in the bleachers, then you have a crush. If you want to be near him whenever you do hang out. If you find yourself drifting toward him when you're in a group of friends, or even touching him in a playful way whenever you can, then you have a crush. If you can't stand being around him when he's flirting with other girls, then you have a crush. If your heart falls when you show up to a place where you thought he'd be and he isn't there, then you have a crush.  It may not be a coincidence that you're suddenly spending twice as much time in front of the mirror whenever you know you'll see the guy. Here's how to know if your grooming habits and attention to your looks say that you have a crush on the guy:   If you try twice as hard to look good if you know you'll see him. If you wear your best outfit, best hairdo, and most amazing eye makeup when you know he'll be there, then you have a crush. If you find yourself experimenting with new makeup looks or jewelry to see if he notices, then you have a crush. If you find yourself not caring at all about how you look if you go somewhere where you know you won't see him, then you have a crush.  Let's say this guy is the athletic, typical-boy type. You might find yourself practicing basketball and soccer, or buying Nike shoes, so your guy can get interested at you. And if you want your guy to get interested at you, that basically means you have a crush on him and will kind of do anything for him.  

notice what you say.  notice how you act.  notice if you're starting to pay more attention to your looks.  notice if you're starting to change your personality. 

 Most of the time if you are not happy or confident, your feelings will show. Look in a mirror and smile at yourself and make different faces. Smile around him and be with friends, so you look like you have a life outside of trying to get the attention of guys. You don't have to ignore him completely, but don't get obsessive, either.; , Walk with your shoulders loosely relaxed. Swing your hips but only a little, otherwise it will give the guy the idea that you're trying too hard.  Maybe you'll get a compliment back. If you don't brush it off. Most likely he is not interested, because for in most cases, guys will look for every opportunity to compliment a girl who they are into.  This will let him know that you are comfortable doing things for him, and usually this starts conversations. Don't become the "guy" in the relationship though. If he is not sure enough of himself to do the same back, like pick up a book you dropped in the hallway, then don't try. Or at least, give him a year or two to "man up".  Make sure you laugh at his jokes, just not all of them or else he might think that you're trying too hard. Ask him about his interests and what he likes to do for fun.  Talk to other boys, and act independent and confident. Boys go crazy when they like you and you flirt with other boys!  , If he really likes you he won't need the sexy side of you all the time. Make yourself stand out, but not so much that he will think you're way out of your comfort zone and trying too hard. If he likes what you think is inappropriate or extremely uncomfortable to you, he's not good for you.  Just keep on being yourself. Remember, there's someone out there that's absolutely amazing and will love you for who you are, and if you keep on looking, you will find him. 

make sure you are happy about yourself and your appearance.  practice walking at home.  when you are in a same class together, try complimenting him such as saying: "wow, i really like your handwriting" or "i like your shirt.",  if he accidentally knocks something over, try picking it up and handing it to him with a smile.  don't be too shy around him.  if you're sure he likes you, but is nervous about asking you out, play hard-to-get.  be intimate but conservative.  if he doesn't like how you truly are, then it's his problem and he's obviously not the perfect guy for you. 

 Dress in a way that is feminine and flattering. Men tend to gravitate towards hourglass figures. This means you should accentuate your waist by using a belt or fitted shirt to draw the eye to the waist. Wear flowing materials like lace overlays and feminine cuts like the sweat-heart neckline. Studies show that men also gravitate towards teen girls who wear red.; , That means no overly complicated twists or braids. Instead try a messy, casual up-do or long flowing curls.   Maintain hair with a thick conditioner and a heat protector spray if you curl or straighten your hair often.  It should draw his focus to certain features.    Lips: Full, plump lips are attractive to men. So try using a light to medium pink to carefully paint your pout.  Eyes: Big, bright eyes can be attractive to men. The goal is to line the eyes without drawing too much attention to the make up. So instead of overdoing the smokey eye, try using white shadow on the corners of the eye and just below the eyebrow, then put a thin layer of liquid liner on the top lash line and use a voluminous mascara.  This will leave a lasting impression. Literally. Spray enough perfume for him to smell if he leans in. Don't overdo it, if you do, use rubbing alcohol to remove some of your excess scent.     Teeth: Get shiny, white teeth by using a whitening toothpaste. Every five months, try using bleaching strips to add a little extra whitening power to your mouth. Always use mouthwash after brushing your teeth to prevent any bad breath.  It's a myth that you should chew gum in order to freshen your breath. This will actually cause your saliva glands to overact worsening your breath. Instead try a breath mint.    Skin: Get bright, glowing skin by washing your face every night and by exfoliating once a week. This will cause your skin to look fresh and new. If you want to add a little color, add some bronzer to your routine instead of tanning which can cause damage to your efforts to look cute in front of your ex, crush or boyfriend.  Body: Get smooth and soft legs by using a men's razor instead of a women's razor. Use a body scrub that prevents break outs or that has exfoliates in it. Your ex, boyfriend or crush will think you look cute if you do this, for sure!  

dress to impress.  wear you hair down or up in a simple way.  apply make up to always look natural.  smell nice.  maintain the beauty “extras.” this means put in an effort to always look your best. 

 These things have to be little things that won't make him too mad. They just have to be things that will irk him a little bit. Here are some examples:   Poking him on the arm. Coming up next to him and saying something weird like, "Flying Monkeys are inside of you, that's why you feel tingly!" then giggling, apologizing quickly, and running away. Taking his binder/pen etc. and giving it back almost immediately. Raising up a 20 dollar bill and tempting him to take the money but then not giving it to him. Throwing a crumpled piece of paper at him.; , For example, if the guy likes the band "Front Minor," you can say "Front Minor is stupid." in a teasing tone It catches his attention right away.   Find out what he likes first, like what he likes in general or what he likes to do, or his favorite bands etc.  This way, you can get on his nerves a little bit more. For example, if you are in class working on a project, start pushing him out of the group and pretend you're doing all the work to get him angry. IF you do something like this, stop after a while, smile, laugh a bit if you want to and say "Sorry about that."  , You can use the classic "Johnny and Sarah, sitting in a tree, K-I-S-S-I-N-G!" song, but don't get out of hand with it. Don't be racist either. Don't joke about him being gay and liking another guy, or anything as serious as that.  Example: find out his middle name and let him find out yours, so you can call him by his middle name and joke around about it.  Get cute little nicknames for each other but NOT couple nicknames like "hunnyboo". That's going a little too far.  

do little things to annoy him.  tell the guy all about how you feel about what he likes.  spend some time with him.  tease him about liking someone that you know he doesn't like.  tease him in a way he can tease you back. 

 If your too shy to talk to him at first, make or develop a friendship with someone close to him, and hang around with them (this is also a great opportunity to make new friends). You can start by laughing at his jokes, then answering questions he asked to the group, and so on and so forth, until you are ready to speak to him.When you are feeling that you two are getting close tell him that you like a boy but you don't know how to tell him and when he asks who is it don't tell him and see what he does or says after that.; , MSN is good too. You could share more things and become closer to them, without having to talk TOO much in person. But remember, you do need to talk to them! Don't talk to him every night though, then he will think you are desperate.  Flirt a little. Laugh at his jokes, but not too much, just giggles, act happy to see him, and twirl you hair. Try to play sports; guys love girls who like sports. And try to find out his interests and try them, but don't change yourself too much.  You could use this as a guideline for how long you wait before you tell him. Wait until something similar to that subject happens.  If he asks who you like, just say no one, don't make anyone up. If he says no one too, it's a good sign. If he likes another girl, use it to your advantage. What is it about her he likes? Is she well liked? If she is, why? Is she funny? Sweet? If it's because she's pretty, think about why she's pretty. Is it her long hair? Big eyes? Don't copy her completely, but try to accentuate whatever you have in common. Try out some of her interests but if you try all of them he might notice and think you are weird.  There's a little something called self-fulfilling prophecy, which means that if you think it's going to go terribly, it will lead to subconscious mannerisms that will make it go terribly. Believe it will go well, and it most likely will.  Ask him who he likes (again), or say 'Do you still like her?' They might say 'Why' or 'Yeah/No, because .... What about you?' Then is the time to laugh, or type (I'd rather do it through cyber) 'Ha,' then say/type/text, 'I'm kind of starting to like you.' But only if it seems like he is ready. 

become friends with him.  talk to him on facebook or other social networking sites.  drop subtle hints.  mention casually how you hate being single, and see how he reacts (if he agrees).  ask him who he likes.  build up your confidence.  come straight out with it.  see how it goes from there.  

 If the pros over-do the cons, it means you can deal with the bad things because the good things matter the most. While making the list, don't be too harsh on the cons! Try to keep away from annoying habits, like "nibbles on his nails too much".; , If he compliments you, or tries to make you smile when you're sad, he's a keeper. But if he insults you and yells at you, throw that sucker away.  You can never have chemistry with someone who you can't even express yourself with!  , Signs of yelling, continuous teasing, and criticizing you means he's not patient at all. No, it means that he doesn't like you or respect you in any way.  Or does he hide you like you don't exist? If you said yes to the first one, he's capable of being a good boyfriend. When he shows you off to his friends, it's a symbol of pride to him that he's with the most amazing girl in the world. If not, he's just trying to not seem so "sprung"!  , Don't get me wrong: he does like you, but he doesn't like you enough to be open & honest with you, which is a key in relationships.  If this guy changes his feelings with you because you aren't wearing any makeup, he's not the one for you. A good boyfriend will like you for who you are, whether you look a model or have sack over your head.  If he does, it means that he likes the thought of a hot hook-up more than a stable relationship. Don't rush to do things you don't want to do, you're only a teenager!  , It's a pretty big key to relationships. Relationships require good work and people change constantly to make each other happy. If he's not willing to do that for you, it means he doesn't care very much, and you need someone that cares.  

make a list of pros and cons about him.  this is probably the biggest one of all: does he make you feel good about yourself?,  if you can be yourself around him and feel comfortable with being yourself, then you know you can start a real relationship.  you know he's right if he's patient with you.  does he try to show you off to all his friends?,  if he lies to you or doesn't tell you something just to make you happy, he isn't stable enough.  does he care about your appearance too much?,  does he pressure you into doing stuff you don't want to?,  is he willing to make changes for you? 

 Timing is everything, as the old saying goes. "Make time for a casual exchange when both of you aren't preoccupied with something else."   Try to get him alone. If he's surrounded by friends, he might respond based on their presence, and not based on how he actually feels. Don't worry if you can't catch him alone, though — just quietly ask if he has a minute to chat privately. Don't rush. You don't want to be nervous or hurried. Asking him as you're trying to sprint to class, or he's on his way to an appointment, is a recipe for disaster. Instead, choose a time when you have some flexibility, like after school or at lunch. Pay attention to his mood. If he seems particularly grumpy or quiet, it might be best to wait for another chance.; , This may feel tough, but it can be surprisingly simple. An open-ended question (that does not have a "yes/no" answer) is a safe place to start.   Ask about his upcoming plans. ("What are you doing this weekend? I wanted to....") Ask his thoughts on a common experience (teacher, friend, class, etc.). ("Did you see...? I thought that was...! What did you think?")  , Open, attentive positioning will get your point across — perhaps without even saying it.    Lock eyes. Eye contact will tell him that you are listening to him and you care. Shying away from eye contact shows you're nervous and less approachable. Posture. Make sure your body is open and pointed toward him. Tilt your hips toward him (if standing) and make sure your arms aren't crossed.  Touch. Make excuses to touch him in appropriate, light ways. The bond of human touch subconsciously puts humans more at ease. Lightly lay your hand on his forearm as you're talking, or gently bump into his side if you're walking together. Mirror his positioning. Getting into a physical groove with him will tell him you are similar. Humans are programmed to seek out those like us.  Always, always, always smile. Not only will it make him happier to be around you, it'll up your mood, too!  , When the big reveal comes, remember to relax! After all, he's just one person, like you. Here's how to get through it with grace:   A non-threatening idea is to pad it with another statement:  "Sarah was asking who I thought would go to State this year. I told her I liked you and thought you'd make it." "You failed the history exam? Oh, that sucks! I didn't do too great, either. But don't worry, I still really like you."   If you're good friends, a more straight-forward approach is fine:  "We have tons of fun together. I like you so much." You may want to ask it back: "I think I'm starting to like you. Do you feel the same?"    , Be prepared for what he says, good or bad. If he's a decent person, he won't want to hurt your feelings.   If he doesn't like you back, that's fine. You were brave for trying! Be proud of yourself. To avoid feeling awkward, leave on a happy note:  "I understand. I still want to be friends, though. You're so funny!" "I have to get home; I just wanted to let you know. I'll see you in gym! I'll kick your butt in basketball tomorrow!"   If he doesn't give you a definite response, revisit the conversation at a later date. He may need time to figure out how he feels. Give the subject space and revisit it in a few days. If he says he likes you back, stay cool. This is not the time to attack him with your kisses. Smile, continue the conversation, and find a time you two are free to spend together.  

pick the right moment.  start a conversation.  monitor your body language.  smile.  tell him.  handle the response. 

 It sounds hard, but if you just act and do things the way you normally do when you're around him, he won't see any reason to act differently. The main thing here is to put him at ease.; , Now that he knows that you like him, odds are he thinks that's pretty cool. At the very least he's got some extra confidence in himself and he has you to thank, so you've got a great chance of becoming good friends with him, and more than friends if you play your cards right. So get him to talk about himself; find things that the two of you can both talk about. It can be anything: recent movies, his and your hobbies, teachers and classes, music, etc.  It puts him at ease and lets him know you enjoy being around him. If you don't think you have a good looking smile, practice making faces in the mirror (embarrassing, yes, but it really works) until you're confident in all your expressions. Once you've got the muscle sequences down, you're all set.  A really good one is to, while you're talking, look into his eyes for a second, then look away and smile, and blush if you can manage it. Maybe twirl or fix your hair with one hand. He already knows you like him anyway, so what is there to lose!  , A reassuring tap, a playful punch, anything like that will definitely make him feel more masculine, and guys generally like that.  Also, things like playing with your hair or licking your lips a bit are great ways to flirt. But don't do things like that too often; he might think you are bored, or need Chapstick or something like that.  Also, make sure you're talking to your friends as well as him or he might think you're not very social. Don't forget, he might be as nervous as you are.  Be you. Don't change your real self just because you are with the cutest guy in living history!  

act normal.  find things you have in common.  always, always smile.  employ a few subtle tricks to attract him, without going too far and creeping him out.  if you really want to flirt, find excuses to touch him, especially his upper arms.  if he is with his friends, let him have space.  don't freak out; just stay calm! 

 You already have his number, so congratulations! The hard part is over. Keep the first message simple yet intriguing.   Ask about him. People like others who are interested in them. Ask how his day went, if he's seen the latest episode of a show you both watch, if he's finished the homework for French — whatever you know he's thought about. If you know what you have in common, talk about it! Do you both play sports or an instrument? Hang in a mutual circle of friends? This way you'll have something to respond with, sustaining the conversation. Use emoticons. With electronic messages, it's hard to be sure of a person's intentions. Emoticons will soften whatever it is you choose to say. A smile signals that you mean your words in a positive way, while a wink is a sure sign that you're flirting.  Responding within seconds to all of his texts may seem like you're waiting around to talk to him. While this is fine occasionally, it's best to busy yourself with other things, too. Go about your day as normal.   Playing hard to get is not the idea here. Don't leave him hanging — just treat his texts as you would any other friend of yours.  After the conversation has started, find a moment where it feels natural.   "You talked to David? Did he tell you I like you? 'Cuz it's true. :)" "Haha! =] I really like you. Are you going to the game on Friday with anyone?"  , Whatever his response, don't jump to conclusions. Breathe first and then respond.   If he's hesitant, don't push. He may need a moment to think. Continue the conversation — don't drop it suddenly. If a few days pass and he makes no gesture of explanation, revisit it in a similar manner. If he says no, try to lighten the mood. He's probably feeling awkward, too.  "Oh, that's cool. I just wanted to make sure you knew. But you are so not borrowing my highlighter anymore! :)" "I get it. I'm super busy, too — I'm just starting !"   If he says yes, find a time to hang out. Don't drive over to his house or start naming your children. Just make plans to see each other over the weekend.  

open the conversation.  get the timing right.  reveal your feelings.  answer back. 

 Intensity may scare him off. Keep your note light-hearted and playful:   Hi! :) I couldn't resist dropping you a note. Uh oh...I think Mrs. Umbridge is watching me! --All clear for now. Are you going to Sarah's party on Saturday? I like you -- wanna go together? :)"  , You can either put it in his locker (don't forget your name!), slip it in his book, or hand it to him directly. A quick, "I think you dropped this," will surely raise his eyebrow.  Depending on his response, you will need to act a certain way.   If he responds positively, talk to him in person. You've got nothing to lose! If he responds negatively, stay friendly. When you see him, smile. Continue as normal. Do not go out of your way to pursue him any further. The ball is in his court now. If he doesn't respond, you may need to talk to him in person. If you didn't hand deliver the note, it's possible he didn't get it. Wait a few days. If he still hasn't responded, visit the conversation in person. He may just need time to think.  

be fun.  give it to him discreetly.  respond. 

 Make sure to say hi when you first see your crush everyday. If you pass them in the hall, wave and smile. If you see them in class, you can say, “Good morning! How’s it going?” This will help your crush notice and remember you., Find an excuse to be near them during the day. If you don’t have assigned seats, you can take the seat next to them in class, or you can eat near them at lunch time.  If you want, you can come up to them and say, “Hey, is this seat taken?” If you’re feeling shy about approaching them, ask your friends if they would help you out. One of your friends can take a seat close to your crush, and you can sit next to your friend.  A good way to break the ice is to ask your crush questions. Perhaps you need help with a math question or maybe you didn’t catch the homework. Always thank them when they give you the answer.For example, you can say, “Hey, I forgot my book today. Can I look onto yours?” If your teacher says you need to work with a partner, you can ask your crush, “Do you want to work together on this?” Remember to smile as you say it!  , Once you have started talking, you can casually ask about their interests, hobbies, or plans. Try to find out what they’re interested in, and start talking to them about it.You can start the conversation by saying something about your own interests. For example, you can say, “Do you listen to this band? I have had their new song stuck in my head all day.” If they haven’t heard of the band, you might ask, “So what kind of music do you like?”  , Look for ways to connect over common interests, hobbies, or practices. If you know they enjoy something, you can start a conversation about it, or you can invite them to do the activity with you.  Look at their clothes, bags, and other belongings for clues about what they enjoy. For example, you can say, “I noticed the pins on your bag. Do you like anime too?”  

say hello to them.  sit next to them at lunch or in class.  ask them a question about your schoolwork.  talk about your hobbies.  find things you have in common. 

 Every now and then, give your crush a sincere compliment. Tell them something you like about them. Maybe they’re really funny or smart. Perhaps they have a cool talent or skill.For example, you can say, “You’re an amazing skateboarder. How did you learn all of those tricks?” Don’t shower them with compliments, or they may feel uncomfortable.  Laughing shows that you are interested in what they are saying. When your crush says something funny, laugh or giggle gently. Don’t overdo it, though, or it may seem insincere., Your crush may be just as nervous about talking to you as you may be talking to them. To help them out, check your body language. Smile when you catch them looking at you. Instead of crossing your arms, try twirling your hair.When your crush walks towards you, don’t look away. Instead, make eye contact. Wave if you want to catch their eye.  

compliment them.  laugh at their jokes.  make yourself approachable. 

 You might invite your crush over to your house, mall, or park to hang out together. Since this is not a date, there is nothing to lose. You and your crush can get to know each other even better!  If you’re still uncertain about inviting your date over to just hang out, you can ask them to come over to help you study. This works well if there is an upcoming test that you both need to prepare for.  If you’re nervous about hanging out with your crush one-on-one, you can bring them on a group outing instead. This will let you hang out with them without any of the pressure.For example, you can say, “A bunch of us are going to go to the beach this weekend. Do you want to come?”  , A great way to continue your flirting when school’s out is to get their phone number. Send them a text afterwards to confirm that you got the right number. This will help start a new conversation!  If you want, you can simply say, “Hey, can I have your phone number?” If you’re nervous about asking, you can ask instead, “Can I get your phone number in case I have any questions about our homework?” Never send naked images of yourself to someone. These can be spread or posted online. They can also get you both in trouble with the law or school., Friend them on Facebook, or get their SnapChat screen name. You can like their statuses or post a funny article onto their wall. Who knows? Maybe they’ll even comment on your posts.  Do not stalk someone on social media. Do not like or comment on their posts daily, or the other person may start to feel uncomfortable with the attention. Use these sites responsibly.  

invite them to hang out.  ask them to join a group activity.  get their phone number.  add them on social media. 

 Before you confess, try to see if there are any hints that your crush might also like you. Ask your friends to see if they're interested, or pay attention to how they treat you. Ask yourself:Does your crush initiate conversations sometimes or do you always start them? How often does your crush text, Snap, or message you? Does your crush smile when they see you? Does your crush ever make excuses to touch you? Do they remember things that you said in the past?  , When you’re ready, tell your crush that you think of them as more than just a friend. You can tell your crush in person, text them, give them a card, or send them a message over social media.You might say something like, “Hey, I really like you a lot, as more than a friend. I was wondering, do you like me too?” You should always tell your crush yourself. Don’t ask a friend to tell them this for you.  If your crush likes you back, congratulations! Now you just need to ask them on a date. If you are both allowed to date, ask them if they would like to see a movie, go to the mall, or attend a school dance together.You can say, “Would you like to go out with me on a date?” You can also say something like, “Do you want to see a movie this weekend with me?” Ask your parents first. Your parents may have rules about when you are allowed to date., Sometimes, your crush may not like you back. That’s OK! It may hurt at first, but over time, it will get better. Distract yourself by getting involved in activities where you will not see your crush.You might feel as though there is something wrong with you, but the truth is, sometimes people just don’t feel the same way about each other. This will pass. Be sure to talk to your friends about it. They can help support you during this time.  

look for hints that they like you back.  tell them that you like them.  ask them out on a date.  avoid blaming yourself if you’re rejected. 

 Say hi, and do a cute smile. If he responds, well done! Next thing; ask him how he is! If he returns with a question then you're onto a winner!; , He will soon begin to notice you and realise how nice you are!  , An example conversation you might have would be is 'do you have any siblings at the school?' or 'so what lesson have you got next; do you like it?' Find out what his interests are, or what he thinks of a new song that's been released.  Mention things he might be interested in; make him laugh! There is nothing better than making guys laugh. Once they know you have a sense of humor he should soon look forward to your lessons together because you can have 'a bit of a laugh'.  Remember, You just have to be yourself! Compliment him on his new trainers; maybe ask if he's had a haircut because his new haircut is looking pretty good! Touch his arm when you're talking slightly. Or perhaps you could tease him a bit; but, play nice!!!  , Make it cool and casual. Say something like, 'is it cool if we swap numbers? I need someone to contact when I get stuck on homework!' You could also just ask it on Facebook just saying 'can I have your phone number?' I'm sure he'll say yes!  , Now this doesn't have to be a date if you don't want it to be! Invite all your friends out and ask him if he wanted to come and bring some of his mates, because it would be a good laugh!  

if you don't really know him that well, the start is at the beginning!,  get used to seeing him around school, and start saying " hello" as you walk past or flash a cheeky grin.  once you're more comfortable with talking to this lad, start asking more in-depth and personal questions.  find out what makes him tick.  start injecting a bit of flirtiness into your conversations.  ask for his phone number if he doesn't ask already, he might just be too shy!,  ask him out. 

 He will hopefully notice you and start wondering why you do that. ; ,, He should start returning that soon after.   ,, If he catches you, smile cutely and look away not as fast. Do this around his friends and hope they notice and pick up the situation, and maybe hint about you liking him.   , If you sit with friends in that particular space and eat or relax it won't look as obvious.   , Eventually you can move onto other topics. Make sarcastic comments and jokes where appropriate.    , If it wasn't very funny, put your hand on his and say sarcastically, "Hilarious" while rolling your eyes.   , If you think he may be looking at you, abruptly turn your head to something away from him, then look back at him quickly. If he is watching you, he should look at whatever 'distracted' you subconsciously.   ,, If his friends tease him when you are around, then there is a very good chance he likes you back.   , Boys are generally the ones expected to ask out girls, so he may feel flattered and relieved and then accept, or he may decline. If he does decline, nod and smile and say, "That's okay, I'll ask somebody else if they want to come" then walk away calmly. Do NOT hold this against him, but instead continue to be nice to him. Show him that you don't mind the rejection, even if you do. Do not shy away from him, but continue to pursue him subtly.   , Speak your mind on topics that come up during conversation with him. Don't hold back on saying what you think is right and just, but don't overdo it and accidentally offend him.   , If you are athletic, get into a sport he is involved with. If you are smart, join a debating team or do something that he is involved with academically. But don't change the person you are just to get him to notice you. If he doesn't notice you after a few major hints, like actually asking him out, or if he acts snobbish around you, forget him, he just isn't worth your time.   , Smiling means confidence, and boys like girls with self-esteem, as it makes talking less awkward and more communicative.   , Add to this by saying thanks- but don't try to deny what he says, it will lower his self-esteem and make things awkward between you. Graciously accept the comment and perhaps make one of your own.   , Don't push too hard for information though- you don't want to come off as a stalker.   , If he walks up to you, don't be afraid to talk. Ask him how his day has been and what class he has next. Hopefully he will return this and you will move onto another topic.   ,, Everybody tells you to do this, but reality is, not everybody does. If you lie about who you are and what you do and don't like, then chances are you have ruined the relationship before it has begun. He will like you for that 'person' you say you are, instead of who you really are. When he finds out, things WILL get awkward, so it's best to be honest from the start. And then, if it turns out he doesn't like you, then he just isn't worth it.   

walk past him a few times during the day, without 'noticing' him.  smile at him once in a while, like when you walk past him or see him looking at you.   ,  say "hi" to him in the mornings.  'accidentally' walk into him or cross his path and nearly hit him, after pretending to be distracted by something else.   ,  look at him and then away quickly.  spend time where he does, but not obsessively.  strike up a conversation with him about something like how much homework he is receiving.  flirt a little with him, like, if he told you a funny joke, giggle cutely.  try the distracted method.  be a little mysterious- don't blab everything about yourself to him in the first few conversations.   ,  if he teases you, he may like you back.  if you think he does like you back, ask him out to a movie or lunch.  be different.  use the natural assets you have and flatter them by wearing clothes or styling your hair in a way that suits you.  laugh and smile a lot when he is near or if you are talking to him.  if he compliments you and you really like him, chances are you are going to blush and smile shyly.  ask his friends about him openly- it will show them that you like him, and they will probably blab to him about it later.  be friendly and open to him.  do something 'absentmindedly' around him- like, if you are reading, twirl your hair or drum your fingers lightly on your seat or play with your necklace/earrings.   ,  be yourself. 

 This might give him the initiative to talk to you first, so it's easier!; , You may want to wait a day or two after smiling at him before because he might not be interested and think you're too pushy. , Try not to be negative when talking and try to avoid yes or no questions.  and act like you enjoy talking to him.  There is nothing worse than trying to be someone you're not at all. , The less, the better. And please, don't be that girl who's eye make-up makes her look like a raccoon. You may think a lot of make-up is attractive, but it's NOT.  Don't look sloppy. Make sure your outfit looks put together and matches! Guys notice how a girl dresses and like presentable looking girls. Dress in your comfort zone so you appear relaxed. How otherwise will people relax around you?  , He will think you're not interested in him or you like them and not him.  Don't be a drag, get him to want you. Remember, you are amazing as you are, so be happy and fun!  , There are TONS of others guys in the world- ones that will like you!  

before starting a conversation with him, smile when he looks at you whenever you happen to lock eyes.  if he doesn't start a conversation with you after smiling, you start the talking.  just greet him and introduce yourself, but remember to be enthusiastic and very friendly towards him.  ,  ask about classes you both share or your opinion on teachers when confronting him.  remember to smile!,  just be yourself!,  act as if he is just one of your regular friends that you know.  ,  don't put on tons of make-up to try to impress him.  look presentable!,  don't talk about other guys when talking.  have fun!,  if you find out he's not interested in you, don't sweat it. 

 It can be scary to start up a conversation with your crush. It may feel silly to you, but may be people find rehearsing what to say ahead of time can help. If you're unsure how to approach your crush, stand in front of the mirror in your home and practice.Try to think of ways to start a conversation. Where do you normally see this person? If you have class together, you can practice asking him about a homework assignment or making a comment on the latest test. You don't have to plan what you'll say word-for-word. In fact, rehearsing too much may make your conversation sound strained. Instead, have a general idea of what you want to talk about.; , Look for observations or comments you can make to get the conversation started. There are a variety of ways to begin a conversation. Once you're talking, you can proceed to keep things flowing, allowing you to get to know your crush.Try starting with a compliment. For example, say something like, "Hey, I love your sweater." You can also make an observation. For example, "What did you think of that quiz yesterday? I thought it was really tough." You can ask a question. For example, "Do you know when that report is due? I forgot to write it down." Try to approach him in comfortable situations. If he's not distracted, it will be easier to get his attention.  Once you start talking, ask some questions. It can be difficult to establish a smooth flow of conversation at first. One helpful tip to remember is that people generally enjoy talking about themselves. If you want your crush to keep talking, ask him questions. This can also help you get to know him better.Ask him about things you have in common, at first. For example, "What do you think of this class?" and, "Do you think you'll go to the football games this season?" Once you're in a conversation, try to ask more broad questions that relate to the topic at hand. If you end up discussing a movie you watched in class, say something like, "What kind of movies do you like in general?"  , During the initial conversation, you don't want to overdo it. Pay attention to how the guy is reacting. Wrap up the conversation when it seems to have reached its natural end.After you exhausted a certain topic, you both may get the sense there's little left to discuss. The guy may start giving shorter answers. This isn't necessarily a sign the guy is not engaged. Conversations just have a natural beginning and end. Rather than trying to force a conversation to go on longer than it has to, try to wrap it up. Look for an organic way to exit the conversation. For example, say something like, "Well, I should head to my next class. I'll see you later."  , You want to be yourself around your crush, so don't center all the conversations around him and his interests — let him get to know you, too. Once you're talking regularly, try to look for shared interests to discuss. This way, you'll get to know each other better and bond through common traits.For example, say you find out you both like Dancing With The Stars. Try asking him about the latest episodes after they air. For example, "Did you see Dancing With The Stars last night? It was so crazy." From there, you can look for broader topics of shared interests to discuss. For example, "Do you like dancing? I just love dancing and musicals."  , If a conversation is slowing down, ask a question. Asking someone about themselves will usually keep a conversation interesting. This will also give you a sense of whether you want to eventually ask your crush out. If you have a lot of shared interests and opinions, you're more likely to be compatible. You can ask questions like:"What's your favorite movie?" "Do you have any hobbies?" "What's your favorite subjects in school?" "What's the coolest place you've ever visited?" "Who's your favorite television character?"  , When you really like someone, it can be very tempting to try and be the type of person you think they would be interested in dating. For instance, if the guy is really sporty but you could care less about sports, you might be tempted to pretend you're also a big fan. Avoid this. Don't deny your own interests, hobbies, and friends out of fear of judgement or rejection. You can be polite about it ("Oh, I'm not really into football."), and use it as an opportunity to help him learn a little about you ("I actually really love going to see live music.").It can be hard to keep this in mind when you are crushing hard, but remember that someone who doesn't like you for who you really are ultimately isn't a good match for you.  If you get his number, texting can be a great form of communication that can help you get to know him better. Try to text him once in awhile and see how he responds. This can help you see if he likes you as well. A guy who texts back eagerly is more likely to be interested.Be yourself when you text. If he asks you questions, give honest answers. Use your own unique voice and sense of humor. Throw in an occasional emoji. Don't overdo it, but a few smiley faces now and then can come off as flirty. Allow him to initiate texting on occasion. You don't want to overwhelm him.  As you're getting to know a guy, try to do some light flirting. This will convey your interest and allow you to get a sense of whether a guy likes you. If he flirts back, it's likely he's interested.Smile. Smiling is contagious. Keeping eye-contact while smiling is key. This keeps the tension in the air flirty and fun. A smile to a guy gives him motivation to pursue you. Give him a brief smile and then look away. Make eye contact. This will convey interest. Try to introduce gentle touch. Lightly brush his arm when you're talking to him, for example.  Some topics can tank a conversation, so they should be avoided. If you're trying to get to know a potential romantic interest, stay away from topics that may make him uncomfortable.Avoid putting yourself down. You want to show that you like yourself and you're not insecure. Never say anything negative about his friends or family.  Before you ask someone out, it's a good idea to see if they're interested as well. If the guy doesn't seem at all invested, it may be a good idea to stick to being friends.A guy who's interested will often show this in his body language. He will lean towards you when he talks, make eye contact, and smile frequently. People often subtly mirror one another's body language when they're interested in someone. A guy may, for example, cross his legs when you do. If a guy makes excuses to touch you, this is a sign of attraction. He may brush your arm, give you a hug, or try to touch you in other ways. It may also help to notice if he acts different around you then he does other people. This may suggest he likes you, and may even go against the normal signs. For instance, if he is usually very flirty with just about everyone but is more quiet and shy around you, this may actually be because he is nervous around you. Keep in mind that none of these are definite signs he is interested.  Sometimes, it's best just to be straightforward. It can be scary to confess your feelings; however, if you think the guy is interested, it's easier to just come out and say so instead of beating around the bush.Keep it simple. Say something like, "So, I really like you a lot. I was wondering if you feel the same way." Take a few deep breaths before going into the conversation. This will help you stay calm.  If it goes well, ask the guy out on a date. Say something like, "Do you want to see a movie tonight?" or, "Do you want to go to the school dance with me?" It can be hard to make the first move, but if your feelings are shared that's somewhat easier., You can never be 100% sure if someone is interested in you. Even if you think you've read the signs correctly, there's always a chance a guy will not return your affections. If this is the case, try to accept this and move on.If the guy turns you down, don't question him or get angry. Say something like, "Oh ok. I'm disappointed, but I understand." Then you can excuse yourself and walk away. Seek out support from friends and family members. Find someone to vent your disappointment towards. Do something nice for yourself in the wake of disappointment. Buy yourself a new item of clothing or other treat. Take a day off to watch a movie with a friend.  

rehearse what to say if you're nervous.  find a conversation starter.  ask questions.  maintain the conversation for an appropriate amount of time.  discuss shared interests.  get to know him by asking questions.  be yourself.  text him regularly.  try to flirt some.  avoid certain topics.  look for signs of attraction.  be straightforward.  ask them on a date.  cope with rejection. 

 Ask people if it looks good on you to boost your ego. Make sure your hair looks good as well. Feeling good about your appearance will give you confidence.; , That's the first thing you have to do. Breathe deeply, talking to him is no big deal. You both attend the same school, or wherever, and assuming it, you can talk to him if you want to. Make sure that you and your crush are both at a relaxed social occasion. This could be a party, a sports event or the mall. This lends a feeling of casualness to your interaction.  If he is in the middle of a conversation with other friends, wait for him to split off on his own or wait to make eye contact with the group and say hello to everyone at once.  When you get your crush alone, attempt to sound as casual as you can. Casual comes off as confident and confidence can be faked. Even if you don't feel confident, act like it. If you don't know him yet, a good way to start a conversation is paying a compliment on his shirt, and then when you see him again ask his name and introduce yourself. But if you both already met each other, just start a conversation anyway.  When he answers, make sure you seem interested and react truthfully.  Mention a similar story of your own or comment on what he just said. During this time use your instincts to feel out if your crush is interested in you, not necessarily if they like you as much as you like them. Pay attention to how engaged they are and how they try to steer the conversation.  Ask about his favorite movies, what he likes doing. Show you're interested.  This way he will enjoy being with you even more.  Once you have reasonably assessed that your crush likes you, bring up an event that relates to what you have been talking about, such as a play, movie or sports event. Mention that you will be attending. Tell your crush that you would love it if they would go with you. This makes it less of a question and more of an invitation to something you are already planning on attending.   If you want to ask him out, you don't need to be nervous. A girl can do it. Just don't make it sound so big like a date, make it sound like something two friends do together. For example, you can go up to him and say 'hey, there's this really cool movie going on in the theater, wanna come with me?". Act naturally and friendly. If your crush says yes, get his number and tell him you will call him about the details soon. This doesn't have to be the end of the conversation, but your main goal has been accomplished. Congrats! If he says no, figure out why. Possibly he is just busy that day or perhaps he is not interested in a date with you. Use your instincts to feel it out. If you are unsure, its best to leave it at "Well, if you ever want to go to (a movie, sports event), let me know, I would love to go with you." Then the ball is in his court. If you are planning to ask him on a date, then bring up something like "Hey would you like to catch a movie this Friday night?" Be confident and comfortable. Do not be offended if he rejects your invite. Just go "Ok." Then change the subject. If you are rejected, don't take it personally. It is alright. There are always more fish in the sea.  

make sure you are dressed in an outfit you find comfortable and attractive.  relax.  walk up to your crush confidently and at a properly timed moment.  start a conversation.  ask your crush a question about something that you know he recently did, such as star in a play or take a trip.  continue the conversation normally, as if you are just talking to a friend.  try to find common interests.  smile and make eye contact.  make him ask you out. 

 Often we are afraid to talk to someone new or someone we like out of fear of being of looking bad or saying the wrong thing. Your nerves may get the best of you and you may end up with your heart pounding in your chest as you try to talk to the guy. Your nerves always make it more difficult for you to stay calm and focus on generating good conversation with him. You can try to adjust this by focusing on keeping your breathing steady and relaxed, even if you are nervous.You may take a few deep breaths before you approach the guy. Do this by inhaling deeply, filling your stomach with air. Let your stomach puff out as you inhale, expanding with air. Try to inhale for a count of three. Then, exhale slowly for a count of three, letting the air release from your stomach. Your stomach should contract and pull in towards your spine. You can also close your eyes and repeat a mantra as you do deep breathing. You may repeat silently to yourself, “I am calm” or “I can do this”. Repeating a mantra can help you stay focused and motivated to talk to the guy.; , You may also stay calm by taking time with your appearance so you appear calm once you are standing in front of him. You may choose an outfit that makes you feel confident and poised, such as your favorite shirt and jeans or your favorite piece of jewellery.You may also decide to do your hair that day or put on some makeup so you can appear confident as you speak to him. Keep in mind the best form of confidence often comes from within, so you should not stress too much about getting your appearance just right. Instead, use your appearance as a way to project confidence and a healthy sense of self.  Another way you can present yourself with confidence is to have open, positive body language when you are talking with the guy. Positive body language can show him that you are interested and engaged in the conversation. It can also encourage him to keep talking to you and connect.Keep your arms relaxed and at your sides, with your body positioned towards him. Maintain eye contact as you speak to him and nod when he speaks to show you are engaged in what he is saying. You should also smile and laugh when appropriate to communicate positivity and engagement. You may also lean slightly towards him when he speaks. Note if he is responding to your positive body language with his own positive body language. If he is mirroring your body language and displaying engagement with you as you speak, this could be a good sign.  

keep your breathing steady and relaxed.  present yourself with confidence.  display open, positive body language. 

 That's what the Boy Scouts say. But we're going to use that to make a Boy Scout blush.   Take a look at yourself in the mirror, then close your eyes. Think about something or somebody you think is super sexy. Think about that with your eyes closed, until you are feeling undeniably sexy. Now open your eyes, and take a look. That's a look you want to recreate! Listen to voices, and see how guys respond. Sexy is as much in the tone as it is in the words you use. Low and throaty is always a safe bet, but if your voice is not ready for that, soft and sweet works well too.; , Start with saying phrases such as "I must really like you." This turns guys on without sounding too serious, too soon.  Once you know what your sexy look is, practice it on yourself, until you can get that "look" whenever you want. Try variations on it:   Look directly ahead with a no-nonsense "yes, you" gaze. Bend your head down, and look up with your eyes. It's sort of the opposite of the direct gaze, but still very sexy to guys. As you're waking away from him, turn your head and eyes towards him, and smile. If that doesn't make his knees quiver, nothing will!  , Nothing is sexier than telling somebody how much you appreciate things about them, especially the little things.   When you're talking to him, focus on him, no matter who else is around—even if the hottest guy around walks into the room. Focusing on him alone is most definitely sexy. Think about it: if Selena Gomez walked into the room while he's talking to you, and his gaze never wandered from you for an instant, how would you feel?  , Being a little bit aloof means that you're not going to be taken for granted. Look like you don't really care if he responds or not, and enjoy yourself!  , If the goal is to make him think sexy thoughts about you, then there's no better place to start than his own imagination. Try using subtle cues when talking. It might be a sexy smile, or touching your lips while listening to him, or even saying something that is borderline naughty, like "It is so hot today, I could just toss off all my clothes and dance naked in the fountain!"  , Don't just use "friend" touches. Part of talking sexy is being sexy. When you're saying something flirty, run a finger down his forearm towards his hand. He will like that.  Learn how to use double entendres. Those are words or phrases open to two interpretations, one of which is usually risqué or indecent.  

be prepared.  don't say, "i love you" right away.  practice your "look.",  appreciate him, and let him know.  don't overdo it.  use his imagination.  touch him while talking.  use words well. 

 Though you may continue to be nervous whenever you talk to the guy, continuing to engage him in conversation every time you see each other will help you continue to connect. It will also help you to get more comfortable talking to him and allow you both to get to know each other on a deeper level.Even a casual conversation on a consistent basis can help you strengthen your relationship with him. Over time, and with enough conversations, you both may be comfortable enough with each other to be friends or perhaps something more romantic.  In our current digital world, connecting through social media is a social norm and a good option if you want to stay in contact with the guy. After your initial conversation with him, you may friend him on Facebook or add him on Instagram or Snapchat. Making connections through social media will signal to him that you want to continue to get to know each other, in person and online.  Once you feel comfortable chatting with the guy, you may want to shift the relationship into friendship or something romantic. You may propose a one on one hangout outside of school or work, where you can get to know each other in a casual setting. Though it may seem intimidating to do this, you and the guy have also been getting to know each other through your casual conversations, so your suggestion may not be all that surprising to him.   You may propose a one on one hangout by suggesting that you both go see a movie that features actors you both think are great or like. Or, you may suggest you go for Thai food at a new restaurant that recently opened up, as he has mentioned his love of Thai food in a previous conversation. Use your conversations with the guy to build a rapport and move the conversations to more one on one settings, where you can take your relationship further.  

make an effort to talk to him whenever you see him.  connect with him on social media.  suggest a friendly one on one hangout. 

 Don't worry about saying the best thing. Just say, “Hi,” or if a guy is wearing a nice shirt, compliment him by saying, “I like your shirt.” Ask how his weekend went by saying, “Did you do anything fun this weekend?” Whatever you say, say it with a smile and try to stay calm.You can talk about a class you share. Try saying something like, "How'd you do on the test in math?" If you notice they have a phone case or t-shirt or talk about your favorite band, say, "I really like them too. Did you know they're coming to town next week?"; , Reach out first through social media like Facebook or Twitter. Chatting online can be much easier than in real life, because you can think of what you want to say before you say it without awkward silences. This lets you get to know him better, so it’s easier to talk in person later on.If you're messaging a guy for the first time online, say hi and remind them how they know you. Say something like, "Hi, we have math class together. Have you studied for the test yet?" You can also bring up a common interest by saying something like, "Did I see you at the new comic book movie this weekend?" If you're having a get together or party, inviting the guy online is a great first move. Say something like, "Hey, I'm having people over this weekend for a back to school party, and it would be great, if you could come."  , This is a great way to be more outgoing with guys without having to say a lot. When you ask questions, people feel you’re interested in them and they may be more willing to talk. You can say something as simple as, “How did you like the book we read in English?” This will start a conversation, and you can listen quietly, which may help to calm your nerves.Don’t ask random questions. Going up to someone and saying, “What’s your favorite color?” is not likely to get much of a response. Instead, ask questions about a class or shared interest, so it makes sense for you to ask and for him to answer. Listen when they respond. It’s easier to come up with additional questions or insightful responses, if you’re actually paying attention to what they say to you. Plus, no one likes to feel ignored, especially by someone who asked him a question to begin with., This is generally a less awkward situation because if you feel shy or can’t think of anything else to say, there are other people to fill the silence. Having your friends there for support will also make you feel sure of yourself, so it’s easier to talk openly., This is a great way to meet people and in most cases, there’s a built-in topic of conversation. Sometimes there’s even a specific agenda of subjects that have to be covered. Talking to a guy who you know shares at least one interest, may be easier than just approaching guys if you feel shy around them.If it's your first meeting with the club, say something like, "I just joined this club. How long have you been involved?" You can ask a guy something like, "What go you interested in French club?" If you have an upcoming even with the club, you can ask, "Are you going to the service project this weekend?"  

keep it simple.  break the ice online.  ask questions.  talk to guys in your group of friends.  join a co-ed club. 

 While he or she may seem perfect in your eyes, your crush is just like you. When you have a crush, you may be experiencing the "halo effect," which causes you to see that person as flawless.You need to remember that your crush is a human being who makes mistakes, and is no better or worse than anyone else (including you!).   Try the old public speaking tip: to calm your nerves, imagine the audience is in their underwear. In this case, imagine your crush in a vulnerable or silly position: in their underwear, going to the bathroom, or getting potty-trained as a kid! Try not to think of your crush as "the cutest, smartest, most perfect person," but as "that person I sit next to in biology." Idolizing your crush may prevent you from seeing things that are not so good about them. You might be so caught up in how cute they are, you miss that they're actually not a nice person, and not someone you really want to be with at all.; , If you have third period english with your crush, or you know you're going to see them later, do something that will put you in a confident, positive mindset. It can be as simple as wearing your favorite color or a meaningful piece of jewelry. Maybe just stopping into the bathroom before class to apply some lip gloss, practice your best smile, and make sure nothing is in your teeth will help you feel your best.   Try wearing a necklace or ring that was a gift from someone who loves you. When you're feeling nervous, touch your jewelry to remind yourself that regardless of how things go with your crush, there are plenty of people who think you are amazing. Try striking a power pose before you see them. Stand with your feet shoulder-width apart, hands on your hips, shoulders back. This "wonder woman" pose can actually change your chemistry, making you feel more confident, more likely to take risks, and better able to cope with stress., It can be as simple as saying "Hey" when you pass them in the halls, or asking them what the homework was (you forgot to write it down). These little moments will make talking to your crush seem normal and not so scary., Don't listen to advice that tells you to fake interest in your crush's passions. Instead, find out which passions you both share. This can help humanize your crush and will also give you an easy way to start a conversation with them. If you're obsessed with the same band, and you can speak about them with confidence, it might make it easier to talk to your crush without stuttering, feeling nervous, or not knowing what to say.Use this as a jumping-off point to ask your crush about themselves. People love to talk about themselves and usually think favorably about someone who asks them questions and listens.Ask if your crush has ever seen the band live, or which songs are their favorite. Finding out your common interests can also be a good way to lead up to asking out your crush. If you both love soccer, maybe you crush will want to join you (and your friends, if you're still nervous) at a match over the weekend.  If you have a trusted friend who knows about your crush, she might be able to take some of the pressure off your interactions. Knowing you have someone in your corner can help you feel a little calmer and more confident.   Make sure you trust your friend not to embarrass you. If you have a friend who can sometimes be a little mean or likes to tease you, then telling her about your crush might not be the best idea. She might think it's funny to try and make you blush or even tell your crush how you feel.  Overreacting, panicking, screaming, yelling, or blaming someone else for what happened will become the true embarrassing moment.Whether someone spilled your secret or you accidentally walked into a wall right in front of your crush, keeping a level head will help you get out of the situation with as much grace and dignity as possible.   Taking a deep breath can go a long way in calming you down.Try to inhale for four seconds, then exhale for four seconds. As you are breathing, think about what you will say, instead of blurting out something defensive.  So you just fell in front of the whole school at the pep rally. Get up, dust yourself off,and laugh. Say something like "Wow, that was embarrassing!" and keep going. If you're able to laugh at yourself, you'll take the tension out of the moment, and may even appear to be confident.People are more likely to be forgiving of those who own up to their mistakes. If you acknowledge that you said or did something embarrassing, there might be a little teasing, but people will be more likely to let it go.Even if you can't laugh about it in the moment, try making a joke out of it later. It will show you don't take yourself too seriously.  You may be replaying an embarrassing moment over and over in your mind--the dumb joke you told in front of your crush that fell flat--but chances are you are the only one. People often aren't paying as close attention us as we may imagine and tend to judge others more on overall character than one embarrassing incident.It's likely your crush didn't even notice the thing you're agonizing over. Or, if they did, it probably wasn't as bad as you think. Obsessing over a moment in the past can be destructive and does little other than make you feel sad and angry. If there's something to learn from the incident (like to pause and think before you speak), then take that lesson, and let the rest go. Remember that everyone gets embarrassed. Each and every person, from the president to your crush, has been embarrassed.  Don't run before you can walk--practice making conversation, and even flirting, with others before approaching your crush. This doesn't mean leading someone on, but flirting a little with someone less intimidating than your crush can boost your self-esteem and make flirting less nerve-wracking.Try approaching people you think are cute and asking them for the time. Build up to striking up little conversations with strangers., Stop putting yourself down and start replacing negative thoughts with affirmations. It might be hard to believe, but if you start telling yourself you are a smart, interesting, and kind person who deserves respect, you will start to believe it. Cutting out negative thinking and building yourself up can increase your self-confidence.Remember that everyone struggles with self-esteem issues. Everyone has flaws they are worrying about, everyone feels low or like they're not good enough at some time in their lives. In fact, most people are probably so busy worrying about their own flaws that they don't have time to notice yours. Do things that make you feel good about yourself. Exercise and eat right, wear clothes that make you feel comfortable and confident.  Filling your day with things you find interesting will help you take your mind off your crush and remind you that you are an amazing person with a lot to offer. It can also help expose you to new people with shared interests, and you can get to know them and further develop your social skills.   Doing interesting things will make you more interesting. Don't just talk about how you want to join the track team or learn to be an amazing cook--make it happen!  

remember that your crush is just a normal person.  do something that boosts your confidence.  start with small, easy interactions before trying a full-on conversation with your crush.  figure out what you have in common.  ask a friend to be your backup.  keep your cool.  own it and laugh it off.  don't dwell.  practice your social skills with other people.  be kind to yourself.  get busy pursuing your interests and getting involved in activities. 

; , Remember that he's just a boy, and if he has any courtesy he won't say anything offensive.  This will help to "break in" the relationship. Weeks/months of talking you should eventually feel comfortable to be around him as a friend.  If he already knows you as an acquaintance then you have completed the hardest step, which is the introduction. If not then try to find mutual friends between the two of you, thus giving you ways to introduce yourself.  Don't be a mainstream girl; be yourself! He isn't going to want to date you the 1 out of 100 mainstream girls in his life. He's going to want to date you a unique girl who lets her own personality and style shine.  It might sound crazy, but establishing long eye contact lets him know that you're listening and paying attention to what he is saying/doing.  If you get sudden spurts of energy or nervousness, try pushing your toes together in your shoes (unless your wearing open toed shoes) it should get rid of some of that energy and nervousness. You can also cross your fingers by your side, or simply start twiddling your thumbs by your side.  When the conversation goes silent, change the topic or say you have to go. Do not let the conversation go silent for too long; the conversation could become quite awkward and make you even more nervous around this boy.  Best is to plan when you want to leave so right after he finishes his sentence. This shows that you didn't cut him off in the middle of him talking about something he thinks is important, thus giving him a good impression of your attentiveness.  

make sure the boy isn't interacting with himself or in the middle of a conversation where he'll be mumbling incoherently as he does the former.  before you approach him, take a deep breath and get your nervous feelings out.  begin talking to him to develop a sense of comfort between the two of you.  get the ball rolling.  act normally and talk about your interests!,  try to look him in the eyes.  try to stay calm.  avoid awkward silences.  make a considerate exit. 

 Don't beat yourself up if you think you messed up or said the wrong thing. This will only make you continue to feel shy and lack confidence the next time you try to engage with guys. Instead of thinking things like, “That was stupid,” or “I’m terrible at this,” think of how to do better next time. If you find yourself rehashing the scene over and over, get out of your own head by talking to friends, reading a good book, or doing something else that makes you feel good.Instead of thinking negatively, remind yourself, "It's okay to say the wrong thing," or "I don't need to impress anyone." When you're thinking of how to do better next time, practice what to say in the mirror, or role play with friends.  The guy you are talking to may be just as shy as you are. Part of building confidence is learning to understand that it’s okay to not know everything, to not always say the right thing.   Doing or saying the wrong thing is a great learning experience. Most people learn more from the things they get wrong than those they get right. Look at “failure” when talking to guys as a chance to learn how to do better next time. Remember, it’s okay to say or do the wrong thing. If you accidentally offend a guy you’re talking to, say something like, “I’m so sorry. I get nervous and say the wrong thing sometimes.” Most people will completely understand this. You might have heard the saying, “If you fall off the horse, you should get right back on.” This is very apt, when it comes to building confidence. If you say the wrong thing and the guy doesn’t want to talk to you, that’s okay. Try again some other time., Talk to guys who may need your help. If you notice a guy who’s struggling in math class, offer to help him with his homework. Talking about something you excel at makes you feel more confident, and it takes some of the pressure and stress out of situations where you may feel shy., Repetition is one of the best ways to develop a skill. The more you do it, the easier it is, so one of the best ways to feel less shy is to just keep talking to guys. You’ll soon discover that, even if the guy doesn’t like you or doesn’t want to talk to you, you’re still just fine and there are other guys to chat with., It can be as simple as, “I will talk to one new guy this week” or "I will talk to at least one guy at the party this weekend." If you feel like your shyness is really impacting your personal, educational, or professional goals, you may want to set a more aggressive goal for overcoming your shyness. Consider something like, “I will talk to one or more guys for five minutes every day this week.” Build up this goal from there, until it feels natural to engage in conversations with guys. 

avoid negative thinking.  allow yourself to be imperfect.  emphasize your strengths.  talk to new people often.  set confidence-building goals for yourself. 

 Ask a friend who seems confident around guys for advice. You can also watch how they interact with guys. Then, try to mimic some of their more confident behaviors. Listen to how they talk, watch their body language, and try to act more like them, until you find your own way to show confidence.   Ask your friends to introduce you to guys they know. This will make getting to know them easier because you have a mutual friend and there’s someone else there to talk with. Ask you friends to be your “wingmen.” If you’re talking to a guy and you’re getting nervous, have a friend close by who can step in and help. Have your friends role-play possible conversations with you. It may seem silly, but practicing a conversation can help you feel better about the real thing., You may not want to go straight to a parent or guardian, but if you have an older sibling or cousin who is close to your age, they may be able to help you feel better about the situation, offer pointers, or just share stories of times they were shy. Even if you think your parents won’t help the situation, you’ll be surprised how much great advice they can give.Ask your family member, "I'm having trouble talking to guys. I always feel shy or like I'll say the wrong thing. What can I do?" You can ask something like, "Did you ever have issues talking to guys?"  , There are a variety of organizations like Toastmasters that teach people how to be more confident, and give you the opportunity to practice these skills and get feedback. You can also consider taking public speaking, theatre, or other classes that push you to talk to large groups of people. This can often make it easier to speak confidently one-on-one with guys who make you feel shy., If you’re unable to overcome your shyness on your own, it’s okay to ask a professional for help. Counselors, therapists, and psychologists have years of education, training, and experience, and their job is to help people lead happy, healthy lives.   Shyness can be a sign of a bigger health concern like social anxiety, and counseling is a great way to overcome this. If you’re in school, start by speaking with your guidance counselor. They are a great resource to help you find someone to talk to. You can also search for local counselors online or ask your physician for a recommendation of counselors in your area. 

get help from your friends.  ask family for help.  take a class.  consider getting counseling. 

 The most straight-forward way to get a guy talking is to walk right up to him and introduce yourself. It doesn't matter if he's the new guy at work, the cute boy you've noticed around the school corridors, or the handsome stranger at the coffee shop - put your shoulders back, plant a smile on your face and approach him confidently. Say hi, tell him your name and ask for his - if you're lucky he'll take it from there!   Once you find out the guy's name, use it frequently in the conversation. People like to hear their own name - it makes the conversation more personal and creates a sense of intimacy between you. Say something like "Hi, I've noticed you around here and I just thought I'd come over and introduce myself. My name's Kate, what's yours?" Simple!; , One of the easiest ways to start a conversation is to take advantage of your surrounding circumstances to get him talking. It could be literally anything, from the weather, to the traffic, to the results of a sports game. You can either make the comment to him directly or to yourself, hoping he sees it as an opportunity and responds.   Commenting on the weather may seem like a mundane conversation starter, but it works nevertheless. Try saying something like "Beautiful day, huh? Don't you just love the sunshine?" When starting a conversation with someone you don't know, the point is to break the ice and open a line of communication first. Once you've done that you can move on to more interesting topics. If you're sitting next to a cute guy on the train or an airplane, try sighing and muttering to yourself about the delay or bumpiness of the ride. If he's interested, he'll take this as his cue to respond in sympathetic agreement. Once you have his attention, you can take it from there!  , Men love to help women. They're biologically wired that way. So engaging the damsel in distress routine from time to time might just help to get the conversation going. Appeal to his manly muscle and strength - it will give him a confidence boost and make him feel more comfortable around you, allowing conversation to flow more freely.   If you're struggling with a heavy stack of files or a bulky box, ask if he can help to lighten the load. If you just can't seem to open the coffee jar or unscrew the cap of your water bottle, see if he'll oblige. Make sure to smile and thank him sweetly after he helps you - everyone likes a little appreciation when they do a good deed. And he'll be ready to jump at the opportunity to help next time round. This step also comes with a warning: don't overdo it. You want a guy's respect as well as his attention, so don't play the damsel in distress too often or you'll come across as helpless.  Guys like compliments just as much as girls do, so paying your guy an enthusiastic, genuine compliment will definitely get you in the good books and optimize his interest in the conversation. Paying him a compliment is a great conversation starter as you can be as intimate or as casual as you like, depending on how confident you're feeling.   If you're feeling forward, compliment him on his amazing eyes, his killer six-pack or his George Clooney smile. This will let him know that you find him physically attractive, which all guys love to hear. If you're aiming to be a little less obvious, compliment him on his snappy suit, his funky band tee or his great-smelling cologne - letting him know that you think he has great taste.  Compliment him on his performance at work or on the sports field, if you happen to be present at the time. Tell him he did a great job on the presentation or that he played really well. He'll know that you were paying particular attention to him. Alternatively, you can compliment him on something a little less personal. If you run into him walking his dog, compliment the dog instead (earning you major guy points). Or tell him that you approve of his choice of sandwich at lunch. Anything that grabs your attention and gets him talking.  Questions are great conversation starters, especially if you're feeling a little awkward, as they provide you with an excuse to talk to the guy under the pretense of seeking out information. The questions themselves can be as short and simple as you like. Just try to avoid questions that can be answered with a short "yes" or "no" as this can lead to awkwardness, causing the conversation to fizzle away.   Phrase questions in such a way that he will be forced to think about the answer, or at least provide more than a monosyllabic response. Men can be a little dull at times, so try to help them along a little. He'll soon realize that you're more interested in him than in finding out what time it is. Try asking him if he has a pen you could borrow or if he watched the basketball game last night. At this point it's just about grabbing his attention and getting the conversation going, so don't worry too much about the topic.  Finding a shared interest is conversational gold. When you find a topic that both of you enjoy talking about, the conversation will flow much more easily. Even if it's something you're not particularly knowledgeable about, demonstrate your interest by asking him plenty of questions and allow him to do the talking.   For example, if you discover that you both like to watch football, ask him about his favorite team, who he thinks their best players are and whether they'll make it to the playoffs this year. Once you get him going there'll be no stopping him, and he'll probably think you're a pretty cool girl for being interested. Pick up on hints about his interests from his clothing, desk or accessories. If he's wearing a band tee - bingo! He likes music. If he has a surfing picture set as his desktop background, that's a pretty good indication he likes to ride the waves. Picking up on small details can help you to choose the right topic to get him going.  To really get the conversation going and to find out about your guy's interests and personality, it's important to ask open-ended questions. Avoid questions with one-word answers or rote questions that he'll automatically answer without thinking.   For example, avoid starting a conversation with "how are you?" which he'll probably answer by reflex with a "fine" or a "good". Instead try asking him "what did you do this weekend?" or "what do you think of the new boss?" which will force him to think about his answer and actually string a sentence together. Alternatively, you can try asking him an "either-or" question, to initiate a playful debate. Ask him whether he prefers "The Simpsons" or "Family Guy", rock or hip-hop, burgers or hot dogs. Whatever he answers, gently tease him about it and soon you'll both be laughing.  Conversational etiquette dictates that you should always listen more than you talk. That's why you have two ears and only one mouth, right? So once you've got the ball rolling, take a back seat during the conversation and really listen to what he's got to say. Let him take charge of the conversation for a while - in case you've never noticed, guys tend to like the sound of their own voice.   Even when you're not talking, try to stay engaged in the conversation. Acknowledge things he says with a smile, nod or other appropriate facial expression or gesture.  Being a good listener during your conversation does two things: it allows you to make a good impression, letting the guy know that you're thoughtful and easy to talk to, while also giving you the chance to see whether you actually think this guy is worth your time. From the things the guy says, you'll get a pretty good idea of his personality and you can think about whether you want to take the next step. This is important because - let's face it - if you don't find him interesting now, you won't find him any more interesting on a date.  On the other hand, if you've got nothing to say for yourself, he may not find you very interesting. Elevate your conversation beyond everyday chitchat by posing an interesting or thought-provoking question that will make him think and ensure that you make an impression. Give him something to ponder and you'll be in his head long after the conversation has ended.   For example, ask him fun yet interesting questions like "If you could visit anywhere in the world, where would it be?" or "If your house were on fire, what three things would you save?" or "If you were a fictional character, who would you be?" These questions will hopefully make him smile and give you a little insight into his personality. Or you can get a little more serious and personal and ask him questions like "what is your biggest regret in life?" or "where do you see yourself in ten years?" Just to be clear, these are not the kind of questions that you ask to open a conversation or that you bring up completely out of the blue. If you do, he'll probably think you're just a teeny bit crazy. These questions are best reserved for when the initial awkwardness has passed, maybe after a couple of drinks.  Pop culture is the old reliable when it comes to conversational material. Everyone, no matter what their interests, will have something to say about movies, music, television shows, books or the latest crazy celebrity baby names. Once you've gotten a sense of what his interests are, you can ask him whether he's seen a particular movie, read a particular book, or heard a popular band's new record.   Also try asking for the guy's opinion or recommendation when it comes to an aspect of pop culture he considers himself an expert on. Guys love to show off their vast knowledge, especially to a rapt audience. For example, if he loves Woody Allen movies but you've never seen any, ask him which is the best one to start with. Feeling confident? Maybe you could suggest watching it together. Or if you can find something random that you're just as knowledgeable about as he is, you're in luck. Impress him with your love of obscure 70's punk-rock bands or your readership of Franco-Belgian comic books. He might just think you're The One.  The final step in successfully conversing with a guy is to know when to gracefully bow out. You should always leave him wanting more, not wishing you'd take the hint and leave. After a particularly successful joke or story, you should try to make your exit. Tell him that you need to get back to work or should be getting home. Hopefully he'll be disappointed you're leaving and will look forward to the next time you get a chance to talk.   If you feel that things really went well and you like this guy even more now, put yourself out there and suggest that the two of you go out for coffee or drinks after work sometime. If you feel too awkward to say it out loud, do like the girls in the movies and slip him your number on a scrap of paper. Right before you leave, you should look the guy straight in the eyes, flash him a smile and say "I really enjoyed talking to you, *insert guy's name here*" It's personal, it's flirtatious and it's so much more memorable than "see you later".  Guys are more attracted to happy, laughing, smiling girls than scowling, duck-faced divas. Fact. Smiling makes you seem friendly and approachable before you even open your mouth to speak. He'll instantly feel more comfortable around you and be more willing to open up. Laughing at his jokes will boost his ego and make him feel good, while also making you look more attractive. Win-win.  Eye contact is one of the most vital aspects of successful conversations. Think about it. If you are constantly averting your eyes or looking away you'll either look awkward and uncomfortable or as if you're not interested in being there at all. Plenty of eye contact projects confidence and indicates interests, which is exactly what you're trying to achieve. Be careful not to stare though, that's just plain creepy.  Ok, so you want this guy to know you're interested, but you don't need to wave it in front of his face. You can smile at him, make eye contact, laugh at his jokes and ask him questions, but don't do it too often or hang on his every word like an over-eager puppy. Try to retain a little bit of mystery and make him work a little for your attention. Guys like the chase, remember?  , Attraction isn't always physical, nor should it be. You want a guy who's attracted to your intelligence, your sparkling wit, your sweet nature and maybe your ability to chug a pint of beer in under 7 seconds. But when trying to get a guy's attention, it doesn't hurt to look your best. This doesn't mean high heels and a full face of make-up. Rather it involves things such as dressing to suit your figure, always having freshly-washed, sweet-smelling hair or wearing make-up that draws attention to your best features, such as your full lips or beautiful eyes.  Asking questions and getting to know this guy better is all perfectly fine, but try not to scare him off either. Don't ask him questions that you wouldn't feel comfortable answering yourself. Also, try to keep the questions breezy - you don't want him to feel like you're scrutinizing his answers, as if he were interviewing for a job or being cross-examined on the witness stand. Play nice.  A subtle brush against his shoulder or a hand lightly placed on his arm mid-conversation can give a guy chills and let him know, without having to say a word, that you're interested. You shouldn't overdo it, but once or twice over the course of a conversation will achieve just the desired effect.  This is what it's all been leading up to, right? If you've spoken to your guy, decided you like him, and you're pretty sure he likes you back, why not bite the bullet and ask him out? It doesn't need to be a big, romantic gesture or anything so formal as dinner. Try asking him if he'd like to a grab a coffee (or something stronger) after work on Friday. This will give you a chance to spend some more time together without being in an overtly date-like situation. Just think of it as an extra opportunity to work on your conversation skills. Not so scary at all!  

introduce yourself.  use the circumstances around you.  ask him for help.  compliment him.  ask a question.  find a shared interest.  ask open-ended questions.  listen more than you talk.  pose an interesting question.  bring up pop culture.  end on a high note.  smile and laugh.  make eye contact.  be subtle.  look your best.  don't overwhelm him.  make physical contact.  ask him out. 

 Though there's no sure fire way to know if the guy returns your feelings, there are a variety of signs that can let you know how he really feels about you. It's best to make sure that there's at least a chance that he likes you before you move on and tell him how you feel about him. Here are a few ways to see if he likes you as more than a friend:   Notice what he says. See if he's always complimenting you, asking if you like anyone, and telling you that he wishes he had a girlfriend. Notice what he does. If he likes you, then he'll look for every excuse to hang out with you, try to make physical contact, and may even do sweet favors for you like dropping off your lunch. Notice his appearance. If he always takes extra care with his looks when he knows he'll be around you, then this may mean that he likes you. See if he's always asking you to hang out. If he's always asking you to spend time together, even it may not be at a date-type of event, then he may like you.  If showing him that you like him just isn't doing the trick, then it may be time to tell the guy how you feel about him. You should pick a time and place where you can both be alone and free of stress, and then keep cool as you tell him that you have feelings for him. Don't put a lot of pressure on him or yourself and wait for a response.   Just relax. If he doesn't return your feelings, at least you'll know instead of worrying about it. Keep it simple. Don't overwhelm him by talking quickly and telling him the 150 reasons why you like him so much.  If the guy likes you, then you can hug him or just show him how happy you are, and begin to talk about going on a date and moving your relationship forward. If he doesn't return your feelings, that's OK too -- just show him how mature you are by not getting too upset, or even getting angry, because he doesn't share your feelings.   If it turns out he likes you, then you can even laugh about all the ways that you tried to show him that you liked him. If he doesn't like you, don't despair. Be proud of yourself for working up the courage to share your feelings and move on.  

make sure that he likes you.  tell him that you like him.  react appropriately. 

 If you want to make your guy friend date you, then you've already set a solid foundation for your relationship. But if you're not really friends with the guy yet, then befriending him can help you show him that you like him. If you don't know the guy at all and he barely knows who you are, it'll be tougher to show him your true feelings. Also, getting to know him as a friend will help you see if you're really compatible, and will give you a chance to show him how awesome you are in a low-pressure setting.   Start by being friendly. You shouldn't ask him to hang out or reveal your most intimate thoughts to him right away. Just take it easy and start building a fun and friendly rapport with him. Ease into the friendship. Don't overwhelm the guy by always being around. Just slowly start increasing the amount of time you spend with each other. Don't fall into the Friend Zone. You should try to be his friend, but don't develop such a deep friendship that it'll get weird if you try to take things to a romantic level.  If you want to get to know the guy, you can start talking about all of the things you have in common, from your families to your favorite sports teams. If you don't have so much in common, you can learn from each other, and may find yourself picking up on some of his interests. And if you want to pretend to care a little more about his favorite sports team than you really do, then that's okay too.   Most guys love talking about sports. If you both like the same sports team or sport, you can talk about it; if not, you can read up on his favorite team and casually drop some facts. Use music as a common bond. See if you have any of the same favorite bands -- if not, ask if he has any recommendations for you. If you've developed your friendship enough, you can even make him a CD of your favorite music to grab his attention. Talk about your families. Keep it light and talk about your siblings or any pets you have or had growing up. See if you like the same type of food. If he finds out that you love sushi too, he'll be more likely to ask you to go to the new sushi bar in your neighborhood.  Find a common thing that the two of you can laugh about, whether it's the fact that one of your mutual friends never matches, or the creepy poster in the back of your math class. Whatever reason you both have for laughing, you'll develop a deeper bond with the guy and will show him how much fun you can be.   If you find something that the two of you can laugh about, then this will create a little inside joke and will make you grow closer. You can even find the same pet peeve to laugh about. If there's an annoying teacher you both can't stand, or if you both hate a certain pop music star, you can have a good laugh over this together.  The way to a man's heart is through the respect of his friends. If you get his friends to love you, then he'll be much more likely to love you too. Hanging out and being nice to his friends will show him that you're a cool person who can get along with anyone and it will also let him see that you're showing more of an interest in him. If you didn't care about him, then you wouldn't care about his friends.   You should get to know his friends, but make sure you're not "always around," especially during dude-centric events.  Once you get to know him a bit, you can offer to give him a ride or to pick up lunch, if he looks like he needs a favor. If you can't do that, offer to carry something for him. Though this will be a small gesture of friendship, he'll also begin to see that you really care about him. Just make sure that he's offering to help you out from time to time too, so the relationship isn't all one-sided.   If he misses class, offer to take notes for him or to drop them off. If you're picking up coffee on the way to meet him, ask if he wants something too. Just remember to not overdo it. You're not his girlfriend yet, so you shouldn't offer to do his laundry or grocery shopping.  If you've been friends for a while and are hanging out more, then it'll be natural to ask for his number. You should play it cool and not ask for it like you're asking him to go out on a date. Instead, just ask him for his number so you can text him about when everyone is meeting at the bar, send him details to your party, or whatever. If he's a nice guy, he won't say no or think it's weird.   Getting his number will increase the amount of contact you have with him. Now you can start chatting through text and can take your relationship to a new level. Once you do get his number, make sure that you're not the only one calling and texting him.  

take the friend approach.  use your common interests as a starting point.  laugh at the same things.  get to know his friends.  offer friendly favors.  ask for his number. 

 There is always a right time and a right place. There is also always a wrong time and a wrong place. One of the best ways to spend time with your crush is in class or at lunch. There are many classes in this world, but here is the basic classes with a few extras.; , The place where you will discuss books by amazing authors, such as John Steinbeck and Mark Twain. Make use of your time with your crush by discussing the book before class starts, whether you love it or hate it. If he has a different view of the book, then make your conversation a little flirty debate. Or if you are writing an essay or a short story, ask him if he wants to peer edit with you. If he says no, say something a bit flirty like "You sure? Because I know a lot about "The Scarlett Ibis" and you would be lucky to have me to edit your essay." If he still says no, find someone else to edit with. There's always another essay in English class and peer editing with another boy might even make him jealous.  So what if you hate problems with fractions, or if you enjoy solving problems with the layout of y=mx+b? Your math class is another good place to spend time with your crush. Suggest doing some of the homework together if you have trouble. Or ask him for help if he is good at math. It's the other way around? Then say to him, "Hey, you look like you're having some trouble. Need help?" Your dream boy will most likely appreciate your help.  Ah, another class involving lots of writing. This is another class that you can ask your crush if he wants to peer edit your essays on the Civil War. You can also discuss the topic your class is learning about, like the presidents. You can even get into a flirty debate about which president was the worst in history.  This is a great class to partner up with your crush for labs. If your teacher assigned you two together, that's great! Chat a bit while you two complete your work. If not, talk to him after class. Ask him who is his partner and tell him who is yours. Then say something like "Maybe next time we'll be partners for a lab." You can make science a bit fun with a little contest. Try naming the most bones in the human body or name the elements on the periodic table the quickest. It will help you learn better.  Whether you're a jock or rather be sleeping, it is time to break a sweat with your crush. Challenge him to a quick game of basketball or four square with others. Partner up when your class is forced to practice kicking the soccer ball or race each other during the mile.  Okay, this is not a class, but it is still a time to flirt with your crush. At lunch, try sitting with him and talk about low key things, such as class, movies, books, tv shows, or family. Guys don't want to hear drama queens telling stories about a serious fight with a friend. If you can't sit with him, casually walk by his table, wave, and say hi.  This another non class, but passing time at school is good for a quick chat. If you see him, casually say hi and smile. If you want to talk to him more, ask him a quick question. ex: "Hey, what's the French homework?" or "What do we do in English today?"  

location and timing.  english class.  math class.  history.  science.  gym.  lunch.  in the halls. 

 Using your body language to show him you like him means that you use subtle signals, such as facing him or touching his arm, that will hopefully catch his attention. Try to sit by him when you can, and when you’re talking with him make sure that you have your whole body facing him. Don’t cross your arms while you’re talking as this creates a defensive position.Don’t forget to smile when you’re talking to him. Realize, though, that some boys won’t really be paying enough attention to notice your body language. He may feel too nervous around you to be paying any attention to subtle signals.; , Giving him a compliment will show him that you are paying attention to him. You can think about things he is really good at, or something you really like about how he dresses and compliment that.Giving him a compliment every now and then may give him the confidence to tell you that he likes you.   For example, you could say, “Hey! I just wanted to let you know that I think your outfit makes you look really nice today.” If he plays a sport, you can tell him how good he is at it, for example, “I saw your soccer game yesterday. That was a really awesome goal you scored!” Don’t overdo it. A compliment every now and then is OK, but giving a compliment multiple times a day may make him feel uncomfortable.  A shy guy may be reluctant to look you in the face, but if you can, try to make eye contact with him. If you do catch his eye, flash a quick smile, and hold the eye contact for about 3 seconds. Then get on with whatever you were doing. If you are able to do this, he’ll get at least an inkling of an idea that maybe you’re into him.Making eye contact doesn’t mean staring. If you make eye contact for too long he may get embarrassed.  It may be that you are only around this shy boy in front of his or your friends, so you may not get to spend much time talking to him. When you are together, try to focus your attention on talking to him without ignoring everyone else. Ask him questions about things he likes, or what he thought about a new movie that came out.Try to ask questions that will require more than a “yes” or “no” answer. For example, don’t say, “Did you like the game on Friday?” instead say, “Tell me what you thought about the game on Friday.” If you are in a group don’t ignore everyone, just casually try to engage him in conversation while everyone else is talking. If you are alone this will be easy. He may seem as though he has nothing to say, but if you keep coming up with new things to talk about he’ll (hopefully) come out of his shell a bit.  One of the most common ways to show someone that you like them is to simply flirt with them. When most people think of flirting, they think of doing it in person, but if that seems to scary, you can also try flirting with him over text message, email, or chat.   When flirting via text, use emojis. One of the most common emojis used when flirting is the winky face, which keeps things light and fun. Try to make a bit of physical contact when flirting in person. For example, if you are sitting next to each other you can subtly let your knee touch his knee, or you can brush some imaginary dirt off of his shoulder. When flirting, don't forget to smile! Flirting is supposed to be light and fun. If you are being very serious he probably won't think that you are flirting. Tease him just a little bit. With shy guys you definitely don't want to over-do this. However, teasing him just a little bit might show him that you are interested. When you tease him, be sure to smile and laugh, and maybe gently touch his arm to let him know that you aren't trying to be mean at all.  Most boys like to be reminded of their masculinity. Getting him to help you with something may help him feel courageous enough to make a move. When asking him to help you, try to think of something that will make him feel tough.For example, ask him to lift something a bit heavy. Don't be unrealistic here, and make sure that you choose something he can actually lift. You could say something like, "Hey Josh, I'm trying to put these big heavy books back up on the shelf, but they're too heavy for me. I know you're strong, could you help me?"  , Telling a shy boy that you like him is tricky because, in a face-to-face encounter, he might get too embarrassed and react differently than he really wants to. You can tell him face-to-face, but make sure that you do it when you two are alone, and well out of sight of any of his or your friends.When you tell him, try to keep it casual. If you’re not certain that he likes you, or you’re afraid he will get embarrassed, you can make it light-hearted and easy. For example, instead of saying “I really like you, and I want to be your girlfriend,” you can say, “I was thinking that since we get along so well, and have so much fun together that maybe we should go to the dance together next Friday.” This will give him a way to agree that he likes you without actually having to say it out loud. If you are friends on social media, you can tell him via chat, you can tell him over email or text, or you can even just write him a letter. However, if you are worried that he maybe doesn’t like you back, he might show what you have written to his friends. Hopefully he won’t do this, but be aware that spilling your feelings in written form leaves a record of what you’ve said.  When you tell him you like him, try to be friendly and sweet to him. Realize that for a shy boy, talking to a girl he likes is probably one of the scariest things in the world. He might react strangely to your confession, even if he does like you too. Try to be ready for this possibility, and if he does react weirdly, or says something defensive try to stay friendly.You can say something like, “OK, don’t worry about it. I just wanted to see what you thought. Let me know if you want to talk about it more some time.” This has the added benefit that if he truly doesn’t feel the same, then you have easily and gracefully left the conversation without embarrassing yourself too much. Being sweet and friendly may also encourage him to feel less afraid to talk to you.  If you tell him face-to-face, you’ll get some sort of reaction right away, though the reaction he gives you may not be the one he meant to give you. If you write him a text or an email, you may not get any reaction at first. There are lots of reasons that he may not respond to you right away. On the other hand, if you wrote him weeks ago on social media, and you know he’s seen your message, then he may just be afraid of hurting your feelings.   Give him a few days to respond. He may need some time to think about what he wants to say, or he may just be really busy. Maybe he doesn’t get on social media everyday or doesn’t check his email often. If he hasn’t responded after a week or two, consider taking him aside to ask him about it. Tell him it’s no big deal if he’s not interested, but you just wanted to make sure he got your message.  Of course, it may be hard to find out how he acts when you’re not there, but try to observe him from afar. If you see him across the lunch room, see how he is acting with his friends. Is he talking a lot or is he quiet? If he’s very talkative around other people, but quiet around you, there’s a good chance that he feels nervous about saying the wrong thing in front of you.If he is a quiet person all the time, it may be hard to tell this way. Look for other ways to know if he likes you too.  When you’re around does he avoid looking directly at you? Is he sweating? Is he defensive if someone teases him? If he is not normally like this, but seems to be when you’re around he may be worried about doing or saying the wrong thing in front of you, especially if he is shy.If a boy likes you, he’s more likely to seem as though he is nervous or anxious when you are around. If he isn’t really in to you, he will be more stand-offish.  A shy guy is likely to be fidgeting with his hair or his clothes when you are around or he may cross his arms in front of his chest. Shy boys are more likely to feel nervous around their crush, so they may seem defensive, when in fact they are actually very interested.You may find that your shy boy often tries to be around you, but not really near to you. For example, he may find excuses to hang out with your group of friends, but he’ll always try to sit as far away from you as possible. Don’t take this as a sign that he doesn’t like you.  If you are friends on social media, think about how he treats you. Did he find you and friend you? Is he constantly liking everything you post? If so, there’s a pretty good chance he is interested in you, but hasn’t gotten up the courage to do anything about it.You can also try to hint to him that you’re interested by friending him (if you’re not already friends), and showing appreciation for his posts by liking them or making a comment. Don’t overdo it though! You don’t need to like every single thing he posts, rather just a few to show him that you are paying attention.  

use your body language.  compliment him.  make eye contact.  engage him in conversation.  flirt with him.  ask him to help you with something.  decide how you’ll tell him.  be sweet.  be patient.  observe how he acts when you’re around and when you’re not around.  think about whether or not he seems nervous around you.  read his body language.  think about his social media behavior. 

 Although a smile may not be much, just making eye contact is the start. Practice a sweet, pretty smile in the mirror, and as soon as you see him, look him in the eyes and give a nice, natural smile. Keep doing this (don't be disappointed if he doesn't smile back - you know how boys are!) until you feel ready for the next step.; , Make sure you look (and smell!) your best, and make sure your breath is minty and fresh. But most importantly, keep calm and natural. Take a few sips of water to calm yourself down, and breath in and out slowly - but make sure you only do this before you bump into each other so you don't make a big thing of it.  When you see him, look him in the eye, smile naturally, and say clearly "Hi (their name)", or if you don't know their name (it's probably best if you do so they know you are talking to them), just smile and say hello. You could even wave without saying anything if you wanted to.  Just keep it natural and keep greeting him! Take some time to be proud of your first step to...love!!! Well done!  

once you have tried ignoring your crush (for reverse psychology), you'll want to smile.  when the day you're planning on saying hello comes, make sure you are ready.  say hi.  walk off naturally and calmly and don't mention it to many people. 

 You might not really be able to control the fact that he’s popping into your head a lot, but you can control your actions. Try not to constantly talk to your friends about him. Don’t stalk him on social media. Avoiding some of these behaviors will allow your mind to be occupied by other thoughts and will help you keep a more logical mindset., This is easier said than done; getting attention is fun and flattery is nice to hear. You’ll have a much easier time not falling for him if you aren’t around him all the time or texting him constantly.It’ll be a lot easier to maintain balance and to not get swept up in your emotions if you aren’t hasty about bringing him into your day-to-day life.   Try making a commitment to yourself to only hang out with him once a week at the most. Keep your phone in your purse or in another room when you’re hanging out with friends and family members to keep yourself from texting him too much.  It’s okay to have thoughts about what material you want your wedding dress to be made of and what you might name your kids one day, but you’re getting ahead of yourself if you’re thinking about this new guy in that picture. There’s always a chance that this will be the guy who will be a part of those moments, but for now, just focus on enjoying getting to know each other.Ask him about his favorite movies, music, sports, and more. Acknowledging that this point in time is all about learning who each other are may keep you from thinking so far into the future. Enjoy your “firsts”. There will only be one first date or first kiss. Keep your thoughts about him focused on those big, exciting moments as they happen.  

control your impulses.  limit your interaction with him.  stop planning out the future. 

 Try not to ask him too personal questions, as it might make him feel uncomfortable.; , If his friends are your friends too, it gives you a reason to be around him.  Guys love it, but try not to make too much eye contact. It might make him feel like he's under a microscope. , Guys hate it when you try to be someone you're not. They can totally tell when that's happening. They like it better when you're yourself.  Don't overdo anything. , Be happy with your look and just go for it. , Like schoolwork. If you get bad grades, he might think you're way too unfocused. Some guys don't like that.  Let him talk to you or go a day or two without talking to him. If you sit at home waiting for him to get online and send him a message right away he may think your being too clingy and creepy. Just resist talking to him for a while or wait for him to make the move.  Either he eventually will, or he's done talking or doesn't want to talk. Wait until a couple hours or a day later to send him a "Hey" or wait for him to talk to you.  

talk to him about himself.  be friends with his friends.  always try to make eye contact.  joke around with him but some guys are more sensitive then others, so be careful of what you say.  ,  be yourself.  play it cool.  give hints and if he's not getting them, tell his best friends you like him or write him a note and put it in his locker.  ,  feel confident.  act silly and maybe he will too to make you even more comfortable around him.  ,  focus on other things, too.  don't be too obsessive about talking to him.  don't text the guy if he doesn't reply. 

 It sounds cheesy, but if he ends up liking you for being someone else, if you get in a long term relationship, you have to lie about your everything around him and you have to remember every lie you said about yourself. And, when the relationship is over, it won't be over peacefully... so be yourself!; , The more you guys talk, the more you will start to know the boy. Let the conversation be about him. Ask interesting questions. Some good topics are:   What's up? (conversation starter) Crushes. It's good to get him thinking about it if you are in love with him. Dreams and goals. Favorite date places. You better consider this if you are going to ask him out! Friends and family. Sports. Only talk about this if you have a potential interest in it. Celebrities.  Stroking his hand through his hair? That might mean he like you. Reaching his hand for yours? He might like you-more than friends. Laughing at your every joke? This can be a good sign. He might like you. But if he laughs too much, he may feel uneasy with you. Watch his actions and let him know you want to start a relationship (dating or friends) with your actions too. See his reply, and don't forget to check his actions.  The most important parts to look at are if he smiles or not, and his eyes. Don't just focus on how cute his eyes look, but see if you can tell how he is feeling. Boys, like girls, smile when they are pleased too. They have their facial expressions like girls so it shouldn't be hard.  Some other male relative will do too. Ask them why boys do this or boys do that. They might have some great answers! After all, they are talking about their own kind!  , This will take some practice. The best way to ask is to do it casually. When there is an awkward moment of silence, take a breath and ask! He might say yes, or sadly, no. 50% chance. If he says sure, say "Okay, I'll see you there" and leave. No? Just say "Okay, that's cool." Practice a few times in front of a mirror (especially if it's your first time) and don't forget to consider these things:   What will you do at the date? "So, wanna __________ next Saturday?" When will the date happen? "So, wanna catch a movie on/next ____________?" The tone of your voice. Say it cool and casually. Don't seem to make a big deal out of it. Smile! Smiling looks attractive and will keep you in a positive mood. Laugh too! Do not force your smiles and laughter.  Talk to him. Don't flirt. No complimenting muscles for example. The more you talk to him the more he will get to know you and feel more comfortable with you. Ask him questions and share some of your experiences and memories.  

always be yourself.  talk to him.  watch his actions.  watch his facial expressions too.  talk to your dad or your brother!,  if he likes you, go ahead and ask him out!,  if you just want to be friends, hang out with him more. 

 Continue to stay active with your recreational soccer team and make progress on the short story that you’re writing. These activities might seem unimportant when you’re curled up with your new favorite person, but they aren’t. Keep some things in your life as only yours. Later on, you’ll be grateful that you continued to do the things you love., To avoid becoming consumed with the guy you like, set some goals for yourself that you’ve been thinking about putting into action. This will shift your focus in a positive, healthy, progressive way.Consider making a goal to go to the gym three times a week if you’ve been feeling a little sluggish and want to get more exercise in.  While it’s tough to think about anyone else right now, it’s really important to keep investing in your trusted support system. It’s easy to forget about friends and family members who are always there for you when there’s a special new guy in your life, but they’re the ones who have been with you through the good and bad times and have added true value to your life. Remember to grab dinner or go watch a movie with those who have proven long-term loyalty. 

keep up with your hobbies.  work on bettering yourself.  spend time with other important people in your life. 

 If you really like this boy, tell him that. Figure out what you want this note to achieve. Do you want him to give you his number so you can text him? Ask for his number in your note. Do you want to hang out with him after school? Ask him to come over to your house to watch a movie. Figure out what you want to achieve with your note and writing it will become so much easier.   Be honest with yourself as well. Don't tell him it's okay if he doesn't like you, you're okay with just being friends if that's not true. Make sure whatever you put in your note is truthful, otherwise you're starting off on the wrong foot. It’s also okay to say you don’t know what to say. Telling him “I don’t know how to tell you this, but I really like you” is very endearing and he’ll be flattered that you were even brave enough to try.; , There’s no right way to tell someone you like them, so you can feel free to be as creative as you want. Try writing a poem to let him know how you feel.Your poem doesn’t have to rhyme if you don’t want it to. There are many different types and lengths of poems, so fool around and see which one feels right for you. If all else fails, go back to the classics. You can’t go wrong with a little “Roses are red, violets are blue, this poem is stupid, but I still like you.”  , If you have trouble putting what you feel into your own words, use somebody else’s. Include a quote from your favorite movie or book or add a song lyric that makes you think of him. It doesn’t matter what you say, as long as he gets the idea that you like him., Use your note to express things you might be embarrassed to say in person. Compliment his hair or his clothes or his personality; whatever it is that makes him attractive to you, tell him. Even if he decides that he’s not interested in you, he’ll still appreciate the compliments.  If you and your crush are already friends, chances are you have at least one inside joke. Include that joke in your note; these details are unique and specific to your relationship and he’ll appreciate that you thought to include it., Your love letter doesn’t just have to be a letter. If you feel self-conscious explaining yourself in words, try explaining yourself in song. Make your crush a mixed CD or playlist of all the songs that make you think of him.If you’re artistic, draw him a picture of you and him together.   Whatever you decide to give him, make sure you include some kind of note with your name on it. You wouldn’t want to give him a gift and make him guess where it’s coming from. The note with your gift doesn’t have to be highly detailed. It can be as simple as To Jack, From Jill. The gift is what you’re explaining yourself with, so the note accompanying it can be very low-key.  Before you can even start writing your letter, you need to decide what stationary to use. Notebook paper is always a safe option, but it’s not the only one. If you recently went on a trip with your family, use a postcard from that location.Or if you have special stationary that you really love, use that instead.  To do this, write your note on a 6” by 6” piece of paper (or any square-shaped paper). Fold the paper twice over so your paper is divided into four equal quadrants. Fold the top point down to meet the crease in the center. Fold the bottom point up so it touches the top point. Fold your right side to meet the crease in the center and then do the same with the left side. Flip the heart over and fold the top points down., If you’re passing your note in an envelope, feel free to gussy up the envelope as well. You can add stickers or use stencils to write your crush’s name out. If you want to be funny, try cutting out your crush’s name using letters from a magazine and taping them to the envelope so it looks like a ransom note.   Keep in mind that he might not like stickers as much as you do. Less is usually more when it comes to decorating your note, unless you want the note to look over-the-top on purpose. If the note is serious in tone, it's probably best to keep it simple: just write his name in plain letters on the envelope.  To make your envelope a little more colorful and fun, try painting it. To do this, all you will need is your envelope, some paint and a brush. Try painting wavy lines in different colored stripes.When painting, make sure to keep your brush flat and drag it across the surface. Let the envelope dry before you put your letter inside.  If you frequently pass your crush in the halls, plan on giving him the note during that time. You won’t have too much time before you have to get to your next class, so you won’t have to worry about standing around and talking awkwardly.   If you’re too nervous or anxious to pass the note yourself, give it to a friend to pass on. Make sure you choose a friend that you trust, just in case they decide to read the note themselves and tell others what it says. You could also give him the note in class. He’ll probably be thrilled to have something to do (other than focusing on the lesson and studying, of course). Just make sure it doesn’t fall into the wrong hands. You don’t want your teacher to find it and confiscate it, or worse, read the note out loud.  If you don’t want to give the note directly to your crush and you feel weird asking someone else to do it, slide the note through the slots in his locker. Just make sure you’re putting the note in the right locker.  If you feel that you couldn’t possibly give your note at school, try sending it through e-mail. Some people believe that e-mail is not romantic, but that’s actually not the case.As long as you’re being honest and sharing your feelings, your crush won’t really care how you send them over.   You can also send your note as a text or Facebook message. Whatever medium you feel most comfortable using, do that.  If you’re absolutely convinced that you couldn’t possibly send your crush a letter with your name on it, try leaving your name off. Your crush won’t know who his secret admirer is, but some people like a mystery. Just know that if you want to actually pursue a relationship with your crush, you’re going to have to come clean about it eventually.  

be honest with what you want.  structure your note like a poem.  use quotes.  compliment him.  add an inside joke.  include a personal gift.  pick your paper.  fold the note into a heart.  embellish the envelope with stickers or stencils.  paint the envelope with watercolors.  give him the note in the hallway.  stick the note in his locker.  send the note electronically.  send the note anonymously. 

 The most important way you can attract the guy of your dreams is to be confident and content in your own self. You can do this by wearing a cute outfit, doing something new with your hair, trying a new makeup style, or simply just thinking positively, because confidence is one of the most attractive traits a person can possibly have and it will make you less anxious about failure, which makes it hard to take the leap and into a potential relationship.   Don't judge yourself or others harshly. When you focus on all your flaws that is all that you'll think you have to offer and when you focus on the flaws of others, you are making your own brain toxic with negative thoughts. Don't compare yourself to other people. Someone is always going to be more attractive than you, more successful than you, and have more romantic partners than you. Focus on the things that you have rather than the things that other people have.; , If you want people to notice you, especially that guy of your dreams, you should send a little smile in his direction and cultivate a positive attitude. Even better make eye contact with your chosen sweetheart and give him a little smile. It'll signal your interest in a non-threatening way and, perhaps, intrigue him., Now this doesn't mean that you should go around stalking him wherever he goes, but if you know that he likes to frequent a particular coffee shop or book store, feel free to spend some time there and "bump" into him.   It'll give you a little chance to talk to one another without a bunch of people around like at a party. Don't do this all the time, or he'll think that you're stalking him. Once or twice is the ticket, before it becomes obvious what you're up to. (There is nothing wrong with straightforwardly asking him out, but if you're not feeling bold enough this is a good way to work up the nerve to winning him over).  You don't want to be super overt and clingy about trying to win your guy's heart, because you won't come off very well. However, this doesn't mean that you need to hide your interest or pretend not to be interested. You simply want to make it so that you are interested but not overwhelming.   You could try dropping a compliment or two; something that isn't overwhelming (overwhelming would be "you're the most gorgeous guy I've ever met") like "hey that shirt is really awesome" or "I really like your new haircut." Show that you have a life outside of thinking about him. When the two of you do talk, just casually mention some of the fun things you've done that week (even if it's things like the awesome book you read, or video game tournament you participated in, or the soccer game you won). It shows that you have interests and a life of your own. When you run into him, after chatting for a bit, say that you have to run to meet a friend or that you have to be somewhere. That way you'll come across as having things to do and people to see, rather than someone who is waiting around to bump into him.  Oftentimes the key to a person's heart is through their humor. The saying goes "the couple that laughs together, stays together." If you get him laughing at things you're saying you'll make him enjoy your company more and want to be around you more often.   A good way to do this is to mention something that is slightly embarrassing or humbling that happened to you. Mention the time you mistook a stranger for your best friend and slapped them on the butt, or how on the way to the date you missed a step on the bus and fell out the door in front of everyone. It shows that you don't take yourself too seriously and that you can laugh at yourself. You don't need to belittle yourself or talk about how stupid you are. A confident person doesn't need to belittle themselves, because they know that they are awesome! And confidence is attractive!  , He will listen to his friends' advice about whether or not to date you, so you'll want to make sure that you're number one their list. This doesn't mean that you need to agree with everything they say or that you should let them walk all over you (if his friends are that bad, though, you should rethink the guy you're wanting to attract), but it does mean that you're nice to them.   When you're out with him and his friends, really listen to what they say and show that you have interest in their interests. You don't have to pretend to be an expert in what they're talking about if you're not. Simply ask some questions and listen. Don't feel like you should sit on the sidelines when you're around him and his friends. Participate in activities and introduce them to things that you like and you think they might like. It'll show that you have respect for them and that you're interested in getting to know them better.  This rule allows you to avoid committing yourself to a courtship that is basically going nowhere, because who has the energy for that? It means that if you've given him opportunities to try to get to know you better and he hasn't jumped at the chance after 3 tries, then he's probably not worth further effort.   If you think that maybe he is interested but simply shy, there is no reason that you shouldn't ask him out instead. That way, even if he does say "no," you will have a firm answer and won't be left wondering. The reason this is a good rule to follow is that you don't really want to be after him like a lovesick, desperate puppy. If he hasn't shown interest after awhile, he's not going to, or he's only going to show interest in having sex with you because he knows that you're desperate (stay as far away from guys like that as you possibly can). Unless you're only interested in sex, you'll end up hurt by this arrangement. An example of this in action might be you meeting him at a party and chatting with him, then popping in by his favorite coffee shop and running into him there and then chatting with him in class later. If you've given him openings to ask you on a date (or even for coffee), and he hasn't gone for it after those 3 times, stop trying and move on.  Now that you've gotten past the flirting stage, you'll need to have that first date. A good way to win his heart is to have a successful first date that you both enjoy. It'll will make him want to spend more time with you.   Make sure that you have topics to talk about, because it can be awkward during a first date not to blurt out something that is more appropriate for a closer relationship (probably not a good time to go into your anxiety problems). Some conversation starters might be: what are your typical Sunday activities, what is a band or album that you loved, what was the last movie that you saw and what did you think about it, what is the funniest thing you've ever seen in public.  Dress appropriately. This means that you wear something that you feel comfortable in, but which also suits the occasion. So if you're off to a 4-star restaurant, something a little fancier is in order (a dress, or nice slacks and a nice button-up or blouse). If you're going to a coffee shop, dress just a little nicer than your usual attire (button down instead of t-shirt, no ratty jeans, etc.). Remember that you want to be yourself for the date. You don't want your guy to be expecting you to be someone you're not further in the relationship. That's not fair to either of you. You don't have to bring all your quirks out into the open right away, but you shouldn't be hiding things.  A good way to let someone know that you're interested in them and care about them is to take an interest in their interests and in their opinions about things. You don't have to understand those interests and you don't even necessarily have to enjoy them, but being interested enough to talk with your guy about them, will show him that you are interested in him.   For example, if your guy is super into skiing and you're more the bookish type, that's okay! Make sure to ask him about his ski trips and even offer to go a few rounds yourself. Pick up on some of the terminology so that you're able to converse more freely. Make sure that he's also respecting and interested in your interests and hobbies. If he isn't, that's a pretty good sign that he's either a narcissist or not very committed to having a relationship with you.  There is nothing that makes someone feel good and cared about than by showing them that they are not being taken for granted. Find ways to demonstrate to him that you notice what he does for you and that you appreciate him in your life.   Flat out saying "I am so glad you're in my life" is a good and easy way to make sure he knows that you value him. Do some little things that show you appreciate him. If you're crafty you could make him something (knit a hat, carve a special little box, paint a picture). Also, you could do something thoughtful for him, especially if he's having a really busy or difficult time. Bring him some special cookies, or help him by editing his resume or essay, offer to drive his sister to the airport so he can get some extra studying in.  This step is important for both of you. You don't want to enter into a co-dependent, can't-breath-without-you kind of a relationship, as much as the movies make it look nice. Make sure that you're both getting some space from each other and from the relationship.   Maintain your relationships with your friends. Hang out with them. Have sleepovers and movie watching parties that are just with your friends, no significant others allowed. Pursue your hobbies and interests. Go on ski trips by yourself or with your family, go to knitting workshops, learn karate. This way, when the two of you are together again, you'll have so much to talk about!  , Maybe in the beginning he seemed like such a great guy, but it's a good idea to check in with the relationship before you start doing a bunch of stuff to win his heart. You want to make sure that his heart is actually what you want, or even if it's possible to win his heart.   Obviously if he's emotionally, physically, or sexually abusive, you should get away now. If he isolates you from friends and family, if he demeans you or tears you down either in private or in front of people, if he manipulates you or forces you to have sex when you don't want to, if he says he'll kill himself if you ever leave him, any of these signs mean that you should get out. Some questions to ask yourself about your relationship: are the two of you open and honest with each other? Do you feel better with him, or do you feel like you're walking on eggshells? Does he respect you? Do you feel like you're the best version of your self when you're with him? Does he? You shouldn't ever feel like you need to "fix him" or "make him better." You should be in a relationship with someone who doesn't need you to be their therapist or their mother.  Sometimes the absolute best way to get what you want in a guy is to tell him how you feel and ask him if he feels the same way. Often you can hint and hint for ages and do everything you're "supposed" to do and still you won't know whether you've won his heart.Be open and direct. Tell him that you really like him and that you want to see how he feels about you, or how he might feel about you in the future. Be ready to hear the answer, even if it isn't one that you want to hear. He might not feel the same way about you that you feel about him and that's okay. Remember, it's his loss not yours.  

be confident.  smile.  place yourself in his path.  play it cool.  make him laugh.  be nice to his friends.  use the "3 strikes and you're out" rule.  have a successful first date.  pay attention to his interests.  don't take him for granted.  maintain some space.  decide if he's truly worth it.  tell him how you feel. 

 Is the boy popular? A nerd? An introvert? You should find out what he's like so that you can choose your words and ideas accordingly. You wouldn't want to write the wrong thing to him and he probably wouldn't forget it easily if you did.  You could investigate what type of boy he is by walking casually pass by him and overhearing conversations. But don't appear stalkerish-- that can scare boys off entirely.; , Make sure to address him by his first name or his nickname. Last names are too formal for a love letter. Don't use names like "cutie" or he might freak out. 'Cutie' makes it seem like you are literally obsessed with him, which can seem frightening.  Make sure to talk about both him and you equally. You don't want to come off as egotistic by talking about your own life too much. But still, pour out your feelings towards him. Don't forget to introduce yourself a little bit because he probably doesn't know you. Most importantly, be yourself. It would be awful if he loved you for who he thought you were, not who you really were.  Every guy loves to see that the person who is writing them is intelligent and careful. You could ask someone you trust very deeply to help you out with your spelling and grammar.  If you wish to remain anonymous, leave your name out whilst hinting him at who you are. Don't sign it anything out of place or too girly because he might just as well freak out. For instance, do not say, 'Be mine forever' or 'I love you!' A simple 'love' will do.  Pick a picture that you think represents who you are well. This is optional as you might not want to reveal yourself too early. If you do not want to reveal yourself, consider drawing, painting, or writing something for him. If this is not ideal for you, maybe give him a picture of something that represents you: for instance, cats if you really like cats.  If you don't know what his locker number is, you could also investigate by casually looking around to see where his position when using his locker usually is. Don't ask his friends because they will probably straight out tell him that some girl was curious about his locker number. Neither should you ask your friend because they might go annoy or tease you about it.  Don't talk too much to him, you will have plenty of time for that later. If you want to hear his reaction, but don't want to be seen, you can round a corner and hide there to listen, but that might seem a bit creepy.  

know what type of boy he is.  find out the boy's name and write "dear (insert name)" at the top of the page.  talk about what you like about him and a little about yourself.  try to use good spelling and grammar.  sign it "love, (insert your name here)".  try putting a picture of yourself in the card.  put it in something noticeable like a purple envelope, or something more discreet if you think he'll find it embarrassing, and have a friend give it to him or put it in his locker.  if you're the confident type, find him, walk straight up to him and hand it to him with a smile. 

 A great way to get someone's attention is eye contact. To flirt with your crush, make eye contact. If you're at, say, a coffee shop, catch your crush's gaze. Hold their gaze for about four seconds, and then glance away. Then, look back. This is a flirtatious gesture that subtly invites someone to just say "Hi" to you., This may sound odd, but mirroring someone's body language is read as flirtatious. As you talk to your crush, try to subtly mimic his mannerisms. Copying someone is a way of flattering them. This will give off flirty vibes.When chatting by your locker, for example, mimic what he's doing. If he leans onto the locker, lean on to it as well. If he plays with his hair, play with your hair. Do not be too obvious about it. You do not have to copy what he does gesture for gesture. However, try to sit in the same position he does. If he crosses his legs, for example, cross your legs.  Smiling shows you're interested and engaged with another person. While talking to him, make sure to flash him a winning smile. This will show him how much you enjoy being around him, which can help convey that you like him.Smile when you first say "Hi" to him. When you take a seat next to him at class, for example, sit down and offer him a big grim. Smile as he talks. When he tells you about exciting portions of his day, offer a smile to show you care. Laugh when appropriate at well. If he makes a joke about your chemistry teacher, for example, giggle as you smile.  Once you're engaged in conversation, try to introduce some small touching. Brush his hand or arm. Put your hand on his shoulder. Tiny amounts of touch show him you want to be close to him.You can find excuses to introduce touch as well. If you're waiting for the bus, say you're cold and cuddle up next to him. Pay close attention to how he reacts. If he seems uncomfortable, you should slow down with the physical contact. Too much physical contact can be off-putting if someone is not ready for it.  

make brief eye contact.  mirror his body language.  smile.  introduce touch. 

 Just as you're going through changes as a teenager, boys in your grade are also experiencing changes. Try to familiarize yourself with changes boys undergo. You can ask your health teacher where to find reading information or ask your parents. If you have a slightly older male relative you trust, such as a male cousin who is in college, they may be willing to talk to you about changes boys undergo during puberty.You may notice some physical changes in the boys in your class. Their voices may get deeper and they may begin to grow hair on their faces and underarms. Like you, boys will also undergo sexual changes. They will start to release testosterone and begin to experience erections. Be understanding that boys may be embarrassed of sexual changes, just like you may be initially embarrassed of your period.; , While puberty is a normal part of growing up, it is normal to have some insecurity about puberty. Teenage boys in your grade may be embarrassed by physical and other changes they're undergoing, so be understanding of this.Boys often undergo changes in puberty that can be awkward or embarrassing. Teenage boys may experience erections without cause, for example, and their voices may squeak when they talk. While it can be tempting to tease boys in your grade about puberty, be understanding. You are also undergoing changes and would not want to be teased. Refrain from teasing the boys in your grade about common issues associated with puberty.  While you may feel your experiences couldn't be more different than the experiences of teenage boys, there is actually a lot of common ground. You can better understand teenage boys if you identify areas where you're going through similar changes.Like you, boys are beginning to grow hair on the underarms and pubic region. Boys also experience mood swings and feelings of anger and frustration due to changing hormones. Hormones can also cause quick changes in energy levels. You may notice people respond to you differently as you grow. People see you more as an adult and may treat you differently. This happens to boys during puberty as well.  Boys sometimes treat you differently around their friends. Teenage boys are often embarrassed to be interested in girls for the first time. He may act standoffish towards you because he feels insecure. He may also want to make it clear to his friends they are his priority. Try to be understanding of this. If you are dating a teenage boy, allow him to have some friend time.However, you should not put up with disrespect. If a teenage boy is downright mean to you in front of his friends, you should tell him you will not accept that kind of treatment. Say something like, "I understand you want to act cool around your friends, but it isn't okay for you to make fun of me."  , Often, the best way to understand someone is simply to talk to them. While talking to boys can be scary, it is often helpful to understanding them better. Learn to be brave and engage teenage boys in conversation.Ask specific questions. Ask about things like hobbies, family, and his favorite subjects in school. For example, "Are you close to your siblings?" If you're unsure how to strike up a conversation, make an observation based on something around you or something that's recently happened. For example, "What did you think of yesterday's assembly?"  , It can be easy to become frustrated with your teenager, especially if they are acting out or otherwise rebelling. Remember, teens are very insecure and self conscious. They are also striving to carve out an identity, which may explain bouts of rebellion or occasionally being difficult. On top of all that, your teen's brain is still developing, and he doesn't yet have an adult-sized capacity for things like impulse control and decision-making. If you're having trouble understanding your teen boy, pause and put yourself in his shoes. Try to remember your own teenage years.For example, if your teenager suddenly wants to stop an activity he once enjoyed, put yourself in his shoes. Maybe your teen was forced to play hockey during middle school. He may want to feel like more of an individual now that he's getting older and try something different. Think about times when you tried to explore or define your identity as a teen.  It's important to understand the changes your teen is going through as a parent. One of the best things you can do to understand teenage boys is to educate yourself about your teen.Read about teenagers. You can find reading online detailing the hormonal and mood changes teenagers undergo. This will refresh you on the changes people undergo during their teenage years. In addition to reading books about the physical changes your teen will undergo, read young adult books targeted at teenage boys. Fiction books can help you remember the emotions teenagers undergo. Keep in mind that this research may not describe your teen exactly. It's important to get to know your teenage boy, not just the boys described in literature. Take an interest in the things your teen is passionate about to connect and get to know him better.  While it's important to know what your teen is doing and who he is with, remember teenage years are part of the transition into adulthood. It's important your teen feels he has some privacy in your home, so be respectful of his need for space and occasional alone time.There are some things you should know about your teen. It's reasonable to want to know where he's going and who he's with at all times. However, you should grant him some forms of privacy. Understand teenage years are about identity. Your teen may feel he needs a certain amount of privacy to establish his identity. Things like text messages and phone calls should be private. You should also understand you will probably not know every detail of your teen's social life. It may be a good idea to change some rules as your teenager ages. You can lessen up restrictions on things like time spent on the phone and computer, as these technologies are often how teens socialize and form an identity. Keep an open dialogue going about rules and expectations and allow your teen some say in his life. If your teen continually demonstrates he is unreliable, however, you may need to keep stricter rules in place for longer. However, if your teenager violates your trust or demonstrates serious irresponsibility, you may need to take away their phone or remove other privileges. Your teen should understand that trust is earned, and that with your trust comes more privacy.  The teenage brain is not fully developed. As a parent, it's vital you understand teenage boys often have a limited understanding of consequences. This can result in engaging in risky behavior, so be sure to be vigilant. You should make sure your teen is not taking major risks, such as using drugs or alcohol.The teenager's developing brain does not give them a free pass for reckless behavior. While it is important to keep this fact in mind, do not give him a pass on misbehaving because he doesn't know any better. Consequences are how he learns to make good choices. You are still the parent, so you should still have expectations and boundaries. Things like bed times and curfews should still be enforced during your son's teenage years and you should also know where he is at all times., Teenagers undergo a lot of hormonal changes. This can lead to things like mood swings. Try to be patient if your teen seems aggravated or is easily angered. You should make sure your teen faces consequences for inappropriate or rude behavior, but try to be understanding. It will take a few years for your teen to adjust to hormonal changes.Have patience. Many parents feel the teenage years will never end, but your son should eventually grow out of mood swings and anger problems caused by puberty. Once your teen has calmed down, you can have a discussion about his behavior. Try not to lecture — instead, focus on what he can do differently in the future. For instance, if he screamed something rude at you in a moment of anger, discuss how next time he can stop and take a couple of deep breaths before responding.  Odds are, your son will start thinking about sex during his teenage years and may even explore pornography. Recent research says the majority of adolescent males explore pornography websites.While this is a normal part of growing up, it's important you talk to your son about sex and porn.   Talk to your son frequently about sex and sexuality and allow him to come to you with questions. It's important you present the facts. For example, it may be a good idea to explain to your son the differences between sex in pornography and sex in real life.If he is extremely uncomfortable discussing the subject with you, try to find a trusted third party, like an uncle, to help. Do not panic if your teen asks about sex. Asking about sex does not necessarily indicate your teenager is having sex, or even considering doing so. They may be curious, which is normal. Provide information about safe sex, such as condoms, STDs, and birth control. You can find age-appropriate reading material at a local library for your teen to browse. Remember that educating your child about safe sex does not make it more likely they will become sexually active.Leave any conversation you have about sex open ended. Say something to your teen like, "If you have any questions, it's always okay to come to me with them."  , If you need to communicate with your teenager, look for the right time. Pay attention to when your teen seems relaxed and receptive. Make a habit of talking regularly during those times to keep communication in your home open.It may take some trial and error to figure out when your teen is most talkative. Your teen may be more quiet when you pick him up from soccer practice, but get chattier after dinner. You could try engaging him in conversation then.  Whether you're a parent or a teen yourself, remember teenage boys may be private about certain things. They may also be sensitive about some topics. Instead of asking questions directly, learn to ask open-ended questions. This will allow a teenage boy to share information at his own discretion.For example, do not ask, "Are you excited about the school dance?" Instead, ask something like, "How are you feeling about the dance? Do you think you feel comfortable going?" If your questions are met with short responses, then this may not be a subject your teenager wishes to discuss. Try to determine what your teenager does enjoy talking about. Try talking about his hobbies and interests.  If you are a teenage girl, it's important you stand up for yourself when necessary. If a teenage boy is frequently teasing you to the point you feel uncomfortable, it is within your right to let him know his behavior is not acceptable.It is okay to express your emotions to boys. If a boy is making you feel uncomfortable, say so clearly. You may worry about a boy liking you, but you should not strive to be liked at the expense of your feelings. Say something if a boy is bothering you, such as, "I don't like it when you comment on my body. It makes me feel uncomfortable." If teasing does not stop, you can ask an adult, such as a teacher, for help.  Teenagers may suffer from things like depression, anxiety, and other emotional issues. While a certain amount of mood swings are normal, if a teenager seems very unhappy or angry, you should seek the help of a therapist.Warning signs of a mental health issue include:Difficulty concentrating A sudden drop in grades Weight loss or gain Lack of motivation Difficulty sleeping Fatigue  

familiarize yourself with the changes teenage boys undergo.  remember teenage boys are insecure.  look for common ground.  accept he may act differently around his friends.  learn to make casual conversation.  put yourself in your teen's shoes.  do research about teenagers.  allow your teenager some privacy.  make sure your teen does not engage in reckless behavior.  be prepared for the effects of hormones.  expect that he will start to think about sex.  find the right times to talk.  ask open-ended questions.  assert yourself when necessary.  seek professional help in some cases. 

 Do not hesitate to text him too much. If a guy is interested in you, he won't worry about you being overly enthusiastic or overeager. Text him what you really want to say to him without trying to tone down your feelings or emotions.For example, say a guy texts you that he got a new after school job. You feel inclined to say, "That's so great!! I'm super happy for you!" You may feel the inclination to pause and try to tone your language down. Instead, you may feel it's better to say, "Cool." Avoid filtering yourself. If a guy likes you back, he will be happy that you're happy for him.  Many people worry about rules regarding who should text and when. Try not to put so much stake in this. If you're being standoffish, a guy may not realize you have feelings for him. If you think of something to say to him, send him a text without hesitating. Telling a guy about your day to day life is a great way to show him you have feelings for him.Text him about what you're doing and when you're thinking of him. For example, say he's a huge sports fan. You can text him something like, "The football game is playing on the radio. Made me think of you!" Text him things about your life you think may interest him and ask him about what he's doing. For example, "I'm so excited to go to my friend's place tonight. What are you doing? Any exciting plans?" Do not wait around for him to text you first if you think of something to say. Just do it. Making regular conversation with someone without prompting can help show them you like him.  If you like a guy, give me a little extra attention on social media. Like his posts frequently. Comment on things like pictures. Retweet his tweets. This will show him you care.   If you're feeling bold, try posting something flirty on his social media. If he uploads a new profile picture, for example, comment something like, "Cut pic! :)".  Public social media interactions can certainly be flirtatious. If you like or comment on a guy's posts a lot, he may get the sense you like him. However, a private message can give an extra sense of intimacy. Try chatting with him in private via social media. This shows an extra amount of interest.If he's on an app like Facebook messenger, try talking to him there. Send him a generic message, like, "Hey, what's up?" to begin a private conversation via social media. Share things with him via social media. For example, send him funny links or links to articles that may interest him. Send this material with a flirty message like, "Thought of you! :)".  

express your feelings directly.  text him when you have something to say.  interact with him on social media.  send direct messages on social media. 

 Many people feel they should be coy or standoffish with a boy they like. However, if a guy is interested in you as well, he will appreciate you being upfront. Also, people tend to be attracted to confidence. Approach him without hesitance.Make conversation with him whenever you can to demonstrate your feelings. For example, if you see him between class, walk up to him and say, "Hi." Make conversation about things like school and homework. Do not be afraid to text him if you have his number. He gave it to you for a reason, so don't hesitate to send him a message when you feel like it. Keep in mind that, if a guy does not like you, he may get frustrated if you give him too much extra affection. Pay attention to how he reacts. If he tends to pay attention to you in return, he may have feelings as well. If he seems disengaged, you may want to give him space and move on.  If you want someone to feel like you like them, show them you want to get to know them. Make a point of asking him about what's going on with him. Listen to what he says to convey genuine curiosity.Ask him about his life when you see him. Ask how his day is going or ask about something specific. For example, if you know he had a big test in physics, say something like, "How did your test go." Truly listen when he responds. Do not interrupt or talk over him. Instead, pay attention to what he's saying while maintaining eye contact and nodding when appropriate.  This is something small you can do to show you're invested. If the two of you are out, say, getting coffee, paying for something can be a great way to show you want this to be a date. This can help the guy see your feelings. Pay for his movie tickets if you see a film or his espresso when you're getting coffee.This can help make it clear a get-together is a date. Going out for coffee may seem friendly, but if you offer to pay the guy may get the message it's a date.  If you like a guy, you make this clear by becoming his personal cheerleader. Supporting someone's success can show your investment in them. It's a great way to make your feelings known.For example, if he plays a sport, show up to his game to cheer. You can even make a sign cheering him on specifically. If he's struggling in a class and does great on a test, be the first to congratulate him. Say something like, "I knew you would get a good grade. Awesome job!"  , It's often best just to tell someone about your feelings. If the guy does not seem to be getting the hint via your actions, make a point of telling him directly. Even if he does not feel the same way, you will have closure and will be able to proceed one way or another.Make it simple. Wait until the two of you are alone. Say something like, "Can we talk about something?" Be clear about your feelings. For example, say, "I just wanted you to know I have feelings for you. I thought it would be best just to put it out there." Remember, rejection hurts, but it happens to everyone. If he doesn't feel the same way, take some time to grieve before you move on. There are many other people out there and you will find the right person eventually.  

be confident about showing interest.  show interest in his life.  pay for something when you're out.  show him extra support.  tell him directly when you feel ready. 

 You need to be someone that people want to fall in love with if you want someone to fall in love with you. If you are a wonderful person, you will find that people will fall for you naturally.   Take good care of your body. Practice good diet and exercise, proper hygiene, and wear clean clothing that isn’t full of holes or stained. Do something with your life. Don’t just sit around watching television, or sitting in front of the computer! Give your life direction and purpose. Make sure that what you do is something you always wanted to do. The passion you feel for this activity is very attractive and your crush will notice the change in you. Be a good person. It may sound cheesy, but it's true. If you want others to treat you with care, respect, and love, you better start acting that way, too. People want to fall for others who are happy, who give generously of themselves, and are genuinely nice to others.; , You don’t want to snag a crush who’s really Mr. Wrong! He needs to be ready for a relationship and be compatible with you. If he isn’t, you will be wasting your time and his and somebody is going to end up with a broken heart.  Knowing someone really well is an important part of getting them to like you. This doesn’t just mean knowing basic details like where they work or their birthday. This means getting to know and like him for who he really is. If you like him for who he is, this will mean a lot to him.   Discuss topics that will show you his beliefs and values, like politics or religion. This is a good way to get to know someone. You should also learn his hopes and dreams.  Learn about and appreciate the things he enjoys. Don’t fake it, because he’ll be able to tell. Try to see it and experience it the way that he does. This will help you bond and find things in common.   Ask him to show you his favourite sport. You can also explore the his favourite bands.  He will be much more likely to care for you if you show him that he can rely on you emotionally and that you have faith in him, even when others might not.   Help him solve his problems when you can, whether you’re tutoring him in classes where he struggles or giving him a way to get out of his house if his parents are going through a divorce.  We want to be with someone who makes us better as a person. It makes us feel better about ourselves and reassures us that we can be good people if we try. Make your crush the best version of himself by encouraging him to do the things that he loves and giving him the space to do those things.   Remember: this is about helping him make the changes that he wants in his life. You should not to be condescending, try to change them into what you want them to be, or push unwanted help and advice on him.  Share your passions with your crush but also let them see how far you’ve come. He should see that you are happy and fulfilled because you do the things that you love and that make you unique. He will find it attractive that you are motivated to change your life for the better.   It’s okay to be flawed though. There’s nothing wrong with him seeing you struggle sometimes. Let him help you, if he offers. Together, you can make each other stronger, better people.  Respect that he is his own person and give him the space to be that person. Don’t get possessive and try to take up all of his time. If he sees that with you he can feel free and have support, he’ll be much more likely to fall for you.  Don’t constantly question the things that he says and does: trust him and show him that you trust him. Show him that you are a safe haven where he can find and give trust without having to worry that he will get hurt.   If he tells you a secret then you need to keep it. If you find out something that embarrasses him, don’t bring it up. Share your secrets with him and let him see sides of you that no one else does. Be vulnerable around him and let him comfort you. Don’t stress when he spends time around other girls. Knowing that you trust him will mean a lot to him.  If you want to get Miss Perfect you're going to need a few skills and a couple of tricks. But getting a girlfriend isn't always as hard as it seems. be confident and you'll win her over in no time!  , It's terrifying, the idea of asking out that perfect girl. What if she says no? Yikes! Get some helpful advice and you'll find it isn't nearly as hard as you think.  Getting a boyfriend can be tough stuff. Girls are in a tough position where we usually expect guys to find us! But there's nothing to stop you from finding prince charming if you find yourself getting lonely!  , Feel like you have terrible taste? You may have a crush, but if your track record for choosing people to crush on is terrible, you might want to take a hard look at how you find someone to moon over!  , This will make it much easier to nab your crush. Being an expert flirter makes you very hard to resist!  

be the best version of yourself.  make sure he’s mr right.  get to know him.  explore his hobbies and passions.  support him when he has a hard time.  help him be who he wants to be.  show him how great you are.  give him space.  create trust between you.  get a girlfriend.  ask her out.  get a boyfriend.  find that perfect person.  learn to flirt. 

 Don’t dwell on what might go wrong with the conversation. Instead, try to adopt a positive attitude before talking to your crush.If you’re feeling negative and discouraged, think of ways to put a positive spin on these negative thoughts.For example, if you find yourself thinking about reasons why your crush might not like you, think about reasons why she will like you instead.   Have a friend give you a pep talk to boost your confidence. The more optimistic you feel, the more positive your experience will be.; , Everyone gets nervous. It’s your brain’s natural reaction to stimulating circumstances. The trick is to channel your anxiety into excitement. You can do this by repeating this positive mantra: “I’m so excited!” Repeating this phrase will help you gather energy from your anxiety instead of losing your nerve.Any variation of “I’m so excited” will work. For example, you could say, “I’m so pumped about this!”  , If you find yourself losing your nerve, try to relax. Practice a breathing exercise or meditate for a few minutes. Closing your eyes and counting backwards from ten will also help calm your nerves. If you’re still feeling frantic, go for a quick walk or jog to shake off the stress.  Having a plan will make you less nervous. Decide what you’ll talk about. Write down a few sample questions on a notepad. You can refer to these questions while you’re on the phone if you get anxious. Avoid topics that you know you’ll disagree on. Try to focus on interests that you have in common instead.   If you’re worried that you’ll run out of conversation topics, read the newspaper or watch the news. If the conversation lags, you can bring up a current event and talk about it together.  Part of what makes reaching out to your crush so scary is that you have no control of the outcome. He may respond, or he may not, and there's little you can do to influence what he does, and that can be a little frightening. Allow yourself to feel optimistic and excited, by also know how to handle rejection if things don't go so well.   Know how to deal with negative thoughts. If your crush is not responsive, you may start putting yourself down, wondering if there's something wrong with you, or feeling like you will never find love. These are natural thoughts to have in the face of rejection, but just having these thoughts doesn't make them true. Know how to refute these negative thoughts ahead of time so you can put a stop to them right away. Practice self-care. Know what makes you feel better. If talking to your friends usually lifts you up, tell your friend you're going to be texting or calling your crush, and ask if you can hang out afterward. Or, make enough time so you can go for a run, watch a favorite show, or do something else that you know improves your mood.  Practice makes perfect, even when learning how to talk to your crush. Rehearse your conversations with a friend by sending some sample texts. Alternatively, call your friend and pretend she's your crush. Try out all your sample questions and see what works. After the phone call, ask your friend to give you her honest opinion about your performance.   Practicing with a friend will build your self-confidence and sharpen your conversation skills. If you’re persistent with practicing, you’ll be much more relaxed in stressful situations. , If you’re feeling bold, ask your crush in person if you can have her phone number. Alternatively, if you have a mutual friend, ask him to start a group text with a few people. This will give you access to your crush’s phone number.   After a few days of talking to the group, “accidentally” text your crush a particularly funny joke outside of the group text. If you don’t want to ask for a phone number in person, you can ask over a social media platform such as Facebook or Instagram.  Avoid calling during lunch or dinner hours as your crush will probably be busy eating. Similarly, avoid calling or texting in the early hours of the morning or late at night. He may be sleeping. If you wake him up, he won’t be very happy with you.   If your crush doesn’t answer the phone, leave a short message or send him a text and then go do something fun. Don't sit around waiting for him to call or text back — go live your life!  , If you’re texting, start the conversation with a good knock-knock joke to get their attention. After you type “knock knock,” she will have no choice but to respond.If you decide to call your crush, start with an overly-cheesy pickup line to make her laugh. Some other great opening lines include:“My friends don’t want to see the new Avengers movie, but I don’t want to go alone. Interested?” “You looked amazing today! What’s your secret?” “How would you define yourself in three emoji’s or less?”  , Avoid talking about controversial, weird, or unpleasant topics.These discussion topics bring negativity into your conversation. Instead, focus on fun experiences and shared interests. You want your crush to have positive feelings about talking to you. Otherwise, he may not want to talk to you again. For example:   “Have you ever been on any exciting vacations?” “I’m totally addicted to this new phone game. Have you played it?” “What are you going to do after you graduate?”  , Chances are good that you and your crush have a few things in common. If possible, skim her social media profiles to find some common ground. Make sure you don’t do too much research or you’ll come across as creepy;however, you probably have more in common than you think. Do you:   Go to the same school? Play the same sports? Take the same classes? Know the same people?  , Hopefully, you’ll have an interest in common with your crush, giving you an easy conversation topic. For example, if you share a favorite class together, ask your crush what he thought about the homework assignment. If you focus on these mutual interests, the conversation will flow naturally. For example:   “I also love playing video games! Do you have any favorites?” “That’s my favorite soccer team too! Do you have any game day traditions?” “If you tell me what’s on your bucket list, I’ll tell you what’s on mine.” “I love that TV show! Who’s your favorite character?”  , Once your crush answers, ask follow up questions. This will give your crush an opportunity to talk about herself. Ask questions that show you have a genuine interest in what she has to say. For example:   “We just got back from France. Where’s the coolest place you’ve ever been?” “What are you passionate about?” “I wish I could go to Hawaii. What’s your dream vacation?” “What’s your favorite class?”  , Gauge when the conversation is over. If there are long stretches of silence or the conversation becomes awkward politely excuse yourself. If you’re texting and your crush doesn’t respond immediately, give him time to answer.If you bombard him with text messages he'll start ignoring you and may even block your number.   When in doubt, keep your conversation under thirty minutes. You want to intrigue your crush and leave him wanting more, not exhaust him with your company.  

think positively.  embrace the nerves.  chill out.  figure out what you want to say.  consider multiple outcomes.  practice.  get her number.  choose the right time.  find a good opening line.  strike the right tone.  find common ground.  focus on mutual interests.everyone enjoys talking about their personal interests and hobbies.  ask questions.  respond to his cues. 

 Every morning, take a shower. Wash your hair, brush it out, and keep it styled the way you like. Put on deodorant. Even if you’re already friends with the boy you desire, poor hygiene will hurt your chances by showing him you don’t care about yourself.   A little makeup, perfume, or cologne can help. If you choose to use these, put on just enough to accentuate your features, such as a suitable lipstick and eyeliner. Don’t let makeup appear thick or perfume smell overwhelming.; , When you know you’ll be around him, dress to impress. Pick out your best clothes or buy some that fit your figure. The clothes you wear should not be tight, but they should fit you well. Good clothing also helps increase your confidence, which makes you appear more desirable to him.   Even after you start spending time with him, make yourself look presentable as much as possible. Wearing stained sweatpants is easy but it shows you aren’t trying to look good for him.  Practice walking around your room. Keep your head up and your back straight. Take small steps, neither too fast nor too slow. When you sit, maintain your posture, never slouching or hunching. Also, don’t cross your arms, or else you’ll appear closed off. Once you can do all of this in your room, go ahead and try to maintain good posture in public., Practice speaking out loud at home and to a mirror. Your voice should be loud and clear. Eliminate unnecessary pauses, as these will make you sound timid or uncertain. Know what you want to say and say it. If you speak too fast, slow down. Add breaths between sentences and give time for others to listen and speak. Once you feel comfortable at home, try speaking confidently to friends and strangers.Add in humor to emphasize your confidence. Don’t overdo it, but every once in awhile it’s okay to joke with the boy or someone else around you. Start out by speaking into a mirror, then move on to practicing this on friends, acquaintances, and strangers.  Approaching someone is difficult, but it’s even more intimidating when you’re interested romantically. Start out by asking for or offering help, commenting on a shared experience such as a school class, by complementing, or by making an observation, such as about what the person’s eating for lunch. Examples include “I found that class really difficult. What did you think of it?” or “I see you like the sandwiches here. I’m not much of a turkey type.”.As you get him to become more comfortable with you, progress the conversation. Learn more about him, such as is interests. Return the trust, but don’t go overboard. If you already know him, you’ll have some familiarity with him, but you’ll still need to talk and build more of a connection.  By talking to him, you should be able to find out what he likes. Now connect the two of you by finding activities you can share. If you both like bowling, for instance, you’ll be able to talk about bowling and then go bowl. Don’t think of this as a date. Instead, focus on having fun together.Being willing to try the things he likes is a good idea, but pretending to share his interests makes you look false and like you have less individuality. Go out as friends. You need to create moments that help you grow closer, which won’t happen if you come on too strong or overanalyze your interactions.  Even if hiding your personality seems to be working, it’ll hurt you in the end. At some point you’ll have to show him who you are in order to work towards a relationship. Now is the best time to reveal yourself and judge whether he will get along with you. If you like pop music, clothes, romantic comedies, and video games, for example, allow this to come out naturally. Don’t hide your true self., Physical contact is a great way to make him associate the pleasant feeling of touch with you. Choose opportune times, but let your contact appear unintentional. When talking to him, touch his hand or wrist. Stand close to him in crowds. Brush against his shoulders while passing.   When you’re first starting out with him, keep touch brief and not too intimate. You want to build his interest and coming on strong can make your affections seem less valuable in the long run.  At opportune times, lock onto his eyes. Eye contact is difficult since it will often make you feel vulnerable, but it is powerful. At a party, pick him out of the room and meet his eyes for at least a moment. When you’re talking or doing something fun, meet his eyes and linger for a moment.The eye contact in these moments should feel intense. If it doesn’t, that’s a sign that you still have to work at getting closer to him.  You want to be around him, so you have to treat him like you value his company. Encourage him during difficult times. If he had a rough day, reassure him. Wish him luck for tomorrow. Support his goals. Never turn against him when someone’s fighting with him. Instead, show that you appreciate him by complimenting his positive qualities and actions.This includes focusing your attention on him. Don’t get distracted by the attention from other boys.  A relationship can’t operate without trust. Over time, show him that he can open up to you about whatever he thinks or feels. Listen to him without judgment and don’t gossip with your friends. The gossip, even if it doesn’t come back to you, will make him reluctant to tell you anything and will stop you from bonding.To build this trust, you’ll also have to share your own life when appropriate. Confide your fears, hopes, and problems.  Look at the signs and adjust your approach. If he’s interested in you, he’ll want to be around you and make excuses to be close. He’ll lean towards you, keep his legs and arms uncrossed, his hands unclenched, and have his toes pointed at you. He may also make extended eye contact or look down bashfully.These are only signs, so they don’t guarantee he likes you enough to be your boyfriend. Continue spending time with him to gauge his feelings. If he doesn’t do many of these signs, he still may like you. He may be good at hiding his feelings or shy. If his body language is negative, stop what you’re doing. Readjust your behavior by repeating steps. He may simply not be into you. Mirroring body language often helps. If he’s tilting his head while looking at you, keep your head tilted too, for instance.  Eye contact and gentle touch are starts to more serious flirting. Start making your intentions more concrete. Come up with clever lines at opportune times that show you appreciate him and aren’t afraid to show it. For example, tell him, “You should wear that shirt, it makes you look cute” before you see him. Add in appropriate touches, such as putting a hand on his shirt as you pick up the material between your fingers.Don’t go overboard on this. Appear cool and controlled or else you run the risk of smothering him with attention.  You want to spend time with him, but too much time means you’re too close. You have to make him want to be with you and miss you while you’re not around. Don’t tend to his needs all the time. Put down the phone on occasion, after you let him know you’re going out, and make yourself seem socially desirable.Even in a relationship, you need to live your own life. Tend to those other aspects, such as friends, school, or work.  It’s important that you don’t smother him either. Being needy, demanding all his attention is a sure way to extinguish any feelings he’s developing. Keep your own distance from time to time. The absence can make him realize how much he needs you, even if the space you gave him came from something like sleeping in and missing his texts for a few hours., It’ll be tempting for you to stalk his social media or go through his phone when he leaves it near you. Doing this makes you look controlling. It shows that you have no trust in him, so you feel justified to invade his personal space and spy on him. Don’t question him about every little detail that comes from him interacting with other people.   Invading his privacy this way also makes you look insecure, which will undermine his desire to be in a relationship with you.  Good hints start moving you beyond the friendship stage. These can be as simple as noticing what he’s wearing or complimenting his personality. Saying, “You look cute today” suggests you have enough interest to notice him while easing him towards an escalation in your relationship.Avoid coming on too strong. Allow him feel that you’re a valuable catch he has earned. Judge his reaction. A compliment can encourage him, especially if he’s keeping his interest a secret. If he shows no reaction, go back to working on attracting him or move on.  Once your relationship starts to escalate, it’s easy to get wrapped up in the moment. You want him to be around you, so you demand more of him while exaggerating his qualities. Keep calm and stick to the plan of spending some time tending to the other aspects of your life. Accept him for who he is if you wish to make him into a boyfriend.   Many people think they can change their partner inside of a relationship. If you find yourself thinking this, it’s a sign that he’s not right for you. Keep his expectations of you in line, too. Don’t be high-maintenance.  If he hasn’t already made a move, you can push the issue a little. One option is to ease him into it by asking what he would do if you were his significant other. When you’re ready to take the risk, be up front with him. Choose a quiet, intimate moment. Either come out and say it or ease him into it by starting off saying, “So I’ve been thinking…” Explain to him you want a relationship and ask him what he thinks.If he doesn’t come right out and commit, chances are his feelings aren’t strong enough. Giving him a little space after you ask can help if he’s shy or hesitant.  Sometimes he’s not right for you. It can hurt to put in this effort and find out he doesn’t share your feelings. Walk away. Don’t maintain hope, or else you’ll hurt yourself by waiting for him. Also, don’t try to force him to be with you. This only makes it less likely he’ll have feelings for you. Go on and live your life. There are plenty of boys, and maybe someday you’ll even run into this one at a better time.Remember that a good relationship is one that works for both of you. He may not be a good fit.  

clean yourself.  dress well.  correct your posture.  speak with confidence.  start conversations.  find common interests.  be yourself.  gently touch him.  make eye contact.  support him.  build a deeper trust.  monitor body language.  compliment him.  go out with your friends.  give him his own space.  offer privacy.  drop hints about your intentions.  reduce your expectations.  make a move.  move on if he’s not interested. 

 Starting your texting session with a question is a great way to show you're interested in your crush and to make it easy for him to respond. He will also appreciate that you're being direct, and that you're not wasting his time with a text that he doesn't even know how to answer. Here are some ways to ask a good question:   Ask him something specific about himself. This will show that you're interested in what he's been up to. Ask him something he can easily answer. Don't ask him about what he thinks is the meaning of life; ask him how he did on his math test. Be direct. He will appreciate a question that is clear and not too wordy. Ask an open-ended question. If you ask him something that he can answer in just a few words, then it will be hard to continue the conversation. Instead of saying, "When did you get home last night?" ask, "How was the party last night?" This will give him more to work with.; , He will be impressed by you if you don't just send him the kind of text anyone could send. Instead of just saying hello, you can ask an interesting question, or tell him something that will make him want to respond to you and pursue the conversation further.   Make him laugh. Being clever early on will make him want to make you laugh in return. Make a witty observation. This is another great way to start, as long as he knows how to answer your statement. Don't try too hard to craft the perfect opening. If you do, he will be able to tell.  You should let him know that you're able to keep up a lively conversation, and keep things open so he feels like it's easy to keep talking to you. Being engaging means not only giving the right response to him, but making it easy for him to keep the conversation going. Here's how to do it:   Ask him about something he's done. He'll love to tell you more about himself. This will also show that you pay attention to the things he tells you. Be witty. Don't just say "hahaha" if he says something funny. This will end the conversation. Instead, fire back with something equally funny to show that you can play ball. Tell him something he's never heard before. Maybe you heard something really weird on the news, or you were impressed by a random fact. Tell him what you know and he'll ask some questions to follow up. Be playful. He'll appreciate seeing your silly side and will be silly back if you set the right tone. You can show that you're smart without taking yourself too seriously, and he will love that.  If you're at the level where you're ready to flirt, then you should have fun with him without giving your feelings away too much. Flirting will make him excited to talk to you, and he'll be impressed by your boldness as long as you don't go overboard. Here's what to do:   Tease him. Don't be afraid to tease him a little bit, and to be teased back. If you're at the right stage in your relationship, let him know what you're wearing, and he'll be even more excited to see you. Send him an occasional winky face, or make a cute innuendo that lets him know you're excited to see him on your next date...and that things may get hot and heavy when you do.  If you want to keep him interested, you have to be interesting. You should show him that you're a well-rounded person with a variety of interests and friends and that you're always up to something new. He should think that you have a busy life and should feel lucky that you have time to talk to him through texting. If he feels like you spend all your time waiting around for a text from him, then he'll quickly lose interest.   Show that you have a life. Let him know when you're going out with friends, taking a karate class, or watching a new movie. He'll know that your life doesn't revolve around talking to him, and will want to be a part of it even more. Find a common interest. Though you may not have time for a deep conversation when you're texting, he'll be more excited to talk to you if he finds out you like the same band or have the same favorite TV show. Mention something that you're passionate about. This will show him that you are a driven person with a variety of interests.  It's important to end things at the right time so your guy stays interested. If he's always the one to end the conversation, or if you just keep dragging the conversation on when he's busy or when there's nothing left to say, then he will leave the conversation without wanting more. Here's how to know when to end the conversation:   If you're just struggling to find anything to talk about. If he's giving you one word responses, like "Yes," or "No," then he may not want to keep talking. If he's not asking you any questions back, then he may only be responding to you out of politeness. If he's always the one to end the conversation. Mix things up and make sure that you're the one who has to go at least half the time.  You shouldn't just end the conversation by saying, "See ya!" Instead, you should leave the conversation open so it will be easy for you to chat again. This can be as simple as telling him you're looking forward to seeing him, or letting him know about something interesting that you're doing so he can ask about it later. Here's how to do it:   If you've already started casually seeing each other, there's no harm in letting him know that you're excited to see him. If you've started hooking up, tell him that you can't wait to show him the new lingerie you bought for your date. Leave him with a sexy image in his mind, so he'll be anticipating your new panties. Tell him where you have to go. If you're going to a concert of a band you both like, tell him so he can ask about it later. Leave an opening for him to ask you out. Casually mention that you're going out with a few friends and that it would be fun to hang out with him. If he wants to see you and isn't too shy, he may ask.  The last thing a guy wants is a girl who is too needy. If you're already showing signs that you're needy over texts, then he will have no doubt that you're even needier in person. Your texts should be fun and breezy, and should not make him feel like you want something from him. Here's what not to do:   Don't ever say, "Did you get my text?" Unless his phone was stolen, then yes, he got your text, and he didn't feel like answering. Don't make the situation more uncomfortable than it needs to be. You can ask about his weekend, but don't ask if he hooked up with another girl, or if he saw any cute girls out at the bar last night. This will just make you look jealous, and a little creepy. Don't send him a question mark if he doesn't respond to your text. This will make him feel like you're breathing over his shoulder and that you're desperate to hear from him.  Your texts should let your guy know that you're into him, and that you're a cool chick to talk to. Your texts should not make the guy feel like you're obsessing over talking to him and that you're at his back and call and are willing to put your life on hold to respond to him. Here are some things you should not do to avoid looking too eager:   Don't say, "You there?" if he hasn't responded in five minutes. Don't text him twice or three times in a row. Wait for him to respond first. Don't respond too quickly. You don't want it to look like you're just waiting around for a text from him. If he's taken four hours to respond to you, don't fire back an answer as soon as you hear from him. Take six hours to respond to him — or even seven. Don't keep the conversation going when he clearly wants to stop. If he's only giving you one word answers, or barely answering, lay off. Don't use too many emoticons. The occasional winky face or smiley face will let him know you're flirting, but a million exclamation marks or smiley faces will scare him off. Don't text him when you're supposed to be having fun. If you're out with your girlfriends or at a party, you can send him the occasional text to let him know you're thinking of him, but don't make him think that you don't know how to have fun because you're too busy being tied to your phone.  The last thing you want to do when you're texting a guy you like is to completely embarrass yourself. Once you embarrass yourself through your texts, it may be hard to strike up a conversation again, and even harder to build a relationship with the person you like. Here are some things you should not do:   Avoid revealing how you really feel about him. Texting is the time to be cute and to further your relationship. It's not the time to pour your heart out. This is something you can do in person, once the time is right. Telling him how much you like him via text will make you look a bit desperate and afraid of having a real conversation in person. Don't text him nine times in a row with your deep feelings. If he has stepped away from the phone for a while and returns to a filled inbox, he will just be freaked out.  Do not send him nude photos. Even if your relationship has progressed and you've had some sexy time, this is the stupidest thing you can do. Not only may he think you're too forward, but if you don't know him that well, he can end up being a creep and may hold it against you later.  

ask a good question.  be original.  be engaging.  be flirtatious.  be interesting.  know when to end the conversation.  leave him with something to think about.  don't be too needy.  don't be too eager.  don't embarrass yourself. 

 One way to let your crush see that you like him without opening your mouth is to simply lock eyes with him. Make eye contact for just one or two seconds—just enough time to show you’re paying attention—and then look down at the floor or just avert your gaze. This will show your crush that you like him without being too obvious; if you simply stare at him, that may be coming on too strong.   You can try this trick just one or two times when you’re in the same room together, whether you’re at a party or in class. Just try to be subtle about it; you don’t want him to catch you staring too many times! You can even give him a small flirtatious smile to go along with the look.; , You don’t need to give your crush an ear-to-ear grin to show him that you’re interested. Simply look at him, give him a small smile, and then look away or start a conversation with him. Your smile shouldn’t be too big or eager, or he may just think you’re being friendly; instead, try to be a little bit mysterious when you smile at him, so you play coy while letting him know you’re interested.   If you really want to up your flirtation factor, you can even learn to smile with your eyes.  Another way to let your crush know you like him is through some simple open body language. If your body is “open,” that means that you’re standing tall, face your crush, turn your feet and shoulders toward him, and keep your arms out instead of crossed over your chest. This shows your crush that you’re interested in him and that you like being around him. The next time you’re standing next to him or sitting next to him, make sure you’re turning your body in his direction so he sees that you like him.   For example, if you’re talking to him and cross your legs, make sure your crossed leg is crossed toward him, not away, so you have more of an open posture.  Another way to show your crush that you like him is to simply move a bit closer to him, whether you’re talking to him or just hanging out at the same party. You don’t need to be too forward or start close-talking or making him uncomfortable, but you should show him that you like him by simply gravitating toward him in social situations. Without being clingy, you can show your crush that you like him simply by paying a bit more attention than you do to other guys by standing next to him, sitting by him, or making sure you get a chance to chat when you’re in a small group.   When you do talk to him, you can make an effort to stand a bit closer or to sit a bit closer to him as the conversation progresses. If he doesn’t move away but moves toward you, then this may be a sign that he returns your feelings.  If you want to tell your crush you like him without blurting it out completely, one thing you can do is to give him a light touch or two. If you’re talking to him or pass by him, you can give him a light touch on the shoulder or upper arm, or even playfully swat his arm if he’s teasing you. If you’re standing or sitting next to him, you can casually let your feet or knees touch from time to time to show him that you want to get closer.   Just a bit of physical attention will let your crush know that you like him. You don’t need to push it too far; just touching him once or twice during a conversation will show him that you like him.  Now, this doesn’t mean that you have to dress to the nines or put on a ton of makeup to get your crush’s attention. However, it does mean that you should look and feel beautiful, fresh, and clean when you talk to your crush; putting an effort into your appearance will give you a boost of confidence, and it will also show your crush that you want to make a good impression on him. Make sure to wear clothes that make you feel comfortable and not to pretend to be someone you’re not.   If you’re hanging out with your crush and just a small group of people, dressing up will show him that you’ve put some thought into how you look for him, which may indicate that you do have a crush on him.  One way to show the guy you like him is to try to be his friend. As long as you don’t get into the friend zone, this will show that you’re taking a real interest in him. Ask him questions about his life, share his interests, and just spend some time around him, whether you’re working on a group project or hanging out with friends. Just make sure he doesn’t see you as a kid sister or one of the guys, and don’t fall into the role of the person who hears about his romantic troubles.   Becoming his friend will show him that you want to get closer to him. This can be a great way to show him you like him, especially if you don’t have many other guy friends. Take it slow. If you don’t know him very well, start with a simple conversation and work your way up to hanging out.  If you want to tell your crush you like him, then you should show him that you’re comfortable being yourself around him. If you find yourself bragging, talking about how great you are, telling exaggerated stories for laughs, or just doing something that doesn’t feel like you, then this won’t win your crush over. He’ll be more likely to think you have a real interest in him if you’re being yourself, opening up, and talking about your interests or your friends.   Remember that, in the end, you want a guy who likes you for who you are. You don’t want him to like you for being someone else, because that will make it hard to start a real relationship while staying true to who you are.  A small gift can be a simple way to show your crush that you like him without coming on too strong. Simply get him something he’s mentioned or something you think he would like, such as a book or a CD. You can also be silly and get him something more practical, like a pack of pencils because you noticed that he never remembers to bring a pencil to class. You can write him a short note along with the gift and give it to him in person or leave it on his desk.   Of course, this works best if you know him and are already friends; if you’ve never met, then giving him a gift may overwhelm him a little.  One way to tell your crush you like him is to show a genuine interest in him. To do this, you should simply ask him questions about his life and make an effort to really listen to the answers instead of planning your next move. Ask him about his weekend plans, his favorite sports teams, his school activities, his friends, or his favorite bands or movie stars to get a conversation going; this will show that you care about him as a person, and that you may have a little crush on him as well.   You can also ask him about his pets, his favorite movies, or his favorite things to do for fun. Just make sure not to ask too many personal questions at first or he may get uncomfortable. Make sure to share stuff about yourself too; you don’t want to sound like you’re interrogating him.  Your crush will start to see that you like him if you start teasing him a bit. You don’t need to lay it on too thick to get the message across; just playfully tease him about his new haircut, his favorite sports team (especially if the team keeps losing), his obsession with his favorite band, or other things you know he won’t take too personally. This shows that you like him enough to engage him in a fun, lighthearted conversation.   Just make sure he knows you’re teasing and that he takes it well. He may be too sensitive about his favorite sports team, for example, to think there’s anything funny about the fact that they keep losing. Let him see that you don’t tease just anybody. If he thinks that you tease all of his friends, too, then he won’t see that he’s special to you.  Your crush will suspect that you like him if you start helping him out. You don’t need to go too far out of your way to help him, but making just a few small gestures can show him that you really do have a special interest in him. This can mean picking up his homework for him when he’s home sick, letting him borrow a textbook, or answering some questions that he may have. This can be a great way to show him you care as long as he doesn’t take advantage of you.   Ideally, he should find a way to help you out, too. You don’t want him to think that you’ll just be there at his beck and call. Look for ways that you can help him; he may be too shy to do something like ask for him with the math homework, but you can offer to do it and see what he says.  Flirting will definitely let your crush know that you’re into him. To flirt with him, you just have to tease him a bit, be playful, and show a special interest in him over all of the other guys in the room. You can play a little bit hard to get while letting him see that you do like him by smiling at him, laughing at his jokes, and going out of your way to make him see that you want to spend more time with him.   Flirting can be a little tricky to master, but it basically means not taking yourself too seriously while you chat about lighthearted topics with your crush, letting him see that you want to know what he has to say while also teasing him a little bit. You can lick your lips or play with your hair a bit while you talk to your crush to be a bit more playful.  If you do want your crush to know how much you like him, you should make sure to tell him yourself, even if you do it in a letter. While having your friends tell your crush how you feel may be easier, it will make you look like you’re not ready for a mature relationship or like you don’t feel comfortable talking to him yourself. Even if he does say that he likes you back, this won’t start your relationship off on the right foot.   Plus, you don’t want him to feel annoyed by all of your friends surrounding him; respect his privacy and tell him about your feelings yourself.  If you’re too afraid to tell your crush you like him in person, then one thing you can do is to write him a short note or a longer letter letting him know how you feel. You can slide it into his locker or hand it to him. Tell him that you like him, give him a reason or two why if you want, and ask if he returns your feelings. This is a great way to directly tell him how you feel while taking off some of the pressure of having to do it in person.   Keep it short and sweet. You don’t want to go into too much detail about how you like him without knowing whether or not he returns your feelings. You can tell him the best way to contact you, either by telling him where he can leave his response or by giving him your number.  Another way to tell him that you like him is to give him a call and simply to tell him how you feel. Yeah, this technically means telling him how you feel with words, but if you find that telling him without words hasn’t been working for you, then it may be time to come out with it. Give him a call, take a deep breath, and quickly tell him how you feel and ask him if he returns your feelings. You’ll have your answer before you know it.   Just say something like, “I’ve had a lot of fun hanging out with you for the past few weeks, and I want you to know that I like you. I wanted to know if you shared my feelings.”  , If the idea of calling him to tell him your feelings doesn’t feel quite right, then you may just have to pick the right time and place to have the conversation in person. Just ask him if he can meet you in a place where you can be alone, make eye contact, and simply tell him how you feel. Give him some time to react and respond and try not to put the pressure on him; keep things lighthearted instead of sounding intense.   You can make a bit of small talk to make him comfortable, but don’t be afraid to jump in and share your feelings. You can give him a small compliment or two while you say that you like him. You can say something like, “Nobody can make me laugh like you can” to show why you like him.  Once your crush knows you like him, he’ll either say he shares your feelings or will want to stay friends. If he says he likes you too, then you can celebrate and get excited to start a relationship with him. If he doesn’t feel the same way, however, it’s important to stay mature and to keep things positive instead of getting emotional or making him feel bad for not feeling the same way. Though you will be upset, you should make it seem like it’s not a big deal and then be sad about it once you’re away from your crush.   No matter what happens, you want to leave a good impression. If you start calling him names or being mean to him for not sharing your feelings, that will take you down a dark path. Even if he doesn’t share your feelings, he’ll respect you for being open and honest with him. You should be proud of yourself for putting yourself out there and making an effort.  

make eye contact—and then break it.  smile.  turn your body toward your crush.  move closer to him.  break the touch barrier.  look your best.  become friends.  don’t show off.  give him a small gift.  ask him questions to show that you care.  tease him.  help him out.  flirt with him.  don’t have your friends tell him.  write him a note or a letter.  call him.  just tell him in person.  react appropriately. 

 Does he try to touch you? Even just little touches relatively frequently could indicate he likes you.   Do you ever find him poking you or tickling you? If so, this is called flirting 101! Touch is a useful way to tell if a guy likes you, because guys flirt with girls they don't even like all the time, depending on who they are. So if he tickles or touches you, he is obviously flirting.; , Looking sheepish or pretending to think every time you catch him looking at you is a sign of interest. Do you ever glance over at him and catch him staring at you? If you do, there is hope that he likes you. But it also depends on how often you catch him looking or how long you do. Don't give up yet!   If you catch him looking at you every day in every class, multiple times for more than three seconds, you're in luck! Usually if he likes you he will stare a you for a bit and not lose eye contact after a few seconds and will continuously do it. If you catch him looking at you for a couple seconds but he looks away, this is still a good sign, as long as he does it more than once. If he only looks at you for a second but turns away during one class, he probably has no feelings for you. He is probably just looking around. If he looks away and smiles, this could mean he likes you. If he keeps looking and laughs after, this could also mean he likes you.  If he is smiling at you a lot, this is a great sign of fondness.  It is a positive sign if the guy you like tells a lot of jokes near you. Usually this means that the guy wants to be near you. Also, notice if he is near members of your group in science class for example, and he all of the sudden talks to them a lot. This means he wants to get an excuse to get closer to you.  If a guy really likes you, he will usually try to find ways to talk to you, even goofy ways.   Remember that guys often have a hard time talking to girls because they're nervous. If he stutters or gives awkward replies, it could be a sign that he likes you.  Do you ever find him butting into your conversations with a friend? This could mean he is trying to spark a conversation with you and wants to talk. Let him! Joke around a bit to let him know you accept him.  Is he coming up often and talking to your friends but not necessarily you? He may be working his way around to you, and using your friends as the excuse to be near.  If he sits beside you or somewhere close and then tries to talk to you, this is a good sign.  If he starts showing up where ever you are, he may be following you to find a good time to talk to you.  Have you ever found him trying to race or compete with you in gym class? This is also an obvious way to tell if guys like you. He will probably try to catch up with you and give you sarcastic comments that make you want to beat him. This competitiveness will be a great way to show him what you got and flirt at the same time.  Asking you to be his partner in class or to come over and study could mean he likes you (or it could mean he is picking your brains for his assignment, so do be careful here). Furthermore, if you decline and he later denies having anything to do with asking you, he may be interested.   For example: If there is a math problem that he couldn't do, or any other example, and he gets up and comes to you even if he could have gotten the answer from someone else, such as his best friend, this is an indication that he likes you.  If he overreacts when you spend time with another guy, it might be a sign of his interest in you. Beware though, if he's a controlling type, an overreaction is not a sign of affection but one of control.   Does he ever get angry or upset when you are talking to or are fooling around with other boys? Does he give you looks? This could mean that he is jealous! This is also another obvious way to tell if he likes you. By seeing another guy with you, he wishes it could be him talking and laughing to you.  You can often find out if a guy likes you by looking him straight in the eyes and asking him if he likes you. If he blushes, smiles slightly, or says nothing, this could mean he likes you. Try it!  

pay attention to what he does.  catch him if he takes frequent glances in your direction.  check for smiles.  consider whether he has tried to talk to you or followed you.  notice if he laughs or talks about random things around you.  watch for a constant need to butt in.  consider whether he is always making an excuse to talk to your friends.  notice where he sits.  notice if you see him frequently all of the sudden.  consider competitiveness as a possible sign of liking you.  watch for him asking you to be his study buddy.  watch how he responds when you are with another guy.  give him the death glare. 

 A guy who likes you online will often make time to talk and message with you. For instance, he might message you frequently even when you are offline. You may also find that you spend hours messaging back and forth throughout the day and even into the night. This is a sign that he likes talking to you and is making time in his schedule to communicate., If you send a message to him and he takes over an hour to respond and you know that he is online, this likely means that he is just being polite. Alternatively, if he messages back right away and then starts up a conversation he probably likes you.Similarly, a guy who likes you will often message you as soon as you log onto Facebook messenger or any other messaging app.  Some guys will respond to your messages just because they are polite. If this is the case, they will likely respond with short, one word answers and will rarely try and engage in a meaningful conversation. Alternatively, if a boy likes you, he will try to get to know you, ask your advice or opinion, or share stories about his day.   If he is interested he might say "how was your day?" or "what are you up to this weekend?" These types of questions reveal that he wants to be apart of your everyday life.  Boys will often flirt when they like someone. Signs of online flirting include compliments, light hearted jokes, the use of exclamation points, emoticons, or bitmojis.He might say something like "you look so cute in your profile picture."  , Never pin all your hopes or fears on just one or two online conversations. Lots of people run their instant messengers in the background whether they have the time to chat or not. His short responses may just signal that he is busy or preoccupied.If this becomes a regular pattern, it may be a sign that he is not interested in you.  

notice if he spends time messaging you.  look for him to respond to your messages quickly.  analyze the quality of messages he sends.  look for signs of flirting.  don’t draw conclusions from one interaction. 

 You should always give your guy the opportunity to realize for himself that you like him so that he can do something about it if he wants to. Be a little flirty and be sure to spend time with him. Try to introduce little touches and other hints. Just don't drag this on too long!   Try biting your lip every time he looks at you or smile nervously. Look into his eyes and then turn away slowly.; , It's important to choose a good time to talk. You don't want him to be distracted, upset about something else, or just downright busy! That will kill your chances before you even get started. Talk to him about setting aside some good time to talk, or try to catch him at a time when you know he won't be busy.  Talk to him in private. Confessing your crush in front of other people will make him feel pressured and embarrassed, and you don't want that! People that feel cornered can be unwilling to admit how they really feel. Instead, get him on his own so that the two of you can have a real heart-to-heart.  When confessing your feelings, you have to just get out there and say how you feel. Be confident! Guys will think this is sexy. You also have to be bold because you're going to need to take the initiative in talking about how you feel and whether the two of you could have anything.  The most basic way to confess your crush is to just come right out and say it. This can take courage, but generally people will appreciate your honesty and will be flattered by your bravery. This avoids gimmicks and shows how much you really think they're worth. Here are some examples of how to say it:   "Hey, Brian. I thought you deserved to know that I have very strong feelings for you. You don't have to return my feelings, but I thought it was only right for you to know." "Michael: you're special. You're kind, smart, and funny and I am so much happier when you're around. I want us to be more than friends. I hope you see, like I do, that we could be something really great."  , Use his interests in order to confess your feelings. You can use this simply to give yourself an opening (for example, by going rock climbing with him) or you can use it to confess in a unique way (for example, by inviting him over and having the Han Solo/Princess Leia flirt scene queued up on your TV).  You probably don't remember what mixtapes are, but using songs to confess feelings is still a viable option.   Find a song you know he'll love. Ask to borrow a USB drive from him to transfer a file from a school/work computer to your personal computer. Leave the mp3 of the song on the USB, specially named so he'll know: "MIKE - Tessa Wants to Hold Your Hand" or some other reference to the song. Good song options include: "I Want To Hold Your Hand" by the Beatles, Frank Sinatra's "Let's Fall In Love", or Daft Punk's "Digital Love".  You can make him a present to confess your feelings. Try to tailor it to your crush, and if you two were already friends try to use it to remind him of the wonderful times you've had together.   Paint a small wooden box with both of your initials in a heart, and fill the box with pics of the two of you hanging out, stubs from movies you saw together, or other reminders of fun things you've done together. Put together a relaxation care package, with two movie tickets, two bags of candy, and a message something like, "I know you had a hard time with finals last week. I'd love the chance to wind down with you. If you're not interested, no worries! Take whoever you want...but I'd love the chance to make you laugh until you forget what quadratic polynomials are."  , There's nothing more romantic than some old-fashioned letter writing. Write him a letter telling him how you feel and put it in his locker or (if you know his address) mail it to his house. You can also leave it in a place where you know he'll find it, like in his books or his desk.   Spritz it with a bit of your perfume to make it extra exciting.  Make a YouTube video confessing your crush (you probably shouldn't mention him by name). Tell him how you feel and why. Then email or text him a QR code with the link to the video. You can also print out the code and put it in is locker or tape it inside his textbook.  Don't break right out into the "I love you"s and don't talk about the future you want the two of you to have. You want to avoid speaking in definite terms about the future because this creates a lot of pressure and expectations for him...which is stressful and can scare him away!   Instead, speak in terms of what you want to try or what you hope might become real eventually. "I hope we can try being more than friends,", etc.  Don't be creepy when you tell him how you feel. This means no begging, no bargaining, and try not to touch him or get into his personal space until you know he feels the same way. You also shouldn't cling around him if he needs time to think about what you said.  If you can, tell him how you feel in person. Using social media or a text can come across as not being very serious or, worse, being a joke. This is not how you want to start things with him.  You don't want to rush into telling him and if he returns your feelings, don't rush into a serious relationship. If you're going to go through the torture of confessing, you want to be sure that you really like him first, right? This is can be a long process and one that will continue even if you start dating.   Just focus on getting to know him for who he really is, by spending time with him and talking about things that are important to you: what you both want for the future, what your beliefs are, and what you like to do for fun.  Don't worry about being rejected. It can feel awful to be rejected, but in a few years you probably won't remember it at all. Remember: it's his loss. You don't want to be with someone that doesn't like you as much as you like them anyway. You deserve better than that!  , If he does return your feelings, make sure to actually ask him out if he doesn't ask you out! You shouldn't feel bad about making your intentions clear or taking initiative like this: sometimes it's necessary to get what you want out of life! With feelings confessed, asking him out is as simple as coming up with an idea for a date and taking things from there. Just ask!  , If you strike out with him or if he's a real jerk about rejecting you, you might want to take a look at the kinds of guys you find yourself interested in. Stop pursuing guys who don't respect you or like you for who you really are. You might find you have better luck if you focus on what's important: nice guys who have their priorities in the right place.  

give him some signs.  find a good time.  talk to him in private.  be bold.  say it - it's simple.  use his interests.  use a song.  make him a present.  write him a letter.  make a video.  don't pressure him.  don't be creepy.  don't use social media or a phone.  don't rush into things.  don't sweat rejection.  ask him out, if he returns your feelings.  look for good guys. 

 Does this guy “like” every Facebook status update and Instagram picture you post? Better yet, does he frequently comment on your posts? This is a sign that he wants to interact with you and may indicate that he likes you.Look to see if he comments on other people’s posts as well. If he comments frequently, this may just reveal that he is an avid social media user. However, if he rarely “likes” or comments on other posts, this is a sign that he might have feelings for you.  After he publicly comments on one of your photos or posts, respond to him. If he is eager to start up a conversation with you this way, it may reveal that he likes you or at the very least enjoys messaging with you.For example, he may say "That is a great photo! Where are you?" You could respond by saying "I was in Vancouver last week. Such a beautiful city! Have you been?"  , If a guy you just met starts "liking" or commenting on old photos of you, this is a sig that he is interested. It means that he has spent time looking back through your old photos probably because he wants to know you better or he just enjoys looking at pictures of you!, When a guy likes you, he will want to connect with you and follow you on a variety of different social media platforms. For example, he may add you to Facebook and Snapchat, and start following you on Twitter and Instagram.   Adding you to a number of social media sites is likely a sign that he wants to look through your posts, photos, and selfies in an attempt to get to know you better.  

see if he interacts with your posts.  reply to his comments.  notice if he comments on old pictures or posts.  check to see if he has added you on multiple social media platforms. 

 If a boy you met online likes you, he will likely want to get to know you better. Does he ask you questions about your life? If he responds and engages with your answers, it may be a sign that he likes you.He might ask about your job, hobbies, and family in an attempt to get to know you better. Showing an interest in your life is a sign that he likes you. That being said, if he asks you really personal but irrelevant questions, like what your address is or whether or not you’re home alone, he might have other motives.  If he asks you to meet up for coffee or go on a date, that is a tell-tale sign that he likes you and wants to get to know you better. Some guys are shy or timid and may not ask to meet up. If you are interested in him, take the initiative and say "do you want to grab a drink sometime?" If he responds quickly and enthusiastically, it may mean that he likes you too.Alternatively, he may say "Sure, just let me check my schedule." If he never gets back to you with his availability he is probably not interested.  After awhile it may become tedious trying to pick up on signals to see if he has feelings for you. You can always try and be direct and simply ask him how he feels about you. You could say "I feel like we have a really good connection and I am starting to develop feelings for you. Do you feel the same?" This way you will get straight to the point and you can stop guessing about his feelings and intentions., Once you have met and gone on a couple dates, you may be wondering if this is actually going anywhere. One way to see if he likes you is to check if he has removed his online dating profile. This could be a sign that he has met someone he likes (you) and is no longer interested in online dating.  

notice if he wants to learn more about you.  ask if he wants to meet you in person.  be direct and ask if he likes you.  see if he takes down his online dating profile. 

 If you know for a fact that the guy you like likes you back, that should give you all the confidence in the world. Most people aren't sure at all, or maybe have a hunch. So act confident, because confidence is attractive. It will make a difference.   Before you ask him, tell yourself that you already have the hardest part under control: You've gotten him to like you. Now you just have to act on that attraction. This gets easier as time goes on. The hardest part is the first time you tell him; everything after that is a downhill ride.; , Giving him hints might even cause him to be more confident and act on his attraction and ask you out!   Compliment him about something he does well, but teasingly. This will come off flirty and won't bother him because he won't be insecure about something he's really good at:  "If I would have known that you'd single-handedly destroy the other football team, I wouldn't have come. I like a little excitement, okay?!"   Tell him how much you appreciate him. Being a little sarcastic is good, but being sincere is even better:  "Hey, thanks for helping me out with that birthday celebration. You make a pretty great friend. Always stay that way."   Pick him up when he's down. He might not show it the same way that other people show it, but try to recognize when he's not feeling his best:  "Don't worry about Felix, okay? He's a jerk and he knows it. Don't let it hurt your confidence. You're way better than him anyway."    , Chances are you're gotten close enough to him that you're experimented a little with touching him in safe places. If you've already done that, great. If you haven't, try some of these little tricks to communicate your affection before you actually come out and say it.   Learn to touch his hand, arm, and shoulder. When you're making a point, reach over and casually touch his hand. When you're reminding him of something or trying to be really serious, touch his arm or the back of his shoulder. It should send shivers down his spine. Hang or rest on his shoulder. Pretend to be bored and rest your head on his shoulder. Or simply rest your hands on his shoulder. Give him a good look in his eyes if he looks back at you.  This could be a date, or something that you guys regularly do, like walk to the corner store for a soda. He doesn't have to know that it's a date, but if he asks whether it's a date, tell him you'd want it to be. That will tell a guy that you like him without actually going out and saying it.   You can try something like:  "Hey, my dad got me these two tickets for a movie on Saturday, but my best friend bailed, so I was wondering if you wanted to be an even-better friend and come with me?" "I've been meaning to go on this hike past Malibu for ages and I need a hiking partner. Are you doing anything on Sunday?"    , This is for building rapport, or chemistry. You don't want to just blurt out that you like him. You want to slowly build up to it, waiting for just the right moment.   Talk about things that he likes talking about, for example. Build up chemistry by asking him questions about subjects that he's enthusiastic about. Once he gets going, the conversation should really begin to flow, and you probably won't have to do all that much talking. Talk about funny things. Laughter is great for chemistry. Tell inside jokes that you only share with him. Gently tease him, remembering to touch him on the arm or shoulder. Just be silly with him; ask him to give you a piggyback ride, or get him to do an impression of one of your teachers.  Make sure you have a couple of crucial things under control right before you ask him. If you're in a public place, excuse yourself and go to the bathroom for a moment. While you're there, check:   That your breath smells nice. If he swoops in for a kiss, you want to be ready. Pop a mint into your mouth. That your hair and makeup looks great. Touch up your lips with a little balm (not gloss and definitely not lipstick) and make sure you're looking your best. That you're confident. If you have no confidence, it's best to wait until you can ask him with confidence. Don't worry though, you have no reason to worry!  , Wait for the right moment and just come out with it. Maybe wait until the end of the date, so there's no awkwardness after you confess your feelings, and he does his. Here's a couple different options.   Short and sweet: "Maybe you've already noticed this, but I really like you. I was hoping you felt the same and we could do this again next weekend."  Long and heartfelt: "This is really hard to do but I need to do it. Ever since we've become friends, I started liking you. It came slow at first. And then I noticed how funny you are, and it came a little more. When I really started having conversations with you, I felt it even more. And right now, right here, I feel it most of all."   , You've given him the perfect opportunity to open up to you, and he better take it. You should be getting a really nice, or even romantic response from him. Remember to smile and look at his eyes. This should give him the confidence to kiss you, but if he doesn't, don't worry.  Maybe he'll just plan the next date automatically after you tell him how you feel. If so, that's great. Still, he might need a little nudging. In that case, say something like:   "So I was thinking that we could do something like this again sometime. Because I set this one up, will you set the next one up? I'm really easy to please, I promise. I'm a sucker for movies, walks on the beach, or shopping. But I also like to be surprised!"  

remind yourself how confident you should be.  continue flirting with him.  break the touch barrier, if you haven't already.  plan a special day together.  while on your date or excursion, keep the conversation up and the flirting going.  right before you ask him, go through your checklist.  go out and tell him.  wait for his response.  plan the next date. 

 It's important to get to know each other before deciding that this guy is worth shattering your nerves for and telling him you like him!; , If you're in class, sit close to him or even next to him. Try to get into his activity groups or other exercises. In sport, get on his team where possible or play in pairs or alongside of him. If you're not in the same class, catch him at his locker and say hello or spend time with him and his friends during lunch and recess.  Of course, only do this if the activity also interests you, otherwise it's a waste of your time. This can provide a great way for him to get to know you better, and vice versa.  Can you ask a bunch of friends back to your place that will also include him? Can you go somewhere he's likely to be spending time, such as at the mall, a sports field or hanging downtown? Find out what is possible and won't put you in any difficult positions with your parents.  This will help you to make the decision about telling him that you like him and to ask him on a date.  Ask them what they think about your prospects with this guy and how they interpret his reactions toward you at the moment. Often people outside of a crush will have more objectivity and may be able to see the signs––or lack of them––that you can't quite put your finger on. Always talk to trusted friends, who will keep your confidence.  Try to find out carefully whether your crush already has a love interest or might have any interest in you. Do your best to avoid making your interest too obvious unless you want them to relay it straight back to him. If in doubt, skip his friends and only talk to yours.  You are going to put yourself out on a limb without knowing how he'll respond yet, so he had better be worth it!  , This gives both of you wriggle room to back out and to say what you really feel without others overhearing and possibly spreading rumors. This might be at the end of lunch, after school or when you're alone at the lockers. Scout out possible good times and places a few days before you decide to tell him.   Avoid the temptation to text, IM or email him with this news. It is definitely something that should be passed on personally, face-to-face.  While you need to be ready to go with the flow and react to his reactions when you actually tell him, it can't hurt to rehearse your opening lines with him. For example:   "Hey Josh, have you got a moment? There's something I wanted to talk to you about." Josh says yes, so you proceed: "I wanted to tell you that I'm really enjoying spending time with you and that I like you a lot. I was hoping you might want to hang out with me this weekend." "Hey Hank, we've been great friends for a while now and I have grown to really like you. Would you be interested in coming to the movies with me this Friday?" "So Zack, I just wanted to let you know something that matters to me a lot. It's that I really like you. I was hoping you might feel the same way too."  , This is probably not news to him but it is out in the open now, instead of hanging in the air between you two. If there is a long silence, you could interject that you just wanted to get that out there and that he doesn't have to say anything straight away, that you're happy for him to think about it for a time.  This is not necessarily the end of things but it may happen and isn't a reflection on you as a person. He can have many reasons for not wanting to reciprocate the feelings, such as already having a love interest, not wanting a relationship at this point in time or being more interested in friendship than anything more intimate. Be gracious and say that it's okay, you're happy to stay good friends and not speak about it again for now.  You're now both open with one another and can go ahead and arrange a date!  

hang out around this boy more often.  try to find ways to get together.  consider taking up an after-school activity that you know he does.  find out what possibilities exist outside of school time.  use the time spent together to gauge both how you feel about him and whether you think he shows signs of interest in you.  talk to your friends.  consider talking to one of his friends.  be sure that he's worth the effort.  choose a time when other people aren't around.  rehearse telling him.  allow your crush the space to reply in his own way and at his pace.  realize that you may be rejected.  if he says he likes you too, celebrate. 

 Do you only like him because he is taken, or do you genuinely like him? Do you think it would change anything if you told him how you feel about him?; , How well do you get along? Try to find reasons as to why you like him so much. You need to understand your feelings, to allow you to make the correct decision and to be able to express them in a confident way.  Follow the next section before deciding that it's okay to tell him your true feelings. By spending more time with him, you'll get to know him better, he'll grow to trust you more and maybe, just maybe, he might see things differently too.  Show interest in his social life and hang around with friends he hangs around with. This shows a guy that you are confident enough to spend break times with his own friends at times in an outgoing manner.  It is uncomfortable to speak to a guy you really like in front of his girlfriend who might easily realize your interest in her guy and become jealous. Start a conversation on Facebook to get around this. For instance, while he is online, ask him simple questions like how he's doing and how did he do in an exam.   Go for questions like, "what's your favourite food?" or "what movies do you like most?". This helps you learn more about him and in doing so, you keep your conversation going while also showing him you care.  If your conversations are a bit stuck in the same discourse, then try to find ways to make them interesting. Don't always start the conversation with "hey" or "hi there". Instead, find out what his favorite subject is and try to find a picture, a joke or a quote which is related to that. Then you can pass it on, with an excuse that "you might like this" or that "this reminded me of you". This shows a guy that you remember what he tells you.  If it seems appropriate, try to offer advice in case of some ups and downs that they may be having. Even if you actually think of hitting her in the face often for having the guy you are crazy about, showing interest in their relationship gets him to trust you with his personal issues while it also acts as a key to discovering what he likes and what he doesn't like in his relationship.  After doing all of this, some time should have passed by and by then you can figure out if what you feel towards him is a strong feeling or just something temporary. If you notice that these are recurring feelings which are only becoming stronger by time; it's time to face the music and let him know how you feel. The main question is how ?!  , If you've decided that it's worth telling him, then it's time to give it a try. You must be confident with yourself and with what you feel in order to express yourself correctly and clearly. Do not hesitate or fear that you will end up being rejected. On the bright side, if that happens you would have figured out what he truly feels towards you and can hence, move on without thinking what could have been.  The best way to tell him is face to face; however, with his girlfriend around, that might not always be ideal. So a text message or a message via Facebook can help you get what you want to tell him across.  When you are dealing with feelings, honesty really is the best policy. Don't lie to him about it, just come right out and tell him.   Be considerate. Your crush has a girlfriend. Remember that she has feelings too. If you're friends with her, tell her too. You don't want to ruin your friendship with her.  Then include something like, "I was wondering the other day and I have something to tell you...". When he responds "yeah go on, I'm listening", tell him the truth. Don't talk in a very hyperbolic way because it might scare him. Let him know that you are aware about his girlfriend but still you wanted to let him know even if nothing will change after this moment, at least you confronted him with confidence.   Say something like "We've been speaking for the past few weeks/months now and I have gotten to know more about you. Honestly, the thing is, I like you, I really do. And I know that you have a girlfriend but still I wanted you to know."  , This will determine the type of response that you give to him.   If it's just an "okay" or "thanks", say: "I'm relieved now that I told you" . If he answers back in a long paragraph with the fact that he has a girlfriend and other excuses, just say "It's okay, I wanted to be honest and I understand that you have a girlfriend. I'm okay with that". If you get the answer you've been hoping for "I like you too", just go ahead and carry on your conversation to see how things can unfold between you.  If he already has a girlfriend, then you're likely to be rejected. Don't take it personally and remember that if he said he would break up with his girlfriend for you, then consider whether he's the type of guy you would want to be with. If that happens, then get over him.  Letting him know how you feel sets peace to your mind because no matter what the answer might be, you'll know you would have let him know whatever you wanted him to know. However, never force him into liking you or into leaving his girlfriend for you. After all, you definitely rather be his first choice rather than his second !  

sort out your feelings for him.  ask yourself how well you know each other.  spend more time getting to know him before making up your mind.  consider spending more time around him even if he has his girlfriend by his side.  try to use social media in order to communicate with him whilst his girlfriend is not around.  talk as much as possible.  ask about his relationship––with care.  reflect on your feelings again.  pluck up the courage.  decide how to tell him.  be honest.  start by talking to him in a normal way.  see how he responds.  be prepared.  let go. 

 Brush your hair, teeth, shower and get dressed, taking a bit more time than usual to highlight your best qualities; presenting yourself with flare, strength, and passion.; , Never fake your personality just to impress someone. Be gregarious, kind, and leave a great first impression, especially on your crush with a sweet smile and glistening eyes.  Although you may have trouble doing it, catch their attention in class by joking around with them, of course if you are not very shy. Otherwise, you may want to 'accidentally' drop your pencil forward so they can pick it up, or smile when they answer a question.  Although you may of not made a full impression on him, yet often cross paths, try not to be bluntly obvious in your advancements, rather smiling at them. This may or may not result in being asked to the dance.  You may need to become friends with your crush. Smile, talk, laugh at his jokes, no matter how boring.You just have to wait a while and hopefully by the last dance of the year you'll dance and go steady.  Text and email your crush by getting his number. Make sure to use a winking face "winks" occasionally. Even if you think that is too much, you could always use a smiley. After getting closer, use "xoxo" to represent hugs and kisses. 

get prepared in the morning.  be yourself at school.  get attention in class.  impress at the dance.  become friends.  keep in touch.  good luck!  

 Think about something that you’ve done recently that makes you proud. Try to conjure up the details of this accomplishment right before you know you’re about to run into your crush. If you run into him unexpectedly, then take a few seconds to think of what you can do and compose yourself.   For example, you might think of a time when you weren’t clumsy, such as when you won that marathon the other day. You could also recall how you improved your grades in a certain class. If you work hard enough at anything, you can improve it.; , If you’ve just tripped or if you start stuttering, calm your nerves by exhaling and inhaling a number of times before continuing. Try inhaling slowly as you count to five, then exhale slowly as you count to five. This will allow you to collect your thoughts and refocus before proceeding.   If your crush questions what you are doing, you might say, “Oh, I’ve just got a lot going on. I was trying to clear my mind so I could pay attention to you.”  , There is a great deal of power in positive thinking. So, if you’ve had a bad day and something happened in front of your crush, then you might want to tell yourself, “It’s just one day,” or “I can do this.” Eventually you will start to believe your own words.   You might say to yourself, “You have too much going on to worry about this. Let’s move on.” Or, “Let’s make tomorrow a better day.”  , If you find yourself closing your body off after an embarrassing moment, force yourself to adopt an open stance. Uncross your arms and legs. Lift your head and look around. Make eye contact with those persons near you.You can also subtly flirt with your crush by touching your face or neck. You may notice that they start to mirror your movements as well.  Start paying close attention to your body and your emotions. If you notice that you start to feel jittery right before you get really clumsy, then use this as a sign that you probably need to go sit down somewhere. Or, if your mind feels as if it racing before you begin to stutter, then try to calm down before speaking., Take a moment to recall how you’ve survived all sorts of crazy incidents in the past. This will remind you that you are a survivor. In fact, many of the incidents that you remember can’t even be recalled by your crush. When you feel as if you can’t go on, just think about how you’ve had this emotion before and you’ve done just fine. 

remind yourself of a recent accomplishment.  take a few deep breaths.  repeat positive mantras to yourself.  pay attention to body language.  recognize the signs of your own fear and anxiety.  remember your past moments of clumsiness and relax. 

 Believe it or not, boys get just as shy as girls do when it comes to making the first move. Smiles are friendly and welcoming – a smile can make a guy feel instantly secure about walking over and introducing himself. On the other hand, a frown is sure to make him nervous and keep him away., This goes hand in hand with smiling. You can smile all day long, but unless you make eye contact when you do it, it won’t signal to him that you want him to come talk to you.If you make eye contact and smile as you pass him he will notice, especially if it happens often. If he smiles back, all the better!   Eye contact is great, but avoid outright staring at him. Glance over occasionally, but don’t stare too long.  This is far more important than your hair or your clothes. Having confidence is not only an attractive personality trait, but it also makes you a more dynamic, interesting person. Someone with confidence will automatically attract people. Radiate positivity!, When a guy sees you talking to his friends, it makes him feel much more comfortable about approaching you himself.Just make sure you aren’t flirting with his friends! He’ll notice that too, but not in a good way.  When you’re around a guy that you want to talk to, being buried in your cell phone is definitely not a signal that you want to chat. Keep your head up and look alert, ready to engage.  Communication is so much more than just using words – your body language also speaks volumes, even from across the room or hall.   Don’t cross your arms. It definitely sends the signal that you are not approachable. Watch your posture. When you slouch, you communicate to a guy without saying a word that you don’t feel confident enough to have him approach you. Keep your gestures smooth and firm. Relaxed hands imply confidence, whereas clenched hands can make you seem anxious and unapproachable. Try not to squirm in your outfit or fidget with anything. Doing so can make you appear anxious.  

smile!,  make eye contact.  be confident.  talk to his friends.  lose the cell phone.  pay attention to your body language. 

 If he looks at you a lot, it probably means he's interested, but if not yet, then just keep trying using the steps below. They will help you quite a bit in becoming his friend, but if you're shyer maybe you should try and make friends with his friends and work up from there. Get close to him so that he starts noticing you right away. If you really like him than make sure he really notices you   Laugh a lot. This always gets a guy's attention. Just don't be crazy about it, laughing every ten seconds at anything he says could make you seem unreal. Also, smile a lot, not so much that it's cheesy, but show him you are confident with yourself. Find out what he likes doing and be there doing the same thing. Do you both like sports, or maybe science? If you can, be in the same place with him doing the same activity.; , Say "Hi!" and "Bye!" and be friendly. Wave at him. When he replies back to you, you know he's noticed you. Don't expect any guy to notice you just because you are there; it doesn't always work that way. So don't be afraid to talk to him.   Ask him if he could help you with the homework, even if you don't need help. Ask him how his weekend went, and what he did. Tell him about parties, events, or get togethers that you're having.  Don't blurt out random things like "What do you do after school?" He might think you are a stalker. Just be yourself, don't be someone you're not.   If you are in one of his classes, and he sits near you, score! But if he doesn't, that's okay. You can sit near him. Ask him to be your partner whenever you can. If you can see he has a problem, no matter how big or small, be there for him. Find ways to let him know you want to talk with him about anything. Notes, IM, texting, etc. can work.  Most guys are attracted to confident and stylish girls. You don't have to be a supermodel! Just try to boost your confidence — you are beautiful, clever, popular, and sweet.   Treat yourself to some new clothes. You don't need to grab a whole new wardrobe to get noticed. A few stylish items (seasonal, of course) will help you stand out. Get a new haircut. Talk with your stylist or your mom's stylist about maybe changing up your hair. How would it look short? What if you layered it a bit? Consider these things in order to get noticed. Do you need to drop a few pounds? Talk with your mom about whether you can join a gym or sports team. Even if you don't need to lose weight, staying in shape or losing something as small as half a pound will make you feel great, but if he doesn't accept you the way you are, than he isn't right for you. His loss!  , There is no such thing as a girlfriend who isn't first and foremost a friend. In fact, the best girlfriend is one who is not always romantic, but one that is a friend.  This does not mean betraying or belittling your own beliefs. Yours are every bit as important as his. Discuss them when you can.   Listen to what he has to say. Always hear him out. Take the opportunity to learn new facts about him. Respect what he says but form your own opinions about them. Have conversations with him. Attraction often starts when we have a great emotional connection with someone by really bonding with him. Try to have interesting, funny, playful conversations with him to establish that bond. It doesn't matter what you talk about. The important thing is that you have meaningful interaction. Ask him about his background — his parents, his childhood, his siblings. These things are personal, so be respectful. Offer to share your own background to give him a better idea of who you are. Ask him about his goals — what he always dreamed about being, what he's interested in, what makes him happy. You can learn a lot about a person from his goals. Start thinking about your own goals so that you can share them with him.  No matter how much you trust your friends, if they ever become mad at you they could go behind your back and tell him something you said about him.   Stick up for him if he gets teased or involved in a fight. Don't let him wonder whether or not you're his friend — make it absolutely clear. Don't gossip about him. Gossip has a way of spreading like wildfire. You don't want juicy stuff getting back to him quite yet. Shut down the gossip.  Small talk is fine in the beginning; you don't want to rush into it, or else it will seem weird. But smile, be nice, and talk with his friends. He'll want you to get along with them.  You might have to be the one who asks him, but if he agrees, it won't matter that you're the one asking him.   At first, hang out with a group of people. Go to the beach or lake together; hang out at the skate park; go to a football game as a group. Here are some other options of teen-friendly things you can do: Go to an amusement park (roller-coasters, mini-golf, arcade games, etc). Go to the movies. Go to the state fair. Hang out after school. (Sometimes, the best times are when you're not doing anything, just hanging out.)    , When the two of you are comfortable, it might be okay to drop a few hints that you are interested in becoming more than an ordinary friend. Notes work. Texts, work, but a handwritten note is best. that way he'll have a keepsake from you.   Ask him to hold your backpack or carry your books to the next class. See what he does. Ask him to a dance. Sadie-Hawkins dance, if you have one, would be the perfect opportunity: The girl is supposed to ask the guy. Flirt with him. There are a bunch of ways to flirt with him: Flirt with your eyes. Lock his eyes with yours and smile at him sweetly. Hold his eyes a little longer than normal. Flirt with touch. Gently touch his shoulder with your hand when you talk with him. Flirt with words. Tell him that he's good at sports, or compliment him on his new haircut. He'll be thrilled that you noticed. Hold his hand. This should make it really clear to him you are interested. Hug him more tightly than a friend hug, and maybe just a little more often. A small gift. One of those small Valentine's Day hearts that reads: 'I LIKE YOU' is perfect.  Some guys your own age might not get the hint. Girls do usually reach puberty earlier than guys, so girls usually reach that level of emotional maturity earlier as well.  Be casual about it: "Hey, I realized I didn't have your phone number." Establishing a friendship outside of school or extracurriculars will be important.   Wait for him to call you. You don't want to come on too strong; guys don't like talking on the phone as much as girls. Text him kind of regularly, just for simple conversation. Don't make it pointless, however, because guys don't like small-talk. Flirt with him with texts (Facebook, IM, and emails will also work). Say something like "I didn't know you'd singlehandedly destroy the football team on Friday. Nice work!"  , Guys will often let you know if he's interested in you or not without putting any words to it. There will be a part of you that will be able to tell by instinct.   Be on the lookout for signs that he's nervous around you. It could mean he likes you. Does he: Sweat or blush when he talks to you? It could be his body saying that he's into you. Look at you and then look away when you catch him staring? He can't get enough of your looks, and he's day-dreaming. Constantly hang around you, but not with you? It could be we wants to look at and be around you, but doesn't want you to know.  If he's hugging or holding hands with you, then you're golden. He likes you. But here are some other signs in case you're not completely sure.   Do his pupils dilate when he looks at you? Sometimes his eyes will change color slightly. Does he touch you, offer to give you piggybacks, or bump into you randomly? He could want to get any excuse to touch you because he likes you. Gulp loudly or stumble around with his words? His heart is pumping hard and he's worried about messing up. Don't trust too many other minute-by-minute changes to his anatomy. Some of those changes, even the more obvious ones, are completely random in very young men for several years.  Remember, it's better to have tried and failed than to never try in the first place. Wait for the right moment. You'll pretty much know when the time comes.   If you are ready to ask him out don't say it in front of a group or something or he might say no. Be calm, cool and collected while you're asking him. Make eye contact with him and remember to smile. Be confident. It's really hard to ask him, but you're up for the challenge, aren't you? Ask him if he wants to go to the movies or grab a bite to eat. You don't have to call it a date for it to be a date.  Yes, it will feel bad for a time. No, it won't last forever. Remind yourself of all that you have to offer. There will be plenty of other guys.   If he says "no," just smile and walk away with your emotions covered up. Try not to be awkward around him or mean to him. Staying classy might cause him to reconsider.  For instance, kiss him when he says yes to being your boyfriend, but then for the first week or so settle with hugging and holding hands. If he wants to kiss you, go ahead!   If he kisses you, don't make it a passionate kiss the first time. You want him to be interested in kissing you again, so only give him a little taste the first time. Don't let him pressure you into anything. Relationships are about mutual respect, not one person getting something the other isn't comfortable with.  At the beginning of a relationship, some people think it's a brilliant idea to make a pact that they'll still be friends when we break-up. Don't do this.   This gives the guy a sense of security, so generally he won't be heartbroken to lose you. Plus, it's weird to talk about breakups in the beginning. How do you know what you'll be feeling when you break up? You just don't know. Talk about happier things. Instead of talking about the relationship, just be in the relationship. This will help the guy out. Sometimes, it's better and easier to act instead of talk.  Guys need some space. Just because he's hanging out with his friends doesn't mean he doesn't like you, or that he likes someone else.   Let him see his friends. Don't become clingy. Yes, spend a substantial time together in the afternoon or weekends, but let him see his friends at school. If he never makes time for you, however, that's a warning sign. Make sure that he gives you enough time. He should want to be with you if he's in a relationship with you, you might just have to tell him that you need him to pay more attention to you. Don't get upset every time he talks to another girl. Guys are allowed to talk to other girls, just not flirt or go over the line with them. Trust him until he gives you a reason not to.  Don't obsessively talk with him all night on social networks or MSN. If you don't talk to him every second, it will make him want to talk to you even more!   Spend most of your time talking in person or on the phone. It's okay to call him every other or every third night. You don't want an awkward internet-relationship where you don't feel comfortable with one another in person. It's okay to send him sweet messages every once in a while. Make them surprises. If you do it irregularly, he'll be even more excited. Don't always expect a response.  Don't let him treat you like a doormat. You're a living, breathing human being, and you deserve respect.   Don't let him boss you around or tell you what to do. Stand up for yourself when you need to. Love yourself first. If you can't love yourself, it's hard to love him. You'll find a lot of things you like and dislike about yourself in a relationship. They're like mirrors. Change the things about yourself that you dislike, and guard the things about yourself that you like.Relationships are about two people. If you're doing all the work and he just sits back and enjoys it, you're not doing yourself any favors.   Make sure he shows you affection, too. You deserve respect and consideration. Make sure he knows this.  Breakups happen all the time; there's still a chance that you could get back together, or if there's not, there are plenty of other guys out there.   There's no need to unfriend him on Facebook or MSN. Just unsubscribe from him and don't talk to him. Be friendly but distant. You want to be nice to him, but you don't want him to get any ideas. You want him to feel stupid that you ever broke up in the first place. Hold your head high. You're growing into a beautiful young lady. Be confident about who you are and people will appreciate you.  

get him to notice you.  let him know you are there.  become comfortable around him.  try some style changes if he doesn't notice you.  when he starts to let you get close to him, be his friend at first.  find the value in his opinions and suggestions.  try not to say anything bad about him around friends.  get close with his friends, if possible.  start doing things together.  start dropping hints.  don't get down if he doesn't respond.  ask for his phone number.  be patient.  be aware of more obvious signs that he likes you.  if he still doesn't get the hint, tell him.  if he's not interested, try not to sweat it.  don't take any major steps at the beginning of the relationship.  don't talk about breakups or bad scenarios.  give him some space and freedom sometimes.  don't overdo facebook and twitter.  make sure there's equality in the relationship.  if you break up, try to be mature about it. 

 If you think you might run into your crush, take a few extra minutes to brush your hair an extra bit or maybe put on one of your favorite tops. Don’t go overboard but a little extra primping may give you that extra bit of poise to counteract any klutziness.For example, you could style your hair in a way that makes you feel the most confident, such as a sophisticated up-do. Or, you could give yourself a home manicure or pedicure every other week. Other people will also notice that you look put together and they will be less likely to pick on you or bother you as a result. Your confidence will make them view any mishaps on your part as simply accidents and nothing more.  Keep a slight smile on your face, even if the going gets tough. This will show others that you are not that affected by any klutzy behavior and that you’ve moved on, so they should too. Smiling also relaxes your body, reduces stress, and makes other people feel more comfortable with you.If you are not sure how your smile looks, you might want to practice a bit in front of a mirror. You will soon find that it comes naturally to you when you feel good.  The best way to demonstrate that you do control your body is to carry yourself in the best possible way. Keep your back straight and pay attention to holding your shoulders back as you walk. Focus on taking clear, deep breaths as well. A benefit of maintaining proper posture is that it will also help to minimize any clumsiness in the future.As you walk over to meet your crush and other friends, imagine balancing a book on your head. Each step that you take must be slow and chosen carefully. This will make you less likely to trip or fall.  If you are unsure whether or not you can talk to your crush without stumbling, try to interact with his friends instead. Ask them about their hobbies or interests. Talk to them about the day’s events. Just be casual and discuss anything that comes to mind. This can help you build up to interacting with your crush directly.You might say, “Did you all go to the football game on Friday?” Or, “What do you guys have planned for Spring Break?”  , As soon as you fall, you may feel the need to stand up and say, “I’m sorry,” to everyone who witnessed it. Unless you hurt or knocked someone else down, this isn’t really necessary. Stating an apology could make you feel better, but it will likely make you feel worse and even less worthy of being around your crush. So, just skip it entirely. 

take pride in your appearance.  stay smiling.  keep an eye on your posture.  strike up a conversation with his friends.  resist the urge to apologize. 

 Right after you do something clumsy, come up laughing. This takes a potentially negative moment and makes it into a positive one. It also makes it less likely that anyone will try to pick on you because of the incident. They are more likely to laugh right along.  This is a good way to build community with others on the basis of what might have seemed like a negative event. They will likely agree with you and may even tell you a few stories of their own.You could say, “I hate when I trip over my own feet. Have you ever done that before?”  , If gracefulness isn’t your strong suit, switch the subject to something that you are good at. When you start to talk about something that you are passionate about, others will instantly be interested and will forget any prior actions on your part. The dopamine that comes from relieving a hobby of yours will also help to calm your nerves down.For example, you might say, “I just went to this amazing concert last week. Let me tell you guys all about it.”  , Just after you’ve had a clumsy moment, take a second to look closely at your crush. You may seem that he is sweating a bit or perhaps wringing his hands too. These are signs that he is nervous as well. It means that you are not alone.You can also watch for erratic eye contact. If he can’t look you directly in the face, he may be nervous. He may blush as well.  Your crush might be shy. Or, he might feel bad for you after an embarrassing moment and not know what to say. Give him the benefit of the doubt and don’t expect too much conversation until you get to know him better. Be patient and keep trying to reach out to him in friendship.You might start by simply saying, “Hi!” on a regular basis. If he responds, great. If not, then keeping moving on.  If you are talking with your crush and his friends and find yourself growing more nervous, turn your attention to your surroundings. Look at the people around you and pay attention to what they are wearing. Try to pick out your favorite elements of the room that you are in. Try to stay engaged but a bit distracted at the same time., If you want to gauge your crush’s level of interest in you, without resorting to klutzy questioning, then try to talk with him about relationships and friendships in general. Ask him about his closest friends. Talk to him about his family relationships.Pay attention to not only what he says, but how he answers the questions as well. Does he give you his full attention or are you an afterthought? You might say, “Tell me about your best friend. You said that he lives out of town, right?”  , Tell your friends about your dilemma and ask them to walk around with you when you might run into your crush. They will hopefully distract everyone from anything embarrassing that you might do. They can also talk about your positive traits and give you a dose of needed confidence. Make sure to return the favor when you can.   You might tell your friends, “I could really use your help when I’m around my crush. If you could start talking to everyone or distract them if I do something klutzy, that would be great.”  

laugh off any accidents.  swap embarrassing stories with others.  talk about what you love.  recognize if he is nervous, too.  don’t be put off by his silence.  focus on minor details around you.  feel out his interest level with casual questions.  ask your friends for help. 

 If you see a natural opportunity to walk past him, take it! If you notice that he walks down a certain hallway every day at a certain time, position yourself there. Do this sparingly, otherwise you may come off as desperate.   Make sure when you are walking past him that you are doing so for a purpose. Get a drink from a water fountain he’s standing near or go into the library if he’s standing out front chatting with his friends. When you do walk past him, makes sure to stand up straight, hold your head up high, walk with confidence and have a smile on your face., This doesn’t mean sit right NEXT to him – that would be too obvious! But sitting near him (in his line of vision, if possible) can definitely get you noticed and create a scenario in which he’ll approach you to talk. If you share a class with him, sit nearby. At lunch, sit with your friends one table over.  Try walking past him with an armload of heavy books, or try to enter a door he’s standing near with your hands full. Perhaps even walk by him looking confused or lost, as though you are trying to find a classroom or a person and having no luck.   While the “damsel in distress” act shouldn’t be employed too often, it can definitely be effective in getting a conversation started, or at the very least, provide an opportunity to lock eyes with him and smile!, If you know he’s interested in something in particular, give it a try yourself. For instance, if you know he enjoys watching basketball games at school, go to one yourself every now and then. If he loves music, occasionally drop by your local record shop. Bump into him at the gym. If you see one another while in the midst of a common interest, he’s almost certain to come over and chat with you about it.   Don’t go to extremes to make this happen. You don’t need to force yourself to enjoy anything that you don’t like! Keep it natural. Plan carefully and don’t try to pop up at every single event or hobby he’s interested in. Doing this will likely make you seem creepy, and the stalker vibe is not one you want to give off!  , If you are already friendly with some of his close friends and it feels natural to do so, get closer to those people. It will provide him with plenty of opportunities to approach you. Not only that, but his friends will have nothing but nice things to say about you in front of him, which is never a bad thing!  

put yourself in his line of sight.  sit near him.  create a situation that prompts him to approach you.  share a common interest.  join his friend group. 

 The way you present yourself on the outside is a big indicator of how you feel about yourself on the inside. You want to show your guy that you are worth it and you want to catch his eye. Looks aren't everything, but they are the first thing a guy notices about you. No matter how awesome your personality is, a guy isn't going to see that from across the room!   Groom yourself. Keep your hair neatly combed and your nails clipped. Practice good personal hygiene by brushing and flossing your teeth and taking daily showers. Wash and moisturize your face on a regular basis. This helps give you a healthy glow.Try lotions and perfumes that smell nice. Just don’t overdo it! You want him to notice it when he passes by you, not from across the room.  Don't go crazy and dye your hair pink, but doing some little things can help. Experiment with flat irons, curling irons, clips, bobby pins – anything that is different might get his attention. Try out different styles the night before school or before the event where you'll see the guy.   Straightening your hair with a flat iron can give you a more casual look. You can use a curling iron to give your hair some extra bounce. Are you a ponytail person or a hair down kind of girl? Whatever you are, try changing it up! Try a different part in your hair, or consider bangs. Have fun with it!  , The ways to do this are many, and range from the simple to the complex. Focus on the basics! When you take care of yourself, it shines through without you needing to say a word.   Get enough sleep. Exercise regularly. Make healthy changes to your diet.  Some may say that clothes don't make the girl, but we all know they have some impact! Wear clothes that fit well and make you feel good about yourself.If you aren’t comfortable in the clothes you're wearing, your discomfort will show through in the way you carry yourself.   Try incorporating flattering colors to spruce up your wardrobe. Accentuate your assets. This doesn’t mean wear skimpy clothing! If you have toned arms, try wearing a tank top, for example.Make it work for your guy. If you’re tall, try wearing flats around him more so that he feels comfortable. If you usually wear jeans, change it up and try a dress.Try to develop your own sense of style. Everyone notices this, not just guys! Experiment with jewelry or other accessories. Sometimes it’s the little details that really catches someone’s attention.  

take pride in your appearance.  try doing something different with your hair.  take care of yourself.  dress to impress. 

 Guys like you more if you are just laid back and cool about things. If someone spills something on your Tori Burch handbag, don't cry and whine, even though you may want to. If you fall in the hallway or slip, just laugh at yourself in public. You can hit yourself in the head as much as you want to when you're alone.; , Most guys don't like the girls that have the huge black fake eyelashes, the thick eyeliner, or the blood red lipstick. Embrace your natural beauty! Try going without make up, or just wearing minimal makeup. For everyday makeup, try wearing neutral colors like brown rather than black around your eyes.   Makeup should add glow, not color.  Try to find clothes that fit you, and enhance the good features of your figure. Yes, this does mean that going to the store and trying on the clothes is better than ordering them online where you're not sure if they will fit or not, but it's good to know what you're buying is perfect for you. Also, don't feel like you should wear your lowest top or shortest skirt to impress him. It'll do the opposite and make you look cheap, shallow, and desperate.  Guys love girls who have hobbies. It's okay not to play a lot of sports, but some guys tend to like girls who can throw a ball or shoot a basket. When sport season starts, try encouraging your friends to join a sport team with you and maybe try to learn a few things about the sports your crush likes.  Having a good body will make you more confident, and guys find confidence in a girl very attractive. Try small things like replacing your daily chocolate bar with an item of fruit, cutting down on the amount of TV you watch, and walking rather than using transport (which is environmentally friendly too). If you want a drastic change with your figure then start a fitness regime and ask friends or family to do it with you for support.  Everyone (yes, boys and girls) love someone who can smile and laugh. Try to be optimistic and look at the glass as half full as opposed to half empty.  As long as you take care of your hair and don't walk around looking like you've been dragged through a hedge backwards then don't worry. Also, don't worry about hair colour, some guys like blonds, some like brunettes, some like red heads, everyone has different taste.  It could be anything, even a small thing. Maybe a hobby, such as dance or art or a certain sport. Or it could be a phrase or saying that you have, nothing annoying though, and don't say it too often. Or perhaps something about the clothes you wear, try dressing slightly different to the people around you, as friends are often highly influenced by each others taste in fashion. Don't buy loads of shocking clothes, but just don't copy too much.  

don't be too serious, unless the event actually is serious.  show off your natural beauty - this is incredibly important.  wear the right clothes if you want to impress a guy, don't wear extremely baggy clothes, as they sometimes make certain girls look fatter than they actually are!,  participate in a sport to make a good topic for conversation.  get into health and fitness.  smile!,  make your hair look presentable.  have something which makes you different from your friends. 

 If he jokes around with you then he, may like you, however, he just might like to mess with other people too. When you are sitting at lunch, pay attention to see if he is messing with you just to be funny, or if he is trying to be funny and friendly. If he:   Is extremely nice to you, never puts you down.       Walks with you in the halls on your way to classes. Acts shy.; ,,, For example, he might list all the sports he plays, how much he can do of something, or continually say how good he is at something. Again, this may be a part of the way he is around everyone. Try to figure out if he is taking extraordinary measures to build himself up in your eyes.  He might kick your chair, talk loudly, or act clumsy. These are all signs that something is up and he has an interest in you.  If he is making an effort to sit or stand up straight, then he may like you. If he may be pulling his shirt down, playing with his hat, you can assume it means he is shy and thinks you're pretty. If he stands up for you all the time and is overprotective, then he may like you.  This is the simplest and most direct way to find out. This takes a confident person unless you already are perfectly confident. You'll also have to be able to handle it if he doesn't like you (especially if you like him).  By asking him/her just to ask them or 'observe' them 'further'.  This is something that is very important to look for. If he does stare at you, try to see what kind of a stare it is. Is it a stare like he is lost in his thoughts, or is it a stare meaning he thinks you're weird? Sometimes his eyes can say everything!  , Do his pupils dilate when he looks at you? Sometimes, if a boy likes you, his pupils will dilate. Not many people pay attention to this, but sometimes it can be a sign that he is crushing on you.  Do his cheeks turn any shade of pink or red around you? When you two are having a simple chat in the hall, try to see what color his cheeks are. Do they turn an unusual pink or red around you, or do they stay their normal color? If they are not their normal color, it could be a sign that he is nervous around you and is afraid of embarrassing himself.   Slightly look at him if he walks past you or are in lessons and see if he is looking at you. Notice his reaction when he realizes he's been caught. If he blushes or turns away quickly, it's a definite sign he is into you, but don't be upset if he doesn't react because some guys like to act cool and make it seem they weren't looking at you at all.  Does he ever try to gently 'shove' or touch you? If he does this, he could just be friendly, or he could be trying to make an excuse to get closer to you.   Does he ever hug you for no reason? Making physical contact is a sign that he likes you.  This usually means he is just being friendly, but if he does it often, it may mean that he wants to make an excuse for you two to get closer.  If he panics more than your other guy friends would when you cry, it's a sign. Ever had those kind of days where nothing seems to be going right and you break into tears? Pay attention to his reaction: Does he ask what's wrong and who/what caused it and tries hard to make you laugh or at least smile? If he does any of this more often than your other guy friends, it means he cares about you and likes you.  Have you ever talked to him about a TV show or a video game and a week later he is hooked on it? It means he is either really into the same things as you, or he wants you to like him more.  Does he ever try to sit by you in class? If your class does not have certain seating arrangements, does he try his best every day to sit near you?   Has he asked for your phone number yet and does he text you a lot? If he hasn't got your number, no problem, it might mean he is shy or nervous.  Have you ever caught him glaring/narrowing his eyes at a boy you talk to? He might be jealous of other guys around you.   Look at his expression when you are talking to other guys. Does he look angry or act moody or even comes and interrupts you when you are talking?  , Do his friends laugh at him and look at you like they know something you should know? This can be a dead giveaway. It is usually the friends that let the boy's crush find out he likes them. Try to look for that when you walk near.   Do they a giggle and nudge your crush and make lovey dovey noises or smirk at him? Does he hang around your friends a lot? This may mean he wants to get closer to your friends to help him find out more about you.  

find out whether or not he is just joking with you, or if he just likes to mess with people.  pay attention when he is near to see if he sort of invades your personal space.  ,  determine whether he tries to make you laugh.  ,  observe carefully for signs that he is building himself up by showing off.  check for him trying to get your attention by acting silly or brash.  watch the way the guy moves when he sits or stands with you.  ask him if he likes you.  have a trusted friend get the information for you.  determine whether he stares at you often.  watch his eyes.  check out his cheeks.  notice when he touches you.  be alert to attempts to try to help you.  notice panic when you cry.  be alert to his interest in things you like.  watch for deliberate attempts to get near to you.  watch for appearances of jealousy of your current boyfriend or other guy friends?,  use his friends as a gauge. 

 Have your crush notice you and if he doesn't notice you,then try to make him notice you. Give a good first impression, say hello in the hallways, maybe walk with him to class and talk a little. Form a little bubble in his mind about you.; , Sometimes boys can be confusing, and some times they can be sad. If you see your crush down, and by himself, or just on a wall looking sad go up to him and ask "Are you okay?" Let him know that you're always there for him if he wants to talk, and that he can trust you. Remember to Give him some space once in a while or if he looks like he wants to be alone. This will make him miss your comfort and he'll think about you.  To make a boy notice you, you have to sometimes act in a way that hints you want to be noticed more. If you find him looking at you, make eye contact with him and give him a sweet innocent closed mouth smile. Hold the eye contact for about five seconds, then break off. This will leave your crush wondering about your seductive smile.  Guys will be guys, and a little bit of flirting won't do you any harm. It's okay to flirt a little bit, leave your crush with a memory of a beautiful girl that has shown some interest in him. He will come back to return the favor sometime and voila, conversations will start rolling.  Leave the girl talk to your friends! Usually, one way to get a guy to notice you more is to talk about him. Ask him about his game if he plays a sport, or an art piece if he's into art, or whatever you find he has hobbies in. Your crush will most certainly be flattered, responsive, and maybe even a tad bit embarrassed if he's shy when you ask about his day. He might ask about you a bit too.  A friend is always there, but if you want your crush to notice you more, then you've got to be unavailable once in a while. Break off a conversation nicely and excuse yourself off, or talk to another guy. Have him wondering about the mysterious side of you.  If he says looks, then ask him why and say it's all about the personality not looks. Also keep on giving him hints about you. 

be friends with him.  always be there for your crush.  give him a few cute little clues.  flirt a little bit.  talk to a guy as a guy.  have him chase you.  if you're not necessarily the prettiest of girls, try to ask him what he looks for in a girl.  when the time is right lean in and kiss him on the cheek or lips and quickly pull away and walk away, leaving him wanting more!  

 Strike up a conversation with him and pay attention to the way he interacts with you. If he is an outgoing person and likes you, he’ll playfully touch you while you talk. The occasional shoulder brush or hand-grab to show you something are tell-tale signs. If he is shy, he won’t be as obvious. If this is the case, he may blush or stare at you while you talk.; , A true smile extends beyond the normal width of a mouth. If his smile is across his whole face, he’s being affected by you in a good way. If his teeth aren’t showing, he’s most likely forcing the smile. This means that he’s humoring you and isn’t interested.  All of his muscles will be pulled to show off his body to his best advantage when he’s talking to you if he’s trying to impress you. He’s often stand with his hands on his hips to suggest confidence. When a man is interested, he’ll stand directly in front of you to show full attention and make it possible to lean in to get closer with ease. If he’s not interested, his shoulders will face away from you.  

interact with him.  notice his smile.  notice his stance. 

 Show him you are well-groomed and put together by ensuring you maintain good hygiene. Shower every day, make sure you brush and floss at least twice a day, and present a clean appearance., You can let an older guy know that you can be mature and put together by choosing outfits and clothing that appear more adult. Go for outfits that project maturity rather than a childish or teenager look.  A big part of acting mature is being able to own your own sense of style, based on your tastes and preferences. Don’t expect to wake up one day and have personal sense of style. Instead, let your sense of style evolve as you evolve. As you grow older, your taste in clothing will change over time. It may help to focus on a certain style of dressing, like surfer girl style or ladylike style, and then tailor it to fit your personality and your tastes.   One way you can develop your own sense of style is to find an older style icon and emulate their style. This could be a classic film star like Carey Grant or Grace Kelly, or it could be your mother or father’s style in the 70s or 80s. Look at how your style icon dresses and carries themselves. Try to find clothing that has a similar cut or look and style yourself after an older style icon. If you’re trying to create an outfit for a night out, you should think about dressing mature and still true to yourself. This could mean higher necklines and lower hemlines, but also an element that is true to your personality or sense of style, like a cool necklace or a vintage coat. The idea is to project confidence and maturity with how you wear your clothing, rather than what you are wearing.  Show the older guy that you have a strong intellect by reading up on current events and pop culture. You can then bring up current events in conversation when you are around the older guy or on a date with him. You should try to have a well-informed opinion about local and global issues and be willing to engage in conversation that is interesting and engaging.  You can become well-versed in current events and pop culture by reading articles online and in print in magazines, newspapers, and journals. You can also watch videos online about pop culture and world issues so you are armed with lots of intelligent information you can discuss with the older guy.  Take pride in your skills and abilities at school or at work and don’t be afraid to discuss them with the older guy. If you are a star student in a particular subject or an ace employee at the office, brag and let the older guy know that you are in control and in charge in a certain area of your life. This will show him you have skills and abilities that you excel in. Your confidence and skills will surely impress him and make him more interested in you as a person.  One way you can show off your skills or abilities is to invite him to an event or setting that will allow you to demonstrate them. This could be an art show displaying your artwork, a sporting event where he can watch you play, or an office event where you can show off how well-regarded you are among your co-workers. You can also share this information in conversation by asking the older guy what he is most proud of or asking him about his skills and abilities. He may then reciprocate by asking you about your skills and abilities, thereby allowing you to share them without appearing cocky or egotistical. For example, you could suggest: "Let's talk about things we are proud of" or ask him, "What do you feel you are good at?"  , If you know you and the older guy share certain topics or interests in common, you should focus your conversation around these interests. This could be a shared interest in science fiction novels or a sports team, or perhaps a shared experience of backpacking through Asia alone. Think about topics that you can bring up that will encourage interesting conversation and a feeling of connection between you and the older guy.   You can also plan dates or get togethers that focus on a topic or activity of interest, like going to see a favorite author read at a bookstore or going to watch a hockey game of a team you both love. This will show the older guy that you are trying to create experiences that you will both enjoy and that you are mature enough to consider his needs as well as yours.  Try not to put on an act or pretend to be someone you are not around the older guy. Though you may try to impress the older guy by being someone you are not, it can be difficult to maintain the act and over time, you may slip up or not be able to keep pretending. Avoid giving the guy a false sense of yourself and start the relationship on an honest, straightforward note. Be forthcoming and yourself around the guy so you appear confident and self-aware to him. This will likely impress him more than a false representation of yourself.  Impress the older guy with your ability to be a good listener and practice active listening. Active listening is the process of viewing every conversation as a learning opportunity, where you can get to know someone better or learn something new from someone else. When you actively listen to someone speak, they can tell you are interested in what they are saying and are skilled at sincere and engaging conversation.  Do active listening with the older guy by asking him about his day and then listening to him fully as he speaks. Listen without interrupting but show you are engaged by nodding and maintaining eye contact with him. Once he is finished speaking, repeat back what he said in your own words, such as, “I think you mean…” or “What I hear you saying is…” You can also offer advice or comment on what he tells you. Be thoughtful and take your time when you respond to him, as this will show him you take his words seriously and can be a good active listener.  Avoid bottling up your feelings and emotions or being passive aggressive about your emotions. These are both signs of immaturity and an inability to be emotionally open. Older guys can have more developed emotional maturity due to their age and experience, so meet him halfway by being willing to share your feelings if you are upset or bothered by something or someone. This means also being honest with him if he does something that annoys you or makes you uncomfortable, as this will show him you can be confident and straightforward.Keeping your feelings and emotions to yourself may seem like an easy to avoid conflict and appear relaxed and easygoing, especially if you are trying to appear cool and collected to an older guy. But being dishonest about your feelings will only lead to conflict later on and less trust between you and the older guy. If the older guy is as mature as he seems, he will react to your honesty with compassion and gratitude. For example, if the older guy does something that upsets you, rather than get upset and start a screaming match or give him the silent treatment, you can respond by suggesting that you both discuss the issue and try to resolve it together. If he forgets your birthday, for example, you may tell him: "I'm sure you didn't mean to be hurtful, but when you forgot my birthday I felt really hurt. It felt like you didn't value a day that's important to me. Can we talk about it?"  , Another big turn on for older guys is a partner who is not overly needy or insecure. Show him that you can be independent and self sufficient so that he comes to see you as his equal, rather than a younger, inexperienced partner.This means not calling or texting him all day, every day, or insisting that you spend every minute together. You should cultivate your own friend group and stay connected to your family and friends, even if you become involved with the older guy. This will illustrate your independence and likely lead to a healthier relationship. Do things on your own occasionally, like going to a concert or seeing a movie. Knowing that you can have fun by yourself will make you more confident, which is impressive to older guys.  

practice good hygiene.  choose outfits that are mature and put together.  develop a personal sense of style.  develop a knowledge of current events and pop culture.  discuss your skills and abilities in school or your career.  focus on topics or interests you have in common.  focus on being yourself around the older guy.  practice active listening.  share your feelings and emotions.  demonstrate independence and self sufficiency. 

 Are you making the statement you wish to make or do you need to make some style adjustments? This might be as simple as ironing out the wrinkles or as complicated as coming up with new, fun ways to wear your existing clothes.; , That's the easiest and most sensible way to land a guy who is going to relate to the real you. Avoid going overboard to impress or act differently, it'll just embarrass him and cause him to keep away.  Find the brave inside of you to strike up a conversation and have a good chat. Talk about school, sports, teachers, whatever! If you miss this vital part of trying to get to know him, no amount of hair flicking, flirting or dropping binders in the hallway when he passes will cause him to feel impressed by you.   Ask him questions about his interests and hobbies outside of school. Share a little information about what you're interested in too.  Work onto the longer ones later, for now just enough to be interesting.  There's no need to overdo it and embarrass him in front of the others.   Avoid flirting with other guys in his presence. He'll just figure you're not the slightest bit interested.  He won't be impressed by someone whose marks dip or sporting performance falls short because you're too obsessed with him.   Staying on track with the things that are important to your development and future is more impressive than flirting or making ga-ga eyes all day. It'll also reassure him that you're not the clingy type. He'll appreciate the space you leave him.  However, don't pressure him or push him into going out with you; he won't. Don't keep asking until he says yes either––leave it be and let him think things over.  If he says no to that, just shrug and say okay. He'll come around sooner or later. He might see how you didn't really care and really want you.  

check your personal style.  don't try too hard, be yourself.  make conversation.  keep your conversations simple and short.  keep the flirting to a tolerable minimum.  get on with your schoolwork, sports and other activities.  ask him out.  ask if you can be friends if he's not interested in romance. 

 Not only should you be looking for eye contact, but you should also notice his pupils. If he is looking at you while you talk—great. If his pupils are larger than normal—even better! Dilation is a brain response that occurs when someone is attracted to something.If his eye contact is shaky, it most likely means that he wants to get out of the situation that he’s in.   Excessive blinking is another strong indication someone is attracted to you. For some people, blink rate spikes when they’re emotionally excited.  If his eyebrows are raises slightly, this means that he finds you fascinating. This is a subconscious expression that happens when a man likes what he sees., He may not always have direct eye contact when he’s speaking to you, but that doesn’t mean he isn’t interested. If his eyes wander, take note of where they’re going. If he’s checking you out—he’s obviously interested. If he seems to be looking past you, it’s not a good sign. That shows that he is in a rush to escape the conversation.  

look for eye contact.  check out his eyebrows.  notice if he looks past you. 

 Once you do this, sit with the group for a bit to see how your guy acts. If he seems to be putting on a show for his friends, it is likely that he is trying to get your attention. This means that he’s interested. If he seems quiet or awkward, he might be uncomfortable with the situation because he’s not interested in you and doesn’t feel comfortable with you hanging around his friends.  Take note of how often and the reasons he calls or texts you when you aren’t together. If he is only calling you to ask a favor, he probably just sees you as a friend. If he calls just to see how you’re doing or to make small talk, he’s interested.  Is he always on is phone? Does he appear scatter-brained and ready to get out of the conversation? If either of these are true, he’s not interested. If he is interested, he will give you his full attention for as long as he can get it for. 

introduce yourself to his friends.  talk on the phone.  watch how he talks to you. 

 Ask him, straight forward, what he looks for in a girl. This will give you a better idea of the kind of things that he is or isn’t attracted to. (Take note about if you have these qualities or not.) Not only should you ask what he likes, but also ask what he doesn’t like. Keep it casual, but pick at his brain for his biggest turn-ons and turn-offs.  If he says that he’s “not sure how he feels,” that’s not a good sign. Chances are, he knows, but he knows you won’t respond well if he tells you.If he says that he thinks that you have a great personality, ask him if he finds you attractive.  Have a talk about what you mean to each other. Make sure not to bring it up in front of a group. That might make him uncomfortable and he might not give very straight answers to avoid an awkward situation.  

learn what he likes.  ask him what he thinks about you.  talk in private. 

 Having a clear face is an important step in grabbing a popular boy's attention. While you should mainly rely on your natural beauty, you should also remove flaws or acne that distract from your attractiveness. In order to do so, follow a light makeup routine in order to hide small blemishes and bring out a natural glow on your face:   First, use makeup sponge to apply a thin amount of liquid foundation on your face. Ensure that it is the same shade of your skin; otherwise, it may appear unnatural. Be sure that you spread some down your neck in order to maintain the same color. Second, use a large brush to lightly dust your face with powder. This will help the foundation to stay on your face, as well as create a proper base for additional makeup. Third, apply concealer over remaining blemishes. If you have bags under your eyes, cover them as well. Fourth, use a big brush to add a light dusting of pink blush or face color. A good example of an excellent brand is Bare Minerals Clear Radiance face color.; , Take good care of them to prevent them from becoming dry or chapped. If you have kissable lips, they will most likely grab his attention. The image of your lovely mouth won't be able to escape his thoughts if you follow the below steps:   First, apply chap stick to your lips every night. Forming this habit will prevent them from becoming chapped. Moisturized lips are ideal for applying lipstick in the morning. Another method is to brush your lips with a wet toothbrush, which exfoliates your mouth and removes dead skin. Second, apply a light pink or red lipstick. Be sure that it is not too bold; otherwise, it may appear unnatural and unattractive. Third, lightly apply a gloss to add shine to your lips. Fourth, outline your mouth with a lip liner that is a shade darker than your lipstick and gloss. This step is optional.  They are one of your most unique facial features. and can be used as means of seduction and flirtation. To further draw out their beauty, accentuate their appearance with eye makeup:   Lengthen your eyelashes. By drawing attention to them with mascara, you can bat your eyelashes and have your guy swooning at your feet.  First, decide on the type of eyelashes you would like to have. You have the options of either long, thick, or both. Second, when using the wand, wipe excess mascara off of the sides by using toilet paper or the side of the container. There should be enough remaining to use on your eyelashes. Third, apply mascara to your eyelashes with careful and light motions. Fourth, carefully pick or wipe off excess clumps of mascara on your eyelashes. You can also use a Q-tip to fix mistakes or remove stray bits of makeup from your face.   Outline your eyes. To place emphasis upon them and attract attention, you can use eyeliner to give them a larger or smaller appearance. When purchasing eyeliner, find a mixture between liquid and crayon eyeliner, as liquid is runny while crayon hurts during application and is difficult to use.  First, pull down the bottom of your eyelid. Choose the color of your eyeliner (black, white, brown, or silver). Apply it on or below your waterline in thick but moderate strokes. Keeping it thick is important, as the waterline may cause it to be washed off. Carefully apply eyeliner over your top eyelashes. Keep your stroke light as a thick line will cause you to appear to have a black eye.   Add color to your eyes. For a unique appearance that complements your outfits, use eyeshadow to add a dramatic flair to your eyes. Although optional, it is recommended if you want to place the focus on your eyes.  First, choose the color of your eyeshadow. To be safe, you can stay with plain colors, such as pink, white, silver, brown, and grey. However, it is recommended that you stay away from black. Second, use an eyeshadow brush to lightly apply the color over your eyelid. If you wish, you could blend two colors together. Apply a light shade before blending it with a dark layer on top. A good example of an ideal combination is black, white, and grey. Brown, pink, and white is another. Purple, white, and silver is also ideal.  Although they may not be as noticeable, your hands should appear just as beautiful as the rest of your body. Paint your fingernails and toenails, as weekly trips to the nail salon can be expensive. Keep your nails trimmed short unless you plan on doing french tips.   Clean your nails on a daily basis. Remove dirt and grit from underneath them. This will show that you take good care of your body.  

focus on your skin.  add color to your lips.  make your eyes bolder.  keep your nails pretty. 

 It’s difficult to put yourself out there without healthy self-esteem and a sense of confidence, and shyness is common in middle school. A big part of self-confidence is being more aware of yourself. Writing down a list of your strengths and weaknesses can help you uncover your best attributes. Play these up when interacting with a boy you like.   For example, if you have a great smile, be sure to use it often around the boy. Identifying your weaknesses can help you make improvements. ; , Along with confidence, one of the best ways to make yourself more noticeable to a boy is to look approachable. Smiling gives the instant impression that you are friendly and approachable. Making eye contact is also important, but be careful not to stare. , A big part of confidence is looking and feeling your best. It doesn’t mean being overly fancy, just wear clothes that make you happy and it will be easy to project a confident image to the boy you like. For example, if you feel comfortable and attractive in certain outfits, wear them when you know you will see him.  It can be easy to get wrapped up in having a crush on a boy in middle school, but spending some time on your own interests, such as sports, clubs, or other hobbies, can make you look more confident with yourself. Pursuing your interests may even give you something to talk about with the boy you’re trying to impress.  Nothing kills confidence faster than comparing yourself to your peers. It’s easy to feel inadequate when thinking about what you don’t have, so it’s important to minimize these feelings if you want to get the attention of a boy you like.   Be cautious when it comes to social media. Many teens spend a lot of time projecting a particular image through their social media profiles, but this is often an exaggeration. Try not to dwell on what your peers are posting on social media because it can harm your self-esteem.  

write down a list your strengths and weaknesses.  smile and make eye contact.  wear clothes that make you feel comfortable.  pursue your own interests.  try not to compare yourself to others. 

 It's probably safest to go to a hotel (although your place is the next safest alternative). Make sure your place is clean or that you have a hotel (or other option) ready to go.; , Wear something revealing and a little tight but avoid the "hooker look" (forgo fishnets, leather, leopard print, etc).  Drinking is okay, you shouldn't feel guilty about wanting to drink, but if you do drink do so safely. If he's super hot, you at least want to remember it in the morning, right?   It's safest not to drink alcohol at all. If you don't want to get harassed about it, just tell him that you're allergic (sulfites are a common allergen and are in many types of alcohol).  You need some quiet time to talk. If you're at a party, get him off to the side where you can actually hear each other. Besides, getting all hands-on in front of other people just makes things awkward.  Studies have shown that there's a high correlation between hook-ups and depression, anxiety, and low-self esteem. This is not to say that they cause those feelings, but make sure that you aren't looking for sex just to fill a hole. There are better ways to make your life happier and more fulfilling.  When you're talking to him, stand or sit close. Really close. He should be able to see down your shirt, smell your perfume, and look deep into your lustful eyes.  Get playful and move to sitting in his lap. You'll be sending his hips a direct message about exactly where you want them to be.  Once you've moved on to kissing, own that kiss. Show him who's boss. Nibble a little. Be passionate. Give him a little taste of what he can expect.  Use touch to show him what you have in mind. A casual caress or even a firm grope can show him you mean business.  If he's not taking the hint, tell him exactly what you have in mind. Guys will find that taking that kind of initiative is really sexy. Just say something like, "I'm feeling pretty tense. I think I could use a workout. Do you want to get out of here and help me get a little exercise?"  , If you change your mind, you can say no. If at ANY TIME you feel uncomfortable, you can say no. There is nothing wrong with that. Do what's right for you and don't let someone guilt you into something you don't want to do.  Don't drive if you're drunk and don't let him drive if he's drunk. You don't want this hook up to be to an IV in an ambulance.  You never know what could happen. For your own safety, make sure your bestie or someone else you trust knows where you are.  Never leave your drink unattended and make sure you watch it being opened or poured. Even if your guy is super awesome, that doesn't mean the other guys at the bar are.  Everybody wants their junk to stay healthy, right? Even if you're a girl, have a condom for him to use. And don't let him talk you into going without, even if you are on birth control. Make sure you know how to put it on him (in case he doesn't know how or does it wrong).  Again, you never know, so just make sure you have a phone ready to go with numbers for things like taxi services. Or a friend if you want someone to talk to later.  You want to be the one to wake up first so that you can get out without making things too awkward.  Don't make a big deal out of hooking up. You don't have anything to be ashamed of. Just be calm and let yourself enjoy it.  Put yourself together and make sure all panties are accounted for. Wash off your makeup quickly if it's all smudged and tie up or comb your hair into something that looks intentional. You should also clean up any mess you guys made the night before as best you can without making too much noise.  Leave if you're at a hotel or make an excuse about needing to get him out of your place. You want to clear out before things get too awkward, especially if either of you is new to the hook up.  You don't need to apologize to anyone about hooking up with a guy (unless you have a boyfriend, in which case, oops). Don't apologize to him. You're just going to make both of you feel bad about something you don't need to feel bad about.  A quick kiss goodbye will help make sure everyone leaves with good memories. Leave him your phone number if you want to leave the option open for a Round 2.  

have a location in mind before you start.  wear something sexy.  go easy on the drinks.  get him alone (or close to it).  make sure this is right for you.  get in close.  sit in his lap.  conquer your make out session.  let your hands do the talking.  tell him what you want.  say no.  don't drive drunk.  make sure someone knows where you are.  keep an eye on your drinks.  bring protection and insist on using it.  bring your phone!,  wake up first.  be cool.  clean yourself up.  leave before it gets awkward.  don't apologize.  kiss him goodbye. 

 In order to attract attention from a popular boy, you should dress as though you were a part of the popular group. They often wear expensive brands, such as Hollister, American Eagle, or Abercrombie and Fitch. Although you could purchase a few sets of clothing from those places, you should shop at different stores that sell similar clothing at a lower, more reasonable price, such as Aeropostale. Garage sales or Goodwill are alternate options, although you should never let people know that you go there.  Although you should draw your inspiration from the popular people's outfits, never lose your own style. Dress fashionably, but add your own personal preferences in order to stand out. If you dress too similarly to the crowd, you won't easily catch a popular guy's attention. You may also be accused of copying.   Gradually ease into your new clothes. If you make an abrupt change, it will cause suspicion within people. They may spread rumors about you copying the popular people or attempting to impress someone.  Your fashion and wardrobe should change as the year progresses. For example, when summer comes, find clothing in lighter shades, such as light pink, yellow, and purple. However, once autumn begins to hit, adapt to natural colors that inspire thoughts of earth and fall, including light brown or grey. Include skinny jeans, yoga jeans, or sweatpants in your outfits. Good winter colors are dark blue, purple, white and black. Meanwhile, floral clothing is popular in the spring.  It is a simple way to add flair to an outfit. Have your ears pierced if you like, and start wearing necklaces with unique pendants. Purchase bracelets, watches, or rings to attract attention to your hands. However, beware of adding too many accessories, as you will appear tacky and unfashionable.   Employ the method of removing one accessory before you leave the house. If you feel that you have too many on, stick to your gut, as you may be right.  

stick to name brands.  find unique clothing.  dress according to the season.  wear jewelry. 

 Take good care of your body, and it will show. Shower on a daily basis, and use deodorant to smell good. Wash your hair every two or three days, using an excellent shampoo and conditioner. Be sure to shave your legs and armpits to remove unwanted hairs. Keep your face clear by washing it with a chemical-free cleanser, toner, and moisturizer.  By keeping your meals balanced with good nutrients and healthy foods, you will be able to maintain your weight. Include carbohydrates in your meals for high energy levels so that you will always appear alive and active. If you eat good foods, it will in your vibrant, glowing appearance.  Exercise on a daily basis for at least thirty minutes. If you have trouble finding time, you can separate your workout time into three separate sessions, each one lasting ten minutes. Find exercises that appeal to you the most, such as running or lifting weights. Understand that you should recognize and respect your limits when exercising, as you could potentially damage yourself if you push your boundaries.  To attract him, use enticing perfume that does not smell overwhelming. Floral and vanilla scents are natural smells that are the most attractive. To ensure that you leave a subtle but sweet scent on your body, release one spritz of perfume in the air before walking through it.  Brush them twice a day, and floss them to get rid of buildups in the gums. Include mouthwash in your daily regime to fight bad-smelling bacteria. Keep mints with you at all times for fresh breath in case you need to talk to him. Be sure to have regular appointments at the dentist's in order to maintain your teeth's health.  To ensure that your clothes appear fresh and smell nice, clean them during your free time. Wear shirts only once before washing them. Avoid wearing pants or shorts more than twice, as dirt and smells could build up on them. Be sure that you plan your outfits ahead of time so that you know when to do your laundry.  

stay on top of your personal hygiene.  stick to a healthy diet.  keep your body fit.  wear perfume.  keep your teeth healthy.  do your laundry. 

 Although you may be tweaking your appearance, never forget that your personality can be a powerful tool. Although a popular guy may like you for your appearance, he should also like you for who you are. Otherwise, it is not worth it. Despite how people think you should behave, be yourself and do what you enjoy. Becoming a fake, lifeless doll who relies on people's opinions is a bad direction.  Without taking any steps forward, you will not be able to progress in a relationship with him. By initiating a conversation and showing that you are confident in yourself, you will catch his attention and show him that you exist. If you remain in the background and only stare at him, he will not be interested in you and may think of you as creepy. Find the right times to talk to him:   Use large group activities at school to your advantage. Show your intelligence and skills on projects, as this will impress him. Socialize with all the group members to prove that you are a social butterfly. This will also give you the excuse to talk to him. However, avoid placing your entire focus upon him, as this will cause you to appear desperate. Allow him to hang out with his friends, but occasionally drop by for a short conversation with him. After the project is over, continue talking to him once in a while. If he is interested in you, he'll eventually start initiating the conversations. Attend after-school meetings. Casual locations, such as the park or community swimming pool, are ideal as he may be alone or with a small group of friends. If you see him, wave and start a conversation about your plans and activities. However, avoid pulling him away for too long, as he may become annoyed.  If he has a small sibling, show your kindness to him or her. This will show the popular guy that you are good with children. However, avoid being overly sweet and fake; otherwise, he may dislike you and feel that you are using his sibling to win his favor. Ask the popular guy about his interests. Show him that you are genuinely interested in his life. For example, if he plays football, ask him about last night's game. However, if his hobbies bore you, avoid spending too long on the topics, as your boredom will show. Instead, find common interests or activities that you both participate in. Compliment him. If he has a talent in a certain area that you didn't expect, offer him a genuine compliment. This may open up the path to a new conversation. However, avoid gushing over him or being overly sweet; otherwise, he may feel uncomfortable.  Accidentally drop your belongings, or ask him to reach an item on a shelf or locker for you. You could also ask for his help on a question or an assignment. However, avoid being needy and constantly asking for his help. You should also show him that you can be independent and strong without him. If you constantly cling to him, he may feel smothered and think of you as weak.  Boys are often attracted by a flirtatious girl who knows how to set the tone. Use subtle methods to show your attraction to him, such as twirling your hair, lowering your voice, or wearing slightly suggestive clothing. Wear semi-low, cute tops, as well as dresses or skirts that fall slightly above the knee. Occasionally bat your eyelashes, and don't hesitate to smile or wave to him. Have a confident walk as if you have places to be.  Although boys may be attracted by a flirtatious girl, they are often turned off by one who constantly throws herself at them. In order to set the mood and raise his interest in you, add an element of mysteriousness to your personality. Be secretive about certain aspects of your life. If he questions you about them, use slightly flirtatious lines, such as, "I'd tell you, but then I'd have to kill you." You could also drop hints about having a crush on a certain boy, but avoid revealing too much information.  Although you should avoid completely bragging about them, attract his attention by flaunting your intelligence and talents a little. Jog past him to show him how fast you are. Do your best in gym class, or show him your excellent skills on the computer. By proving to him that you are capable of different activities, you will be able to capture his interest.   Beware of pushing your limits in skills that you are not good with. If he finds out that you are not as good as you claim, he may dislike you for lying.  Make sure that you are also well-connected outside of school. Add the popular guy on several social media websites, such as Facebook and Twitter. Once in a while, send him friendly messages, which will let him know that you are thinking of him and that you care. Upload good photos of yourself, and make sure you look your best in them, as he could see them. However, avoid following all of his accounts; otherwise, you'll appear to be a stalker.   If a friend tags you in a bad picture, untag it.  If he has a girlfriend or doesn't like you, find other nice boys. Understand that it is not the end of the friendship if he shows no interest in you. Continue to maintain your relationship with him by talking to him; otherwise, he may feel as if you were using him, and you might have destroyed a potentially important bond. Realize that there is still hope that he may like you in the future, but don't heavily rely on it.  

be yourself.  have conversations with the popular guy.  make him feel helpful.  flirt.  be mysterious.  show off your skills.  build a social life on the internet.  don't wait for him forever. 

 If you aren’t sure if he likes you or not, trying to become friends first may be the way you want to go. Get to know him a bit, spend time with him, and find some common ground. Ask him about his hobbies or how he likes to spend his time and open up a bit. Keep it casual. Find common interests. If there are activities you both enjoy, you’ll have more reasons to spend time with him. Ask him what kind of music he likes to see if he has similar interests. You can even talk about classes you have together. Spend time with his friends. This may help you learn more about him.  If you have a crush on this boy and are trying to be friends first, be careful not to come on too strong. As you get to know him better, reveal some more personal information about yourself. However, if he isn’t also telling you about himself, you may want to stay more remote instead of opening up. Don't spill your soul.   Have inside jokes and secrets with him. This is a great way to open up to each other and can help you gauge his sense of humor. Having inside jokes allows you to establish common ground and can strengthen your friendship. Ask him if he has a crush! After you’ve gotten to know each other and share a certain level of trust, you may feel comfortable enough to ask him if he has a crush. This can move the relationship forward if he’s interested in you! Be sure to ask at a time when it flows naturally; do not force it into an unrelated conversation. If he isn’t interested, don’t be visibly upset. Put your best foot forward; you can still be friends and his feelings about you may change over time.  As you become friends and spend more time together, let your confidence show. If you try too hard to be someone you're not, he won't get to know the real you. Don't be afraid to be yourself. He’ll be impressed by how cool, understanding, and fun you are.  

get to know him.  get a little closer to him, but don’t overdo it.  let him see your best self. 

 Be sure it isn’t all about his looks. Get to know him first so you can be sure he isn’t a jerk. Take opportunities to chat with him in class or in the hallways. Without getting to know him, you may eventually realize you don’t have anything in common. Maybe you enjoy his positive attitude or sense of humor.  After working on your confidence and identifying why you like the boy, it’s time to jump in and talk to him! Make sure you talk about things he likes, or the conversation may die quickly. For example, if he's on a sports team, tell him he played well. If you’re still feeling shy, find ways to be around him in a group because he still might notice you if you smile and make eye contact.  They can be sources of information, such as if he likes you or the kinds of things that interest him. Ask them about activities they enjoy doing together.You can even talk about classes you have together or ask for help in a certain subject. Then you can use this information to make conversation with the boy you're trying to impress.   If his friends reveal anything personal about him, be careful not to mention this to him. He may think you're prying.  After talking to him for a little while, an opportunity to ask for his number may come on its own. For example, if you’re walking on a class project together, that’s the perfect time to ask.   Connect with him on social media if he doesn’t have a cell phone. If he doesn’t have his own phone where you can call and text him, he might be active on social media. Mention Twitter, Facebook, and Instagram and add him on those sites. Mention previous conversations or something he might find interesting if you're looking for a way to initiate a dialogue on social media.  Just a little bit of flirtation will get the message across. You don't want the guy to think that you'd flirt with just anyone. Make him feel special about getting some attention from you.   Don't talk about other guys. While you may not mean anything by it, this could send the wrong message to the boy you're trying to impress. He may think you're interested in someone else.  

identify why you like this boy.  don't be nervous about talking to him.  get to know his friends.  find an excuse to get his number.  don’t be too forward. 

 Eye contact shows that you’re paying attention and care about what a person is saying. It’s also a silent form of communication. In general, try to maintain eye contact for about 30-60% of a conversation, particularly during the part of a conversation when you’re listening, not speaking. Don’t stare, because this can make people feel uncomfortable and communicate hostility. Too little eye contact makes you seem insincere or uninterested.; , A happy face makes you appear approachable, friendly, and fun. This is exactly what you want to look like if you want your crush to notice and approach you. Not smiling can make you look disinterested or even hostile.In one study, 60% of men described images of unsmiling women as “moody,” and 66% of women described unsmiling women as “disinterested.” As an added bonus, smiling and laughter can actually make you feel happier.With all of this in mind, you should still feel free to tell people to go jump in a lake if they ORDER you to smile! , Keep your back straight and chin up. Put your shoulders back, but not too far. This shows confidence and energy. Keep your legs and arms relaxed instead of crossing them. This conveys openness and friendliness. Get in the habit of doing some simple exercises to improve your posture. Do yoga, pilates, or other stretching. Try to avoid slouching or leaning against the wall, because this implies insecurity or disinterest.  Don’t be afraid to say hello! Girls are often taught to sit back and wait to be approached, but it can be very attractive, and you can stand out from the crowd, if you speak up instead of waiting around.  Studies have shown again and again that grooming is the most important element of attractiveness. Shower often. You shouldn’t necessarily style your hair like you’re going to prom all the time, and don’t feel like you need to spend hours with the curling iron and hairspray, but be sure your hair looks clean.Sometimes the amount and type of grooming that you will do depends on the type of person you want to attract. Some people are more attracted to a rugged, outdoors type, while others prefer a more put-together appearance. Smell your best. Wear deodorant, and bathe regularly, but don’t overdo it on the perfume, body spray, or lotion. You don’t want to make your crush sneeze or get a headache because you are wearing too much scent.  In general, research shows that neat, well fitting, and more formal clothes are considered the most attractive. That is, clothes should be free of holes, well-laundered, flattering to your shape, and typically on the classier side. That said, it all depends on who you’re trying to attract. Some people find a more casual look appealing. No matter what style you choose, pick clothing that you feel good in, so that you will look and feel more confident. Some researchers believe that wearing red makes you more attractive. , According to one study, teeth are “the human equivalent of a peacock’s tail.” The study showed that people with whiter, brighter, more evenly spaced teeth were rated more attractive than others. Be sure to brush and floss those pearly whites, and if you’ve had the privilege of orthodontia, wear your retainer!, Subtly let your crush know that you are interested in them simply by paying attention when they speak. You don’t have to hang attentively on every word, but make it clear that you care about what they are saying by nodding, smiling, and responding when appropriate. Ask questions about what they say. If your crush is telling you that he’s sad about his grandma dying, ask about what he liked to do with his grandma. If your crush is excited about her basketball game tonight, ask what position she plays. You’ll be especially glad that you listened carefully the next time you see your crush, because you’ll have a basis for conversation already. You may have even developed an inside joke with them, which can be great for creating lasting relationships.  This can help you learn more about your crush to help you determine whether you are truly compatible or not. It can also lead to increased interactions with your crush, which will make it more likely that they will notice you. Of course, there’s always the added bonus of making new friends too, even if your crush never notices you.  If you are particularly nervous around your crush, it might be hard to make conversation. Try to think of conversation topics before you see them. Think about what you have in common, who your common friends are, what upcoming events you might both be excited about (or dreading), and see if you can come up with a few different topics in your head.   Joking around is a great way to interact with your crush, but be careful not to make jokes at the expense of others. You don’t want to seem like a bully or a mean person just to get someone’s attention.  You might want to start by asking them to be part of a group you’re organizing. This can be a group doing a school project or a group getting together to go to the movies. Just make it clear that you’re interested in having them around. After you’ve done some group activities together and feel comfortable, then ask them to do something with you one-on-one.   Oddly enough, one study with over 1,000 participants found that people who rode rollercoasters found their non-romantic friends more attractive after a ride on a roller coaster than before. So maybe a trip to a fair or an amusement park is in order! , If you sit down next to your crush and your legs bump each other, pay attention to whether they jump away quickly or let their leg linger. If they let the touch continue, it’s possible that they are interested in you, so you might want to escalate the touch ever-so-slightly by casually letting your arm touch theirs the next time you’re at your lockers together.Don’t escalate until your crush reciprocates or lingers. They might also be super shy and feel terrified when their arm touches yours, so be respectful of their comfort level and don’t touch them if they seem uncomfortable. Even if they jump away when you touch, that doesn’t necessarily mean they don’t like you, so try some other tactics if you suspect that’s the case.  This is the hardest part! If you try to follow every piece of advice you have ever heard about getting someone to notice you, you may find that you feel fake or overwhelmed. When in doubt, just try to act as naturally as possible. Treat your crush like you treat your friends, and odds are good they’ll pay attention to you eventually.  

make eye contact.  smile and laugh.  have good posture.  take the initiative.  groom carefully.  dress carefully.  keep your teeth clean.  listen attentively.  get to know your crush’s friends.  talk even if it’s difficult.  ask them to do things together.  touch incidentally.  be yourself. 

 If he says "Hi" back to you, then great, you're already getting started! If he doesn't, then don't worry- There are some tips for you at the end.; , You don't have to, especially if he just walks around school, but it's a good way to lead him to second thoughts about you (good thoughts.)  , Say he's sitting at a different table or he's sitting in front of you. Pretend to drop something near him. If he looks at you- look back for a split second and then look away.  If you don't want to do that, whenever you make eye contact, keep your eyes fixed on his (but don't be creepy and scary, he'll think you're crazy!), and then you'll probably both start bursting out laughing. NOTE: This might mean he's nervous, which may be a good thing, because anxiety/curiosity is one of the key terms in having a crush. , Don't be a giggle freak and laugh every time he talks, otherwise he might think you're a little crazy.  Remember, be yourself! And if you wear makeup, some skin-tone matching eye liner would be good, along with some eyebrow pencil and a little mascara! If your school has uniforms, wear your uniform in style. If your school doesn't have uniforms, spice it up! Not too clashing, not too chic to be honest.  If you do,what type is it?" This will make him think you just want to see what type of phone he has. Then, eventually, he'll give you his number.       Start a nice, easy-going conversation with him and then ask,"Hey, can I have your phone number?" just ask this calmly. NOT frantically or excitedly. Then, when you get home or when you have FREE time, pretend to "accidentally" call him. If he picks up, or even if it's voice mail, say, "Hi, sorry, it's _____. I accidentally called you, sorry I didn't hang up before you answered. Didn't realize." Give a cute laugh at the end of the sentence and then hang up. This will leave him mystified and wanting more.  No point having a crush on him if you're not going to befriend him.  Don't do this too early or even too late, because he might say "no" if you hadn't done it sooner because he might think you don't like him. If he says "yes" or you say "yes", don't blab it off. Tell your parent/ guardian of course but don't run your mouth off about it or your friends might tease you or him and he won't want to go out with you anymore. Here are some ways to ask him out or say "yes" to him:   "Hey ______! My parents and I are going somewhere and they wanted me to invite a good friend, so I decided to invite you. Wanna come?"       "Hey ______! So, we've been best friends for a long time, right? I wanted to know if you wanted to ." "Hey ____. My parents and I want us to have a little hangout, so... do you want to come?" Or just ask him to hangout with you! Don't call it a date right away, say something like this, " Hey do you want to hangout in the park?" Or " Do you want to come see this new movie with me?" Work your way up to calling it a date, but for now just call it a hangout!  

say the casual "hey" to him to get his attention.  if you go outside, play the games that he plays.  make it your job to hang out with him.  when you're working on projects together, get close to him when he needs help.  lead yourself to like the things he does, but be yourself, otherwise he might think you're fake.  ,  laugh!,  look good around him.  lead him naturally into giving him your number, or making him give you your number!here are some examples:  "hey ___ , do you have a phone?,  become real friends with the guy.  finally, ask him out if he already hasn't! 

 Dropping hints is a great way to start getting the message across if you are sure you want more than a friendship try having one thing and sharing it. If you have something in common with him, use it. There is no doubt about it, flirting is the key to opening the door to a new relationship. Of course, you need to make sure you are not overdoing it, but you also want to get the message across.   When he says something funny to you, laugh! Only laugh if it's funny to you because you'd want him to know the real you. Still, even if his jokes aren't all hilarious, at least smile. Boys love seeing your smile. Just don't overdo it if you can help yourself. Be yourself at all times! Tease him every now and then. Don't make it too harsh though. Just give him a smirk and tell him he totally failed whatever he was trying to do. If he usually does it well, that's an okay time to tease him. But if he is working hard on it and just can't get it right, it's probably not the best idea to tell him he did poorly. Send him notes or put messages in his backpack. Write small things like "I wish the day was done..." or "What are you doing for summer?" Sending him notes will make him feel special and singled out by you. If you think it might work, give him a little wave with your hand. Don't be discouraged if he doesn't wave back. If he smiles back at you, you'll know it worked. If that doesn't get you noticed, try winking at him. Winking is a universal sign of affection. Make sure that you only close one eye when you wink, or else it might just look like you're blinking.; , We all like our personal space, but we're eager to give it up when it comes to that special person. Touching him gently in social situations will signal that you don't just want to stay friends.   Ask him for help on a math problem and brush your shoulder against his. Stay close to him for a while if he doesn't move away. Touch his forearm or his shoulder when you're talking to him. Don't grab hold of him like you're going to shake him; just tap him or rest a few fingers on him for a moment, and try to do it casually If he wears glasses and you see that they are slid down a little then slowly and gently walk up and push them up to the top of his nose. As you do that rub your hand on his cheek and smile. Be gentle!! If he smiles that means he enjoyed it. If he backs you off then he's not interested or you pushed to rough. If you have a playful relationship with him, you can get away with more physical contact. Ask him for a piggyback ride (not when you're wearing a skirt!) or tickle him when he least expects it.  Be happy when you look at him, and try to project that happiness as much as possible. Being happy is attractive, and smiling is the way you show the world you're happy.   Don't conceal your true smile. Remember that time you laughed so hard you couldn't breathe? Remember the smile that was plastered on your face afterwards? Show him that smile! Your confidence will be infectious. You can tell he's interested if he smiles back at you and tries to hold your eyes a bit longer than regular friends would. This means he gets pleasure out of feasting his eyes on you. Try smiling at him as you stroke your hair. This will bring his attention to both your great smile and your fantastic hair.  This can be difficult to do, but it will give you more chances to talk to him. The more you're around him, the more he'll take notice.   In classes, if seating is optional, sit next to him every so often. Sit next to him at lunch when there's an opportunity. Join the clubs that he's in, unless they're something like boys' sports teams. Try to find clubs that you both like, so that you'll do fun activities together and enjoy yourself while you're at it. If he plays sports or does other activities, make it a priority to go to his games or see him perform. There's nothing like scoring that winning touchdown and seeing a cute girl in the stands. Be careful about being around him all the time. You don't want to look like a stalker, so be selective and play things off like they're random. Plus, they say that absence makes the heart grow fonder.  When the two of you are in the same class, look at him from wherever you're sitting and when he looks back, turn away and blush. This sends him non-verbal information that you enjoy looking at him.   Do not stare. You want him to think you're interested, not obsessed. Occasionally look his way, and if he isn't biting, don't sweat it. Send him a note or talk to him and see if he looks your way the next time. When he turns to you, look him in the eyes and smile. Remember, if he catches you looking at him, that means that he was looking at you, which means he probably likes you. Score! Always keep good eye contact when talking to him, even if he's shy. Show him how pretty your eyes are, and how he makes your eyes smile with delight. Keeping good eye contact shows him he's got your undivided attention, but also that you're one confident gal.  Be sincere about what you compliment, and don't make it seem cheesy. The best compliments say something sweet about a person's character.   When he gets a haircut, for example, ask him where he got it. If you tell him you like it, you're saying that you like his style and paid attention enough to notice. Try complimenting aspects of his personality. Tell him he was loyal not to snitch on his friend, or sweet for giving up his lunch. Going beyond surface-level compliments is important. Try to work the compliment into a bigger conversation. If you just say, "I love your shoes," he might not know how to react. Find a way to talk about shoes in general, and gradually let him know that you like his shoes more than his friend's, which are just ugly.  Give him something boyish and thoughtful. It might seem weird to give him a gift, but just pretend like you're giving it to your best friend.   Whatever it is, make him think it wasn't a big deal by saying something like: "I came across this and I thought about you." Don't buy anything too extravagant or expensive. Get something small enough so that he won't feel like he has to get you something in return. Pick up an extra pack of gum, or that bottled juice that he always gets during recess. You might even get him a notebook or pens, especially if he always forgets them. If you don't mind asking him out, get him some tickets to a movie or sports event. Tell him, "I thought we could go together." Whatever gift you give, find out his interests first. You'll want to get him something that he actually likes — something that shows you're thinking about him and you like him for who he is.  Don't call him every day and talk to him for hours, but don't be afraid to take that next step and get to know him. Calling him is a sign that you're serious about getting to know him better.   When you call him, find excuses to talk to him. Ask him what the homework was, what time the party is going to be, or what he knows about the latest cell phone. Be creative. Talk about something weird that happened in school, or something interesting about his life. Listen well and be sure to pick up on the little details that he mentions. Use them to build on old conversations and to bring up new ones. Exchange information and perspectives. This is your chance to get to know him, and his chance to get to know you. Talking on the phone can be enjoyable for boys if they feel funny and interesting doing it, so make sure to laugh at his jokes and sound excited. If he's not talkative, be sure to ask him lots of questions. Ask him what his parents do; where he grew up; what he wants to be later on; what his siblings are like; or where he wants to go on vacation. Asking question will help move along the conversation and tell him you're interested. Don't keep him on the phone for a long time; he might have other stuff to do. Always maintain a little mystery about yourself. You want him to get to know you, but you also want to leave him curious about learning even more.  This is risky, because his friends may distort information or tease him (don't worry, they're jealous!), so you have to be careful about who you tell. But sooner or later, his friends will bring it up to him, and the ball will be in his court.   Use this as a kind of last resort. If all the above steps don't work, consider telling his friends. Again, you will have little/no control over what his friends tell him. Don't tell his friends that you want them to pass it along. Just find a way to mention it to at least one of his friends — they'll most likely do the rest. If you really trust them, tell your friend to "accidentally" spill it to him. Because this is tough to do, have someone who is really casual do this. If they don't do it casually, it can feel like you're demanding him to make a decision about you. You want him to feel flattered, not caught in a corner.  You can try indirect flirting all you want, but it might not have an effect. Sometimes guys need you to spell things out really clearly.   Ask him to walk with you after class is done. If he says he doesn't know, nudge a little more and say, "You're going to leave me all by myself?" If he says he can't, he's not interested. If he says he can, try to flirt with him when you are walking together at the end of he day. If he says yes immediately, he's definitely interested. Ask him if he wants to be your date to a dance, especially if it's Sadie Hawkins. If he says yes, plan what you want to wear together so that you can be color-coordinated. Ask him if he'll carry your heavy backpack for a little while. It doesn't need to be all day, but tell him that it's hurting your back and that he looks strong enough to carry it. If he says yes, he's definitely into you and likes that you think he's manly.  

flirt with him.  find ways to make physical contact.  smile, smile, smile.  be in the same place as him.  exchange looks in class.  work in compliments.  give him a gift.  call him more regularly.  mention to his friends that you like him.  get a feel for where he's at. 

 Even if it's just for a few split seconds. It'll put a guy in a little pickle if he's asked if he likes a girl he doesn't even know. Try this: when your friend isn't looking, knock one of her books off of her desk. Right in front of the guy, then step away quickly. If he isn't a jerk, he'll pick it up. Now he'll know who you're talking about when you ask if he likes your friend.; , If you stalk him, showering him with questions, he'll probably be a little freaked out. This is a turn-off. At lunch go sit at his table if you're friends with one of his. Then ask him, if he doesn't reply, give him time. And ask the next week.  He might be a little embarrassed if he's asked in front of his friends, they might laugh at him or something. But when you ask to see him in private, make sure you sound casual. Otherwise he'll think that YOU like him.  Most guys will say, "I don't know." "Maybe." "I gotta think about it." Don't press him to much just try to get a definite answer.  If he says yes, then don't tell everyone at school. That's is a humongous turn-off.  That is if she knows you're trying to set the two of them up. If she doesn't, don't say anything.  Even if she doesn't know you were setting them up. Make sure she goes and talks to him, and they arrange the date. Humbly take the million thank-yous she gives you.  

get your friend's dream guy to notice her.  be casual.  try to ask him in private.  yes or no?,  don't yell it out to everyone!,  if he says no, tell your friend.  if he says yes then tell your friend. 

 By entering someone's social circle, it becomes easier to spend more time with them. This will give you two a chance to grow comfortable together.    Give him a comparison. By spending more time with him, he can pick up on how you act differently around other people that you are not interested in. This will make it easier to see that you only act flirtatious with him.; , By becoming interested in his favorite things, you are signaling that you two are compatible. This creates a mutual feeling of like-mindedness that is associated relationships.  Compliment the qualities about him that you like and don't be shy to compare him to other men. Show him that in your mind, he is "different" from other guys you know. Flirting with other guys is a way to show that others find you desirable (and that he should too), but don't this can also send mixed messages that you are flirtatious with everyone. So follow up flirting with other men by clarify why you would much rather be with someone more like him.  This is a subconscious way to flirt with him and display interest without having to verbally express yourself, which can be hard. All of the following body gestures display interest but have subtle difference in what they are attempting to subconsciously provoke.    Direct eye contact shows that you are listening. This is a direct way to show that you are genuinely interested not only in the conversation but also in him.  Slowly nodding while you are listening says that you "agree" with what he is saying. This signals that you are "compatible" in the way you think, and that you two would likely be compatible in a relationship.  Moistening or parting lips draws attention to your lips. This subconsciously implies you are preparing to kiss the other person--showing interest.  Looking sideways and upward creates an illusion of "doe" eyes. These signal vulnerability and interest in the conversation.  Feet pointed straight at the other person is a natural display of interest in him. This direct stance implies a lack of interests in everything else around the other person.  Legs crossed "into" him is showing a subtle interest in only him and that you are closing your legs ("self") off from other things.  Sitting or standing closely (0-18inches) sets an intimate space between the two people. This implies that it is more than just a casual conversation, but in fact you are sharing intimate details with him.  Mirroring implies "compatibility." By mirroring his gestures you are encouraging a mutual feeling of trust in what both of you are saying. For every 10 gestures that he does, mimic one or two of them.  Preening or grooming yourself, shows a desire to look presentable to the other person.  Frequent touching evokes a sensory feelings between two people. This is a strong showing of interest in the other person.  This is the hardest thing to do because people are often scared of rejection. Being direct, however, is the best way to create a conversation about your feelings for each other. By saying "I like you," he will be forced to confront how he feels about you. While you might not hear what you want, at least you will clear up any confusion that exists.  Boys like girls who are always nice to him. Then, you would be able to naturally show how you like him. For example, text him on Facebook, Skype, or other social medias. If he answers you, he doesn't hate you (At least!). If he likes you, he would be the one who sends the message first.  

enter his social circle.  show interest in his likes and dislikes.  praise him and don't compare him to other men.  use the right body language.  tell him how you feel.  always be nice to him. 

 One of the most important things you can do is smile at the guy to make him feel comfortable and to give him the impression you are friendly. Don't give him a big cheesy grin; just a soft, sweet smile will do just the trick.; , Don't swat as if you're trying to get a fly off the ceiling, just give a small, cute, fluttery-fingered wave that lets him know that you're glad to see him. If he smiles, you're making progress.  If you can't sit at the same table, just sit at a table nearby and make lots of eye contact -- maybe wink once or twice if you're feeling like playfully showing him how cute you think he is.  If you're going somewhere with friends, don't be afraid to invite him along! Just casually say "Oh, me and a bunch of friends are going *insert activity here*. Wanna come?" He'll probably say yes. If he says no, just give him a pretty, casual smile and say "Oh! No problem. Maybe another time."  , Don't cross your arms around him, which makes you seem closed. Always have your arms by your sides to show you're relaxed. Playfully twirl your hair (don't overdo it), or lightly bat your eyelashes. Be careful with this one, because if you overdo it, he'll think you've got something in your eye, or having an eyelid spasm.  Wear clothes you feel comfortable in. That is most important. The more comfortable you around him to more comfortable he will be with you. If you wear a school uniform, don't break the rules to try to impress him with your style. Usually, it makes your uniform look tacky if you over-accessorize. Just wear it properly and work it. Light, natural makeup (guys hate girls who wear tons of makeup) and do your hair in a fun, girly style. Make sure you shower and wash your hair often, and put on body spray, deodorant or perfume before you leave the house. Use a perfume popular with teens, don't use your Mom's, it might remind him of his Mom!  

smile.  look out for him in the halls, and wave at him when you see him.  try to sit near to him at lunch.  ask him out on a group date.  use friendly fun body language to show you like him.  look decent. 

 Do you like him? Do you think you might like to get to know him a little better? Do you enjoy his company? Answering yes to these questions suggests that he might be someone you would hit it off with.; , Be yourself!   Definitely don't pretend to be a big fan of, for example, his favourite band if you have never heard of them. Instead ask questions like 'What kind of music do they play?' 'Have you seen them play live?' 'What's your favourite song?'. Take an interest in the band. Smile and ask questions while he talks about them. Tell him you'd love to check out their music online when you get home; ask for song suggestions or even a link to his favourite song on Youtube. You then have a perfect opportunity to chat again in a few days time. If he's into sports and you aren't, take an interest but don't be afraid to admit sports aren't your thing. Mention something else you do to keep in shape or mention a game you went to see. You don't have to become David Beckham if soccer is his thing but learn a few things about his favourite team and engage with him when he talks about his favourite hobby. Find a way your hobbies can align; maybe you could join him on a run sometime or share recipes for high-protein snacks if cooking appeals to you. If he asks about your hobbies, carefully watch his response. If he acts bored or disinterested, move the conversation on. Nail art or hockey drills are fascinating if that's your thing - but appreciate that it's a bit like watching paint dry if you're not into it.  If you can pop that question: What kind of girl do you like? Then do it. Do it with everything you have!  , As well as becoming friends with each other in real life, send a friend request on social media like Facebook or any other site like that. It's often a more casual way to express an interest in keeping in touch than swapping numbers. Play it casual - don't send a friend request right away but don't wait a week. Perhaps wait until later that evening or the next day. If he sends a friend request, wait twelve to twenty four hours to reply. However, if he added you straight away, accept straight away.   Make sure your profile picture shows off your best side before sending or accepting a friend request. Positive first impressions go a long way.  It could go either way, from leaving you alone to getting worse. Politely tell him to go away.  You don't have to instigate a conversation but if he asks you a questions, nod or shake your head or give a polite, brief answer. If he asks what you're doing next weekend, you might say 'I'm meeting some friends for a Chinese meal; we're having a girls night out. I'm looking forward to it.' Don't give a frosty response like 'None of your business' or a one-word answer. Don't lead him on either by saying 'I'm going to the disco on Main Street on Saturday. Are you?' or 'I've no plans but I was thinking of catching a movie'. Be gentle and polite but don't give the wrong impression or leave things ambiguous. Boys' hearts are just as sensitive as girls' hearts, you know; they get hurt easily.  You don't have to put up with his persistent presence if it upsets you but don't blurt out that he is the most annoying person that ever lived and that he smells and that his new shirt is a weird mould colour. That won't help anyone.   If you have to ask him to leave you alone, do it tactfully. I'm sorry Kevin but I really can't talk right now, I have to look over these notes! I have a test next class. Your friends are helpful in this situation, perhaps asking if they could talk to you privately about something. Be polite but firm. If he's bothering you online or endlessly sending messages, ask him to stop. If he won't, unfriend or block him. If he keeps ringing your mobile number you can block his number. If he tries to sit next to you constantly, talk to a good friend and ask them to sit beside you in class or at lunch so that he can't physically sit beside you. If there is a seating plan and he is harassing you, talk to your teacher and see if he/she can juggle things around. If he's always tagging along with you, ask your friends to join the group if they see you alone together. He is less likely to bother you when a big group of friends are around and chatting to you both.  If he is hurting you physically or emotionally abusing you, tell someone you trust. This is not okay. Don't hurt him and do not ever, ever allow him to hurt you.  

think about the boy.  talk to him and find things you both like.  don't be shy!,  befriend one another!,  don't ignore him!,  acknowledge him.  be tactful if he's bothering you.  don't tolerate bullying. 

 Whether you're an athlete, an artist, a singer, or a writer: spend time doing what makes you happy. The first step to getting noticed is feeling (or at least appearing) confident and comfortable in your own shoes.   If you're in your element, you won't feel so self-conscious. Confidence is attractive, and guys can often tell when you're comfortable with yourself. Focus on doing what you love, and the rest will follow. Have a good time with your friends. Laugh a lot. Guys may find you more attractive if you seem like you're fun to be with. Relationships often sprout from common ground. If you spend time doing what you love, you're more likely to find someone who shares your passions.; , When you know you're going to see the guy, wear your cutest outfit. He may notice your outfit, and he may not--but you will likely feel more confident, and that can make all the difference.Consider wearing clothes that the guy might relate to. If you're crushing on a guy who's into music, wear a band t-shirt. If you're crushing on a guy who's into sports, wear a shirt or jersey with the name of his favorite team. If the guy sees that you have interests in common, he may be more likely to think of you. You don't need to wear revealing clothing to impress a guy. In fact, many guys may be turned off by "trashy" clothing that reveals too much. Respect yourself and consider the social consequences of what you wear. Consider wearing makeup, but don't overdo it. A little makeup goes a long way. Ask your mother, your older sister, or another female relative for advice if you haven't applied makeup before.  Join clubs, teams, or groups that he has joined, and put yourself into a position to grow close to him. Make it a natural process.   If a guy is involved in the science club, consider joining the science club. Only do this if you are genuinely interested in the science club; this approach only works if you can impress him by being as passionate about his hobby as he is. If a guy runs for your school's track team, consider joining the team. Again, only do this is you are genuinely interested in track. You don't want to be noticed for the wrong reasons. If a guy is in a band, consider going to his shows. Get to know the scene and compliment him on his music.  From time to time, gaze over in his direction. When he notices you, discreetly lock eyes with him for a moment, then look away.   Smile coyly, if you're feeling bold. Research indicates that guys are more likely to approach girls when they are given clear signals that their interest is returned; smiling will subtly tell him that you're interested.After you lock eyes, don't look over at him for a while. Repeat occasionally. He may begin to glance over at you more often to see if you are looking at him. Avoid looking at him too often. Be flirtatious, but don't be creepy., If you have mutual friends, spending more time with them can be a great way to grow closer to your crush.   If his friends like you and see that the two of you have chemistry together, they may help convince him to go for you. Be careful: sometimes, getting deep into a guy's social circle can complicate matters. If you share too many of the same friends, your crush may be afraid that asking you out will disrupt the friend group. He may worry about the complications that could ensue if the two of you break up down the line. Be aware that if you grow close to a guy's friends, some of them may fall for you instead. If you aren't open to this, be careful with your flirtation.  It is one thing to move in the same circles as someone; it is another thing to follow him around. Stay true to yourself, your friends, and your interests, even as you make an effort to get close to him.   Be forward, but not forceful; don't push yourself upon him. Let him notice you for who you are.  

do what you love, and let your passion show.  dress to impress.  consider where the guy spends his time.  catch his eye.  consider getting to know the guy's friends.  be respectful of a guy's space. 

 When you approach him, does your face all of a sudden turn red? Does your body shake? Does your heart skip a beat? Does your body all of a sudden feel sick or cold or warm? You could ask your friends to give you a little update on that each time whether you're near him, close to him, or around him.; , You don't want that to happen because you're not ready for a move yet. And you're not ready because you're reading this article and because you don't know what to do when you're around him.  You should even look at something else that will get your attention off that boy. Like, say you had homework. Think about it and see if you did it right. Or, if you're at a store, you can just look through the aisles and think of what you want to buy. And if you're with friends, don't look in his direction; just try to keep cool-- talk and pay real close attention to what your friends are saying. Try to act as if he isn't even there. Slowly, you'll start to get over your shyness.  Do it slowly because it will not happen right away. It will probably take about 3 days or more, and maybe possibly even a week. But it will help you A LOT!  , Look good, but be yourself and don't change yourself or who you are. it will make you feel better about yourself. Your crush may notice you if you are very positive, confident, smart, and outgoing around him!  , For example, when you're with them, ask them, "Do I look pretty?" and of course they will tell you the honest and real answer--"Yes!"--not a fake answer.  If it's music, ask him about new concerts or CDs!  , Try to act like you do around your friends or family members. 

figure out how you look when you're around your crush and you could even ask some friends how you are whenever you're around him.  know and remember if your crush sees you like that, he may know you like him.  whenever you approach your crush, whether you bump into him at a store, at school with friends or by yourself, or just anywhere, stay and remain calm and focus your attention on something else.  if you think about your crush a lot and maybe even daydream about him, slowly start thinking of your crush less and less everyday, so that when you see him, it won't be as big of a deal.  once you've gotten over your shyness or feel more comfortable around your crush, stay positive.  have your friends make you feel better and help you with your crush (especially the ones you trust).  find something you have in common with him and if it is an activity, ask them how it is going.  pretend that he is just a normal dude. 

 Become his friend, and gain his trust. If he can trust you, then that's great!; , Make sure you can do some things on your own, rather than being 'wimpy', but also don't try to act really 'tough'.  Be a little flirty with him, but not to much, until you really get to know him better.  Once you get to know him better, you can open your arms and greet him with a hug... If he says no, but you happen to know he likes you, then it's because he's too shy to give you a hug... but he will be wishing for a hug later on, even if he denies a hug. But still, give him some personal space if he REALLY protests against it. Or just give him surprise hugs.  Ever. If he likes make-up, you can put on a little extra, but if not, then try limiting the make-up you put on. If you don't wear any make-up, then that's fine too. Lots of guys like natural beauty.  Pretty simple. If you change for every single guy, then you're not yourself. Just be yourself.  After you know him for quite a while, and you're great friends, you could give him a quick kiss if you're sure he likes you. Just a quick one, not a big kiss or anything.  Playing different games, even if they may seem stupid or silly.  Poke him, hug him, wink at him, do whatever... If you're really, REALLY brave, you could do bigger things, such as play footsies or tickling him or having him tickle you or both. Do whatever. Be creative.  If you like him, don't expect him to like you back if you try to make him jealous. If he sees you with other guys, chances are that you honestly don't like him and that he won't or will stop liking you.  But don't be around them more than with him, or he could feel that you like them more than him. Also remember that if his friends don't like you, that they could influence him to dislike you.  If you make eye contact with him, keep it for just a few extra seconds. Too long and it can seem awkward. Too short and it seems like nothing. But keeping eye contact for a few extra seconds, then smiling, is good.  To be close to him on a certain level, mirror certain things he does, or copy them. Not all the time, but just occasionally do things that would be normal for you both to do, to connect on a certain level.  Never be distrustful, and always stay honest with him- If he deserves it, which he probably does, then ALWAYS be honest. ALWAYS. Make sure you both are always honest and open with each other.  Not in a mean way, but in a more playful way. Make sure he can tease back, and that you both enjoy the teasing as a joke.  Touch him, poke him, just touch him in general. If you don't want to openly touch him, just lightly have your arms brush against each other, on 'accident'. Or, run your hand up his leg, whether by accident or on purpose. Pretty much just touch him anywhere. This will develop a closer bond between you both, and could make him like you more than ever before. Start with small 'accidental' touches and then move up. An idea of 'up' is having your legs touch during class. If you happen to sit next to him, you could sit close enough together to practically be on the same chair. If he likes you even a LITTLE bit, then he'll love this.  If he's not funny at his own jokes, laugh anyway, so he will feel appreciated. But also try being funny yourself.  Be nice in general. Not just to him, but to everybody!  

get to know him better.  do things for yourself.  be flirty.  hug.  don't wear too much make-up.  don't change yourself for a guy.  kiss.  be playful.  flirt.  don't try to make him jealous.  hang out with his friends.  keep eye contact.  mirror him.  be honest with him.  tease him.  break the touch barrier.  get him to laugh.  be nice. 

 A guy will be more likely to notice you and remember you if he knows who you are. Strike up a conversation that makes sense: talk about a class that you're both in, a holiday that's coming up, or something that he's wearing.If you're members of the same class, club, team, or friend circle, you will probably see each other on a regular basis. Take advantage of this proximity; spend time with him and build a friendship. Make a joke, or comment on an interest that the two of you share. If you're in the same class, ask him about the homework. If he's wearing a band t-shirt, ask him about the band.  Getting to know someone online can mitigate much of the initial awkwardness. If you've gotten to know each other a bit in person, consider adding him on Facebook (or any site that you frequent).   Once you're friends online, consider striking up a conversation over instant-messaging. Lead in with something nonchalant: ask him about the homework, or about a deadline for a club. "Hey, I forgot to write down the homework for Mr. Hoover's class. Did you happen to get it?"  Once he answers your question, follow up with a more personal question. Something like, "So, any plans for spring break?"  Consider throwing in a compliment like, "By the way, good job on your presentation in English today! Your song was hilarious". Keep your first conversation brief, unless it's going particularly well. You can build into longer conversations as you get to know each other.  Take the time to get to know this guy and make sure that you like what's beneath the surface.   Once you've gotten to know each other, you might decide to take the friendship further.  

introduce yourself.  use social media to your advantage.  develop a friendship first. 

 This requires courage, but it's a surefire way for him to at least know that you exist. If he's new to the neighborhood, go over and say a quick hello. Introduce yourself and welcome him to the neighborhood. Tell him where you live; ie. "Hi, I'm Miranda. I just live in the house across the street. I just thought I'd stop by and welcome you to the neighborhood."; , When he is outside, go outside at the same time. Make sure that you're not just standing there staring at him; you'll need a reason to be outside, such as doing yard work, washing the car, playing, etc. so it seems like a coincidence that you're outside at the same time. The last thing you want is for him to think that you're a creepy stalker.  Give him a reason to - play with a friend/sibling, play a very loud game, listen to your favorite song (and sing along if you're confident enough), etc. Doing this will make him start to notice you.  If you walk by his house and see him, or vice versa, be sure to say something. You don't have to get into a huge conversation; a simple "Hi", "Good morning", or "Good afternoon" will do the trick. Once he gets used to you greeting him, he will be the one saying hello first.  After a while, begin to actually talk to him. Saying things like "How are you?", "What's up?", "Hey, neighbor!", etc. will give him the opportunity to talk to you more, so you can learn more about him. This will help you two get closer.  Once he's really started to notice you, feel free to look over at him. If he catches you, instead of looking away, smile and wave at him. He'll most likely smile and wave back!  , Once he's noticed you, he'll probably initiate a conversation or two. When this happens, be cool. Talk to him like you would any normal person. You don't want to freak him out, right?  

say "hi".  find ways to be around him.  make him look your way.  acknowledge him.  have deeper conversations.  look over at him a couple times.  be cool when he talks to you. 

 One way to break the ice is to pay attention to what is going on around you. Find something in your environment that you can make a funny comment about. For example, if it is lunch and the food hasn’t arrived yet and you two are waiting outside in the heat, you can something silly like, “Do you think they going to get us water for this wait, or do they just want us to die?” Guys find playfulness attractive in girls, and it will give you something to make a little bond over.   Even if you don’t think of yourself as a funny person, you can still be playful.This playfulness can help make the conversation fun and low pressure. Remember that getting the conversation started is most important thing. Don’t worry too much about how the ice breaker goes. Focus instead on continuing your conversation.; , One way to get a guy to like talking to you is if you seem like you are having a good time talking with him. A few ways you can show you are having fun is if you make eye contact, smile often, laugh genuinely, and lean forward slightly when you are talking. When you are talking, tilt your head to one side, smile and touch your hair, neck or clothes. But don’t over think it, just do what feels natural as well. Your nonverbal signals should just show him that you are having a good time.Let him know you like messaging with him if you are mostly messaging. For example, you can say something like, “I think you’re pretty fun to text with.”  , Write down the things that make you awesome. Knowing why you are awesome and not being afraid to show it attracts others. Do not be afraid to make mistakes around him. Be authentic to the real you, quirks and all. Relax and laugh when you make mistakes, everyone does. Do not act like someone you think that he would like instead of being yourself. Imagine if someone were acting in a certain way to please you, would you like that? Probably not.  Enjoy laughing and hanging out with other people in his company. Showing him that you are fun, independent and have your own friends is important to establish.   This will show him that friends are important to you and will help him see what you are in like with other people. It could make him a little jealous (in a good way) and maybe he’ll want to hang out with you more than before.  If you don’t have a social media account and he is active on social media, get an account. Like or retweet something that he has posted. If you are both on your social media, this could be a good way to start talking. Liking and retweeting things he posts on his social media can help build up your friendship and give you an idea of the things he likes. Also, liking his posts will help you to know what is going on with him.   After liking a couple of things that he has posted, you should write a comment on a post or send him a message. Do not like everything he posts. Choose one or two things that you genuinely like, and space out the time between your likes to every few days. If you send too much attention to him, it may come off like you are trying too hard or creepy.  If you have been liking or commenting on his posts, post things that shows him what you are into. He should see your interests just as much as you should see his. For example, share beautiful or interesting pictures that you have taken, or find funny gifs, pictures or quotes from the internet which you can post along with a comment about why you like it.   For example, if he writes a lot of posts about bands he likes and there is a band you both like, you can post one of the band’s music videos or the lyrics from one of their songs with a comment about why you like it. Stay true to yourself. Only post things that you genuinely like and are a part of who you are. It can come off fake if you are posting about things you haven’t shown any interest in before.  You should make a comment on a post that he writes early after it has been posted. If you write the comment early, he will be more likely to respond. Consider praising the post, asking a question about it, or commenting about something you find interesting. For example, if he writes a post about going to a show of the band you like, you can respond by saying, “I am so jealous you got to see them! Did you think they were good live?”.   Avoid commenting too often. Make sure to space out your comments.  If he seems distant or aloof and isn’t responding to you much, he may not be interested. Luckily, there will be other guys who will want to talk to you and who you can have a great connection with. Instead of thinking about the interaction with this guy as a failure, think about the interactions you have had with him as good practice for having a conversation with another guy down the road.  

make a funny or playful observation to break the ice.  show him that you are enjoying yourself in conversation.  be confident in who you are, and enjoy yourself in his company.  hang out with other people who bring out the best version of you with him.  follow him on social media.  post things on your social media.  comment on his posts.  move on if he doesn’t seem interested in you. 

 After you have made your first connections, you want to continue messaging him and having conversations to keep the connection you have made with him strong. One way to make your connection stronger and keep your conversation interesting is to ask him his opinions on things.   Whatever you have in common, be it books, movies, food, etc, think about good questions to ask him that are open ended and will start interesting conversation. For example, if you both love Harry Potter, you can ask, “So what do you think is the best Harry Potter book?” And feel free to completely agree or disagree with him. These kinds of disagreements can lead to banter and can be pretty fun to have. You can start by telling him something that you have an opinion of and then ask his opinion on it. This question can also be related to the context of where you are or what you are doing. For example, if you are eating an apple at lunch, you could say, “I think that Granny Smith are the best apples period, but out of curiosity, what kind of apple is your favorite?” Once again, being playful is a good way to make your conversation more fun, especially when you are talking about simple topics and just getting your conversation going. Come up with a few different questions you can ask him before you talk to him because topics of conversation can go more quickly than you realize.  He will want to keep talking to you if you have fun when you talk. An example of banter is if you raise an eyebrow when he tells you that his favorite apple is Red Delicious, and you say something silly like, “You are saying you like Red Delicious apples best? Well I guess we can’t all be perfect.” Guys like this kind of silly banter because it is low pressure and fun. Banter is great because you two don’t have to talk about anything in particular, but you are still making a connection.   Practice bantering with your friends and family. Find silly things to disagree with them on. Playfully disagreeing can be good for your other relationships too.  Try not to use small talk or getting to know you questions like “What’s going on?” or “So where are you from?”. These questions are not very interesting and you won’t learn much about him because he may give you an answer that he has already used many times before. You want him to come away from this conversation excited to talk to you again, so stay away from small talk.  Everyone wants to feel good about themselves, and if you can provide that for him, he will most likely want to keep talking to you. So get good at telling him why you like him with small, genuine compliments. You don’t have to make it a big deal- you can casually tell him why he is great. In fact, avoid making a big show of it. For example, while you are walking somewhere and if you notice he is usually good with directions, you can say “I like that you always seem to know how to get us where we are going.” , One way to keep your guy wanting to talk to you more is if you leave the conversation at the right time. The best way to end a conversation is to first find a place after you have made good connections and before the conversation has started to wind all the way down. Then think about why you need to get home, and after you have laughed or made a connection about something, let him know you need to get going. Make sure you tell him you really enjoyed yourself and look forward to talking to him again.   Be casual and cool when you end the conversation. Say something like “Hey, it was so fun talking to you. I think I need to get home and get on my homework, but I really look forward to hanging out with you soon.” Make good eye contact with him when you leave. Let your eye contact linger a second longer and smile at him a little brighter or slyer when you do.  Depending on your conversation style and the guy you like, regularly can mean different things. Start messaging him every couple of days, and if he is prompt or slow with his answers, you can message more often or less often. Send him playful or funny comments or questions that engage him.   For example, ask him for updates on how things are going. You can ask him something like, “Hey, how is that midterm paper coming?”. Or tell him about something interesting that happened to you or that relates to him from your day. You can say something like, “Remember eating peanut butter sandwiches because the food trucks were late? I can see B lunch is eating all of our food.” Try to vary the kinds of messages you send. Don’t only ask for updates or say funny things. Try to do a combination of questions and funny comments.  

ask him his opinions on things that you have in common.  playfully disagree and banter with him.  avoid asking him questions he already knows the answer to.  boost his confidence.  learn how and when to end a conversation.  follow up with texts or messages regularly. 

 Some guys bond with people by doing things instead of through talking. He might feel closer to you if you do side by side activities together. Examples of side by side activities would be playing sports, playing a game, or working on a project together. Pay attention to the kinds of activities that he likes to do, and do those activities with him. For example, if he likes to do outdoors activities like shooting, have him teach you how to shoot a gun. Or if there is a game that he likes to play, learn how to play too.   Even if you don’t know how to do the activities that he likes to do, it can mean a lot to him if you try to learn. Enjoy yourself while you are out with him. Laugh aloud at your mistakes, ask lots of questions, and talk to the other people who are doing the activity too. Even if he is a guy who enjoys talking, it might build your relationship in a new way if you do side by side activities together.  Some guys do feel connected with girls based on their feelings and talking, and even guys who may not be always excited to talk about their feelings may want to talk to you about the things they care about once they are really comfortable with you. After you have spent quality time getting to know him, you should move on to getting to know him on a deeper level. He will feel closer to you and rely on you more if you know more about what he cares about and the history of his life.   These kinds of conversations are great to have at night. You should ask him questions about important times in his past, the important relationships in his life, and the things he cares about. For example, you can ask him, “Which of your interests means the most to who you are, and why do you care so much about it?” Or ask him, “Who in your family do you think you are the closest with and why?”. These questions can be really simple but listening well will help you have a really meaningful conversation with him.  For your conversation, sit across from him or in a position where you can see his face and hear him well. Ask him questions about him and use the following listening skills to have a great conversation with him.Show him in your body posture that you are listening. Make eye contact, nod your head and react to him with small noises or gestures while he is speaking. Give him the right amount of distance. If you stand too close, you may come off as overly interested and stifling while standing too far away will make you seem distant. Give him space to talk but position yourself so that you can hear and see him well. Restate the main idea of what he is saying. This will let him know that you really understand the point what he is saying. If he is talking about his frustrating day, for example, you can summarize the most important parts of what he has said so far. For example, you could say, “So you are saying that you didn’t understand why your brother was acting up until you saw what was going on with him at school.” Be empathetic to his feelings. Empathy means you can understand the feeling that he experienced even if you do not share a common feeling. For example, you can combine restating his main idea and being empathetic by saying something like, “You must have felt so frustrated to have to retake that test after you studied so hard the first time.” It is important to tell him that you understand the feelings he has and the reasons why he feels the way he does.  Don’t forget to put yourself out there, too. If you really like him, you could feel shy talking about yourself, but he will build a better connection with you if you can talk to him about the things that you care about, too. Tell him about the important relationships in your life, the big experiences that you are going through, and the good things that you love in your life. As before, make eye contact with him when you talk, use your gestures to express your feelings, and let your tone of voice express what you mean. He will be better able to connect and care for you when he is able to understand what important stuff that is going on with you.  Everyone needs someone to lean on during hard times. If you can be that person for him, you will build a really strong bond that will make him feel close to you. There are lots of things you can do to be there for him in hard times. For example, if you know he has been struggling with his grades and is going to have a difficult conversation with his teacher, send him a text encouraging him before he goes into talk. You can say something like, “Good luck- I know you’ll be able work it out because you always do.” Then after his talk with his teacher ask him how it went, and let him know you are there if he wants to talk.   Sometimes people would rather be distracted when they are going through something hard. In that case, send him funny texts that make him laugh. If he tells you that he is having a hard time with something, ask him if he wants to get together and talk about it. Or you can let him know that you are there for him if he just wants to hang out and chill. If you can be there for him during hard times, this will make your connection deeper and make him more likely to go to you the next time something good or bad happens with him.  Guys like it when they feel needed. If something is going on with you that you need help with, let him know, and ask for his help in advance. For example, if you need help painting posters after school for a club, ask him if there is a day he is available to help you. When he gets there make sure that you have something for him to do. Accomplishing tasks together is a great way to bond people together in new ways.  

do side by side activities with him.  get to know about his interests and the important relationships in his life.  find a quiet place for a conversation where you won’t be interrupted.  express yourself back to him.  be there during hard times as a confidant.  ask him for help. 

 Relationship experts have proven that smiling is the easiest way to say "I'm interested" or that you are easy to approach. Guys love a great smile.; , Don't be a phony funny, be genuine. Guys are attracted to girls that have a 'funny bone'. Being funny doesn't mean laughing at everything, or acting dumb, cause that is just a turn off to guys. Instead, joke around, and/or tell funny stories that happened to you or a friend.  If you have blemishes or large pores help them go down by washing your face with warm water and soap, finishing with cold water to close pores. Eat lots of fruits and veggies. Get rid of all junk food, cause all it is doing is ruining your insides and outsides. Make sure you drink 8 glasses of water every day! This will flush out(Get rid) of toxins inside your body. Take showers everyday and brush your teeth. Brushing your teeth will also let him be able to come up to you without holding his breath.  Have lots of friends. Guys like when girls have friends, that way they know you are approachable and friendly.  Wearing something cute and flirty is what most guys are attracted to. Maybe a skirt with a flouncy shirt and some cute flats with a headband That is sure to grab his attention.  Wearing makeup is something a lot of girls may choose to do. You don't have to, all it does is accentuates things. Guys usually prefer girls to wear simple things like blush and lip gloss. If you have blemishes you can cover them with concealer or a powder. Eyeliner is good for showing off the depth and angles of your eyes. Blush is good for showing off and accentuating your cheek bones. Lip gloss is just for some extra sparkle.  Sometimes it's hard to feel confident on things like bad hair days, but every guy likes his girl to keep her head held high, and not worry about what others are saying, as long as you stay true to yourself. If you are having, say, a bad hair day, then just forget about hair and wear an extremely cute outfit, or makeup look, or vice versa. Also, don't be afraid to speak your mind (but don't be rude or snotty).  Most guys hate when they do something wrong, so if he happens to say something about you or do something wrong, but he apologizes, then you should forgive him. But if he constantly does it, you have the right to not forgive him. Also, if a guy did something wrong awhile ago, don't bring it up again! That makes guys cringe and it's a huge turn off.  If you are trying to make him jealous with another guy you need to be subtle and not to clingy. Guys will chase after you, if they really want you. So, making him a little jealous can't hurt anyone.  You're not going to marry him, you're only a teenager. So never change for a guy. Make sure he is the right guy for you and if not move on.  

smile.  be funny.  be clean and healthy.  try to be cool and popular.  dress nicely.  know your best features.  be confident.  forgive and forget, don't remind!,  when you're trying to get a guy to like you, you shouldn't act jealous, that's a major turn off.  never feel that you need to change for a guy! 

 It is easier said than done, but often times the best way to get attention from a guy is to exude confidence and be yourself. You can start by making sure you feel good about how you look. There is no perfect weight or perfect style. All that matters is that you find a look that makes you feel confident!Browse some magazines for outfit ideas and pick out some clothes you like. If you don’t have a lot of money, check out local thrift stores or resale shops. Decide on a hairstyle that feels good for you. Wake up early enough to groom and get ready before school.; , Don’t feel like you need to act shy or meek to get attention. In fact, that usually fails to work. Instead, let your strengths shine. You can show your confidence and embrace your talents without being boastful and arrogant, so don’t be afraid of the spotlight. That is where he’s most likely to notice you! Plus, when you own and embrace your talents, you come off as confident and attractive. Maybe your strengths include:   Your sense of humor. Your athleticism. Your good grades.  The way you talk to yourself (or about yourself) has a huge impact on the way you feel about yourself. Start boosting your confidence from the inside out by keeping track of the way you talk. As a general rule, don't say anything about yourself that you wouldn't say about your best friend.   Instead of thinking, "I am terrible at soccer," think "When I practice my soccer moves, I feel better." If something goes wrong, try to stop your thoughts from spiraling. You can think, "I made a mistake, but I can decide how the rest of my day goes." Make a deal with your friends to correct each other if you hear negative self talk.  Motivate yourself and boost your positivity by setting aside a few minutes each day to write down positive affirmations and read them back to yourself. For added benefit, post them places you often look, such as on your mirror, near your computer monitor, or inside your school locker.  Write down positive statements, such as “You are worthy of love and support,” “Everything will work out in the end,” or “You can do it!” You can find great quotes online if you’re struggling to come up with affirmations.  Confident people are viewed as being more attractive and desirable. The way you hold your body and interact with other people communicates a lot about your confidence level. Show your confidence by making eye contact and smiling at people. Practice holding your body in confident ways, and in time you will begin to feel it on the inside, too.You might try:   Keeping your shoulders back (leading with your heart). Avoid slouching or hunching. Hold your head high (you can practice balancing a book on your head). Practice your social skills.  

feel good about how you look.  take pride in your strengths.  practice positive self-talk.  write down daily affirmations.  hold your head high. 

 As you can imagine, it can be nerve-wracking for a guy to ask for your number or to ask you out, especially in middle school when girls are maturing faster than boys. If you want a guy to approach you, it’s important that you make him feel like he can. , Not only does smiling make you approachable, it also shows that you’re a happy and fun person, both of which are traits guys love to see in a girl., Confidence is so important because it means that YOU know your value; and a guy can never take that from you. So value who you are, and be don’t be afraid to be yourself., Direct eye contact is a great way to get a guy’s attention, because they can’t misread it. You want to connect with him, and you’re not afraid to show it.  Talking to a guy in person and getting to know him a little bit before asking for his number can make things a lot easier. You’ll already be comfortable with him and you can get a sense for how he feels about you.   Compliment him. Whether it’s something he’s wearing or his eyes, a compliment tells him you’re taking notice in him.Let him do most of the talking. Ask him questions about himself. Pay attention and be genuinely interested. If he turns the conversation to you, try to avoid going into detail and then change the subject. You can also tell him you have to go (even if you don’t). This makes you seem mysterious and leaves him wanting more (like learning those details you refused to share). It also eliminates the chances of the conversation ending awkwardly.  

use inviting body language.  smile.  be confident in yourself.  make eye contact.  start a conversation with him. 

 Accept the grief, sadness, loneliness, regret, anxiety, guilt, insecurity, or other negative emotions in the order they come to you. Let yourself be sad, and let yourself heal. Ultimately, the surest path to getting over someone is to be honest with yourself.; , Don't bottle up your emotions. Ask your support system for advice, and try to understand what went wrong. If you aren't sure what to do next, these people may have the wisdom and insight to guide you.   Talk to parents, older siblings, aunts, uncles, grandparents – anyone that you feel comfortable asking for insight. You may even feel comfortable asking a favorite teacher or a leader in your community. Be careful who you trust. If you are spilling your guts to someone for whom your crush is a mutual friend, make sure that this person won't pass along what you say. It may be harder to get over the guy if there's gossip floating around.  Consider that there are hundreds of thousands—even millions—of people with whom you can fall in love. He may seem like the one, but this doesn't mean that he is the only one. Nor does it mean you'll never find someone like him again.  Think about why this crush didn't work out. Maybe you were into him, but he wasn't into you; maybe he was in a relationship already, or he had eyes for someone else; maybe you said something to turn him off, or he did something that made you decide that he was bad news. Whatever the circumstances, you cannot take back what has happened. You can only absorb this, learn from it, and grow.   Think about what you would have done differently. You might be able to successfully navigate a crush situation in the future by analyzing what went wrong with this guy. Think about the sort of person that you want to pursue. Maybe this guy just wasn't right for you, even if you found yourself attracted to him. Consider which qualities will guide your future crushes, and which personality traits you want to avoid.  If you know where he hangs out at lunch, avoid that area altogether. Find a new way. You may wind up thinking about him even more if you walk near him or you see him talking with someone else. If you're going to forget about him, you can't keep hanging around.   If you have mutual friends, consider spending less time with that particular group until you're sure that you're over him. If you don't want to give up your social circle, try focusing your attention on other members of the group instead. It may be hard to avoid this guy if you have classes together, you work together, or you are frequently drawn together by other commitments (clubs, teams, etc.). Again, try to focus your attention on other members of that group, or try to interact with the guy in a platonic way.  If he tries to talk to you, don't let yourself fall under his spell. Try not to fully engage in the conversation; give him short answers, and slip away as soon as you can. You don't need to be rude – you just might have an easier time forgetting about him if you aren't always talking to him. Bear in mind that if you have mutual friends or mutual obligations, you may eventually need to learn to interact with him in a platonic way.  It's hard to forget about someone if they're constantly popping up in your peripheral awareness. "Facebook stalking" this guy will keep you emotionally attached to him, but it won't make him feel the same way – and it isn't healthy to fixate on something unattainable. This will take discipline, but it will keep you grounded in the long run.   If you're friends with him on Facebook, but you don't want to unfriend him, consider stopping notifications on his posts. This way, none of his photos or statuses will show up in your Newsfeed. Train yourself not to wonder about him. Whenever you catch yourself reading one of his updates, stop yourself and keep scrolling. Let go of him and focus on the next thing. Eventually, you may be able to completely disengage your interest from him.  This might include pictures of the two of you together, or a CD that he gave you, or a pen that you let him borrow – anything that keeps you thinking about him. If the things belong to him, give them back. If the things belong to you, give them away to a friend or a donation center. Let these reminders slip from your life, and you may find it much easier not to think about your crush.  If you are constantly fixating upon what your crush is doing, you will find it much harder to forget him. Think about what demands your focus right now: maybe you have a big test coming up, or an exciting trip, or a big game this weekend. Try to divert your attention away from your crush so that you can move on. Throw yourself into your hobbies, your passions, and your obligations, and try to keep your mind engaged in the present.   If you can't think of anything big that's coming up, try to focus on things that you can look forward to each day. Think about how lucky you are to be able to eat lunch with your friends on a daily basis. Think about the satisfaction that you get from practicing music, or practicing a sport, and feeling yourself gradually improve.  If you have an especially rough time getting over this guy, you might want to take at least a few weeks to bring your emotions back into balance. Focus on school, on sports, friends, hobbies – focus on anything that you love. Try to bring yourself back in line with your non-relationship goals.   When you find yourself drawn to a new guy, ask yourself whether you are ready. It can be a wonderful experience to let yourself fall for someone, but make sure that you are prepared for the emotional ride. Be careful not to simply replace your crush with another guy. Ask yourself, and be honest: are you shifting your feelings onto this new guy without giving yourself time to get over the first guy? If so, consider taking it slow. Some people advocate the "rebound" strategy: find a guy for whom you have a purely physical attraction, and don't let it get too serious. You will need to decide what's best for you – but be careful not to play with someone else's feelings as a way to deflect your own pain.  You will know that you have fully moved on when you can hold a normal, non-self-conscious conversation with this guy. Try to change your emotional association with him from "crush" to "friend". You may not work well as romantic partners, but you may find that you become great friends! If you are already friends with the guy, and you don't want to throw that friendship away, you will need to learn how to be platonic.  

embrace your feelings for him, then let them go.  talk about your feelings with a friend, a relative, or a counselor.  remind yourself that this crush is just another fish in the sea.  learn from the experience.  avoid him for a while.  keep conversations to a minimum, for a while.  stop checking his social media profiles for updates.  get rid of things that remind you of him.  focus on what's important in your life.  take some time to center yourself before pursuing another guy.  learn how to interact with the guy on a platonic level. 

 The simplest strategy for getting a guy’s attention is just to walk past him in the hall. It may take several tries; so if possible, time it so that you walk by his locker once per day. But there are some tricks to it!   Keep your body language confident (head held high, shoulders back). Try to feel good about the way that you look and have a smile on your face. You don't want to seem like you are trying to get his attention, so don’t stare! Ask a friend to walk and talk with you so that you don’t seem obvious. Your conversation may also catch his attention. You may want to practice walking at home until you feel comfortable.  After you have done a few “walk-bys,” the next phase in your plan should be to try and lock eyes with him for a few seconds. This might be his first clue that you are interested in him. Don’t stare at him longingly, or try look too eager. Just lock eyes for three seconds and then look away.Glance at him the next time you walk by. Try to catch his eyes during class. Smile if you see him at an assembly or in the lunchroom.  Once you have successfully made eye contact, you need to find reasons to talk to him. Fortunately, school provides lots of opportunities for that. Think about upcoming school events or shared activities to get ideas for things talk to him about. Before you talk to him, rehearse what you will say so that you don’t get flustered in the moment.You might say, “I missed class last Friday. Do you have the English notes?” Ask, “Do you know when our permission slips are due?” or “Do you know the date today?" Plan what you will say after he answers. For example, you could introduce yourself and thank him for his help.  A cute dress or funky sweater might be enough to get his attention. Choose a fun outfit and save it for a day when you're feeling extra confident. Be sure to walk by his locker on that day. 

walk by him in the hall.  try to catch his eye.  find a reason to talk to him.  wear something fun. 

 Once you have been able to strike up a conversation with this guy, you can move on to actually flirting. An important element of flirtation is making strong eye contact. This is different from just catching his eye from across the hall. When you are flirting, you want to:   Maintain his gaze while you are talking. Keep your gaze soft. Smile and/or laugh.  Your early conversations should be simple, effortless, and brief. Your goal is to keep him wanting more, so you should avoid giving him too much of you at once. Avoid digging into heavy emotional, political, or stressful topics. Avoid complaining or ranting. Instead, talk about something funny or look for things you have in common (like sports, fashion, spring break plans).   Keep early interactions short and sweet. You can say, "I have that same notebook." You can brainstorm a short, funny story ahead of time. For example, try saying, "That reminds me of this time I went to San Jose." When in doubt, use compliments! Such as, “Wow, you’re really good at math.”  , If you are talking and feeling great, it might be time to “break the touch barrier.” In other words, you can really communicate that you like someone by using nonchalant touch! You can try:   Gently touching his arm while laughing Brushing against him Pretend to clean a leaf from their back Make it seem like an accident and see how they respond.  Rather than waiting around for him to notice you, take the plunge and ask him out. If it seems like he is interested in you, go ahead and make the first move. Pump yourself up with a motivational song or a confidence-building conversation with your friend before you talk to him. You might say:   "Hey, are you busy this Saturday? Maybe we could catch a movie." "Would you want to grab a coffee sometime?" "Do you have a date for the dance next week?"  

make strong eye contact.  keep conversations light.  use touch.  just go for it. 

 It’s not cute to look at your feet and mutter “um” every few words.   Keep your head up, your voice strong and stay calm. A quiet confidence is key. It adds to your mystery. Go in with no expectations. Confidence is knowing you’re fine even if he says no. His loss! A "who cares?" attitude puts you in control.  Some girls may be able to wing it, but you’re less likely to fumble or lose track of your thoughts if you have a general idea of what you’d like to say.   You might try, “Hey Ryan! We should hang out outside of school sometime. Can I get your number?” If you want to look really confident, when you’re having a conversation and it starts to wind down say, “This is usually the point when a guy asks for my number.”You may even get the added bonus of making him laugh!  , This can be a really effective method of getting his number, but it's not guaranteed. It will go one of two ways:   He immediately texts or calls you so you also have his number too. Score! He takes your number, and you’re left waiting for him to contact you. This can actually be good for you, because if he doesn’t contact you it's a sign to move on. You've then spared yourself the time and possible hurt feelings in the long run.  In person communication is always preferred; however, if he’s either not in any of your classes or you really can’t bring yourself to ask him in person, then writing him a note is a good alternative.   Get straight to the point and write something like, “Hey Sam. We hardly ever get to talk between classes, so I wanted to give you my number so we can get in touch whenever.”  

approach him with confidence.  plan what you're going to say.  give him your number.  write him a note. 

 The beautiful thing about technology making mistakes is that we can use this as a very believable excuse, even if it's not true.Try this common problem: “I lost/dropped my phone and lost all of my contacts. Text me your number so I have it?” For an excuse that works anywhere and anytime try, “I can’t find my phone! Will you call it for me so I know I didn’t lose it?” If you have an opportunity to catch a cool photo together, you can even say, “My phone is out of space, can I use yours and send it to myself?” This is also a good way to get his Instagram handle.  School is the easiest and most believable excuse to get a boy’s number if you have classes together.   Ask him if he can help you with your homework sometime.  DO NOT pretend you’re bad in a subject in the style of Cady Heron from Mean Girls, just to have an excuse to talk to a guy. If he’s the one who could use some help say, “Maybe we could study together sometime.”   If you're both working on a group project or other assignment, you can use this excuse to ask him for his number for a simple reason like, "so I can text you if I have a question."  , This is going to put him on the spot, while also showing your care-free and independent side.“A few of us are getting together this weekend to see a movie. Text me if you’re interested. Gotta go!” This should prompt him to say, “Wait, I don’t have your number!” If he doesn’t think of that fast enough, he’ll find a way to get your number. If he doesn’t find a way, you’re better off without him.  

use common cell phone issues to your advantage.  use school as an excuse.  invite him to a group event, and make a quick exit. 

 Remember, shy people are just like everyone else except with a wall, like I said; they won't run away if you make quick movements. Small conversation is usually rather impersonal and can consist of: the homework, weather, teachers, something on the news, or otherwise. If he really likes you, he won't be able to stop thinking about you.   If you don't go to school with him, maybe ask what he likes to do other then homework, and school, or even maybe ask for his number. Remember if he doesn't text you first don't sweat it. If he's shy in person with you, he'll be shy everywhere with you!; , It won't intimidate him as much, and will give him a chance to think about his answer. If you don't have social media, just try asking for a simple number.  By talking to him a few times a week, you will begin establishing a bond and he may start to tear down his wall for you. After small talk, you should begin moving onto personal things like: family, travel, summer vacation plans, his hobbies, and other casual but personal topics.  After you've talked to him for awhile, transition conversations onto a more personal level. Perhaps talk about what you both are looking for in a person, and drop hints that what you're looking for is him.  Don't ask him if he's okay with being touched, just do it once and see how he reacts. A touch or pat on the shoulder is fine. If he seems to dislike it, then refrain from touching him until you know he is more comfortable with you. However, if he seems fine with it, then you should continue to do it every once in a while. Don't go too far; hugs (when needed), small touches on his arm, and pats on the shoulder are just fine.  Make sure to do this in private and one-on-one. Don't even ask around close friends, or else he might feel uncomfortable as well as feel pressured to say yes. You want him to say yes because he wants to, not because he thinks he needs to. He might also be pressured to say no, so be careful.  Going out to public places is most likely not his thing. Suggest a movie at your house (though he might be afraid to meet your parents) or something else that's away from people. You could also suggest getting drive-through dinner and parking some place quiet to eat and talk.  If necessary, find a way to increase his self-esteem. Make him feel confident around you.  It could be a homework problem or where to buy the latest gadget. Whatever works.  Because shy guys are guys too! Find out his hobbies or passions. Or talk about a common interest. DO NOT PRETEND TO LIKE SOMETHING YOU DON'T! But ask open-ended questions about it. It will make you a good listener, get to know him better, and you will have fewer chances to say something stupid. (If you do anyway, as 99% of us do, forgive yourself.)  , Most guys actually approach cute girls over gorgeous girls because they find really pretty girls out of their league. This applies particularly to shy guys, who have little confidence to begin with. I'm not saying it isn't okay to be really, really, really, incredibly good-looking. But don't draw so much attention to it. Now is not the time to try cutting-edge fashion or over-the-top makeup.  Make it fun by trying some ice-breaking games and whatnot.  

casually approach him and strike up a small conversation.  get in contact with him on a social network.  attempt to talk to him a few times a week.  gauge his feelings and drop hints that you like him.  make physical contact after awhile, but be sure he's okay with it.  ask him out.  keep the date simple if he agrees.  every person has an ego.  let him feel competent by having him help you with something.  be genuinely interested in him.  be approachable and attractive, but not so stunning and loud as to draw him away.  throw a small party and invite a few people you know he'll be comfortable with. 

 It's unhealthy! You'll find that you are constantly arguing with yourself to convince that you don't like him. Accept and embrace it. It'll make everything a lot easier for you.; , Are you a mean, nasty, hateful person? If you are, it's important to change now. Guys want a girl who's smart, funny, kind, caring, affectionate, thoughtful and knows how to enjoy herself. Don't totally alter your personality just to make a boy like you. It's important to be who you are but watch the way you treat those around you. Make sure to be genuine and don't pretend to be someone you're not.    Embrace your natural beauty. You can use makeup, it's your choice, but don't overdo it. Keep up personal hygiene and do your best to look your best!        , This is probably the most important step. Learn how to connect to the guy you like. If you don't know how, follow some of the following suggestions:   Find common ground. Find something you're both interested in. It could be a book series, a movie, a TV show, a sport - anything. This will give you a base to work off of. You can talk to him about how awesome that new episode of that TV show was or how excited you are for that movie to come out.       Get involved with something he does. Okay, don't go stalker-ish on this. If he's in a club or sport, only join it if you are honestly interested; so not only can you spend time with him, you can have fun yourself. If you are busy and can't join something he's in, embrace those times you see him like in class, the halls, church, etc.  Contrary to popular belief, it's important to become friends before you start a relationship with him. Be careful to not fall into the friend-zone. In this stage, it is important to initiate conversation with him - don't be afraid to be the first to talk. At the same time, don't always be the first to talk or you may seem annoying.   Talk to him when you can in person, online, or through text       If you don't want to fall into the friend-zone, make yourself seem different. Don't act all buddy-buddy with him or like a bro. Act like someone he would be interested in having a relationship with.  Be a good listener, make interesting conversation, be funny, likable, and flirt - but don't overdo it.       As you talk to him, create inside jokes between the two of you. If you can, compliment him! You'll probably get one back!        Be unique, cute, and overall a fun person to be around.  Try to be friends with different people and befriend some of his friends - both male and female. With these friendships, don't make them just because of the guy. Make these friendships because you want to create new friendships with other people in addition to connecting more to your crush. You may be surprised at who you meet! If you make friends who are friends with him, you can have a good time and may be invited to the same events as him, parties, and other activities in which you can spend time with your guy. You can then have more excuses to talk to him and make transitioning into conversations with him easier.   You can talk to one of his friends and if you're lucky, he might just walk in and start talking to the both of you.       His friends will probably hint to you if he has taken a liking to you.       It is very important to be real with this. Don't use people; it's a total turnoff. Create new and genuine friendships with his friends. Don't pretend to be friends with one of them just so you can talk to your crush. If you don't like his friends, you can choose to skip this step.  A strong friendship and a relationship doesn't come easily or quickly. You have to continue to create a better friendship which may or may not lead to something more. Having a relationship may take awhile but it may vary. It is important to be patient and don't be pushy. Don't make him uncomfortable.  By this point, it's either time to admit your feelings or get over him. If you feel like you've been waiting too long for him to ask you out, just admit you like him directly to his face. If you're feeling he's not the one anymore, try to move on.   Remember that it can take a while for him to ask you out. Admitting you like him to your crush can speed up the process though.  You could just be really good friends with him or trying to handle rejection. Whatever it is, be happy because it is what is meant to be. If you're with him, congratulations! If you're not, it's okay. You'll find your Prince Charming soon enough!  

stop trying to deny you like him.  look at yourself and reflect on your personality.  talk to him.  create a friendship.  mutual friendships: with this step, make sure you don't ditch any of your current friends you have now.  keep on working on it.  accept or reject, yay or nay.  results may vary: so now you may or may not be in a relationship depending on if you learn if your crush does or does not return your feelings. 

 When you find out that your crush knows you like him, don't let this turn your relationship into something awkward and unpleasant. Try to continue talking about the things you normally would. For example, if you have classes together at school, don't hesitate to talk to him about your assignments. Keeping a casual attitude will make your interactions much easier.   Keep in mind that he probably doesn't know that you know about him. If you keep your cool, you can buy a little extra time for yourself to come to grips with the situation.; , When you're worried about how your crush knows you like him, constantly thinking about the situation is one of the worst things you can do. Try to keep your mind off of him by staying busy with your day-to-day activities. You can even avoid him for a day or two if it gives you time to calm down, although you won't want to do this for too long if you eventually plan on making a move.   It can help if you don't think of the situation as a "problem." It's not necessarily a bad thing that he knows you like him. After all, would you be angry or upset if you knew someone liked you? Probably not.  Having a crush on someone can make even the most rational, level-headed people jealous. Try not to get too invested in who your crush is talking to.The odds are that he's not playing hard-to-get or doing it to hurt your feelings — he's just having friendly conversations with the people around him like he usually does.   He's also probably not talking about you, so don't fall prey to paranoid thoughts like, "He's telling everyone about how I like him!" Unless he's really immature, he probably wouldn't even consider doing that.  Your crush is just a normal, everyday human being like you. Many of the same things that make you nervous probably make you nervous. Since he knows you like him, he probably gets a few butterflies in his stomach when he talks to you. Keeping this in mind can make it much easier to deal with him — how scary can talking to someone be when you know he's just as nervous as you?  

don't stop talking to him about "everyday" things.  try not to fixate on the situation all the time.  don't stress out about who he's talking to.  remember that he, too, is probably nervous. 

 The next time you're around each guy, make an effort to really engage him and to think about what it is you like about him so much. Though you can't always pin down the complicated feelings that make you like a person, it's important to have as much information as possible when you make such an important decision. Ask yourself the following questions when you talk to each guy:   Does he make me laugh? Does he have a good sense of humor? We're all attracted to people who can make us laugh. Guys with a good sense of humor make us excited and cause us to look at the world in a different way. If he tickles you, is it weird or do you like it? No guy should touch you in the obvious places unless you are ready for that, but like a hug around the waist, holding hands, or even his arm around you is okay, but if you're at the stage where he is going to kiss you and you kiss him back, make sure that you are ready to be at that stage. When he kisses you, be sure you know how to kiss. You don't want it to be awkward. The guy you are going to choose needs to be able to restrain himself. Does he seem curious about other people? Is he interested in things outside himself? Guys who are only interested in themselves can be pretty boring. You'll want a guy who has hobbies, friends, and a good perspective on life. Is he in touch with his emotional side? Is he sensitive about other people? Lots of guys have an emotional side; the problem is they don't want other people to see it. A guy who's okay with other people seeing his emotions is a guy who's both confident and mature. Does he flirt respectfully? Basically, the ask question boils down to this: Does it seem like he likes you for more than just your body or just your looks? Are the compliments he gives you more than just about your body? Does he take things slow? Guys who take things slow like to savor things. They care about getting every last drop of enjoyment out of being around you. Guys who are moving at the speed of light are often onto the next girl faster than you can say "letdown."; , This is just as important as thinking about what you like about each guy. One guy may look better on paper and may have all of the qualities that you're looking for, but the other guy may have the ability to make your heart pound just by sending you a text message. So, the next time you're around each guy, think not only about why you like him, but ask yourself if he makes you feel confident, happy, giddy, and like a better person. Here are some things to consider:   How does he make you feel when you're around him? Does he make you feel like he's only interested in you, or does he seem like he flirts with other girls all the time, and you're just another girl on his long list? Does he bring out the best in you, or is he okay with you just being "okay"? Does he challenge you and make you want to be a better person? Does he compliment you in a way that is meaningful and not forced? Does he make you blush, giggle, and feel like a giddy little girl? Does he treat you like a lady and make you feel special?  , Though you may only be thinking about all of the great qualities of both guys and about how they both give you butterflies, you should also consider the negative aspects of their personality or lifestyle to get more clarification. If you're serious about making this choice, then you have to consider the pros and the cons of being with each guy. Here are some things to consider as you make your decision:   Does the guy have a lot of baggage? Does he have a complicated past and a slew of emotional issues to deal with? Sure, you may have fun with him, but is that something you want to be responsible for in the long run? Is he bossy and manipulative? Does he always try to get his way, or is he incapable of admitting he's wrong? These are serious signs that he's probably a little selfish, and signs that you might get more than you bargained for in a relationship. Has he lied to you? You want a guy that you can trust, a guy who's not afraid to be honest with you, regardless of how much the truth hurts. Guys who like gossiping and starting rumors probably don't care much about other people, meaning stay away from him. Does he constantly get in trouble, either at school, with his parents, or with the authorities? Bad boys may have a certain sexiness about them, but chances are if they're constantly distracted with shenanigans or hijinks, they won't have any time to be around you. Does he still talk about his ex-girlfriend? If he's still talking about his ex, dropping in little hints from time to time, or constantly talking about her, that's a bad sign. It doesn't mean that he's a bad guy; it just means that he still loves her.  If both guys are completely devoted to you, then you have a tough task on your hands. Though you shouldn't go with the guy who likes you more just because it's a safer choice, you should consider how important you are to each guy, and what it would mean to him if you stopped seeing him. If he would just shrug it off and then move on to the next girl, then he's not the guy for you. If you think one of the guys likes you much more than the other, then this should play a strong part in your decision.   You don't have to ask outright. You can get a sense of how much guy feels about you just by the way he looks at you, by how often he wants to hang out, and by how much he talks about a future together. Of course, if you're just looking to have fun with a summer fling or to get some dating experience for a few months, then you don't have to care so much about whether the guy sees you as long term potential.  Your friends are there for a reason: they offer shoulders to lean on, provide examples of how to behave, and give you advice when you need it. Take their advice, but with a grain of salt. You're making the decision at the end of the day. Remember that you're not asking them to help you pick the "better" guy, or the guy that they would pick, but that you want them to help you decide what's right for you.   Don't ask, "Who do you like better?" Ask, "Who do you think is better for me?" These questions will keep you from getting suggestions about who your friends would date, instead of who you should date. Be open to their suggestions! If you have your mind made up about who you want to date, there's no use in asking your friends about their opinion. If you ask them for their input, be ready to follow it.  This will help you see what you really wanted in the first place. How does each one make you feel? Make a list of what you really want in a guy and don't. Do a pro/cons chart about each guy's strengths and weaknesses. See how this pro/cons chart lines up with the list of what you want out of a guy. Here are some other questions you can ask:   Which guy will treat me better? Which guy will be there for me through the tough times? Which guy do I have more in common with? Which guy's face will I always want to see at the end of the day? Which guy will get along better with my friends and family? Which guy can I not live without?  , We can't pick and choose who we like. We're born a certain way, and we eventually develop likes and dislikes. Don't overthink things. Trust what your gut tells you about these guys and go for it. Flip a coin in the air. Tell yourself that if it lands on heads, you have to go with Guy A, and if it lands on tails, you have to go with Guy B. While the coin is in the air, where do you instinctively want it to land? That's your answer.   If you know one guy is bad for you but can't help feeling attracted to him (and don't really like the other guy), take a break from both guys. Not being in a relationship really isn't bad. In fact, it's much better than being burned. Learn from your mistakes. If you've dated a certain guy before and the relationship ended poorly, don't make the same mistake all over again with another guy. Even if you feel attracted to him, what's the use in going through the same thing all over again if it caused you heartbreak and misery?  , Don't feel like you need to make a decision right away. Your decision could take some time. During that time, hopefully, one of the guys will do something good or bad to make the decision much easier for you. As long as you haven't committed to either guy and don't feel like you're being disloyal to one guy by hanging out with the other, then you should take some time to make the decision.   Just don't drag it on too long. If you pick one guy, but he finds out that you've been hanging out with another guy for the last few months, then he may feel hurt or slighted.  Once you've made your decision, stick to it. That doesn't mean you have to tell the guy, "Hey, I chose you over Guy A!" That won't make the guy feel very special. The commitment is something you make through your actions and your heart. Work on building a healthy, stable relationship with the guy you've chosen -- and only the guy you've chosen.   Get ready to start dating and hanging out with only the guy you've chosen. Enjoy the benefits of being with one person without wondering what another guy is up to. If you feel empty or incomplete without the other guy, then it may either mean that you made the wrong decision or that you never liked the first guy that much in the first place -- you only liked the chase. Be friendly to the other guy, but don't go out of your way to hang out with him or do stuff alone together. If you're overly friendly with him, he might think that he still has a chance. Plus, it might get the guy you chose unnecessarily jealous.  Know that choosing between two guys will affect your relationship with both of them. This is the double-edged sword of relationships: chances are good that you're going to break the other guy's heart, and miss out on a relationship with him. If the guy you don't choose doesn't know about the first guy, you don't have to make it a big deal or give him the real reason why you're ending your "relationship." Though you should be happy once you've made your decision, know that the seas may still be a bit rocky.   Know that you may turn guys against each other. What if both guys are best friends? What do you do then? If you choose one and the other likes you, they'll probably stop being best friends. If you want to avoid this situation altogether, date someone else instead. Be prepared to lose the guy that you didn't choose. He may not want to be "just friends" after you hung out romantically or flirted with each other. But that may be for the best.  Life is yours to live, and you deserve to live it the way you want -- while trying to hurt others as little as possible. Though you may feel guilty for making the decision, you and the two guys are better off once you've come to terms with your feelings. Be proud of yourself for making a mature choice instead of leading two guys on forever.   Don't be afraid of making mistakes as long as you learn from them. Don't worry about having everyone like you; when you're making a big decision like this, feelings will get hurt.  

consider the positive qualities of each guy.  consider how each guy makes you feel.  consider the negative qualities of the guy.  consider how each guy feels about you.  ask your trusted friends for their opinions.  weigh their similarities and differences in a list.  trust your gut.  don't rush it.  commit to the guy you've chosen.  be prepared for the aftermath.  accept your decision. 

 Tell him that it looks really interesting. After you've told him this, ask about the author or artist/band of the song/book. This should get the conversation going if he really likes the particular author/singer/band. If he doesn't know much about them, say something like, "Hey, (insert band/singer/author here) sounds a lot like (a different band/singer/author here)."; , If he is really friendly and outgoing, he'll probably say hello. If he doesn't, you say hi. This way you can pretend that you aren't trying to talk to him because you like him, but just because you're just bored and have nothing to do but to talk to him or you can pretend that you're just being friendly.  If you have trouble with math and he's a math whiz, ask him to help you with the math. If you're carrying something heavy, then ask him to help you carry it. This sets you up for a conversation in a non-awkward way. Don't forget to thank him after.  Say, "Oops, sorry!" Don't just walk into him, blush, and walk away. After you've apologized for bumping into him say, "Hi, my name's _____. What's yours?" If you know his name already but he's new or you're new, say, "Hi, I'm _____. You're _______ right?" If that won't really work, make a comment about something funny that happened in class, some bizarre rumour that obviously isn't real, the amount of homework that the teachers give you, the weather, how awesome they did on their school project or at their football game, etc.  Here are some examples:   If your crush did awesome at a sport event (football, let's say), say to him, "Wow, you did awesome at the football game on Friday. Can you give me some tips on how to play football as well as you did?"       If your crush did a great school presentation or speech, say to him, "Hey, I loved your speech/presentation on (name school presentation here). I need some help in the public speaking area, and you seem like the best person to ask for advice about this stuff, so could you give me some tips?"       If you know for some reason that your crush got a good grade on his math test, say, "Hi. I heard that you did great on your math test. Great job! I have a couple of tests coming up, maybe you could give me some tips about how I could do as well?"       If you heard that they aced a job interview, say, "Hiya, I heard that you did great on your job interview. I have one coming up, so how did you do so awesome on it?"        , Note that this isn't likely set up a real conversation (unless you do this before class has started), but it might let him know that you're interested and this is good because he will most likely want to talk to you more if he thinks this!  

if he's reading a book or listening to a song that you don't know about, ask him about it.  just be around him when he isn't around his friends.  ask him to help you with something.  'accidentally' bump into him.  compliment him and then ask him for advice on something.  drop your pencil and ask him (politely) to pick it up or if they wouldn't mind sharpening it for you. 

 Sooner or later, you need to commit to either talking to your crush about the way you feel or staying silent. Being undecided about a crush is a terrible feeling. Making a decision can be scary, but it gives you closure. You get to either take things to the next level with your crush or start moving on, but either way you don't have to worry about it anymore.   Often, honesty is the best policy. Being open about your crush can feel like taking a huge weight off your chest — no matter what happens, you were true to your heart. It also lets you avoid nagging feelings of regret. In other words, you won't be wondering, "What would have happened if I had talked to my crush?" in a few weeks. Try explaining to him that you don't want to ruin the friendship and you wouldn't like it to be awkward. Usually he would accept that and try to keep things as normal as they were before whilst deciding his next move. On the other hand, if you really don't want to open up about your crush or you have good reason to think it's a bad idea, you shouldn't ever feel like you need to. An example of a situation where it would be a bad idea to act on a crush is if your crush is already with someone else.  If you decide that you're going to open up to your crush, don't waste time waiting for the "perfect moment." It probably will never come. In the meantime, your crush may lose interest or even start to think that you don't like him anymore. Pick a time and place where you can be alone with your crush and stick to this. Your best chances for romance will come if you seize the opportunities you are given.   For example, if your crush is someone you know from school, you might arrange to meet this person after school in a secluded spot. It doesn't have to be 100% deserted — just reasonably private. A park bench, for instance, will usually work fine.  Opening up to your crush doesn't have to be a huge, dramatic production. In fact, if you make a big deal about it, you may even scare your crush off. Instead, keep the conversation low-pressure and casual. This will make it much easier for him to give you an honest answer.   You don't even have to outright say that you have a crush. Instead, you can simply invite him to spend one-on-one time together. For example, you might start the conversation by saying something like, "Hey, Spanish class has been fun. Do you want to get some lunch and go to the fair with me this weekend? I hear the enchiladas they have out there are amazing."  , Even if you keep things very low-pressure, your crush might get a little shy. Don't worry about this. Don't take silence or awkwardness as a sign that he doesn't like you. These things just show that he is having a hard time getting his words out. Give him plenty of time to take in what you're saying and encourage him to come to a conclusion when he's ready.   He shouldn't even feel like he needs to answer you right away. Getting a date offer or having someone admit they like you can take a day or two to fully process. Consider saying something like, "Take your time — you don't have to tell me today."  , Respect your crush's ability to come to his own decisions, even if you don't like the one he makes. If he says no, just casually say, "Oh, OK" and make your exit. Don't pester him with repeated questions or try to get him to change his mind. On the other hand, if he does accept your offer, congratulations!   After a "no," you may want to limit the amount of time you spend with this person for a couple days. You don't have to outright ignore him, but if your feelings are hurt or if it's hard to stop thinking about it, give yourself some distance for a little while until your emotions die down.  

decide whether you will admit your crush.  if you want to come clean to your crush, don't put it off.  keep things casual.  don't be put off by his shyness.  accept his decision (even if it's "no"). 

 If he seems to like girls with more of a girly style, then dress girly. Watch what designs, colors, patterns, stores or styles he likes, and get some that you think he might be into.; , You don't want to look like a creep, but you also don't want to look like "purple-girl." Go to the store and ask a professional what colors would fit you, your body and your personality. Avoid wearing all of one color, but do have the colors clash in a good way.  Even if you really think you love the boy, don't go spending three-thousand dollars on clothes to impress him. Spend a decent amount, though, as you really like him.  Make sure to choose a shirt that flatters your body shape. See which kind of shirt you like best, whether it's tank-tops, turtle-necks, v-necks, etc. For shirts, it's important to feel comfortable in them but to also look good in them, something even he would know is a perfect match.  Try something that doesn't make you look too big or small. If he is more punk try getting skinny jeans. They look good on anyone. Never try pants that are too, too tight. Skinny jeans are okay, but be sure you can even walk in them!  , Shoes are a must with style. Don't go outside wearing clogs. Have shoes that a comfortable and look great too. Make sure that your shoes are appropriate to your activity.  Accessories can be of any kind depending on who you are. If you are more preppy, then you might want to have a watch. But if you are scene, punk or emo you might want to try on some bangles or chokers. Remember that accessories can make or break the outfit.  Do not wear too much makeup, as boys don't like it. Wear some mild lip gloss, a little mascara, some blush, and any color eye-shadow you feel is nice. It is important to wear makeup, but just as important not to wear too much.  Sure, you want to look sexy and hot, but not out of your comfort zone when it comes to showing skin. For example, if you don't feel like coming to school wearing a shirt that shows your appendix or with bra sliding down your shirt, and you feel uncomfortable wearing those things you will appear a lot more relaxed and they will appreciate how comfortable you seem in your skin. You may think guys would like this, but they would really run away fast. Be hot, but don't be inappropriate. 

see how he dresses.  select a color.  stay in your price range.  choose a shirt.  pick out a pair of pants.  select a pair of shoes.  add some accessories.  wear makeup.  be appropriate.but through all of this make sure to still be yourself and be comfortable, confident and positive about what you wear. 

 Was it a little weird; or maybe it was a secure feeling?; , Does he seem to have a lot of "friends-who-are-girls"? Does he have real bad language, maybe talk a little bad about women? Does he imply bad intentions? If he hates his ex today, maybe he'll be saying the same bad things about you tomorrow.  What do his good friends say about him? What do his ex-girlfriends say about him?  , This may tell you how long the relationship may last which, in turn, will tell you if he's serious about a commitment to you.  He should treat you differently, act a little more respectfully. i.e. He shouldn't curse (as much) around you, or make "rude" noises and/or gestures. This should be left with his buddies. 

when you first met this boy, what was your initial vibe?,  don't be "creepy nosy," but just think about his myspace or stuff laying around in his room.  have you heard people talk about him, whether it be good or bad.  how many ex-girlfriends has he had?,  how does he act around you opposed to his friends or family?,  ask yourself, "could i stand this person being with someone else".  

 You may lack confidence if you don't like what you are wearing. Confidence is key. If you can't love yourself why should he?; , If you have trouble waking up, try to  A) Form a sleeping routine such as reading or journaling before you go to bed every night. B)Go to bed early on school nights. C) Get a loud alarm clock. D) All of the above!  , After your shower, put some lotion on your legs, hands, and arms. You never know when you two might brush hands. Plus, guys like girls who look after themselves.  It makes you feel better about yourself all day.  Pick a look you like, and try to do your hair that way.  If you skip this step, you may be stuck with a stomachache all day!  , Floss as well.  Do something you like, but not too much. Guys don't like girls with too much makeup.  Even spray your favourite perfume. Guys love good smelling girls!  

make sure you have an outfit that you like ready the night before, or else you might end up wearing an outfit that you hate.  wake up 1 1/2 to 2 hours before you normally wake up.  get out your robe, clothes, and have a shower.  after you are all clean and fresh, wash your face.  brush your hair and then take out a magazine.  eat breakfast.  brush your teeth extremely well.  put on your makeup.  lastly, don't forget the deodorant. 

 He can't seem to look at you directly. And when he does look at you, he looks straight into your eyes. He responds with short, tentative, quiet and incoherent sentences. He touches his hair. He speaks to you in a very quiet, gentle, and tentative voice. He instantly and voluntarily agrees to all your challenges, bets, wants, etc.. (for instance, you jokingly offer a box of candy to whomever will accept your dare, and he accepts without second thoughts). He jerks away from your touch as though you have a contagious disease. He comments on your new haircut/clothes/jewelry. He offers you reassurance when you put yourself down, even though he's not the type to usually console someone. He frequently makes comments on things you dislike (e.g., bands, celebrities, sexism,) then looks at you, smirks, and waits for you to react. He constantly challenges/bets you to do things and waits patiently for you to do it. His feet are pointed towards you. It's a very subtle sign but it means he's unconsciously reacting to you. He almost sits by you but jerks away quickly.; 

watch for the following indicators:  he blurts out random, rapid words or phrases when you speak to him. 

 Put your hair up another way, wear or change makeup, Get some new clothes, etc.; , Wash yourself more often and wear perfume.  If you see him, talk to him, flip your hair, giggle.(not too much giggling or else it will make you seem dumb and strange)  , If he's going to geometry next, take the long way so you end up passing him. Don't pass him every day. (don't take the long way if it will make you tardy)  , They can say nice things about you to your crush.  Having self confidence is great, but don't make it seem that you're "all that." It turns people off.  Boys don't like girls that seem sad.  Try to work with good posture and great walking skills.  Don't change because if he ends up liking you for who you are not, that would be bad.  

make a subtle change about yourself, not too much, or else he will probably think you're fake.  make yourself smell good.  be flirty.  make sure to walk near him.  get close to his friends.  don't have too big of an ego.  smile and sound happy.  walk with style.  be yourself. 

 Does he hang around with physical sport junkies? Maybe it's the emo group or computer game guys. It could even be the book-club group, whoever they are they all have the same thing in common and that's their interest.; , Don't do it in a freakish way, where you just kind of pop up and want to make friends. This way you can talk about him every so often allowing you to find out more about him and what interest he shares with that friend.  The siblings always know all the juicy gossip and will definitely know what he's interested in.  Is he always wearing football shirts? Maybe it's overly baggy jeans and hip hop style clothing. It could simply be the new style icons. Is he dressing geek and nerd or is he the relaxed cool guy in jeans, T and sneakers/trainers. (this could tell if his interest is sports, urban lifestyle or fashion, as well as where he might get his clothes)  , See his reactions to the things the teacher is talking about, does science spook his interest? Is he answering all the questions? Maybe he's chilled out in the back drawing on his desk or drumming pencils on the desk.  This gives you the chance to get to talk to him.  It doesn't have to be at the same table, and you really don't need him to know you are listening to his conversation, so keep it cute. Use your hair to hide your facial expressions, or sit with your side turning to him with your hair hanging down on the side he is closest to. That way you can hear what he is saying but with your hair hiding your face.  You can do this by asking him (make sure it's a convenient time) or simply searching for his name. If you don't already have social networking accounts, you can open one too. This way you can chat and find out more about him.   On his Facebook, get added to his list and subscribe to his updates.  Also you can search for his family members if you know their names but be sure he doesn't know so you don't look like a stalker. This way you can find out more about both him and his family.  You could apply some of your knowledge whilst in a conversation with him but be discreet and don't say too much as not to appear as a stalker.  This will show the true him.  Have a look around his room. Posters, books, and video games are all hints about what his interests are.  

have a look at the friends he keeps.  get to know his friends better, or at least one of his close friends.  try to make friends with his sister or brother.  take a look at the way he dresses.  take the same classes he does.  offer to be his partner in a class group project.  try to sit by him at lunch.  check out whether he has facebook, twitter, instagram etc.  check out the posts he makes and what he likes and comments on.  check out the area where he writes a bit about himself.  tell him about a party you are want to have and ask his advice on what he thinks would make a party the greatest.  arrange a webcam conversation with him. 

 Smile and be happy. Don't be a downer all the time. Get plenty of sleep and exercise. Otherwise, he'll think you're always upset and he doesn't want someone to bring him down. He wants someone to bring him up. However, if you're feeling down one day, don't feel like you have to fake happiness. Otherwise you'll seem fake.; , Make sure your clothes fit properly and you're in your comfort zone when it comes to showing skin. You don't want him to think you're high maintenance. Brush your teeth. Spray some perfume on yourself, but not too much, as you don't want your scent to be over-bearing. Just enough to where you pass him his face turns towards you. That's one trick to catch his attention. The most important thing in looking nice is that you like the way you look. Usually we are our own worst critics; if you even slightly like your appearance, you probably look great!  , Your hair doesn't always have to be down. If it's knotty and gross looking, then throw it up with your bangs down. Straighten your hair when the weather is nice out, or scrunch it when it's rainy or a bit humid. Experiment with what looks best with your hair; again, remember you are your own worst critic.  When you're around his friends, talk to them, especially if he's around. If he sees you talking to his friends he might come over and join in the conversation. That's when you talk to him and find out about him. If he doesn't seem interested in whatever you are talking about, then bring up a new topic.  Crack a joke or two. Even if you know they're not funny if he laughs that's a sign that he's into you. Try not to be too serious; guys of any age sometimes tease girls they like.  Don't find out where he works and go there everyday. He'll think you're creepy and that you're stalking him. Guys don't like that, and if he thinks you're creepy, your chances just went down the drain. Don't find out where every one of his classes are and follow him there. Don't stand at his locker; if your locker is near his, then that's a different story. If he asks then you simply say "my locker is right here".  This is the most important step in catching his attention. Don't have your shirt down to your navel if you feel terrible wearing it just to get attention or a really long shirt if you feel awful in them. He'll mistake you for being insecure and think you are miserable and desperate, which you aren't! Don't lie about how many guys you've been with, and don't wear something completely impractical like super shorts in the middle of Winter, he'll consider you outlandish.  Smile and flirt, but not too much. Don't over think how you talk to him; otherwise you might seem fake.  Give yourself a mental pep-talk before you talk to him. Don't worry about how you look or anything. Remember that he is just a person, and nothing to freak out about; be yourself, and if it happens, it happens.  This applies to almost all situations with guys. When it happens, you'll know what's right. However.  Otherwise, you may feel bad about yourself; isn't the point of a having this guy to make you happy?  

be positive, but do not fake it.  look nice.  take care of your hair.  talk to his friends.  make him laugh.  don't be creepy.  don't act fake.  be cute.  be confident.  don't over think it... just be yourself.  know your values and stick to them. 

 When you feel your heart thudding faster and faster, pay attention to how you are breathing. Remember: the quicker you breathe, the less air your lungs get. That means your heart is speeding up to pump the little oxygen you have to the rest of your body. So make a point of taking deep breaths to calm your body and mind.Breathe in through your nose and out through your mouth. Imagine that your lungs are down in your abs. Think about filling your abs with air instead of your chest. This will help you draw longer breaths.; , Keep your focus on what is happening outside of you, rather than inside. Focus all of your attention entirely on him. Empty your mind of everything else. Ignore your own internal reactions, worries, and concerns. Just pay attention to what he says and does and react to that.Obviously, you’re a human being hoping to have a conversation here, so you can’t really empty your mind of everything. The goal is to quiet any thoughts that don’t have anything to do with the immediate conversation. Just think about what you’re going to say in response to what he says, not how you feel inside. For example: If he asks for your opinion on something (like your taste in music), speak from the gut and tell the truth, regardless of what his opinion may be. Keep the conversation going instead of stalling it by trying to second-guess yourself about what he will think of your answer. If he says something you disagree with, say so. Don't start yourself worrying about how he might react. It's better to deal with his reaction, whatever it may be, than worry over a hundred different scenarios that probably won't happen anyway.  Play something relaxing and keep an ear tuned to that. If not, just play a song that usually calms you down in the back of your head.   The key is to play something calming. Your breathing, heart rate, and other body rhythms will naturally fall in sync with the music’s rhythm. This is also a great ice breaker to get the conversation rolling and find out his interests. Depending on where you are, subtle ways to go about this could be fiddling with a car radio, switching between music channels on TV, starting your iPod or other device before you engage him, or asking him if he wants to check out that jukebox in the corner.  With one hand, form an “O” by bringing the tip of your index finger and the tip of your thumb together. Leave your other three fingers straight, but relaxed. Sounds weird, but this is actually a yoga trick known as the Gyan Mudra. Instead of focusing on all the thoughts and feelings building up inside you, just concentrate on keeping the tips of your thumb and index together together.If you think this will look weird, just hold your hands behind your back, or use whatever you’re holding (like a textbook) to hide it from view.  Release your stress by moving around. Get your blood flowing and get rid of the tension building up inside you. Full-out dancing is a proven way to lower your anxiety, but even though it would probably be too weird if you broke out into a jig for no reason, moving around just a little bit will still help.A simple solution is to just get the conversation mobile by suggesting a walk-and-talk! If you're already playing music, let yourself move to the rhythm. Slowly stepping off and on a curb or stair step also be a way to burn off nervous energy without looking too odd.  

breathe!,  concentrate on him.  calm yourself with music.if you have music handy and it seems natural to play it, great!,  make an “okay” sign with your fingers.  move your feet. 

 When you see him, walk right up and start a conversation.Spark his interest by showing him yours! Demonstrate how confident you are by seeking him out right away, rather than forever waiting for that "perfect moment" that may or may not come.Don’t worry about declaring your undying love right away. Simply get the ball rolling by showing him that you would like to get to know him better.   Don’t feel super-confident just yet? That is all the more reason to go straight up to him! Dawdling will just give you more time to overthink things and stress yourself out.Also, you don't want to give someone else a chance to get in there first and hog his attention.  Don’t stress yourself about flooring him with the most clever thing that you could possibly say. Instead, start small and build from there. Draw him into a conversation with you by posing an offhand question or asking for a quick favor.Whichever you choose, be sure the topic is something that will lead to an actual back-and-forth conversation, instead of a one-word answer. Open with something like:   “Is that the new iPhone? Could I take a peek at it? I need to replace my phone and I’m not sure what I want to get.” “You have Ms. Novak for first period, right? What was her test like? I have to take it eighth period.” “I like your Smiths t-shirt. Real quick: what’s your favorite album and why?”  , When you approach, make direct eye contact and maintain it. Even though you’re nervous, stop yourself from glancing away to stare at your feet or something in the distance. Gain his attention and keep it by keeping yours on him from start to finish!Smile, too! Put him at ease with a grin as you approach. Remember: you want him to like talking with you, so show him that this conversation is going to be a good thing by opening with a big friendly smile.  Once you draw him into a conversation, keep him engaged by sticking to a subject he knows about: himself! As you move from topic to topic, show him that your main interest isn’t the topic itself, but what he thinks about it. Flatter his ego so he feels eager to share. At the same time, avoid the stress of being in the spotlight by keeping it trained on him!Think of yourself as an interviewer. Ask lots of questions. For example, if he happens to have a book with him: Ask him what he thinks of it so far. Then ask what other authors he enjoys. Quiz him with: “Which five books would you bring if you were stranded on a desert island?” Then ask if he could only recommend one to read, which one would it be.  Don’t overdo the questioning and make him feel like this is an interrogation! Start peppering the conversation with your own opinions and anecdotes. Even though you feel nervous at first, share a small piece of yourself when he shares something with you. As you grow more comfortable, expand and offer him a wider view so the conversation grows to be equal parts give and take.For instance, if one of the books he picks to bring with him to a desert island is the same as one of your picks, say so! Then use that topic to direct more questions at him: “Which character do you most identify with? What was your favorite part? What did you think of the movie?” When he shares his answer with you, return the favor by answering your own question. By asking lots of questions and sharing your own answers, you can control the course of the conversation and share exactly what you want to share.  As the conversation builds, stick to topics that the both of you enjoy. Even though you may want this guy to be your shoulder to cry on when you need one, save that for later. For now, show him that you are fun to be around by keeping the conversation carefree.If he brings up a topic that stresses you out, redirect the focus to something more positive. Let’s say he brings up a flood that recently hit the city where your favorite aunt lives. Instead of focusing on the flood, use that as a segue to talk to about a happy memory of your aunt or that city. From there, shift the focus back onto him by asking about his favorite family member or city.  

just go for it.  open with something casual.  look at him.  make him talk about himself at first.  offer your own insights.  keep the tone light. 

 Don’t fret about what he might think of your appearance. Be comfortable in your body, even if his previous girlfriends belong to a totally different “type.” Rest assured that guys respond more to your self-confidence than your looks. So instead of stressing out about mirroring his type, fix yourself up however you like to. Then simply walk into every room like you own it by:Refraining from slouching or sticking your hands in your pockets.Keeping your chin up with your neck extended. Throwing your shoulders back. Allowing your arms to swing freely.  Give each interaction the chance to develop into something great. Don’t shoot yourself in the foot by assuming that everything will go wrong!When you’re with him, avoid over-analyzing the situation. Just take pleasure in interacting with him by staying in the moment, rather than dwelling on the past or trying to predict the future. Respond to what he (and anyone else in your group) says or does right here, right now, and nothing more.Keep your mind clear of any preconceived notions about what he might mean with this comment or that look. Focus on what goes right: a joke that he finds funny; his willingness to share his opinions and personal experiences; his interest in your own opinions and stories. Let the not-so-right parts slide. Recover quickly by refusing to dwell on them! For instance, if your joke falls flat, simply make a joke out of that by making cricket noises and then laughing it off.  Remember: you don’t know everything! So if you feel like he isn’t interested in being with you or even just chatting right now, don’t take that as a personal slight. Take a step back and think of every reason that might be, rather than just assume that he doesn’t like you. Other possibilities could be:He’s shy in general or (gasp!) nervous because he’s attracted to you, too! He may be distracted by something else in his life, like schoolwork, his job, or a family situation. He may just have little to say about the particular topic you bring up.  Don’t think all is lost just because time spent with your dream guy didn’t go exactly the way you dreamt it. Remember what went right, and put everything else in its proper place. Avoid placing too much significance on minor details.If he, say, fails to get one of your jokes or disagrees with one of your opinions, don’t take that to mean that you aren’t funny or a good match. Instead, just accept that he didn’t find that one particular joke funny or agree with that one particular opinion. Don’t assume the whole conversation was a total disaster just because it wasn’t 100% perfect. Remember that he may have had a perfectly good time even if you think it could have gone better.  

be confident in your looks.  think positively.  keep your mind open to all possibilities.  stay open-minded afterward, too. 

 Whether you're in the classroom or on the bus or at work, always find a way to sit beside him or get close, that way you can talk with him whether it be about the weather or a sports team. Just get to know him better!; , If you've chatted before he will recognize you and most likely accept the request; a friend request is one of the most common and nonchalant things today, so don't dread or be afraid they have connected the figurative dots and know your crushing; this fear is equivalent to worrying people thinking you odd for, say, breathing. If you're good friends already send him a message or give him a poke!  ,, Guys love it when girls smile as it's a sign of friendliness and makes you more approachable. More than likely he'll think your smile is cute also!  , After general chatting with him everyday on the bus for 3 months you're probably wondering, "what next?!" Well, naturally, you'll be friends by now and will talk about other things but if you're really stuck, why not talk hobbies? Find out what he likes and if you like the same ... viola!  , After you're past the general chatting stage and you've become good friends ask for his cell phone number or he might ask you for yours, but make sure you know him well enough!  , If after all this you want to meet up with him after work or school for some relaxing time as friends why not go to the cinema, park, seaside or shopping mall? If you get the feeling he won't go if it's just the two of you then invite more friends, some of yours and some of his and everyone will get to know each other more!  

sit beside him and generally talk.  become friends on facebook, you both have facebook, in all likelihood, so find him and send a friend request.  plan your route so you unexpectedly bump into him can be a great opportunity to talk again, however make it look realistic and don't do it all the time or he will think you're stalking him!  ,  smile!,  talk hobbies!,  get his mobile/cell phone number.  cinema trip! 

 If there's only one thing you do to boost your confidence, make it this. Try not to fall for the trap of changing your normal behavior to impress your crush. This is a bad idea for a few reasons. First, it puts pressure on you to be someone you're not, which can add to your stresses because it's not something you're used to. Second, it gives your crush a false idea of who you are. This can lead to confusion and hurt feelings when you drop the act. On the other hand, if you're true to yourself, you don't have to worry about keeping any lies straight.   This basic idea can extend to things as simple as casual conversations. For example, if your crush says that they love the movie Fight Club and you haven't seen it, don't say "Me too!" to try to impress. This is setting yourself up for embarrassment if, for instance, your crush asks what your favorite part is.; , In the grand scheme of things, looks are only a single, fairly shallow part of what makes someone attracted to someone else. However, putting a little extra effort into your looks can be very useful if it helps you keep your confidence high. Consider spending a little extra time each morning putting yourself together if you know your crush is going to be around. Loving the way that you look in the mirror will help you feel positive about yourself later in the day.   However, you'll never want to spend too much time worrying about the way you look. Remember that your crush is most likely to like you for your personality, not the way you look. Stressing out about whether or not you look perfect will only lower your confidence and make it harder for you to act natural when you're around your crush.  The way you carry yourself can have a big effect on how confident you look — and feel. While sitting or walking, keep your shoulders back, your head slightly raised, and your chest slightly stuck out. Above all, wear a classy smile. People are generally much more likely to start conversation with people who appear friendly and open.   On the other hand, "nervous" behaviors can make you look and feel less confident. Try to avoid fiddling with your hair, biting your nails, and similar gestures.  When you're absolutely infatuated with someone, it's easy to forget that they're an ordinary person. In addition to the things that make them amazing, crushes have flaws, fears, and insecurities just like you do. They are complex, imperfect people, so don't think of them like movie stars or royalty. Instead, try to think of them the same way you'd think of any casual acquaintance.   This is especially important if you eventually start a relationship with this person. Sooner or later, if you spend enough time together, you will find things about each other that you don't like. This can be a very unpleasant realization if you have the idea that your significant other is perfect.  Scrutinizing every single action that you make around your crush (or that your crash makes around you) is a sure fire way to turn yourself into a nervous wreck. Odds are that you don't always choose the perfect thing to say or do when you're around your friends and family, so there's no reason to worry about this when you're with your crush. Ironically, stressing out about every single thing that happens just makes it more likely that you'll make a mistake, so stay cool!   If, during a conversation, you find yourself thinking, "Oh my gosh, why did I just say that?", relax. Most minor mistakes will go completely unnoticed. If they don't, your crush may even find them amusing. Most people won't get offended or angry over a minor slip-up. Besides, if they do, they aren't good crush material.  

be yourself.  look your best, but don't obsess over your looks.  use confident body language.  think of him as an ordinary person (not an idol).  don't over-think things. 

 Flirting is a great way to judge whether your crush is reciprocating your feelings. There are many different ways to flirt. For example, you can try gently teasing your crush about a mistake, as long as you keep things good-natured. You might also try delivering a suave compliment or making a subtle innuendo while you're talking with each other. Touch is also a good idea — try reaching out and touching your crush's shoulder when s/he says something that makes you laugh, for instance. If your crush goes along with your flirting or returns it, this is a good sign.   See our flirting article for many more tips.  Crushes aren't always logical. If you're captivated by someone's looks and confidence, you may get a crush for this person before you have a good idea of who this person is. You don't want to make a move on someone only to find out later that you're not actually attracted to this person, so try to spend at least a little time together (alone or in groups) before you take the plunge.   If you're nervous about spending casual time with your crush, pick activities that you know you're good at. Your natural confidence will make it easier to keep your cool while you're interacting. For example, if you're good at tennis, you might challenge your crush to a few friendly volleys.  No matter how confident you are, asking a crush out can cause some major butterflies. A good way to "defuse" the situation is to make your request a casual one. This takes some of the pressure off — your crush isn't deciding whether to express his or her undying love for you, just deciding whether to spend a little time together.   You don't even have to bring up the idea of romance yet. For instance, you might simply ask your crush, "Hey, do you want to go get some Mexican food after school?" If you hit things off on your first hang-out session, then you can start hinting that you'd like to be more than friends.  Crushes aren't the end of the world. Try not to let yourself get too invested in the outcome of asking your crush out. For one, a "no" may have nothing to do with you — there may simply be other commitments that make romance impossible. More important, though, is the fact that one person's opinion of you doesn't matter. Crushes come and go, so don't let one determine how you feel about yourself.  

flirt a little to test the waters.  spend a little time with each other before you make any decisions.  be direct with your intentions, but keep things casual.  don't put too much weight in your crush's reply. 

 You are a unique individual and already blessed with positive differences from others. Capitalize on your strengths. Never try to "fit in" or change who you are as a person to have any sort of relationship, whether strictly platonic or in fact, romantic. If you feel the need, invest in a new shirt or bracelet for a confidence boost to add to that edge. However, remember that you shouldn't have to change who you are inside to get him/her to like you. Be true to yourself and what is in your heart, as that should be the ultimate attractive quality.  Obviously good personal hygiene is a must, but spritz on a great cologne or enhance your eyes with a great new shadow color. Fun additions like these not only help with intensifying your look but also enhance your confidence level.  Soft and sleek, curly or smooth make hair look not only clean and healthy but add to the your overall physical presentation. Maybe you could even be super-daring and go for a bold new haircut!  ,, Try use little to no makeup. Boys love when the girl is either natural and subtle, or a little bit sassy with the soft flick of black eyeliner: (Glide your liquid eyeliner across the eye and end with a soft flick if you are allowed to). Nude lips are also attractive, so try out a clear lip gloss. If lip gloss isn't quite your style, try a lip liner that highlights your natural pout. , Invest in a average sized bag with a nude colour to match your outfits! Remember to carry around your pick me up beauty supplies i.e. deodorant and mini makeup bag for a quick spritz and fresh glow.  Smiling is known to make a person glow, so stick on your smile and show them teeth! Whether you have braces or not, people will appreciate and see the beauty of your smile.  If he can accept you for the person that you are, then he is the best.  This article talks about beauty tips, but a man will be captured by your presence, fun streak and mannerisms, so keep good posture, head high, smile and talk nicely. Men will be all over you. Be yourself and if you are a fun person, then beauty tips are not always essential.  Try to avoid him a little bit, but don't show him your real feelings so easily, because this will divert his attention towards you.  Most guys like intelligent girls so don't behave like a dumbo. , If he sees that you like doing his favorite things, then he might like you even more and think of you as a great match for him.  If he is interested in sports, learn everything you can about it in general, then learn the specifics for the local teams so you can offer to take him to a game. If he likes skateboarding, find out if there is a local skate park he may not have gone to yet. If he is into debates, then learn the art of debating and if he gets engaged in a topic with you, keep pace. The point is, engage in what it is that he enjoys and find enjoyment in it yourself. There will come a time when this is more important than how you look.  Don't be bossy or rude or demanding but instead polite and girly. Offer him drinks when you get your own but don't focus on just him and look obvious.  Also don't lie, since it's not good to start a relationship with lies. You'll only get found out later.  This makes you more interesting, because he will see that you also have lots of friends who think you are interesting!  , You can be more confident and alluring by being interested in him than trying to sound interesting. So listen, and participate in conversation. Try not to start off every single sentence with "I". This may seem difficult, but you will find yourself asking more questions and being more involved and fascinated by your crush. People are generally not too interested in other people and their accomplishments. So if you discover some of your crush's likes, then bring up a conversation about it. Does he like hockey? Ask if he saw the big game last night. So if you become more interested in people, then you will stand out as a bright, friendly, confident girl.  It should be something that makes you stand out from all the other girls.  They may, however, help you keep up with the latest fashion trends.  If you aren't yourself, then how are you yourself supposed to impress him? If he doesn't know the real you, then why did you try to impress him by not being yourself? if he doesn't like the real you, then it is his loss! Good luck!  , Put on foundation first for the base.; ,,,,, Grab a blusher brush, and glide evenly your blusher over the cheeks to create tone. Then if you are an eyelash curler addict, grab your eyelash curlers, and follow up with a few strokes of mascara, starting from the bottom of the top lashes brushing outwards. Most guys do not like it when a girl plasters her face with makeup. It looks unnatural to them, and they are never fooled by make-up. So a little make-up is fine, but as strange as it may seem, guys find you more attractive with less of it.  

find your strengths.  spruce up your look.  find what looks best for your hair: guys love when a girl's hair is flirtatious or pretty.  invest in a scent that suits you, such as a flowery perfume or rugged-scented cologne.  ,  less is more.  dress the way you feel, but to attract the male attention, try to stick on an outfit which extenuates your curves but not too revealing otherwise they will get the wrong idea!  ,  keep a casual handbag to put with everyday outfits, if you see this guy daily; don't drag around a rucksack, you want to look like a lady!,  keep a smile on.  show the person your real beauty show what you are.  remember, beauty is not everything.  along with looks, you need to learn few more steps like don't give too much attention to him.  talk intelligently with him.  most important of all, love yourself and be confident in whatever you do.  ,  do some of the things he likes doing.  find out what he likes.  have a good attitude around him.  don't try to sound like you're bragging or exaggerating when having a conversation.  make sure that you keep in touch with all of your friends and have conversations with them when your crush is in the room.  remember, the most important thing is not trying to impress him.  show him one of your talents, like playing the guitar, singing or maybe dancing.  read fashion magazines like teen vogue or cosmo girl, but be careful, because they may not always give good advice, so think before following them.  don't be afraid to be yourself.  for a sweet sexy pin up girl look, invest in black liquid eyeliner, matching skin foundation with a matte finish, red lipstick, and peachy blusher.  prep the eye for the eyeliner with some nude eyeshadow, then glide your eyeliner from the inner corner of the eye outwards to the end, then a small upward/straight flick.  ,  use peach blusher, or a liquid blusher to highlight the cheekbones and create good facial structure.  ,  then prep your lips with lip balm, following with a lip brush to use with a rouge lipstick.  ,skin matching foundation, clear lip gloss with a non stick feel, peach/pinkish blusher and mascara, preferably non clumpy mascara, recommended bourgeois "elastic mascara"  ,  for a very natural beauty:  apply moisturizer leaving it to set in for 5 minutes, then blend the foundation evenly over the face. 

 If your crush has no idea you exist, it's going to be difficult to attract him. Try to get to know each other by becoming acquainted with his friends, joining a club he's in, or asking someone who knows him to introduce you. Be careful because if you don't want him to know you like him, they might say something which could ruin your chances and make things uncomfortable.If your crush is in your class, talk to him a little before or after class (talking during class could get you some unwanted, negative attention).You could comment on the teacher, the work you have to do or make a joke when he's listening. It's scary but you'll feel good once you make a move. Say something like, “The homework was hard last night. Were you able to figure it out?” to start a conversation with him.; , It's easier to start conversations when you both have found something to talk about. You might possibly consider taking up some of his interests but don't become a whole different person just for someone else. It's definitely not worth it. If you have no common interests, don't freak out, just ask him about his hobbies or about something you already know he enjoys.For example, If you've never watched a TV show before that he's practically addicted to, just tell him, ask him about it to spark an instant conversation. You could say, “Have you ever seen ?” to get him talking about something he is a fan of and will get excited about.  You have to be friends before he will start to reciprocate the whole "crush feeling" in return. If you aren’t already friends, you could always start out by bringing up a general conversation topic (i.e. weather, a crazy thing that happened that day, presidential elections, assignments...) and if all else fails, you could always just ask for a pencil or some paper and go from there.   Maybe after you've gotten to know him a little better, you can joke around or tease him, maybe even flirt with him - but don't get too ahead of yourself. He might feel awkward if a girl he barely knows starts flirting hard-core with him. Add him on Facebook or follow him on Twitter or Instagram if you haven’t already done so. You can learn more about your crush’s interests and hobbies by doing this as well. You can “like” his posts whenever you see them to indicate your interest in what he posts and talks about.  Guys are generally attracted to and notice people with a good sense of humor, especially those with playful personalities. Try joking around with him or teasing him if you are comfortable doing so. Being able to make him laugh could be attractive to him.For example, you could lightly joke around by saying something like, “I’m short because I actually escaped from Willy Wonka’s factory” or something silly along those lines to show that you are confident in yourself but you enjoy a good laugh.  

be friendly.  find common ground.  get to know him better.  be playful. 

 There are many reasons why you might want a relationship with a boy that's older than you. Most of the time, we see older people as more sophisticated and mature. This is most often the case, but not always. Some older boys will be just as immature as they ever were.; , There's no point in dating an older boy because you think it will make you appear cooler. Before committing to a relationship, you should make sure you're ready for a relationship. Especially if you're looking to date someone older than you, there's that much less  , If two people are at different stages in their lives, it can bring up issues in communication. For instance, if you want to go out and party with your older boyfriend, he might be at a part of his life where he's had his fun and prefers a night indoors. In some cases, it can be hard to have a sense of equality in a relationship when one person has considerably more life experience than the other. Keep these potential problems in mind before you commit.   On the other hand, some maintain that age is just a number.There's no concrete reason why people of different ages can't connect on a deep, meaningful level.  Even if your relationship is perfect, other people are prone to make nasty assumptions about an age gap relationship. There's only so much you can do to fend off these nay-sayers. Ultimately, its your relationship, not theirs, and you shouldn't put their feelings before your own.   If you're under the age of 18, you should consider the legal consequences of someone who is older than you. If the age gap is big enough to make a sexual relationship illegal, you should not go through with it.  In virtually all cases of trying to make someone your boyfriend, you should be his friend first before anything romantic happens. Go out of your way to spend time with him. Ask him to hang out as you normally would with a regular friend. If there is chemistry and the two of you are emotionally available, there's a good likelihood that things will begin to take shape in time. For the meantime however, you should simply enjoy the experience of hanging out as friends.  Unless the older boy in question is incredibly shy, the fact that he has more life experience will probably mean that he'll be the one to instigate something. Some guys can be made to feel uncomfortable by a girl that is very forward, especially someone who is younger than them.   If it doesn't look like he's going to make a move out of shyness, you should think about making a move yourself. This should occur if he has shown signs of interest but hasn't acted on it over the course of a few hangouts.  This is where it can difficult for some girls who try to attract older guys. While your first instinct may be to be completely submissive towards the boy, this will only go to show your age. Instead, you should take age out of the equation when it comes to talking to him. If it makes you feel more comfortable, pretend he is the same age as you. Relationships usually need a sense of balance between the two people in order to succeed.  If you're attracted to a guy, you can say a lot simply by making eye contact with him and holding his gaze. Flirting covers a wide range of different behaviours, but most flirting begins with steady eye contact.   This kind of gaze is best combined with a smile. That way, it will tell the boy that you're looking at him for good (as opposed to negative) reasons.  If you smile at the boy you're interested in, you'll be projecting positive vibes in his direction. If he notices your smile and smiles back at you, it's a sign he is probably interested in you.  Saying something nice about someone can be interpreted as a form of flirting. Complimenting a boy based on his looks or other traits you find attractive will let him know you're interested. Make sure your compliments are genuine, however. People are usually able to tell when a compliment is sincere or not.  Because the boy you are interested in is older than you, it's possible he has different ideas of what he wants in a relationship with a girl. Although you may feel pressured to give in, you should only ever do what feels comfortable with you.  Relating emotionally to people older than you can be hard if you're not used to spending time with you. This is why it's recommended that you try to surround yourself with people that are older than you. Make friends with people in the boy's age range and get comfortable with hanging out with people with more experience than you. This can be hard to do if you don't already have older friends. If you have older siblings, you might try tagging along with some of their hangouts.   If you want to make older friends, you won't be able to depend on your classes. Extracurricular clubs are a place where people of different ages will get together with a common interest. If you work a job, there will likely be older co-workers you can befriend as well.  Regardless of the age you're trying to attract, it will work to your benefit if people are able to see that you're a girl of your word. If you make a promise, do everything you possibly can to follow through with it. Don't flake out on plans you make. When you follow through with the things you say, everything you say will have a greater sense of weight in the eyes of others. This includes any older guys you may fancy.  Self-esteem is a major sign of maturity. It's natural for young boys and girls to feel a lot of insecurity as they grow up. If you want to catch the attention of an older boy, you 're going to need to match the sort of self-assurance that is common with his age range. Challenge any negative thoughts that enter your mind, and replace them with positive thoughts about yourself. Even if you have to fake it until you make it at first, you'll eventually start to believe it sincerely.   Remember that there is no right or wrong answer when it comes to self-esteem. There's no objectively wrong reason to have confidence in yourself.  You might be surprised how much you'll find out about yourself if you make a regular habit of keeping a diary. Buy any book of lined paper, or keep a Word file on your computer where you can add thoughts at the end of each day. If you become aware of the things you're thinking and feeling on a daily basis, you'll get a stronger grasp of the way other people see you.  Much like a healthy sense of self-confidence, getting past feeling jealous of other people is an important indicator that someone has matured. Most teenage girls tend to be very jealous at that stage in their lives. If you want to stand out from others your age, you'll need to let go of your jealousies towards other people. This is easier said than done for many people, but it is possible. Anytime you are beginning to feel jealous towards someone, remind yourself that there is no one who can do you better than you. Comparing yourself to anyone else is a waste of time.  Even if you're trying to become mature beyond your years, your current circle of friends might make it difficult to break free. Less mature groups of friends will often fall into spurts of drama or gossip. The best thing for you to do is to avoid this stuff entirely. It doesn't add anything constructive to your life, and you won't be made to look good if you're associated with that crowd.   This does not mean abandoning your friends. Rather, you should spend time with them, but take a step back if bickering starts. Of course, if a friend of yours is hurt and wants to talk it through with you, you should do so. Being mature can also mean being a reliable friend.  Nothing can make people look at your twice than a new hairstyle. Getting your hair cut or permed will have a major effect on your appearance. You should use this opportunity to spruce up your look and turn some heads. If you're trying to appeal to older groups, you are going to want to steer away from fashion trends that are reserved for juveniles. Aim to make your hair attractive but classy.   It's a good idea to pick a hairstyle that suits your face shape. Ask your hairdresser if you have any confusion., Depending on your age, there may be things you wear that might seem juvenile in the eyes of someone older. While you should always ultimately find your own sense of fashion, impressing an older guy can be easier if you look at the fashion expectations for his age group.   If the age gap is big enough, don't wear the boy's age range's fashion if it will look weird on somebody your age. It helps to take a look at some current fashion outlets. This will give you some insight into the latest trends.  If you're young girl, don't try to compensate for your age by using a lot of makeup. Doing so only brings more attention to how young you are. In addition, it also gets the impression across that you are insecure with the way you look. You'll have a much higher chance of getting a guy interested if you stay as true to your real sense as possible. Some makeup to highlight your natural features should be more than enough.   It's a fact that younger girls aren't often as skilled at makeup as they will be once they're older. With that in mind, it's good to start small and work your way up from there.  Whether you're standing up or sitting down, make an effort to keep your back straight and your shoulders even. If you're not used to having good posture, this will feel a bit strange to do at first, but it will eventually feel natural if you stick with it.   Maturity and confidence are the two major ways you can get across the age gap, and posture is a way of expressing both of them.  

ask yourself why you want an older boyfriend.  make sure you want a relationship for the right reasons.a relationship should be pursued because you feel a legitimate connection with the other person.  consider how an age gap might affect a relationship.  prepare yourself for criticism.if there is a significant age gap between you and the guy you're with, there are a number of problems you should prepare to deal with that you wouldn't normally have to think about.  be his friend first.  let him take the lead.  treat him as an equal.  hold his gaze.eye contact is a very powerful part of body language, and it's especially important in terms of flirting.  smile at him.smiling is a universal language for warm feelings and affection.  offer compliments.  make sure he respects your boundaries.  start hanging out with older people.  follow through with whatever you say you're going to do.reliability is a hallmark of any truly mature person.  be proud of who you are.  keep a journal.keeping track of your daily thoughts and feelings in a journal is a great path to self-discovery.  get past jealousy.  avoid social cliques and drama.  try a new hairstyle.  dress to suit his age range's fashion sense.  keep your makeup light.  keep your posture confident.regardless of your gender or age, posture is an important way of expressing confidence and making yourself look attractive to anyone around you. 

 Nothing is more tragic than the oh-so-cliche' friend-likes-friend-who-doesn't-like-her-that-way drama. Be sure that you aren't considered "one of the guys" or just his "bud". Of course, you have to get to know him first and you may possibly just gain an amazing friend in the process (which is all right, some pursued crushes could turn out to be one of your best friends) but be a little more flirty with him, in a way that you're sure one of his "buds" wouldn't be.For example, to set yourself apart from “one of the guys”, maybe give him a hug, a playful peck on the cheek, or play with his hair.  Your crush may be attracted to you if you let him share details about his life. This shows that you’re really interested in him and what he has to say. Try not to always talk about yourself; he wants to know about you but give him a chance to share about himself.   If he asks questions about you, answer them but don’t focus on yourself for too long. You can steer the conversation toward him by asking questions like, “How many siblings do you have?” or “What is your favorite thing about your family?” Ask about his interests or hobbies by saying something along the lines of “Have you read any good books recently?” or “What videogames do you like to play?”  , One of the best ways to demonstrate to a guy that you like him and enjoy his company is to laugh at his jokes! This boosts his confidence and signals to him that you have a similar sense of humor and find the same things funny. For many people, a sense of humor is one of the most important qualities they look for in a significant other.If he says something that you find funny, join in or add your own joke. For example, if you’re talking about a celebrity, you could add something that you find to be amusing to the conversation. Avoid being too mean, such as making fun of other people’s appearances or mocking individuals you both know. You don’t want to come off as someone who will make fun of him behind his back or come off as cruel.  If you know where your crush likes to spend his time, you can get yourself noticed by showing up there every so often. For example, if he has a favorite coffee shop in the area, you could go there with a friend or two on the off chance you might see him there. You could also study or do your homework there.   If you know that he’s going to a concert, see if you can get tickets to go as well. This can provide a chance for you to bump into him and say hello. This could even give you a reason to hang out together. Try joining a club or activity that he is a part of. This could also give you a reason to talk and hang out. Be careful not to show up where he is all the time or he may get annoyed or think you are stalking him. Just be yourself and if he happens to enjoy the same activities as you, even better!  

flirt with him.  avoid always talking about yourself.  laugh at his jokes.  hang out at his favorite places. 

 Hair is one of the first thing guys notice and it has been shown that they are attracted to healthy-looking hair. If your hair is color-treated or damaged, try soaking it in coconut oil overnight and washing it out the next morning. It’s a great way to treat dry, damaged hair. If your hair is healthy, avoid over-processing it with too many dyes or chemicals, which can lead to damage and breakage., You may want to avoid smelling like body odor in front of your crush, which could give him a negative impression of you. You don't have to be flowery, clean, and fresh all the time, just try to shower daily, wear deodorant and possibly put on some nice perfume or cologne to try to impress him. Smelling nice or at least presentable, is actually pretty attractive.  Don't feel pressured to dress just like everyone else and don't concern yourself with whether you’re wearing the brand name that's popular. If you feel comfortable, you will protect your best self and people will feel comfortable around you. Also, if a guy is truly into you, he won't care about the small flaws in your appearance that you might see every time you look in the mirror.  

keep your hair healthy.  practice good hygiene.  be yourself. 

 If he has a friend who's a girl, get to know her. You will get to hang out with him when she is with him. Try to be included in a group activity with them so that you can talk to the boy.; , After a while, strike up a conversation following the "Hello", preferably about something he likes (sports teams, hobbies etc.) If you have classes or lunch with this boy, that would be a good time to do so. If you are too scared to speak to him in person, then try social networking websites like Facebook or Myspace. Using these can be easier than talking face to face and good ice-breaker, just remember its hard to have a proper friendship only online.  Be careful to not overdo it. You don't want to look desperate or pushy. Just look at him and wait until he looks at you-- then look away. That signals that you are interested. Laugh a lot!!  , You don't want him to think of you as a friend forever. Give him compliments and find little ways to touch him.  Don't pretend to be somebody you're not. Guys like an honest girl and not drama queens.  Before you can become his girlfriend, you have to be able to keep his secrets. Don't betray him by telling someone the things he tells you in confidence. Make him trust you so that he can talk to you about anything. This could lead to him believing that you are good girlfriend material.  If he says no, you guys can still be buddies. If he says yes, then you've done it! But only ask him/her out when you are sure that he/she likes you! Or it might go wrong! But, if you're satisfied with your new friendship, then you could suggest big groups get together instead and find ways to talk to your crush alone.  

get to know a friend of the boy you like.  smile and say "hi" whenever you see him.  flirt often.  get him to notice you.  be honest.  be a good friend.  ask him out after at least a month of being friends. 

 Even if you don't feel very confident, take a minute to build yourself up before approaching a a potential date. Envision the conversation going well in your mind. If you are going into a conversation expecting to be rejected, it will show in your body language. Make sure you make eye contact and stand up straight and speak clearly.  Sometimes a drink or two might be necessary to loosen up your inhibitions enough to talk to a good looking guy, but know when to stop. Going over the line can lead to some embarrassing situations. Drinking too much impairs your judgement, including your ability to decide if you have met your dream guy or not.  Nothing will make you seem more lonely and desperate than revealing everything about your past right away. You don't want to seem like you're on the rebound and desperate to feel validated., Just because you met a good looking guy at a party and feel like you can talk to him all night does not mean you should. This is the time where you excuse yourself. Spend some time talking with your friends or meet some other new people. Just be patient and make your way back in bit. Leaving them wanting more and let them see your whole life isn't going to crumble the second you stop talking together!  

be confident.  limit your drinking.  keep your emotional baggage in check.  know when it is time to go. 

 A modest amount of social media stalking is pretty standard when you start dating someone, just keep it from getting creepy. You can secretly look at every photo of them for the last four years without scaring them off, but try to avoid making it obvious you're watching their every move. Limit your comments and likes to one or two a week. You should have better things to do, even if you don't have better things to do.  Desperate people often look to push the relationship too fast. Don't bring up topics like marriage or even make too many references to future dates early in the relationship. Desperate daters are often asking for continual status updates on the relationship and trying to push for more commitment in various ways. Just let things happen and if you are right for each other, it will work out in time., Just because you start dating someone, don't put aside your friends to spend all your time with him. Anyone that drops all their friends for a new date, will come off as very desperate. You can't make yourself too available and you don't want to come off as clingy. Staying true to yourself and your friends will set up healthy boundaries and expectations for a happy relationship.  By holding on too tightly, you can drive a love interest away. If the guy is right for you and the relationship is going well, he will stick around. If it isn't meant to be, no amount of clinging is going to make it happen. Most of the time, it isn't even the guy you're clinging to, it's the idea of needing a relationship.  

avoid being a social media stalker.  let the relationship progress naturally.  spend time with your friends.  do not be clingy. 

 No one will know what kind of person your crush is looking for better than his friends. Get to know them and you’ll find out more about him, like where he tends to hang out. On top of that, if they get to know you and are impressed, they’re more likely to want to help you with your crush. If the two of you have mutual friends, they are the perfect people to talk to. Think of the following examples when subtly trying to find out more about your crush:   If you want to know where he skates, ask about parks in town: “Where do people usually skate around here? Who goes to that park?” If you want try and know whether your crush is single: “How come he doesn’t have a girlfriend/boyfriend?” Ask about their friendship with him: “How did you guys become friends? What do you do together?”; , If you want to understand your crush better, don’t be afraid to learn about skater culture. Like any other culture, skateboarding culture has a set of values, norms and ideals. The best way to find out more is to talk to skateboarders about why they skateboard, and what it brings to them. You can also find many interviews on YouTube, where skateboarders talk about the culture. This can give you a great idea of how your crush thinks.  Beyond understanding the culture, you’ll want to learn a bit about skateboarding itself. You don’t necessarily need to know all the tricks or professional skateboarders by name, but knowing a bit about your crush’s passion will give the two of you something to talk about. Simply knowing what an ollie is (jumping with the skateboard), will show that you care about his passion and he’ll be impressed when it’s time to talk to him.  Skater guys tend to spend most of their free time at the skatepark of their choice with their friends. Give yourself the opportunity to “bump into him” by hovering around his favorite hang out spot.  First impressions matter; it can take only three seconds for your crush to make up his mind about you the first time he meets you.There are two main ways you can introduce yourself, depending on how quickly you want to make your intentions known:   You can be extremely casual if you don’t want him to know you like him just yet: “Hey, what’s going on, mind if I hang out with you?” You can be completely blunt and honest. This lets you know right away if he’s interested in you, and you can put a comedic twist on it as well: “Hey, I like you. Want to hang out?”  , People love to talk about themselves and their passions. Asking questions shows that you have more than just a passing interest in what he has to say. Some questions you might want to ask him include:   ”How long have you been skateboarding?” This shows your interest in what he does and learning more about him. ”How often do you hang out here?” Not only will this tell you how passionate he is about skateboarding, but gives you a chance to know when you can next bump into him. ”What do you do when you’re not skateboarding?” This gives you a chance to find out about common interests the two of you might share.  Even if you’re not interested in skateboarding, you should still pay very close attention to what your crush is saying. Active listening means you’re paying attention to what he’s saying, asking important questions that show you’re listening, and absorbing the information he’s giving you. It might sound strange to do this at first, but people definitely appreciate someone who isn’t on their phone while they’re trying to have a conversation.  Not only will being positive and supportive bring him up and let him enjoy spending time with you, but it actually makes you more attractive to him.Try to see things in a positive light and avoid nagging about your insecurities. There’s nothing wrong with having insecurities, but don’t let them affect your actions.  Skaters, by nature, like to play around, goof off and take risks.Get in touch with your playful side to reel him in: it shows that you don’t take yourself too seriously, and will make you irresistible.Be willing to step out of your comfort zone and let your your rebellious side out. Think of the following examples:   Don’t always play it safe. Skateboarders like to take risks; try doing the same, within reason. Try an extreme sport or explore an abandoned building. Experiment. Leave your comfort zone and try things you were too scared to try. Conquer your fears and be adventurous. Go on spontaneous road trips or try a new hobby. Playful teasing. There’s a fine line between mocking someone (“That trick really sucked.”) and teasing them (“Is that the best you’ve got to show me?”).  Style is all about making the clothes work for you, and skater guys respect confidence. Don’t feel that you have to dress up or dress down just to impress him, but keep in mind that if you’re hanging out with him at the skatepark you may need more functional clothing. Think jeans and sneakers, but you can wear jeans that flatter you and you find stylish.  No one likes a poser, especially not a skateboarder. Being yourself will give you an infectious confidence that will get him to pay attention. Use these steps to guide you into bringing out qualities you already possess; don’t try to become someone else because you want to impress a guy. He’ll see right through you if you try to be something you’re not.  This is a great way to gain some shared experiences with your crush and get the opportunity to hang out with him. Ask him if he’ll show you how to skateboard sometime. You might even like skateboarding, giving you something in common with him. If you already skateboard, even better! Take the opportunity to ride with him, showing off the tricks you can pull off in a friendly competition.  

talk to his friends.  show interest in what he does.  learn about skateboarding.  hang out where he hangs out.  introduce yourself.  ask him questions.  be an active listener.  let your positivity shine.  embrace your playfulness and be adventurous.  wear functional clothes that make you feel confident.  be yourself.  try skateboarding. 

 You can't go home again, and scold yourself for not talking to him even though you said you would. Or even though you passed up the perfect opportunity just because you thought you were ugly. Or because you thought that he probably wouldn't want to talk to you. You can't be nervous. Relax and trust your instincts. If someone came to talk to you, I'm sure you would probably just flirt back.; , The more you think about it, the less likely it will happen. Close your eyes, and breathe. After people start to look at you weird because you just did that; just go up to him and talk. Just talk  , So do girls. See? It's not a girl vs. guy thing; it's simply a human thing. Make it a point to talk to him everyday. You can't just talk to him one day, then skip the next. You need to make it gradual. So think of this conversation-thing as an engine when you start a car; once it's on...you keep it running.  With small talk comes follow-up conversation. Example: in class you spoke about the crazy teacher. Next day, or even later next class, you tell a story about the teacher. Or you make reference to her. This is also a great way to create inside jokes- which are ideal. Make sure that when you're talking to him you smile, and try to make it look like you really want to listen to him. Oh and laugh.  Once you talk to him on a daily basis and are perfectly comfortable around him, ask him to go somewhere. It could be anywhere, just the fact that you asked him will make him feel good. Again, this is not a girl vs. guy thing, this is simply human. Whether it's coffee, or McDonalds, just ask. But make sure you ask very chill-y. Very casual. i.e Ha, speaking about obesity...I'm probably going to McDonald's after school with Michelle and Amanda, wanna come? If he agrees then excellent! But if he doesn't, don't start hating, it's just going to McDonalds...right? That's the whole point-casual.  Or when you're talking, make sure you use 'we'. It'll develop an automatic friend-thing in his subconscious, and will make all of this easier. Tell jokes, don't hold back. Say whatever is on your mind; if it's funny...it's funny.  

be ready.  just do it.  even a compliment is fine, guys like being complimented.  pay attention to the conversation.  ask him to hang out.  in class, make sure to sit next to him. 

 If you want to get a bad boy’s attention, then you have to show him just a tiny bit of interest before letting him see that you've got better things to do. Just look at him for two seconds — try looking down and looking up through your lashes for an extra sexy effect — and then turn away. Stare at him long enough to make an impression but not for so long that you look like you really care whether or not he likes you.   Bad boys like girls who want to give them a run for their money. They don’t want girls who fawn all over them or give them their heart right away. Once he notices you, turn away. That should give him enough incentive to pursue you. Of course, you can also take the initiative and pursue him first.; , Bad boys don’t go for the girls who blend in with the crowd. They go for the girls who don’t quite fit in, who are worth a second look, and who don’t try to look, act, or dress like everyone else. If you have a funky fashion sense, stick to it. If you have an unusual laugh, don’t hide it. If you love sketching, playing the harmonica, or practicing karate, let him see what you love to do and don’t be ashamed of it.   Bad boys want girls who know what they’re about. If you look like everyone else and have nothing special going for you, then he won’t be impressed. If you stand out, even if it means you’re not like most girls, he’ll be even more into you.  A lot of girls are intimidated by bad boys because they think they’re too cool to give them a second of their time. If you want to attract one of them, the best thing you can do is to show them that you’re not afraid of them at all. Think of it like coming face-to-face with a bear or a lion; the second you show fear, you’ll be destroyed. If he comes up to you, don’t back away and stand even taller instead. If he tries to interrupt you, then let him know you’re not finished speaking and say what you have to say.   Bad boys are used to girls who bend at their will. If you stand up to him and let him see you as an equal, then he’ll be truly impressed by you.  Bad boys don’t like girls who do what everyone else is doing. Just because all of your friends are taking Art History, take The History of Motorcycles, if that’s what you’re into. If all of your friends love Taylor Swift, have pride in your love for The Stones or more indie bands like Bottomless Pit. If the crowd is lining up to see the latest Will Ferrell movie, go for the indie flick you've been meaning to catch instead.   Though you shouldn't be quirky or different just for the sake of being different, if there’s something different that you would genuinely like to do, then you should go for it.  Bad boys don’t want girls who fawn all over them. Instead, they’re looking for chicks who can take them or leave him. If you start talking to him and are clearly having a great conversation, you don’t have to run up to him and give him a big hug the next time you see each other. Instead, give him a few minutes to come up to you and make him work for it. If he texts you or chats you, give it a few minutes before you get back to him. Let him see that you have better things to do than to wait for him to talk to you, and he’ll want to talk to you even more.   Of course, you should be careful and make sure that you don’t ignore him so much that he doesn't think you’re interested. Find a balance between looking interested and making him work for it a bit. You don’t need to be rude to do this. If he comes up to you and says hello, you shouldn't ignore him, but if he walks by, you don’t have to act like you've been waiting for him to come by and have been looking for him for hours.  Bad boys love it when girls play hard to get. If they feel like they can have you any time they want you, then they won’t want to work for it. Instead, let him know you like him by flirting a bit or giving him a compliment or two, but don’t put it all on the line. Let him reveal his feelings well before you do, and don’t accept every invitation he gives you; make sure he asks you out at least a week in advance so he doesn't think your schedule is wide open and knows he has to work for your time and attention.   If he calls you, don’t answer the phone on the first ring. In fact, give it an hour or two and call him back. If he texts you, wait at least half an hour to respond. You don’t want him to feel like you’re just sitting around waiting to hear from him.  Bad boys hate girls who cling to their friends and care too much about what they think. If you want to start a relationship with a bad boy, then you shouldn't let your friends hang around too much until you get to know each other better. You should also avoid saying, “My friend thinks that…” when you talk about your relationship, or you’ll make him feel that your friends are way too involved in your personal life. When it comes down to it, bad boys really want girls who think for themselves.   You should also avoid having your friends talk to the bad boy for you. If you really want to win him over, then you have to do the work yourself.  True bad boys don’t want girls who they can boss around. They want girls who are confident enough to stand up to them and to believe in their relationship without questioning them every two seconds. If you want to keep your bad boy hooked, then you have to wow him with your confidence, showing him how happy you are with how you look, who you are, and what you do. Work on projecting a positive energy that shows that you’re content with being yourself and don’t need anybody for validation.   Focus on the positive and talk about the things that make you happy instead of complaining about things that aren't perfect. Don’t gossip about other girls or you’ll look insecure. Instead, praise them and the bad boy will be impressed. Avoid seeking validation. Don’t act like you’re only beautiful or smart or interesting if he says so.  To keep your bad boy interested, you should take charge of the relationship. Don’t let him make all the calls, tell you where and when you’ll be going on your date, or be the one who calls first all the time. Show him that you know what you want and that you won’t go on a date last-minute because you've made other plans; don’t let him take you to a bike show if you’d rather be out to dinner, and don’t make him think that he has total control over you or he’ll lose interest pretty fast.   You don’t have to take charge with every situation or that may get tiring, but you should try to take charge at least as much as he does.  Bad boys want girls with a thick skin and they don’t want to worry about whether or not they hurt your feelings every two seconds. Of course, if the bad boy is thoughtless or even verbally abusive, then you should ditch him ASAP, but if he treats you well, then you shouldn't second guess everything he says or does and be on the verge of tears if something doesn't go as planned. You can show him your softer side as you get to know each other, but it’s good to work on keeping that skin nice and thick so the bad boy knows he can roll with you.   If you get upset every time he teases you or feel emotional if he’s five minutes late, then you’ll come off as a bit weak and insecure. Learn to roll with the punches and only get upset when you have a legitimate reason to get upset. Of course, if he gets in the habit of being late all the time, then you should say something, but avoid getting prematurely upset or throwing a scene over something insignificant.  Real bad boys want girls who give them a run for their money. You should show him that you’re skilled and savvy and that you’re not looking for a man to teach you how to do everything. While no relationship is great if you’re constantly questioning your partner, if you keep him on his toes, he’ll be even more interested in you. Don’t get too comfortable with him and let him know that you want him to be dynamic and interesting and that you won’t settle for less.   If he takes you to the pool hall, don’t let him wrap his arms around you and show you how to play; instead, beat him at his own game. If he cites a fact about Metallica that you just know is false, don’t be afraid of calling him out on it instead of taking everything he says at face value.  You may think that all bad boys only want bad girls, but in fact, a lot of them like girls who are more innocent-seeming, or who just like to do their own thing. If you’d already call yourself a bad girl, then keep doing what you’re doing, but don’t feel compelled to wear black leather or dark makeup, to smoke cigarettes, or to curse a lot if that’s not really who you are. Bad boys are much more attracted to girls who are true to who they are than those who try to be someone they’re not.   Most bad boys are just as attracted to good girls as they are to bad girls, so you shouldn't worry too much about changing your image. In fact, sometimes bad boys and bad girls can be too much alike to be compatible. Bad boys have low tolerance for fakeness, and if you try to be someone other than who you are, then they’ll be able to tell.  If you’re really cool and hip, then the bad boy will know it without you having to say so. Avoid talking about how much your bike costs, how you’re best friends with the lead drummer of your favorite death metal band, or how you’re the best tattoo artists in East Oakland. Instead, let him figure out how awesome you are for himself. If you brag too much, that’ll be a sign that you’re just trying too hard to prove yourself.   A true bad boy doesn't brag or show off, either. He doesn't like people who feel the need to talk themselves up too much.  Most girls who date bad boys are convinced that they can change them. Though there are some exceptions to this rule, most of these girls end up disappointed when their favorite bad boy won’t change his ways. If you want to really enjoy your relationship with your bad boy, then you shouldn't try to domesticate him and make him do things he doesn't want to do; instead, you should appreciate him for who he is instead of making him take yoga or spend an afternoon with your Aunt Mildred if that’s not what he’s into., If you’re dating a bad boy, then chances are that you’re not looking for marriage with him. Though some bad boys can change, if you want to enjoy your relationship with him, then you should work on being present in the moment and enjoying every moment you spend together in the now instead of worrying about what lies ahead. Have a great time hanging out with him, dining with him, drinking with him, riding his motorcycle, and letting your hair blow in the wind. If you want the relationship to last, then the best thing you can do is to focus on fun.   When you find yourself constantly worrying about where the relationship is going, you can have a talk with the bad boy about it, but you should know that this could discourage him. Think of your relationship growing from week to week, instead of thinking about what you’ll be doing in a year. If you want a guy with a clear future plan, then you should try going for some of those nice guys who are always asking you out at work.  There’s a difference between being a bad boy and being abusive. If the guy you’re with is either abusive to you verbally or physically, then it’s time to remove yourself from the situation ASAP. No guy is worth the pain and suffering you’ll have to face from abuse, even if he keeps promising that every time is the last and that he’ll change his ways. Bad boys can be fun to date as long as they don’t pose any harm to your well-being.   If you’re being abused, talk to a close friend or family member and create a plan for leaving the situation as quickly and as safely as possible.  If you want to enjoy your time with the bad boy, then you can’t let him dictate every little thing you should do together. Though you may think he wants to be completely in control, you should give him a run for his money and show that you have ideas for where you should eat and where you should go over the weekend. Make sure you’re both equally in control and don’t let him tell you how to act, dress, or look; he’ll like you much more if you stand up for yourself and prove yourself to be independent.   Most bad boys, if they’re the harmless kind, like a girl with her own initiate and don’t actually want to be in control all the time.  If you want your relationship with the bad boy to last, then you can’t put pressure on him to move in with you, meet all of your friends and family members, or marry you any time soon. Bad boys like to run free and to do their own thing, and as soon as you put the pressure on, he’ll start to back off. Though it’s natural to want the relationship to move forward, you should know that you’re dealing with a bad boy and that he may be allergic to commitment.   Let him move at his own pace. If he wants to meet your friends or family members, then he’ll ask to do it. You can casually mention meeting up with them to see if he wants to come, but you should avoid telling him that your friends or family members are dying to meet him, or he’ll feel suffocated. Don’t compare the progression of your relationship to the progression of other relationships, either. Just because your best friend and your neighbor both got engaged this month doesn’t mean that you two should do the same.  If you want to make it work with the bad boy, then you can’t keep tabs on him 24/7 to make sure he’s been loyal to you. You’ve got to trust him to do his own thing because he has an independent spirit. If you text him every half hour, pop in on him unannounced, or just act insecure when he talks to other women, then he’ll quickly get tired of your routine and will look for a woman who doesn’t want to keep him on a tight leash.   Of course, if he’s really flirtatious with other girls, then that’s something you should have a talk about. If he’s just having harmless interactions with girls and you’re on his case, then his alarm bells will go off. You have to be able to trust a man in every relationship. If he’s legitimately suspiciously gone for hours, then you can ask him where he went, but if you freak out every time it takes him fifteen minutes to return your call, you’ll be creating a fuss.  Though you may think that you only want a bad boy in your life, in the end, you should know that there is a wealth of nice guys at your work or near your home that would love to get to know you. If you’re looking for a level of commitment a bad boy won’t give you, then you may have to look elsewhere to really get what you want. Instead of being skeptical of guys who actually want to get to know you without a chase, give the next guy a chance and see what happens. You may be pleasantly surprised.Ask yourself what you’re so afraid of when it comes to nice guys. Do you think they’ll all be too boring, too sincere, too serious? Give one of them a chance and you may see that your expectations will change.  

make eye contact — and then break it.  stand out to him.  don’t be intimidated.  do your own thing.  ignore him a little bit.  play hard to get.  keep your friends out of it.  wow him with your confidence.  take charge.  be tough.  challenge him.  don’t try to be a bad girl if you’re not.  avoid showing off.  don’t try to change him.  have fun while it lasts.  make sure he’s not abusive.  don’t let him boss you around.  don’t put pressure on him.  don’t be jealous or possessive.  if it doesn’t work, don’t underestimate the nice guys. 

 Your eyes are very powerful when it comes to body language. They can indicate interest, and indicate if he's interested as well. Eye contact increases your heartbeat and helps to release the hormones associated with love or lust.Fix your gaze on a guy you're interested in if you're not already acquainted with him or talking to him. Show that you're sizing him up––locking eyes is a sure sign of continued interest. Do a face scan. This is a tell-tale sign of interest. Darting glances and second looks can help indicate your interest in him. Avoid staring; he might go into flight mode. Keep it casual and always smile.; , Do just enough to let him see the change in your expression, without it looking forced or overdone. It's important to look amused, not disgusted. But remember not to overreact (they'll think you are too interested).  But not too much! This makes you seem innocent yet still interested. As you do this glance down or at the other shoulder.  Open your mouth a little more, but not so much that your mouth looks overly wide (too much and you look like a fish gasping for air). This makes you look flattered and also gives the impression that you're a good kisser, which guys are gonna want.  Only move your shoulder, and not your whole arm. As you bring your shoulder forward, move your head slightly closer to it. As you drop your shoulder, move your head back up.   Try looking over your shoulder; this positioning accentuates your curves and invites more attention.  This keeps him wanting more and wondering what you meant by flirting with him and then moving on.  Once he's started to show interest, make him keener by getting closer. Move near him and touch his hand or the base of his arm or gently squeeze his arm, hand or shoulder while you're talking. Nothing hard, just light, quick touches before withdrawing your hand again.   Lean in and whisper. Speaking softly will reel him in. He's interested if he moves closer but beware if he moves back from your lean-in; it means he lacks interest. If he flinches or tenses when touched, it probably means he's nervous around you, and that you might be moving in too fast! Try to act more relaxed around him.  Slowly run your fingers through your hair, stopping at the nape of your neck. Once your fingers reach your neck, either trail your fingers back and forth across your collarbone, or move the pendant on your necklace back and forth. Caressing your body in this way will cause an interested guy to watch intently.   Watch for his lips parting or touching his mouth with his fingers; you're right in his interest zone once this happens.  Everyone else is already taken!   Make yourself look appealing. Acting or looking dumb in front of him when you're actually really smart will make him confused. He will start to wonder if you're all truth or just lies. It's okay to do this in the beginning just to get him to notice or talk to you (in a good way) but once you strike up a conversation, be yourself and act natural! Where to look. When you two are in a conversation, stare at his lips and MAKE SURE you are listening to what he is saying too. An instant turn-off is when a guy thinks you are just taking advantage of him.  

communicate with your eyes.  raise your eyebrows just the tiniest bit whenever he smiles, nods, winks, etc.  look down and flutter your eyelashes a little.  push your tongue against the skin below your bottom teeth.  when your eyes meet with his, move your shoulder forward slightly and then let it drop.  once you've glanced at him quickly, look away and continue on with whatever you were doing.  get close.  involve your hair.  remember to be yourself. 

 You can go all out and make something elaborate, or you can keep it simple – it’s up to you! It’s what you say in the card that matters. If you aren’t very artistic, get a piece of red construction paper, fold it in half and use that as your card. You can also draw, paint, or even make a collage on it. Get creative!   If you know your crush likes a certain animal or activity, you can draw or make a collage based on that. Your card doesn’t have to be handmade, although your crush might find it particularly sweet if it is.; , You can write a long note anytime, but if you just want to ask your sweetie to be your valentine, write something simple in your card. You could say “Would you be…” on the front of the card, then write “…my valentine?” on the inside. For a little something extra, you could write a compliment like “You look nice today.”   You could also write “Just wanted to know…” on the outside and on the inside say, “Will you be my valentine?”  , If you want your crush to know it’s you right away, sign your name on the inside. To be a little more mysterious, sign the card as “Your Secret Admirer” or “Your Hopeful Valentine.” You don’t have to write “Love” or anything serious like that if you don’t want to! You could put “xo” which means “hugs and kisses.”   For example, you could write: “Dear Helen, Will you be my Valentine? If yes, please meet me at the park at 4:00. xoxo, Jane.”  , If you’re feeling brave, you can always walk right up to your crush and hand them the card. However, it's pretty normal to feel shy about it, so you don't have to do it that way. You can always leave the note somewhere they’ll be sure to find it.   For example, you could put it in their locker, slip it in their backpack when they aren’t looking, or put it in one of their text books. For an extra special touch, you can leave a single flower with the note. Roses are popular, but you don’t have to be that traditional.  

create a handmade card.  write a simple message.  sign your card.  give the card to your crush. 

 You can sweeten up your crush’s day with a box of Valentine’s candy, like a heart-shaped box of chocolates. If you’re not comfortable asking your crush to be your Valentine in person, you can tuck a short note in the box or packaging for them to read later.   For something a little more creative, use candy "conversation" hearts to write your note., Instead of sending your crush a traditional card, burn them a CD of sweet songs that make you think of them. If CDs aren't really your thing, curate a Spotify playlist for them instead! Include the track list and make special art for it. If you’re not comfortable explaining your gift in person, include a note (with the CD) or send them a message (with a link to your playlist) and ask them to be your Valentine.If you are musically gifted, you could write and record a song for them, and include that as the last track. You could also use a voice recording app to record yourself asking them to be your valentine, and put that in the playlist.  Your crush will appreciate that you took the time to make them something, and if you’re low on cash, this might be a good solution! If you know their favorite kind of cookie, get a recipe for it and make those. If you don’t, you usually can’t go wrong with chocolate chip or sugar cookies. You could even make them heart-shaped!Add a note with the cookies asking them to be your valentine. You could also use icing to write it out on the cookies.  If you know your crush loves cats or monkeys, take advantage of that! Most stores will have a whole aisle dedicated to Valentine’s Day gifts, and there are usually plenty of plushies to choose from. What you choose doesn’t necessarily have to be an animal. There are plush versions of everything!   For example, if your crush plays basketball, look for a plush basketball. To get the conversation started, hand them the plush toy and smile. Say something simple like, “I saw this and it made me think of you.”  

give your crush candy.  make your crush a mix cd or special spotify playlist.  bake them cookies.  bring them a stuffed animal. 

 Try not to corner your crush or force them to talk with you if they are in a hurry or busy doing something. If your crush is chatting with a big group of friends or working on their homework, that’s probably not a good time. Wait for a good time to talk to them about it. Since they’re your crush, you probably know when they have a little free time during the day., It will be a lot easier to talk to them in private, plus your crush might get embarrassed if you ask in front of everyone! Meet them at their locker in the morning before class, or walk with them to one of their classes. Before or after lunch might also be a good time. Start up a normal chat, and then bring it up.   If you two share an inside joke or particular interest, start off the conversation with that., Valentine’s Day is all about sharing how you feel. You have nothing to lose and everything to gain. Just go for it.You could open with: “So I was wondering…” and then phrase it however you want. You could also start off with “So today is Valentine’s day…” and give them a big smile.   You don’t have to make any grand gestures! You can keep it simple.  If you’re too shy to ask in person, this is the next best thing. Keep your message short and sweet. You could write “I really like you. Would you be my valentine?” Add an emoji like a smiley face or heart after your message to keep everything feeling lighthearted.   If you're friends on Facebook or Instagram, you could also send them a private message there.  

wait for a good opportunity.  pull your crush aside.  go for it.  send a text or instant message. 

 This is easy if you are already lab partners in science class or you work together in the same office. However, you may have a crush on a guy whom you’ve never actually talked to. If this is the case, there are several ways you can let him know who you are without seeming like you’re stalking him.If you have mutual friends, have one of them introduce you. If he works at a store or café you frequent, make sure to go there regularly when he works. Ask him questions about items on the menu or things that they sell. Be friendly and thank him for helping you. Like his photos or posts on social media if you are connected that way. If you’re coworkers or classmates but don’t normally interact, find a reason to. Organize an office party and see if he wants to volunteer. Sit near him in class and ask to borrow a pencil.; , You never know (or maybe you do) when you’ll run into this guy. Just in case you do, you want to look good so that you’ll feel confident about the interaction. Wear clothes that you feel show off your personality and make you look and feel special.   If you have a favorite accessory, such as a special hat, wear it. It can become part of your trademark look and help boost your confidence and make you seem memorable. You want to look your best, but make sure you also dress appropriately. You don’t want to show up to work in something too revealing just to impress him, or wear your fanciest outfit to a regular day at school.  This can be an intimidating step if you’re naturally shy. However, most people are happy to meet a new person and feel at ease when someone takes the time to introduce themselves politely.Keep it simple. If you frequent his place of work and he’s become familiar with your face, simply say, “Hi, I’m Jane. I don’t think I’ve gotten your name yet,” next time you go in there. You can say, “I see you around a lot, but I don’t think we’ve actually met. I’m Monique.”  , People always remember when someone compliments them. It’s flattering and lets them know that you noticed something about them. Find something you can tell him you appreciate about either his appearance or something he’s done. He’ll associate you with the positive feelings of the compliment.Tell him you like a piece of clothing, particularly if there’s something you can identify about it. For example, you could say, “Nice T-shirt. I love that band, too.” Compliment him on his work. You can say, “You always make the best lattes,” or “You’re a really good lab partner.”  , Flirtatious eye contact can come in a few different forms. Generally, you need to maintain eye contact for at least four seconds before coyly looking down or away. Holding his gaze this long lets him know you’re flirting.If you’re feeling really bold and sexy, you can subtly lick your lips. This is considered rather forward, so make sure you know what you’re doing. There’s a difference between flirting and staring. Make sure you’re reading his signals and responding, not just staring at him.  It may seem obvious, but if you’re feeling very nervous or shy, you may forget to smile. However, smiling is important. It sends the signal that you’re friendly and approachable. It also shows that you may be interested.Smiling with your teeth showing and your eyes creasing around the edges conveys warmth and gives the appearance that you’re genuinely excited to see him.  If you feel very shy around this guy, that’s perfectly normal. However, you want to feel comfortable enough to at least say, “hello.”You can wait until he looks at you or catches your eye. Once he does, say, something casual, like, “Hi. How’s it going?” If you generally say hi to him in the halls or at his or your place of work, bump it up a notch by adding something like, “Good morning,” or “Nice to see you.”  , This can be an easier step than saying hello in real life. If it wouldn’t seem strange, become his friend on Facebook or another social media platform. This works particularly well if you have mutual friends or run in similar circles.   If he’s someone you’ve been following on an online dating site or app, you can use the app to indicate through your profile that you like his profile. When you like his profile or request to be friends, it can be a natural time to send a brief message. Even something like, “Hey! I really like those pictures you just posted” can be a conversation starter.  This can make you look and sound very confident. Say something to him about your surroundings. This invites conversation and lets him know you’re interesting to talk to.You can say something like, “Wow, this weather is incredible, isn’t it?” or “The coffee at this place is incredible.” You can also ask him for help or directions. Say something like, “I’ve never been here before. Do you have a type of coffee you’d recommend?” or “Can you help me figure out how to get to the library from here?”  , You can save yourself a lot of embarrassment by knowing if the guy you like is available before you do something about it. If you don’t know him, you can try to find out a number a of ways.Check for a wedding ring. Online, check for photos of him with a significant other. Listen when he talks. Does he reveal a lot about himself and his life without mentioning a partner? Does he keep his eyes moving around the room, looking at people? This can be a sign that he’s single and looking for love.  Doing something nice for him is a great way to let him know you like him without having to actually say anything. It can be a small gesture, but make sure it’s something he’ll notice and appreciate.   If you notice that he always shows up to class without a pen or pencil, bring one in special for him. Give it to him and say something like, “I noticed you usually could use one of these.” If you work somewhere that he frequents, give him a small freebie or a discount if you won’t get in trouble. If you frequent his place of work, leave a generous tip or bring him something. For example, you could say, “You always make such great sandwiches. I thought I’d bring you some cookies that I made myself.”  , If you can’t tell if he likes you or is getting the signals you’re sending, you can always be direct. This can be very exciting for guys, since they won’t have to spend time guessing about your intentions.You can be direct without being demanding. Say something like, “I’d really like to get together sometime, if you’re interested.” In being direct, you can let him know what you like about him. Say something like, “You seem like a really interesting person. Would you like to hang out sometime?” Some people like to be super direct and simply say, “I have to tell you that I have a really big crush on you.” This can sometimes be seen as charming, but can sometimes put a guy off. He might not know what to do with that information or might feel put on the spot.  This can be a cute way to let him know you’re interested. It can also be a way to slip him your number so that the ball is in his court. Keep it simple. You don’t need to profess your undying love right this second.   Write your number on a piece of paper and hand it to him. You can say something flirty like, “I believe you wanted this?” If you’ve never met before or you have no mutual friends, you may not want to give out your number for safety reasons.  Of course, you have to have his number or be connected to him on social media to do this. However, if it’s possible, this can be a fun and low key way to connect with him.Say something more personal and interesting than simply, “what’s up?” Ask him something based on his profile or ask him for advice about something. For example, you can say, “Hey, how was that new restaurant I saw you posted pictures of? I was thinking I might try it this week.”  , You may be afraid to ask this guy out, but he’ll likely be flattered. Most guys don’t get asked out very much, so it will probably be extra exciting for him. Think ahead of a fun event you want to invite him to.Choose something that happens on a specific day, such as a concert or a sporting event. Don’t just choose something like getting a drink. Say something like, “Hey, I’ve got an extra ticket to ____. Maybe you’d like to come with me?”  

make sure he knows who you are.  look your best.  introduce yourself.  compliment him.  make flirtatious eye contact.  smile.  say “hi.” this is another example of something that may be easier said than done.  like or “friend” him on social media.  make a statement.  make sure he’s available.  do something nice for him.  be direct.  write him a note.  send a text or online message.  invite him to an event. 

 If your guy is stressed out over work or school, dealing with family issues, or preoccupied with a personal crisis, he probably won’t be all that receptive to a big new development in your relationship. There is no "perfect moment," so don't wait for one. A low-key, quiet moment without stress is always a good opportunity. There are, however, bad times to talk about love:   After sex. While intoxicated. Over text or the phone. During or after a fight or argument.; , Is there a special place that brings up strong memories for the both of you? You may want to tell him at the place where you had your first date, or where you went out to dinner for your two-month or six-month anniversary. That said, all that really matters is that you have a place to talk without being interrupted constantly.   Ask him to go for a walk with you, help with a basic chore, or simply "come over to talk with me for a few minutes."  , Don't try a big gesture or romantic setting -- this isn't the time and chances are good it will backfire. What matters are you and your feelings. So don't overthink things. Speak from the heart and have an open conversation, not some big production.   Just start talking honestly about your relationship -- how happy he makes you, good memories you've shared, your own feelings -- to bring up the topic of love organically., Eventually, the only thing left to do is just come out and say it. So close your eyes, count to three, and let it out. Say it any way you feel comfortable, since the words themselves are what really matter. Make eye contact, smile bravely, and be the astounding, honest, and loving person you already are. Remember-- simpler is sweeter. If you're shy and unsure what to do, try out these methods:   "I'm in love with you." "Joe, I want you to know that these past eight months have been some of the happiest of my life. I feel like we’ve connected on a deep level and every day we spend together is better than the last. I love you." "I've had something on my chest for a while, and it feels good to let it out. I love you." Lean in, and kiss him on the cheek, then whisper in his ear quickly, "I love you."  , If you can't meet in person, but still need to get your feelings off of your chest, there is nothing decreeing that you can't say "I love you" anyway. The reason face-to-face is nicer is that it is much more personal -- but you can make long-distance conversations personal. Instead of a text message, or signing off with an ambiguous "I love you," take the time to write a letter or email that has the only purpose of expressing your love. It doesn't have to be long, just from the heart.   Let them know that you'd rather talk to them in person, but couldn't keep your feelings secret any longer. Elaborate a bit on a story, event, or emotion that lead you to your feelings of love. Let him know that you don't need an immediate response; you just wanted to let him know how you felt. 

wait for a time when he feels happy and secure.  find a quiet, private location to talk.  keep it simple and from the heart.  close your eyes, take a deep breath, and say "i love you.",  tell him how your feel over distance with a thoughtful letter or phone call. 

 If you make an effort to show you love once a day, whether with a good-night "I love you" or by simply putting his toothpaste on his brush for him, you'll keep the relationship strong for a long time. If you're worried about showing your affection, just think about finding one time a day where you can. Even an extra-long, passionate kiss is a great way to slow down time with your man for a half-second. , Some people have a hard time saying the words "I love you." But that doesn't mean that they don't love their partner. If you're someone who struggles a bit with showing affection, try these little techniques to let someone know you care:   Hold or squeezing hands Make plans together for the future, even just future dates Introduce your friends and/or family Surprise him with kisses, hugs, and affection Give compliments, encouragement, and admiration. Do little favors for him, especially when he seems upset., It sounds paradoxical, but sometimes the best thing you can do is not see him at all. Remember -- you fell in love as separate people with separate lives -- you need to preserve some of this independence to stay happy and in love. Don't feel like you need to talk or check in constantly to show how much you care. Sometimes giving each other some free time is the best way to show you know and love someone. , Do not avoid fights or issues just by saying "I love you," and accepting your concerns. The most in-love couples have arguments too, and you need to air them out openly and honestly to keep your love alive. So don't feel like you're destroying your love, or going back on your word, if you bring up a disagreement or issue -- you're just showing your love in another way.   Don't ever let a partner get you to do something you don't want to to "prove your love." Love doesn't need to be proven., Everyone has different comfort levels when it comes to saying "I love you." There are those that say it after every phone call and those that only save it for special moments, and there is everything in between. So don't worry about how often you should say "I love you," or how often you hear it -- people are different, and show their love in different ways. These words mean much more when you mean them. If you only say "I love you" when you're feeling full of love, you'll both be much happier.  

find time once a day to tell or show him your love.  find ways to tell him without saying the words.  give him space and free time.  talk openly and honestly when you're upset-- even loving couples fight.  tell your partner you love them whenever you feel love, not because you feel obligated. 

 You can pause, smile, and start talking about something else, indicate that the moment is over by saying “Just thought you should know." You can even tell him you don’t need to hear anything back, letting him know he should take some time to think things over. The less you come across like you’re trying to extract a particular response from him the likelier he’ll be to give you the one you want – if not immediately, eventually, when he realizes what a lucky guy he is.   When talking, try to phrase everything personally -- "I realized I love you," "I fell for you, etc.-- instead of using language like "we" and "us."  , Because guys aren’t always encouraged to communicate their thoughts and feelings, it’s extra important to make them feel like they have someone to confide in. Be an active listener by reading between the lines, waiting for him to finish before you respond, and digging in with further questions. Avoid tying whatever he says back to yourself. You've told him you love him, now be patient as he works through his own emotions.   Some silence, though it may feel awkward, is not a bad thing. He may be a bit shocked and need time to digest the news -- don't feel like one of you must always be talking.  Just because you're not demanding a response doesn't mean you aren't pressuring him. If he disappears for a day or two, don't worry too much -- he just needs to process things. Chasing him down or following his every move, waiting to see how he responds, will only drive him farther away.  If he is awkward or tells you he has other feelings, be kind and cordial -- you've done your part! But if he smiles or responds that he loves you too, there is no reason to rush down the aisle. Telling someone you love them in just another step in your relationship, not the end of the line. The important thing is treating him like you love him, not just saying the words.   Keep talking regularly, having open and honest conversations about your relationship. Don't feel the need to tell him you love him every day now -- actions speak louder than words.  Ultimately, all you can do is express your feelings. You can't control how he is going to respond, nor should you. No matter what he says in return, you should respect his wishes and move on with your life. It takes a lot of bravery and passion to tell someone that you love them -- be proud of yourself for the effort and courage. 

make it clear that you don’t demand to hear it back.  sit and listen to him after you've said your piece.  give him time and space to think.  continue treating him like a friend, no matter what his response, to help the relationship grow.  respect his decision or response without argument. 

 Love is a beautiful, joyous emotion. But it is also a powerful word, and you shouldn't throw it around with your man unless you're sure you mean it. This doesn't mean you need to write a thesis on your feelings. But you do need to ask yourself what you hope to gain by telling him you love him.   If he's already said "I love you," and you know you feel the same, feel free to come out and say it. If your relationship is strong, and you know him and yourself well, it might be time to say "I love you." If you're convinced you're in love, and need to tell him so, then trust your instincts and say it. If you want to tell him just to see if he'll say "I love you" back, or because you feel pressured to say it, don't. Love is something you give to others, it doesn't expect or need someone else's response.If you're just friends, but want more, you should consider asking him out before saying you love him., Make sure you can spend quality time together before launching an L-bomb. This will also give you a great chance to gauge his own feelings towards you. More likely than not, if you love him then he will feel some attraction back towards you. Just focus on letting go and having fun -- love is not about forcing your feelings -- so take your time and build a relationship.   At the end of the day, this is about you confidently telling him how you feel. If you're not sure if he likes you back, that is okay! That's why you want to tell him your own feelings. Is he comfortable hanging out with just you? If not, telling him you're "in love" might come off a little too strongly.  Sometimes you just need some perspective. A big reason many people won't say "I love you" is that they're afraid the partner doesn't feel the same way. At the end of the day, it comes down to speaking your mind and feelings honestly. However, if you're a little worried:   Ask a mutual, trusted friend if they can see you two dating. Talk to one of his friends and see if he is interested in anyone right now. If you're feeling bold, ask if he has any feelings for you., Even best friends can be taken aback by the powerful words "I love you." You might have thought about this love for months, but for him this is big, sudden news. Imagine yourself in a similar situation -- you have a friend you like who suddenly tells you they are in love. You'd be at a loss for words, to say the least. So don't jump right to love -- take your time exploring your feelings together. Test the water a few weeks in advance with:   "I just wanted to tell you that I really like you." "I love spending time with you. This has been a great few months." "Let's go on a few dates, just you and me for a change."  , Love: the most blissfully confusing human emotion around. If you feel overwhelmed with affection, feel your stomach flip every time you see him, and want to blurt out "I love you!" at every turn, chances are good you're head over heels in love. But, as strong as the feeling is, avoid the temptation to immediately tell anyone. Instead, sit back and enjoy the rush of love for a few days. Show yourself that this isn't just a crush, this is the real thing. If you still feel like you love him, then get ready to make your move.   If you don't still feel attached to him after the a few days than you hadn't a crush, not love. Love stays around for a long while.  It is scientifically proven then men say "I love you" first more often than women.To make matters worst, many dating books are hard-set on the woman always saying "I love you" second. The reasons are fuzzy ("evolutionary advantage for men who create commitment early on") or made up ("women who say it first seem overly needy), but there is something to be said for tradition. Like it or not, some men are weirded out when a woman says "I love you first." This shouldn't keep you from expressing your feelings, but it is worth considering.  

ask yourself why you wanted to say "i love you.",  spend time together talking, hanging out, and being romantic.  talk to trusted mutual friends if you are unsure whether he is a friend or something more.  make sure he knows that you like him before you tell him you love him.  let your love wash over you for a few days before making a move.  considering letting him say it first. 

 That's probably her making sure she looks nice. It means she is nervous on how she looks and normally if it was a regular guy that walked into the room she wouldn't bother to check. If she doesn't look as nervous then don't get your hopes down. Some girls try to hide it and act normal. (They don't want you to know.) Stay tuned there's other ways to notice.; , If she looks at you three or more separate times she probably likes you. (rarely the looks will be one right after the other.) This means she notices you, more than a regular guy who walks into the room. Don't think she likes you right away. , Both of these means she likes you.  does she play with her hair while talking/looking at you?  , Maybe she likes you.  They can be a big help.  She likes your company then.  Now as a best friend, you should directly ask her. She maybe saying "I like him" but deep inside once she will like you but you should be the one to make the first move.   she may just be a nice person or wants to get close to you  , Well 10% she likes you but the other 90%, if you deserve justice then any girl will stand for you.  

when she walks into the room and sees you she may look down as if someone said "you have a stain on your shirt" and she is trying to find the stain.  if you sit next to her in class see if she glances at you.  if she has made any note of you she'll most likely play hard to get sometimes like hardly looking at you but when she does she blushes,smiles,etc.  ,  depending on how shy she is, when she stares at you, she will either pull away very quickly or hold your gaze.  does she casually touch your arm while you are talking?,  does she love to hang around with you as compared to other guys?,  ask her friends about her crush.  does she include you in all her planned events?,  well, now if she is your best friend then these signs will be normal.  does she compliment you?,  does she defend you? 

 Be confident, keep your head up, and look her into her eyes. If you are confident you can make the first move.; , Typically, people love to talk about themselves. Ask her questions and get to know her. If she doesn't know you or doesn't seem interested in sharing, back off. You don't want to come off as creepy.  "May I sit?" If she doesn't reply quickly, it means that she wants you to stick around longer because she likes you. If she likes you she'll want to talk to you more than any other person...unless she's playing hard to get. Also, if she smiles while she's talking, or says not yes not no answers, that means she is nervous of how you will judge her.  If she likes you, especially if you don't talk with her too much, she will attempt to talk to you and start very small conversations. If she has a question, take note if she goes out of her way to ask you instead of anyone else.  Call out her name and say, "Hi." She will probably just smile because she is nervous.  When she talks to you, does she say your name a lot? If so, it means that she wants you to notice that she likes you.  Blurt it at her and keep doing so until she notices. Chances are, if she has even a trace amount of feelings for you, she'll smile and try to stretch the conversation. If she just gives you a dirty look and turns away, it's okay, just go to the next step.  Make sure that you do not make her think you dislike her at all! Be polite and gentleman-like.  Don't worry if her friends don't act different around you, she may not have told them.  Or if you sit across from her, she will be angled in towards you. This means she likes you and wants to get closer to you. ,,, Get it out of the way! If she likes you, it will save a lot of running around after her.  "I'm always thinking of her," and if she asks you, "Who do you like?" tell her that it's her, or you can say that her name starts with a (the letter her name starts with) and get her to think a little before you tell her. This is a really good flirting method, but only do this to a point, because most girls like guys to come straight out with it.  If she logs off, then that is a big hint that she likes you.  If she is playing with her bangs, tugging on her hair, playing with her hair, or adjusting her clothes when she is talking to you, she probably likes you. Girls seem to get nervous around the guy they like. If she can't look you in the eye, it may be a sign of something good. She could really like you and want to look good for you, or she's very nervous around you.  This is a definite sign.  When you're talking to her (beforehand) have your friend walk up and say, "Hi." If she says, "Hi," and turns back to you, she either wants your attention or wants him to leave so she can continue.  If she has a hard time thinking of a comeback she probably likes you but doesn't want to go any further so that she doesn't offend you.  Girls can get jealous.  If she likes you, she'll walk faster to catch up with you. On the other hand, if she's walking in front of you, and she's walking really slowly, it's because she wants you to speed up and walk next to her. If she slows down behind you, don't take this as a sign she doesn't like you! She's probably just nervous. , If she tries to act funny around you, then there might definitely be something there.  See if she follows in your direction. If she does, don't do this very many times. Otherwise, she may notice what you are doing.  If she does the same back, she probably likes you.  It means that she is watching the chat list and waiting for you to come online. However, if she doesn't do this every time, don't worry; she is probably worried about bugging you or appearing pushy.  She may become a 'better' person, or start copying some things that you do as an attempt to impress you. This is also a good way of finding out roughly how long she has liked you.  Take up those problems, and try to help her solve them. Similarly, if you go to her for your problems, and she shows an obsessive 'mother-hen' concern, and genuinely tries to fix every problem, she either likes you or you are very good friends.  This may or may not mean that she likes you.   If you sit near her but not very near to her in a free session, talk a tiny bit louder than usual. She may appear to be reading a book, but if she is not turning the pages and if her head is turned slightly towards you, she may be trying to listen to what you are saying. Say something funny, and if she smiles slightly or chuckles, it is almost 100 percent sure that she is listening to you, and therefore likes you, or at least is interested in you. Similarly, if she has a textbook open and is 'writing' but she doesn't seem to be aware of what she is writing, she may be listening to you (this is quite difficult to spot). , She may be trying to sneak peeks at you.  Or if one of your friends are also friends with her, and you walk by to talk to him/her she might look at you and smile or she will look at him/her with an angry look.  Does she touch or play with your hair? If you're sitting next to her, is her knee touching yours? Does she smile at you a lot? Does she laugh all the time? Do you catch her looking at you? These are some pretty obvious flirts.  If a girl has liked you for a long time, she may not do these things anymore. She will probably still look at you from time, but they will be more discreet. They will become better at concealing their feelings, and liking you will be an accepted part of their lives. So if she does not openly declare her love for you, that does NOT mean that she is not interested. Dig deeper!  , Also, if you know her favorite animal, then say something about it and then smile at her.  because you will freak her out.  If she says "I really want to see that movie!" say "Hey, Me too maybe we can go see it!" Sometimes this will work only do it if you've known her for a while and she is comfortable with you.  That is a clue. Also, if she always talks about you with her friends she's probably crushing on you. If you really want to know, you should just ask her or her friends! If you're afraid, ask one of your friends to ask her friends.  If they say that she likes you, then ask her out!  

be yourself.  ask her about herself.  ask her a simple question.  she'll start random conversations with you.  if she walks by you and doesn't look at you or acknowledge you, it may be because she wants you to think she isn't interested.  does she pay attention to you?,  say something random to her.  make sure to be nice to her.  if her friends look at her and then you, or whenever you are talking to her, her friends give looks at you and raise their eyebrows, this is also a good sign, and if somebody says she likes you, chances are she told them because she was hoping you would find out.  if you sit diagonal from her in class, her knees or shoulders will be pointed towards you.  if you are sitting beside her and she has her legs crossed over and her crossed over leg is towards you this may mean that she is comfortable in your company and likes to talk to you.  ,  if you're sitting behind her, she will lean back on her chair, and try to get your attention (for example, copying your habits) and will look for ways to turn around and look at you (passing an assignment back, she'll turn around and look at you).  ,  another sign that you can tell if a girl likes you is if she smiles every time you come and talk to her.  ,  ask her out and see what she says.  if you like her, give her hints on snapchat or facebook, say.  if the girl is online, chat with her a bit, then tell her you have to go.  notice her movements.  pay attention to whether she changes her posture when you enter the class.  here's a great hint that she likes you.  notice when you tease her.  don't talk to her best friend obsessively, as this could hint that maybe you like her best friend and that is not a good sign!,  when you're in the hallway, try to walk a couple of steps in front of her.  if you talk to her in class and she's quiet and quick speaking, but you talk to her on the phone or something and she's all loud and not nervous, she may like you.  ,  notice when she sits by you in class.  get up a few times in class.  if she looks at you and doesn't say anything, then she is waiting for you to say something to start the conversation or give a simple sign to let her know that you notice her, like a wave and smile.  if you both have facebook accounts or something similar and she starts chatting with you within five minutes of your arrival online, and this happens a few times, this is a good sign.  if you have known her for a long time, then if she likes you, she will start to change her behavior, unconsciously or consciously.  if you are friends and she goes to you with all her problems, it shows she trusts you and wants you to be part of her life.  if you play an online game and she is your friend on the game, she might start sending you a lot of presents.  if you make her laugh and she puts her head on your shoulder and puts her hand over yours there is a good chance she likes you.  ,  if she is slouching forward with her head in her arms, or her hair is concealing her face, pay attention to which way her chair angles, and which way her face is pointing.  if you are in lunch and she stares at you from time to time maybe smiling from here to there, she is probably into you.  check to see if she's flirting.  note!,  tease her a little, but not too much.  get to know her very well then ask her out but don't say, "do you like me?",  help her out and do stuff with her!,  she stares at you.  if you like her, but you're not sure if she likes you back, go to one of her best friends and have them ask her who she likes. 

 Pay attention to if she has broken the touch barrier with you. If she has, you need to figure out if it is friendly or flirty. She might just be giving you a friendly pat on the shoulder or she might be flirting with you because she is interested in you. If she touches you often, it might be a sign that she is flirting.   The amount of time she touches you for is an aspect of what determines if the touching is flirty or friendly. Was the touch a quick brush or does her hand linger for a few seconds? Where she touches you could be a sign of what the touch means. Touching your shoulder might be something she does with friends, whereas touching your hand or face could be a sign she is interested in you. Notice if she reciprocates your touch. If you give her a side hug and she leans into it, she might like you. If she seems uncomfortable and pulls away from the hug, maybe not. ; , If she gives you space when she talks to you, she might not like you. If she turns her body toward you and points her feet your way, she could be interested. Some women get nervous around guys they like. Touching her hair and neck are signs she is feeling jittery and nervous around you and might be interested in you. , Some women look at the guy they like often. If she likes you she won’t be able to help but look at you. If you notice a lot of eye contact from her when you talk to her, she might be interested in you. If you know she is the kind of girl to get shy and nervous, she might be doing the opposite and not looking at you at all. This could also mean she likes you. , If every time she is with her boyfriend she has a huge smile on her face, it might be a sign you should back off. If she always looks miserable with him, then maybe there is room in her heart to develop feelings for someone else. Paying attention to how she acts around her boyfriend might help you figure out how she feels about you, but it also might not mean anything. If she her look sad with her boyfriend, it does not necessarily mean she does not love him or that she wants to be with you.  

notice the touch barrier.  watch her body language.  notice her eye contact.  pay attention to how she acts around her boyfriend. 

 If she is always really serious around you, she might not like you. It could just mean she is shy or not a humorous person, but often girls joke around with guys they like. If she genuinely seems like she is having fun with you – teasing you, joking around with you, and laughing at your jokes – she might like you., If your conversations consist only of basic day-to-day small talk (“How was your weekend?” or “It is really warm out today.”), she might not like you. Although it could also mean she is too nervous to ask you anything deeper. If she is asking you about your life and interests and telling you about hers, she might be interested in you. , If she has never brought him up or only says negative things about him, her feelings for him could be fading. If she goes on and on to you about how perfect he is, she probably does not like you. It can be complicated though because it is possible to have feelings for more than one person.   If she says, “Tanner bought me roses yesterday and we are going out to dinner tonight! He is the best boyfriend,” she probably does not like you. If she says things like “Tanner and I got in a huge fight last night because we never do anything together,” her heart might not be all in the relationship.  If she goes out of her way to talk to you and give you attention, she might like you. Is she speeding up to catch up with you and talk to you or does she only talk to you if you happen to be near each other? If she seems to be going out of her way to talk to you and show you attention, she might like you. , Pay attention to your online conversations, not just the conversations you have in person. If she never sends you texts or snapchats, she might not like you. (Although she might not be doing this because she has a boyfriend.) If she always sends you texts or snapchats about her day-to-day activities or asks you about yourself, she might be interested. If she only texts you once a month to ask about school or work, maybe not.  

notice her sense of humor.  think about what she talks to you about.  pay attention when she talks about her boyfriend.  notice when she talks to you.  look at your messages. 

 If you decide to ask her how she feels about you, figure out what you want first. Do you just want to sleep with her one time and never speak again or are you in love with her? If you don’t have genuine feelings for her, it is probably not worth your time or her time to try to pursue her. If you genuinely like her, then it might be worth asking her how she feels about you. , Don’t just jump right into asking her how she feels about you. First flirt with her you to show her you are interested. Be yourself and joke around with her. Give her compliments and ask her about herself. Smile when you see her and make eye contact. Try to break the touch barrier with her by finding an excuse to brush against her or touch her arm. Be sincere and not fake. , If you feel like you have established a connection with her and feel confident that she might like you back, ask her how she feels. This can be stressful and nerve-racking but worth it to finally have a clear answer. Be confident but also be understanding that this is a delicate situation and you might be putting her in an awkward spot. Even if she has been flirting with you, it does not mean she must not love her boyfriend.   Try saying something like, “I know you have a boyfriend - and I don’t want to get in the way of that - but I just wanted you to know that I have developed feelings for you. I completely understand that you are committed to someone else, but I want you to know that if you weren’t I would want to date you.” Give her plenty of time to think about what you tell her and to navigate her feelings.  If she says she is not interested, then she is not interested. Leave her alone and let her be happy with her boyfriend. Continuing to pursue her is rude and disrespectful. Give her however much space she wants or that you need to get over her. If you are both comfortable with it, continue to be her friend.  

figure out your intentions.  flirt with her.  bring up that you are interested.  back off if you need to. 

 Talk about something he likes - TV shows, movies, sports, his hobbies, etc. Make sure to be calm and casual, yet still appear interested.; , Here, give me your number and I'll call you later." Don't be frantic and crazy when you say this. Remain serene as if you do this all the time.  We can just talk in person tomorrow!" Don't let it get to you if he says no. Some guys just aren't comfortable with that. However, if he says no, wait a while before you try asking again... Otherwise, he'll catch on.  Just say thanks and smile for now. You can get excited later!  

start a conversation with your crush five minutes before your class is about to end.  a minute or so before the bell rings, look at the clock and say, "oh man, class is almost over!,  if he refuses, just casually shake it off and say, "oh, okay.  if he says yes and gives it to you, then don't go crazy right there. 

 So can you just give me your number so I don't have to use that old line."  , Fold a tiny piece of paper, write your name, something sweet (like have fun!), and number on it, and then stick it in a pen cap. If you go to school with your crush and they ask for a pen, it will be there. If they don't find the paper and try to give the pen back at the end of class, just say something like, Keep it; look at it closely! If they like you back, they should text/call you afterwards. Voila, you are the owner of his number, and he is the owner of yours. Just don't text/call him too often unless he does it to you first. No one likes neediness.  

go up to him and say: "i don't want to use a cheap line, like 'i lost my phone, can i borrow yours?',  or...! 

 One thing you can do around guys is to look for things you have in common so you can get an interesting conversation going. It doesn’t have to be super deep and can be as simple as your mutual affection for Community or your lifelong love for the Cubs. Look at the guy’s clothes, binders, or notebooks for clues about what you may have in common and start a lighthearted discussion about it.   You don’t have to find it immediately. If you get a guy talking for a few minutes or more, you’ll be able to latch on to something pretty soon. This is better than coming right out and asking him what all of his favorite bands, hobbies, or movies are, though you can get around to that eventually. You can also check out a guy’s Facebook profile for hints of the stuff he likes, if you’re nervous about striking up a conversation.; , Though “be yourself” may sound like super corny advice, it can be the best advice you get. If you really want guys to like you and to get to know you, then all you can do is to be the person you were meant to be. Of course, if you want to wait for them to really get to know you or avoid topics that may be more suited for your girlfriends, that’s fine, but you shouldn’t change who you are just to fit an idea of what the guys may expect you to do or say.   When you talk to a guy, don’t act like a version of a girl you think he might like more, and don’t try to mimic one of the most popular girls in your high school. This won’t get you nearly as far as sharing your true self with others. If you’re more shy, you don’t have to put it all out there at once. Just open up to guys little by little as you become friends with them.  You can wear whatever makes you feel good. If you like babydoll dresses, then wear them all you want. If you’re into leggings and long shirts, skirts and tanktops, or jeans and t-shirts, then that’s fine, too. You shouldn’t wear clothes that are tighter or more revealing than you’re comfortable with just to fit an image of what you think guys are into. You’ll look the best when you’re clearly comfortable with what you’re wearing.   Don’t feel like you’re limited to one style or image, whether you’re more grungy or super girly. You can rock leather jeans one week and a pink babydoll dress the next. What matters is that you feel like yourself in whatever you wear.  You may think that guys will think you’re cool if you’re mean to people whom you deem unworthy of you or somehow inferior, but in fact, the best thing to do is to be friendly to everyone around unless they give you a reason not to be. Whether you’re talking to the quiet guy in your homeroom for the first time or striking up a conversation with the new guy in school, make a point of having a smile on your face, asking questions, and being friendly. Guys will see that you’re a person they want to be around.   If you’re more shy, then you don’t have to suddenly become super outgoing. But you should make an effort to at least smile and wave at people and to introduce yourself to new people when you can.  If you want to have a great time hanging out with guys, then you have to show that you really care about them, whether you like them romantically or not. Just show that you care by asking them questions about their lives, complimenting them, looking like you care about how they’re feeling, and making eye contact when you talk to them. Don’t switch the conversation to yourself every chance you get or keep checking your phone when they’re trying to talk to you. Instead, take the time to let them know they matter.   Of course, it can be tricky to let a guy know you care about him when you don’t have romantic feelings for him. Just be fun and friendly and make it clear that you’re only looking for friendship.  You may think that every girl but you is feeling confident about who she is, what she does, and how she looks. However, you’d be surprised by just how many girls are plagued by insecurity and try to mask it with a big smile or a mean attitude. You can be better than that. Work on loving the person who you are, being kind to the people around you, and feeling capable of doing anything. If you have a positive attitude and a great energy, then guys will like being around you.   Don’t talk about how much weight you need to lose or how much you hate being tall. Instead, focus on the things you like about yourself. Of course, it can take years to truly love yourself. But you can take steps in this direction by accepting what you can’t change and working on changing what you can.  You don’t want to change who you are just to get the attention of a guy, especially if it means pretending to love Star Wars or talking about a band you can’t stand for hours. Talk about your favorite TV shows, a great movie you just saw, the hobby you most care about, or really any of the things you care about, and guys will be drawn to your passion. Think about it as not being different from talking to your girlfriends about everyday things — except that you can avoid talking about the guys you like!   The subject of your conversation is less important than making sure that you and the guys you talk to maintain a fair balance between talking and listening. Try not to dominate any conversation and leave room for other people to talk. If you’re talking to a guy one-on-one, try not to do more than about half the talking.  Though it’s important to feel comfortable actually talking about the things that matter to you, you should also be able to get a sense of when a guy is starting to lose interest. If you’ve been talking about your horse for twenty minutes and you see the guy shifting on his feet, checking his phone, or looking around for a friend who can give him a save, then you can shift subjects by asking him a question instead.   Learn to read body language and facial expressions to see whether or not a guy is listening to you. If he’s listening, he’ll be making eye contact (unless he’s super shy or has a crush on you!), and turning his body toward you instead of away.  One thing you can do is to offer a subtle compliment to a guy from time to time. You don’t have to tell him he has the world’s most beautiful eyes or that he’s a big hunk, but you can compliment a new shirt the guy is wearing, tell him he did great in yesterday’s basketball game, or just make a kind, lighthearted comment that lets the guy know you care. You don’t have to actually have a crush on the guy to give him a compliment, either.   You can say something like, “You’re so good at chemistry. How do you do it?” Or, “You have such a unique laugh. I could tell it was you from the other side of the hall.”  , If you want to have a good time hanging out with guys, then you should ask them about themselves from time to time without interrogating them. You can get to know them little by little and show that you care about the things that matter to them. You don’t need to interview them, but you should ask them a question or two in the course of a conversation. Here are some things you can ask them about to show them you care:   Their favorite bands Their hobbies Their favorite TV shows, movies, or actors Their weekend plans Their pets  , Guys like girls who don’t take themselves too seriously. While it’s not attractive to actually put yourself down or to make fun of yourself in a real way, like saying that you’re fat, that you’re stupid, or that you hate something about yourself, some light humor can show that you’re a fun, easygoing person. This is different from bad-mouthing yourself in hopes that someone will give you some attention; just learn to laugh at yourself and the rest of your life will be much easier.   For example, you can make a comment like, “Big surprise, I tripped again,” or, “I wonder how many more pink sweaters I can wear,” to show guys that you’re aware of your goofy or endearing qualities while not being committed to perfection.  If you would describe yourself as a girly girl, like to wear dresses and emphasize your feminine qualities, then you should keep doing that. But if you’re more of a tomboy, then you should be proud to be who you are and not try to giggle more than usual, play with your hair more than usual, or just change who you are to be more girly because you think that’s what guys want. The most important thing is that you act like yourself, and guys will be impressed.   You can also mix it up. If you’re more of a tomboy but want to put on a dress or a skirt once in a while, no one is stopping you.  If you have a crush on a guy and have something to say to him about it, then make sure you do it yourself. Sure, it’s easier and less stressful to have one of your friends talk to the guy for you to tell him what you’re thinking, but if you do it yourself, you’ll start an easier flow of communication and the guy will be impressed by your confidence. The worst that can happen is that he may not return your feelings, but at least you’ll have the satisfaction of knowing that you had the courage to talk to him to begin with.   If you’re really shy about telling a guy you like him in person, you can pass him a note or talk to him online. The most important thing is that it’s coming from you directly.  Again, another misconception girls have about how to act around guys is that they want girls who are laughing all the time. Of course, if the guy you’re around is genuinely funny, you can laugh all you want, but you should avoid laughing if you’re doing it only because you think it’ll make people like you more. You can laugh, but you should also have jokes of your own to share, too. You don’t want people to think you’re just a laugh track.   When a guy is genuinely funny, you can crack up all you want. But you should avoid doing it just because you think it makes you look cute.  You may also think that guys like girls who talk about how much money their purse cost, which celebrities are following them on Twitter, or other things that may superficially make you more interesting. Instead, talk about the things you actually care about, and guys will be impressed. If you do something that is worth bragging about, then the guys will find out some other way because other people will be praising you.   Just work on being the best person you can be and guys will be impressed by what you do, whether you’re amazing at learning foreign languages or have an unstoppable tennis serve.  You may think that guys will think it’s funny if you put other girls down or talk about the random drama you’re experiencing. However, most guys actually prefer girls who are chill and who don’t complain about their friends and who don’t feel the need to put other people down just to feel better about themselves. If you actually say nice things about girls who aren’t there and avoid gossip, guys will like you more because they’ll see that you’re easygoing and drama free and will be drawn to you.   If you put down other girls, then it’ll be a sign of your insecurity, and guys will see that you’re only doing it to try to make yourself look better. Instead, praise other girls to show how comfortable you are with what you have to offer.  

find common ground.  be yourself instead of someone else.  dress in a way that makes you comfortable.  be friendly — to everyone.  show a real interest in them.  wow them with your confidence.  talk about the things that actually interest you.  know when you should change the subject.  compliment them.  ask them questions.  be okay with poking fun at yourself.  don’t act like a girly girl if that’s not who you are.  don’t get your girlfriends to talk to guys for you.  don’t laugh at everything.  don’t try to show off.  don’t make fun of other girls. 

 This one is a giveaway. If you look across the room in class or at a party and catch her looking right at you, then she may have a crush on you. If she sees that you've noticed her staring and looks away and blushes, or gives you a little smile, then she may be acknowledging that she may like you.   Just don't be too obvious about trying to catch her staring at you, or she may think that you're the one staring at her.; , This is another sign that she may have a crush on you. If every time you walk by or talk to her, you find her turning red or getting flustered, then this may be a sign that she likes you and is shy and embarrassed about talking to you or saying the wrong thing. If you do see her blushing, don't tease her about it or mention it, or that may scare her off from talking to you.   Just make sure she's not the kind of girl who blushes whenever she talks to any guy -- she could just be shy around guys.  A lot of girls giggle a lot around the guys they like because crushes make them feel a bit giddy and lightheaded just for being around the guy that they like. If you find the girl always giggling or laughing a lot around you, even if you've barely said anything funny, then she may like you. She could just be feeling giggly because she likes you, or she could really think that everything you say is funny because she has a big crush on you.   Next time you talk to her, see how much she laughs. Try a small joke and see if she laughs way too much -- this may mean that she has feelings for you.  A girl's friends can tell you a lot about how she feels about you without saying much. Next time the girl walks by with her friends in the halls, see if the friends giggle when they see you, elbow her, or just nod in your direction, trying to tell the girl that you're around. This is a not-so-subtle way of letting you know that the girl may have a crush on you.   If the girl's friends always greet you with a knowing smile, then they may be telling you that the girl likes you.  If the girl has a crush on you, then she may want to be around you as much as possible. If she likes you, she may be looking for excuses to hang out, like asking for help with her math homework, or even asking you to see a movie or to go to a concert with you. She could be very casual when she asks you to hang out to hide the fact that she likes you.   If you're in the same social circle, but she's been around a lot more lately, then it may be because she has a crush on you.  If the girl dresses up a bit more whenever she's around you and pays more attention to her hair and makeup, then she may be trying to impress you. If you're just hanging out with her, or hanging out in a small group, but she spends a lot of time putting on lipstick or lip balm, looking at herself in the mirror, or just fidgeting with her clothes, then she may be trying to impress you.   If you see her unexpectedly, and she's dressed down a lot more, then she may be dressing up to impress you. If you see her at the grocery store or somewhere unexpected, and she makes a joke about how casual she looks, then she may be embarrassed that she's not more dressed up for you.  The girl's body language can say a lot about how she feels about you. If she's always making eye contact, leaning closer to you, and turning her body to you when you talk, then she may like you. Here are some other things to look for:   If she plays with her hair when she talks to you, then this may mean that she's nervous because she likes you. If she shifts her weight from foot to foot, she may be a bit nervous about talking to you too. If she breaks eye contact and looks at the floor once in a while, it may be because she likes you.  This is an important point. You may think the girl likes you, but it could turn out that she's flirty, talkative, and playful around many guys. Some girls just have a lot of crushes on guys at once, or just like hanging out with guys -- some even prefer hanging out with guys to hanging out with girls. You may be misreading the signs and thinking a really friendly girl has a crush on you.   Check out how the girl acts around other guys. If she's the same way with everyone, then it's just part of her personality. If she treats you differently, however, and pays more attention to you -- or less attention, because she feels shy about talking to you -- then she may have a crush on you.  

try to catch her staring at you.  see if she blushes around you -- a lot.  see if she giggles a lot around you.  see how her friends act when she passes by.  see if she looks for excuses to hang out.  see if she pays more attention to her looks around you.  notice her body language.  see how she acts around other guys. 

 Spending time together allows you both to get to know each other on a deeper level. Eliminate distractions including cell phones, unwanted visitors, or blaring music whenever you can. Getting to know her and spending time together are essential to building a romantic relationship.You won’t know what activities you enjoy together unless you communicate. Choose activities that you can both do together like studying, hiking, or grabbing a bite to eat. Make sure you make it clear that you enjoy your time with her and appreciate how much you both are getting to know one another.; , If you fear rejection, putting your emotions out in the open can be terrifying; however, you should also realize that regret can be just as powerful. Realize that putting yourself out there and knowing the truth is the only way to overcome both the fear of rejection and regret. It is a relief just to get this off your chest.  Do you actually love her or is this lust or infatuation? Could you stand losing her friendship? Do not be friends with her in hopes that you can change her mind about you. This is unfair to her as friendships should be based on trust and respect. If you truly love her, you will be a good friend first and foremost.   Analyzing your own feelings can be difficult but there are a few scientifically proven signals that may indicate whether you’re in love. Do you exhibit any of these feelings?If you believe that she is unique, it may be because your brain has elevated levels of focus and attention. If you think that she is perfect and only focus on her positive qualities, it may be because your memory has increased to accommodate your new feelings of love. If you feel like you’re a wreck over your new love, it is because research has shown that being in love involves similar brain activity to being addicted with similar mood swings. Going through adversity can also make you fall in love because your brain produces more dopamine, a chemical responsible for reward and pleasure. If you feel you are obsessing over her it may be because your brain has decreased the levels of central serotonin, which is associated with obsessive behavior. People in love have also shown signs of emotional dependency in which they want to be together all the time and hope to stay together forever. When you’re in love you may feel like you’ll do anything for her because you have a greater sense of empathy for the woman you love. Studies have shown that being in love is about an emotional union, not about sex. Studies have also shown that people in love feel that their love is uncontrollable.  Be direct when expressing yourself. Don’t assume that you know how she is feeling. Always respectfully ask and thank her for opening up to you. Being open is essential in expressing your love for one another., Love is a very strong emotion and is usually developed over time. Take a look at how your relationship with her has developed over time and focus on all the positive emotions you have shared together. If you feel that your love for her has developed rather quickly, stay positive that there is no better time to reveal your feelings. You can always find a reason not to do something so be bold and follow your heart.  Don’t be distracted by outside factors. Approach her when you are going to be able to talk to her in relative privacy and when neither of you will feel rushed. Look for a quiet place or ask to schedule a meeting to ensure that both of you are mentally and emotionally present. Expressing your love should be a joyous occasion so make sure you’ve created a situation where she is able to fully process her thoughts and emotions.You don’t want to tell her you love her when you are being distracted by friends or she has to work overtime to meet the deadline of an important client.  Chat with her whenever you have the opportunity and initiate with a smile. Focus on your posture and maintain eye contact. Be friendly and joke when you can, but don't be rude. Don't overwhelm her, as a smile and a wave can go along way.   Engage her in a conversation by starting with a simple "How's are you?" You will come off as creepy or awkward if you stand at her location without saying anything. If you can't think of something to say because you're nervous, just say hello and keep walking or talk to someone else.  Her friends are her support system and will protect her so leave a good impression and take a genuine interest in who they are. Endearing yourself to her friends will let them and her know that you are fully invested in her wellbeing.  Studies have shown that men are prone to saying “I love you” first because they do not want to lose a relationship whereas women want to ensure that the relationship is worth their investment so they are inclined to wait.So before you say “I love you”, prove that you are worth it and leave no doubt in her mind why she loves you back.  There are many resources that give examples of romantic gestures, however, love is a personal thing. Only you know how to express your love and what will make her happy. Whether it’s buying her flowers after she’s had a long day, singing her favorite song to surprise her, or just holding hands everyday as you walk her home from school, showing her that you love her isn’t just a one time gesture but rather a state of mind that informs all that you do.  The best way tell her you love her is to be direct. There is no sense in trying to manipulate her or trying to wait her out. Give her time to process her thoughts and emotions. She may say that she wants to just stay friends so be prepared to examine your own emotions and what role she will play in your life moving forward., Some people may have a very difficult time hearing or using that word. However you articulate your emotions, be sure that she completely understands your intentions.   For example, if you know she gets awkward and skittish whenever you watch the end of romantic comedies whenever the characters finally say “I love you”, do not make the same gesture. Instead, sincerely, but casually, let her know how much you care about her and that you want to take a step forward in your relationship.  Religion, cultural differences, or strict family members can all be involved in how she responds to you. Remember to always be respectful of who she is because, if you truly love her, you will get to know these things about her and how you can possibly work through any obstacle.   If she is tentative but still says yes, address it and abide by the rules she has set in order to ease her mind. If she asked you to get to know her parents first because of her cultural customs, then take it as an honour and follow her lead. If she does not want to get physical in the relationship then don’t pressure her.  Whether she says she loves you or rejects you, express yourself tactfully, especially if you’re in public. Don't be a jerk and try to lash out if your feelings hurt.  If she doesn't love you back, remember that she is still the same person who you have created a deep bond with so continue to respect her. You cannot force someone to like or love you.   Don’t become unresponsive or stonewall her. Women are sensitive to interpersonal cues so blank expressions or being stonewalled can escalate an already negative situation., If you have gotten to know one another and developed a strong relationship based on respect and open communication, chances are that she will express the same feelings of love. Take pride in being able to put your emotions out into the open and celebrate with her. Even if the love she shares stops at friendship, revel in your personal growth. Share your experience with others and know that you are not alone.Use your friends, family, and other parts of your support system to deal with rejection.  If you really love someone, you will respect them, care for them, and be there for the good and the bad. Love can be a roller coaster but the scariest part is taking the first plunge and telling her that you love her.   Get closure. If she doesn’t have the same feelings for you, do not keep persisting. Learn to accept that it wasn’t meant to be and keep optimistic that there is something meant for you just around the corner. This may be difficult but take as much time as you need. That’s why there are so many sad love songs and movies that can help cheer you up., There is no sense in trying to manipulate her or trying to wait her out. If you tell her you love her and says she doesn’t feel the same but wants to stay friends, respectfully decline.Your emotions may be too raw after you have been rejected to maintain a friendship. A friendship is based on mutual support and respect. Ask yourself if you can truly give that to her after you have clearly expressed that you see her as more than a friend. Can you still be friends with her if she is dating someone else?  

build your romantic relationship.  don’t allow fear to paralyze you.  be honest about your feelings.  don’t try to read her mind.  stay positive.  choose the right time and place.  be aware of your body language and how you carry yourself around her.  find out more about her and her friends.  understand that men are more likely to say “i love you” first.  let your actions speak louder than your words.  communicate respectfully and openly.  be aware that the word love can carry different emotional context for different people.  prepare for any obstacles.  maintain your composure.  respect her reaction.  celebrate your maturity and fortitude.  continue to build your relationship.  know when to walk away from a friendship. 

 If the girl teases you, then it's another sure-fire sign that she has a crush on you. Teasing is just one form of flirting, and it's her way of letting you know she has a crush on you while being playful. If she teases you, then she'll make fun of your clothes, playfully push or shove you, or even make fun of your hair or new shoes. Don't be offended -- this is just her way to let you know that she's paying attention to you.   See if she teases all of the guys, or just you. If she teases everyone, then she may just be a playful person. But if it's just you, then you're special to her.  If the girl is always giving you complements, then there's a good chance she has a crush on you. If she tells you she likes your new shoes, that she liked your history presentation, or that you did great in the baseball game though all you did was strike out, then yeah, she probably has a crush on you. If a girl has a crush on you, she'll like every little thing you do, and she may not be afraid to tell you about it.   See if she's the type of girl who is just really nice and gives everyone compliments, or if she only says flattering things to you. Who knows -- maybe she's just really, really nice. But probably not. If she compliments a new shirt or a new haircut, that means she notices when your wardrobe or looks change, which already is a strong sign that she has a crush on you.  If a girl has a crush on you, then she'll try to talk to you as much as she can -- unless she's really shy. If you don't have many mutual friends or other reasons to be around each other, she may come up and ask you an obvious question, like something about the math homework that she could have easily asked another friend. She may even call or text you to ask an obvious question, hoping it could lead to more conversation.   If she likes you, she may even try to talk to you about something she know that you love, like a sport or favorite TV show. She could come up to you just to ask if you saw last night's game or to ask what you thought about the season finale of your favorite show. She could share your interests too, of course, but she could also be using them as an excuse to talk to you.  The girl may think she's being subtle when she asks if you like anyone, or when she asks you if you're going out with any girls this weekend, or asks if you have a crush on a specific girl, but you'll be able to see right through her. If she's asking if you have a crush on anyone, she's really asking, "Do you like me?"   There's only one other option -- she could be asking if you like anyone because one of her friends like you and she's acting as a go-between. If you tell her you don't like anyone, and she says something like, "How can you not like anyone?" "You must like someone..." Then she really wants you to tell her that you like her. Even the fact that she takes any interest in your love life shows that she has romantic feelings for you.  Does the girl subtly try to put down the other girls you hang out with? Does she mention that any girls you've dated in the past aren't good enough for you? If so, then what she's really saying is that she thinks she's the one for you. If she puts down any girls you hang out with, or even any girls she just sees you talking to in the halls, then she's just jealous that she doesn't have all of your attention.   It's okay for her to be jealous before you start dating -- just make sure it isn't a problem if she does end up being your girlfriend.  She may think she's just dropping a hint, but if she often says things like, "It would be cool to have a boyfriend," or "being single is so not fun," or "I wish I had a guy to go to the movies with," then she's basically asking you to be her boyfriend. If she's always making subtle comments about how much she wants to date someone, that person is you.   There's only one other option -- that she wants to date one of your friends. But if she never asks about any of your friends, then chances are that she has her eye on you.  If all she says about other guys is that this or that guy isn't good enough, or that he isn't nearly as great as you, then she's basically saying that she has a crush on you. She may even say that she wished this or that guy possessed a certain quality -- one that you have.   If she says she wishes that a guy she went on a date with had a better sense of humor and she always praises your sense of humor, then she's basically telling you that she wants to date you. If she's always comparing you favorably to other guys, then she's letting you know that she likes you more than any other guy around.  If she's always texting you or calling you, then chances are that she has a crush on you. If she sends you a lot of cute smiley face emoticons, or calls you just to say "hi" or for a dumb excuse like asking for the homework for a class that she could get from anyone, then she's just looking for reasons to talk to you.   If she texts you a smiley face or just a word like "hehe," then she's flirting with you.  

see if she teases you.  notice if she compliments you.  see if she looks for every excuse to talk to you.  notice if she asks if you like anyone.  notice what she says about any girls you hang out with.  see if she hints that she wants a boyfriend.  see what she says about other guys.  see if she calls or texts you a lot. 

 Your first resource should be your own buddies. Ask your friends if they've seen you and the girl together and ask their honest opinion about whether or not the girl has a crush on you. Your friends may have more perspective on whether the girl actually likes you, or if she's just playful and flirtatious with everyone. Ask them to be honest -- if they don't think she likes you, they should let you know.   Your guy friends may also know if the girl likes someone else instead of you. This could be helpful information before you try talking to the girl yourself. Just try not to ask anyone too chatty, or a guy who is very friendly with the girl. If you do, the guy may tell her that you asked, and he'll blow your cover.  Asking the girl's friends if she likes you is basically as good as asking her yourself. But if you really trust one of her friends and don't think she'll report back to her friend, then go ahead and ask if the girl has a crush on you. Her friend will mostly likely know whether or not she likes you -- it'll just be a matter of whether or not she'll tell you.   Don't make a big deal about it. Don't reveal your feelings about the girl.  If you like the girl too and want to know her true feelings, don't be afraid to ask. Just find a time when you're both relatively alone and in a quiet place, and ask her if she has a crush on you. If you like her, you can even tell her first that you have a crush on her and want to know if she likes you too. Just speak calmly, make eye contact, and give her all of your attention to let her know she's important. But don't make it seem like too much of a big deal or you may scare her away.   If she does admit she has a crush on you and you like her, then ask her out on a date and see where it takes you. If she says she doesn't have a crush on you, react the right way. Don't get all upset or offended -- just play it cool and show her what a great guy you are.  

ask your friends.  ask her friends.  ask her. 

 You want to know someone before you get romantic. Think about why you like her so much -- what sorts of experiences and conversations brought you together? You want to both feel comfortable and friendly with each other. If you establish a respectful and kind friendship with her, she will be much more likely to like you back.   Ask her on casual dates, usually with other people. Try to hang out outside of work or school occasionally to develop a connection. If she doesn't seem interested in acting like friends, or seems stand-offish, you should re-consider if she is someone you really want to spend a lot of time with.; , You'll need something to bond over, so find things that you both enjoy. It could be a hobby, sport, team, movie, musical style, anything at all. The only way you'll build a relationship together is if you can build off of a conversation, so get talking. This will give you something to talk about, but it will also show her that a relationship between the two of you could be fun.  Hygiene is a sign that you care for yourself, and therefore that you're willing and able to care for her. Take a shower, brush your hair, use deodorant, brush your teeth, and generally try to be clean and tidy. Wear your favorite shirt and put a comb through your hair. This isn't just about her -- it is about you. Looking your best will help you feel your best.   Don't neglect things like facial hair and fingernails. Keep everything trim and tidy. Smell fantastic, but don't overdo it. 1-2 spritz of cologne or body spray, max., Smiling is our way of expressing happiness, and girls want to be with someone who is happy and carefree, not someone who is sad and sulky. The basics of strong body language are easy -- head up, spine straight, and shoulders back. Combined with a good smile, these simple steps are proven to be the most effective form of flirting you have., Don't blurt out the first thing in your head! Slow down and take a breath before proceeding so you don't feel like a chicken with his head cut off. Remember that you should feel nervous. If you didn't you wouldn't really like her. So feel confident in your decision and the butterflies in your stomach -- they're telling you that you've made the right decision.Try to slow down as you speak. It will keep everyone, you included, much calmer. Keep smiling! Just the act of smiling actually makes you happier., You don't have to write a script or poem, or think of great jokes and stories. In fact, trying to manufacture the perfect "tell" is far too difficult and complicated for something that should come from the heart. Visualize the conversation to get mentally ready, but don't obsess over the details.   "I think you're awesome, and I really like you." "What I'm trying to say is I like you. Do you want to go out on a date?" "Hey ______. I don't usually go up to girls and say this, but I really like you.", It may be more embarrassing for the both of you if other people are around, and it puts pressure on her for a response. Find a time and place where you are both relaxed, happy, and relatively alone. Consider telling her "I wanted to talk to you, can we meet after school?" and just pick a place and a time., Most girls prefer talking face-to-face, so try not to call her on the phone. If you call her on the phone, she might think that you aren't confident enough to ask her in person.   If the phone is the only way you can find yourself asking her, then go for it. Know, however, that you'll always make a bigger impression in person. Asking a friend to do it for you has a high chance of backfiring. Again, she might think you aren't confident enough to tell her in person. Don't tell her over IM or chat, if at all possible. Telling her to her face makes you seem more brave and confident but it also shows her that you respect her.  Don't be anyone you're not. Let the real you shine through because there's a much bigger chance she'll like the real you than someone you pretend to be for her sake or someone else's.   Don't be cheesy with her! Try not to say anything too flirty, because she might not know whether you actually mean it. She might even think you were just teasing her (trying to look cool or something, etc.) and get upset at you. Don't keep her guessing. Be absolutely real and truthful. She'll appreciate this more than anything. Do not say anything stupid unless you are absolutely sure she is going to laugh. Otherwise, it just makes the situation more awkward for you. If you think you can make her laugh at a good joke, don't be afraid to work it in. Girls love a sense of humor. It shows her that you like having fun.  You're not talking to the ground, so don't stare at it! Looking her in the eyes has a way of telling her that you're completely focused on her and that she grabs your attention like no other person. Plus, it'll give her a chance to stare into your eyes, too, and lots of girls think that the eyes are the most attractive part of the face.  This won't get any easier, unfortunately. So just get out with it. You don't need to look like Tom Cruise, talk like Shakespeare, or plan a wedding proposal -- you just have to say "I like you." If you're struggling, count to five in your head. Tell yourself that, no matter what, you're going to say the words when you finish:   "I really like you." "I was hoping we could go on a date sometime." "Let's try to be more than friends.", While this is hard for you, remember that you're dropping a pretty big bomb on her as well. She needs time to think about your words, and you asking questions or butting in doesn't help. Even if she does like you back, it's not always easy to say that you like someone, or maybe she hasn't really thought about it yet. Don't force her to make a decision. Instead, ask her out on a date; this allows her to find out whether she likes you if she doesn't already know.  If she says "yes"...Lucky you! You're probably a pretty special person and she thinks that you have a lot to offer her. At the very least, she's interested in you and wants to get to know you better. Have a game plan for a date or at least calling her, or else you might make her wonder if you've reconsidered later.  Don't be afraid to flirt with her a little. When you say goodbye to her, smile, touch her lightly on the back and say, "Cool. I'm glad you said yes. I'll call you about the movie. What's your number?" Once you've made the connection, be sure to follow up on it a bit!   Flirting is supposed to be subtle. You really don't need to change that much about yourself other than the occasional physical contact and willingness to hold eye contact longer. No need to over think it!, Remember, girls sometimes move a little slower than guys, so don't expect to be kissing her the next day. If you get a chance to at the movies — or wherever you have the date — give her a little kiss, but don't expect her to want to move as quickly as you might. Remember, you'll probably get more of what you want by making her feel comfortable, so be patient.  You want to be a good friend, otherwise the romance will fall to pieces. Make sure you talk, hang out, and stay true to yourself and your other friends. Just because she said yes doesn't mean you need to be smothering each other all of a sudden.   Make time together at least once a week. Plan dates together. Continue seeing your friends and following your daily life -- she fell for you, not a puppy who only follows her around!  , Telling someone you like them is really, really hard. Not everyone has the strength to go through with it. At the end of the day, however, you were open and honest enough to take a risk. She might not have felt that connection, but you better believe other women will., Don't try to make her feel bad, because she'll get angry that you're doing that; she won't suddenly like you even as a friend. Remember, people are attracted to happy, playful, funny people. Try to look at life in a happy, playful, funny way, even if it seems like there's no reason to at the moment.  There is no beating around the bush -- it will be awkward for a bit. Give her time, to get to know you better or to show her all you have to offer her. You might have a chance with her in the future, but you won't if you're super creepy about it. If she feels like you're clingy or stalking her, you're going to seriously hurt your chances. Focus on being a good friend and don't make her feel like you have expectations.   If she changes her mind about how she feels about you, she'll probably be more willing to make the first move, so just wait it out. You put yourself out there openly and honestly -- you should be proud of yourself.  If you don't think she'll ever give you a chance, let life show you who else is beautiful. There are lots of people out there who you might be compatible with; try to open your eyes to new possibilities. Life is too short to chase after someone who doesn't see your merits. If you are truly meant to be, she will come back to you now that she knows you like her.  

get to know her as a friend before "making a move.",  build a relationship off of common interests, finding common interests to bring your together as a couple.  keep clean and well dressed to both look and feel confident.  smile, keep your head up, and pull your shoulders back to exude confidence.  stay calm, even if you're nervous, by slowly counting to three in your head before talking or responding.  think about what you want to say ahead of time, but keep it brief.  wait to tell her until the two of you are alone and she is in a good, stress-free mood.  talk to her in person instead of through text, the internet, or a phone call.  know that an open, honest discussion is far more important than any big surprise.  look at her in the eyes.  just come out and say it!,  let her respond on her own instead of asking for a response.  have a game plan.  flirt with her through eye-contact, light touching, and smiles.  don't try to rush through things.  continue building the relationship as friends first, and a couple second.  know that you did everything in your power, and be proud of your courage.  understand that arguing or getting angry fixes nothing in this situation.  give her some space for a few weeks.  be open to other opportunities. 

 Spend a few days catching her gaze every now and then. Don't just stare at her, though; instead, shoot her small glances until your eyes meet and she catches you. When she does, smile slightly and look away after a second. You'll probably blush as well, which is all the better - blushing indicates you're nervous, which is a hint that you like her.; , When you do talk to her, pick a time that's convenient. Don't try to get her attention when she's obviously involved in something else, and try to have a bit of privacy - you don't have to be completely alone, but her attention shouldn't be too distracted.   Make the interaction extra casual (and put a time limit on it) by talking to her while you're both walking somewhere else. If you walk to a class at the same time as her, or you start walking the same way home, this is a great opening.  Paying a girl the right compliment makes your intentions clear right away - she'll know instantly that you're interested in being more than her friend. Here are some things to consider:   Know how to deliver a compliment. Even the best compliment in the world will fall flat if your delivery is off. Keep a half smile as you talk - it will make you naturally add appealing inflection to your voice. (Try this trick out when you answer the phone sometime and see if you notice a difference.) Maintain eye contact with her, and keep the tones of your voice up, but lower the actual volume - speaking softly immediately communicates intimacy, and it can make her instinctively lean in closer to hear you. If this all sounds a bit difficult, practice it in front of a mirror first. As anyone who's ever had a stalker can tell you, there's a fine but definite line between flattering and creepy. With this in mind, choose your compliment wisely. Saying something like "You always look amazing in that shirt" can come off as weird if you don't know her well, and implies that you watch her. (Even if you do, it's best not to spill that information immediately.) Instead, opt for something general but cute, such as "Your smile is glowing today. What's making you so happy?" or "I thought what you said in class earlier was really interesting." A good compliment should naturally lead to more conversation, instead of just hanging awkwardly in the air after you say it. Know what to avoid. If you're going to pay a girl a compliment about her physical looks, stick to her eyes, smile or hair. Do not comment on her body otherwise, especially on the first interaction. If you want to play it extra safe, pick something you already know she's proud of. For instance, if you know she's a dedicated violinist, say something like, "I've heard you're an amazing musician," and use it as a way to ask her some questions about it.  You might be tempted to stop talking and just stare at this girl, but don't let your nerves get the best of you. Allowing a long lull in the conversation will make things feel awkward.    Ask about what she thinks of a shared homework assignment or an upcoming event. Asking for her opinion communicates that you care about what she thinks, and see her as more than just an object. Use the conversation to find out more about her, but be subtle. For instance, if you want to find out if she already has a boyfriend, you could casually ask, "So, anything fun planned with your boyfriend for the weekend?" If she doesn't have one and she's interested in you, she'll let you know immediately. Ask open-ended questions. For instance, instead of saying "So, have anything fun planned for the break?" (which can be answered with a short "yes" or "no"), say "What are you going to do to keep busy while school is out?" A question that requires a detailed response is always better to keep a conversation flowing.  If you're sure you've got a joke she'll appreciate, give it a shot. The goal is to show her you have an engaging sense of humor, but you don't want to come off as desperate or cheesy.   If possible, crack a joke about the current situation or something you both saw happen. Situational humor is more meaningful than a joke you read online. Don't tell a dirty joke. It's not appropriate for a first conversation, and it might give her the wrong impression. If she doesn't get the joke, don't explain it to her unless she asks. Just move on quickly with a new point of conversation. Good humor is really attractive, but bad humor is a complete turn off. If you can't think of a joke that makes sense with the situation at hand, leave it alone.  Follow that old saying - "Always leave them wanting more." Find a way to gracefully duck out of the conversation before it goes stale. Good luck!  

make eye contact.  time it right.  start with a compliment.  keep the conversation moving.  instead, have a mental list of backup questions you can use if you stumble on an uncomfortable pause.  make her laugh (optional).  close the conversation early. 

 If you want to have a knockout conversation with the girl, then you have to start strong. When you see the girl you want to talk to, whether it's a girl you've been crushing on for a while or a cute girl you just spotted at a party, you should let her notice you for a few minutes. Let her see you have fun with your friends and not paying too much attention to her. Then, when you lock eyes, stride over to her with confidence. Keep your head up high and look straight ahead.   If you don't know her, then introduce yourself. Just say, "Hey, I'm Brian. What's your name?" This is simple but effective. If you do know the girl, just say, "Hi, How are you?" or "What have you been up to?" You don't have to be too elaborate here -- you just want to walk up to her like it's no big deal. Fake it until you make it -- even if you're terrified of talking to girls, just pretend like it's no big deal.; , There's no need to prepare an elaborate joke or a pick-up line or to do a backflip to get the girl's attention. Just say something that will make the girl want to talk to you more, and to get to know you a bit. This is not the time to discuss your grandmother's funeral or to talk about your goals for the future. Just talk to her about something you saw on TV, about something your dog did, or about something cool that you did over the weekend. Don't put too much pressure on yourself and start with a light opening line. Try something like this:   "Man, my weekend was crazy. I had to help my dad build an addition to the house and I can barely move my arms. How about you? Did you do something more exciting with your time?" "Look at this scratch on my hand. My cat is nuts when he's hungry. How about you -- do you have any pets?" "Can you believe how hard that math test was? I'm pretty sure I got every question wrong. How about you?"  , As you start talking to the girl, you should get a sense of what she wants from you. Every girl is different. If she's more shy, then she'll need you to draw her out, ask more questions, and to do more of the talking. But if she's really chatty and outgoing, then you should let her speak and not worry so much about impressing her, and avoid interrupting her as well. Once you know the kind of girl she is, then you can adjust your conversation accordingly.   Don't worry if she's shy. She may be one of those girls who is only shy at first, but who quickly opens up once you make her comfortable. Though it's important to be yourself, you should stick to safe topics when you first talk to the girl, before you know whether she has a sick sense of humor or if she's easily offended by inappropriate jokes or comments. The more you talk to her, the more you'll know what you can and can't say around her. Even if the girl is outgoing, you shouldn't let her do all of the talking. Let her know that you can hang with her.  There's nothing small about small talk. If you're talking to a girl, you can't start off with your deepest, most important desires, or she'll want to run away. Small talk is an art, and you can master it just by mentioning mundane topics that lead you to a more intimate, exciting conversation. You have to start small to end big, so don't be afraid to mention the most basic things, even the weather or your upcoming chemistry test. Here are some examples of how you can make small talk turn to a more deep topic:   "Can you believe how much it rained this weekend? I was supposed to go biking with my dad, but we ended up staying in the house all weekend. Did you do anything fun in the rain, or were you cooped up too?" "I meant to study for tomorrow's chem test last night, but my little sister was sick with a cold and I had to help my mom take care of her. How about you -- do you have any siblings?" "I saw The Avengers last night. I thought it was okay, but not my favorite. What's your favorite movie?"  , After you've talked to the girl for a little while, you can let her know you're interested without coming on too strong or scaring her off. You can even joke around with her a bit, and compliment her by teasing her. Just one compliment will do for now -- you don't want her to feel like you're stalking her or obsessing over how great she is. Here are some ways to do it:   "I like the color of your shirt. It really matches your eyes. Did you do that on purpose?" "You have a great laugh. You should use it more often." "You're the only girl I've ever met who knows more about baseball than I do. How did that happen?"  , Once you've been chatting with the girl for a while, you can start to ask her some questions that show that her interests and opinion matters to you without prying too much. She shouldn't feel like she's in an interrogation room, but she should feel like you're genuinely making the effort to get to know her instead of just showing off or trying to impress her without caring who she really is. Here are some questions that you can ask questions while revealing something about yourself to make the girl feel more comfortable:   "When I get home from school, I always pick up my guitar first. What do you do for fun when you're not in school?" "Do you like being on the tennis team? I think being on the soccer team is okay -- when our coaching isn't killing us with drills." "I see you hanging out with Sarah a lot. Is she your best friend, or are you one of those girls with a bunch of best friends?"  , If you want to keep the girl hooked, then you have to make her laugh so she feels comfortable and wants to keep talking to you. To make her laugh, you can poke fun at yourself, tease her a bit, or tell her a funny thing that happened to you over the weekend. Don't be too obvious about trying to be funny or telling her jokes, and don't try to make her laugh just by putting people down. Here are some things you can say to try to make her laugh:   "I've been playing my guitar so much that I think I'm becoming obsessed. Last night, I had a dream that I was Jimi Hendrix -- man, was I bummed when I woke up." "Is everything in your wardrobe pink, or are you just wearing all of your pink clothes at once?" "Yesterday, I told coach I had a cold so I could skip practice. But then he saw me hanging out at Sonic later that day -- man, was I busted!"  , Even if the girl is more on the shy side, you should still let her talk and tell you what she's thinking or what she cares about. You may be so nervous about running out of things to say that you find yourself rambling on about seemingly nothing and not coming up for air. Make sure to pause between your sentences, let the girl make interjections, and don't interrupt her if she tries to talk.   If she's in the middle of telling her a story, don't just wait for her to finish so you can tell her a story that you think is similar but better -- this will make her feel like you're not really listening. React to what she's saying. You don't have to nod along or say "Yeah," every two seconds to let her know you care about what she has to say. Just make eye contact, nod at the right times, and make appropriate comments like, "That's crazy," "I can't believe you had to do that," or "I had no idea that..."  , If you're bragging or showing off, then the girl will want to run for the hills before you finish listing all of your accomplishments in the world of high school basketball. Telling the girl what a great athlete or student you are won't impress her and will in fact have the opposite effect and will make her think you're shallow or narcissistic.   You can talk about how much you like the sport you play without telling her how great you are at it. You can mention your favorite class without saying that you got an 'A' on the last paper. Don't think that the girl won't know how awesome you are if you don't brag. Instead, she'll think you're awesome because you're being humble.  This is different from bragging. You can make the girl see what makes you different from all of the other guys without bragging about it. Instead, let her know a bit about your quirks or interests without making her think that you're a little weird right away. This may not be the time to tell her about your spider collection, but you can talk about how much you like volunteering at the local soup kitchen, taking your dog for walks, or writing songs.   Find a way of bringing up one of the things you like to do that really represents who you are and wait for the girl to ask for more questions. After you tell her something about yourself, ask her something about herself so she doesn't feel like you're dominating the conversation.  If you really want to keep the girl's interest, then you have to play it cool, striking the balance between letting her see that you like talking to her without getting puppy-dog eyes or practically drooling at her feet. To play it cool, you shouldn't crowd her too much when you're talking to her, compliment her a million times, or tell her how beautiful or amazing she is.   You should act like you like talking to her, but that you have lots of experience talking to girls, so if she doesn't like you, you'll survive. Think before you speak. If you're dying to give her a compliment, find a way to make it sound less intense first. For example, if you're dying to say, "You have the most beautiful hair in the world," you can say, "I like the way your hair catches the light. I've never seen that before."  , There are two scenarios for when it's best to stop talking to the girl. One is that she's just not that into you, and is looking at her feet, her phone, or desperately glancing at her friends to save her. The other is when you're having an amazing time talking to her and can tell she's really into the conversation -- though it may seem unnatural, you should leave the girl at the peak of the conversation, if you're not being rude, so she wants to talk to you next time.   If the girl doesn't like talking to you, just give her a kind goodbye and leave. There's no reason to make it worse by saying, "I guess you think I'm annoying." If you can tell that she does really like talking to you and you're having a great time, then it's time to prepare to make an exit.  You shouldn't pull every trick out of your sleeve, tell the girl every little thing that makes you interesting, and ask her every possible question that will fascinate her all at once. That will leave you with little to talk about the next time you see her. Instead, find a way to "tease" the conversation so she wants to hear what you have to say and to keep talking the next time you're around. Here are some ways to do it:   "Did I tell you about the time I met Dave Matthews at a Burger King? Oh man, I'll have to save that one for another day." "Acting sounds so fun. I want to hear all about how you're getting into the role of Lady Macbeth next time. Macbeth is like, my favorite Shakespeare play." "Eddie and I are going to try surfing for the first time tomorrow. It's supposed to be really windy, so I'll let you know if we survive."  , You don't have to tell the girl that you just had the time of your life talking to her -- even if you did! Just one short sentence that lets her know that you had a great conversation will make her feel special and will make her want to talk to you again. Here are some ways to do it:   "It's been fun catching up. I can't believe what you told me about your sister." "I love talking to you about music. I always walk away with a new recommendation." "Looks like I lost track of time because I like talking about movies so much."  , The conversation doesn't have to end there. Right before you say goodbye, say something that lets her know that you're looking forward to talking again, even if you won't get to see her for a little while. This will make her feel special without feeling like she's being stalked. Here are some things you can say:   "Good luck with that swim meet tomorrow. You'll have to tell me all about it soon." "I'll see you in Math tomorrow. Please come prepared with a joke because I'll need a good laugh after we get those tests back." "I love hearing your stories about your family. Maybe I'll get to hear more at Becky's party this weekend."  , Once you've closed down the conversation, let the girl know that you like talking to her, and mentioned a time when you'll potentially see each other again, you have nothing left to do but to smile, lift up a hand, say, "See you later," and then walk off into the sunset. Make your exit confidently and quickly instead of lingering around until you run out of things to talk about or keep shifting feet.   Don't try too hard at the end. Just a simple, "I'll talk to you later," will get the point across. If you have a place to go, like English class or batting practice, tell her where you're going so she sees that you're busy and have a lot going on. Give the girl a big smile when you leave to make her comfortable. It doesn't have to be an intense, over-the-top smile. Just smile enough to let her see that you've had a good time.  

have a cool approach.  open with a light topic.  get a feel for the girl's personality.  make small talk.  give the girl a subtle compliment.  ask some light questions.  make her laugh.  let her talk.  don't brag or show off.  let her see what makes you special.  play it cool.  know when it's time to leave.  leave her wanting more.  let her know you liked talking to her.  talk about when you'll get to talk to her again.  exit gracefully. 

 You don't need to be a brain to find things to talk about, but you do need to have passions and interests. A person who can talk naturally about things he's interested in is always better conversation than someone armed with pre-written prompts and a vague hope of getting a date.   Make a short list. List everything you're interested in. Go for more detail rather than less. For example, instead of “music,” write “playing classical guitar, going to concerts, collecting old funk LPs.” Expand the list into topics. Using the example above, you might think about what brand of guitar you own or rent versus the brand you wish you could have, what concerts you've been to, and what funk bands you enjoy. Make a mental note of your opinion on each topic. This will help you to know yourself better. When you talk about any subject you have an interest in, you'll be able to speak confidently about it and explain why you're interested in it, which makes for good conversation.  Get used to talking, or you'll never be able to talk well. One of the easiest and simplest things you can do to improve your comfort level is simply to say things aloud to yourself. This helps you get comfortable with the sound of your own voice, and with speaking rather than simply responding to others.   Find a time and a place. Whenever you're home alone is a great choice. It doesn't have to be regularly scheduled; just seize opportunities as they arise. Say something. Try to talk a little bit about something rather than just mumbling a few words. Tell yourself about the plot of the last TV show or movie you watched. If you can't think of anything to say, find a book and read aloud from it.  When reading from a book, try to make the words sound natural, rather than the stilted sight-reading drone that many people lapse into. Read a sentence or two in your head first, then say them aloud as though you had just thought of them yourself. Books of poetry are ideal for this. Poetry is almost always meant to be read aloud, and the concentration required to be able to read a poem naturally will help distract you from feeling silly.   Keep talking for a little while. Try to speak out loud for at least a minute. Over time, this will help you get used to initiating conversations and speaking your mind, which are important skills for making a good impression on your crush.  Wherever you interact with women on a regular basis – work, school, clubs, or elsewhere – make an extra effort to engage in small talk with them. This will teach you that there is nothing to fear about talking to a girl, even if you have a crush on her.   Start with people you already interact with a little bit, like coworkers. Ask them how their week has been going, and use short questions to encourage them to talk more. Most girls will be glad to talk with you for a moment.  If a girl asks about your week after she's told you about hers, do the polite thing and tell her, in about the same level of detail she used when talking to you. (Leave out the fact that you're trying to get better at talking to girls.)   Be friendly with project partners. At school or during community service, you will often be paired with a partner. When your partner is a girl you don't know very well, a little geniality will go a long way towards making things comfortable for both of you.  Try talking about the project rather than asking about her. If she responds well, continue on, and mix in small talk and simple questions as you go along.  Don't ask her about herself or her life. Instead, ask her what she thinks of another person, such as the teacher, or an upcoming event you both know about.   Don't talk too often. Show that you're primarily interested in being helpful and completing your project together. Speak as thoughts come to you, rather than pushing the conversation along.  If you want to make a good impression on a girl, the very least you can do is control your behavior and your hygiene.   Keep up a daily hygiene regimen of bathing, face cleaning, tooth brushing, and hair care. Wear deodorant. Clip your fingernails regularly.  If you wear cologne, remember: less is more. Spray enough onto your wrists and the base of your neck that you can smell it from a foot or two away at most, but no more. Good cologne will dry down and last several hours; there is no need to overdo it.   Always dress your best. Use clean clothes, and plan outfits the evening before you wear them so you don't have to make last-minute substitutions. Be on your best behavior. You don't have to stop being the class clown if that's who you are, but you shouldn't say or do anything that you wouldn't want your crush to know about. You never know what might get back to her. Be kind and forgiving with others, and avoid getting into trouble with higher-ups.  Whenever you see a good opportunity to speak to your crush alone for a moment, even if other people are around, step up and do it.   Get her attention. Call her name and wave at her while smiling. Look happy to see her. Meet her. Start walking up as soon as she's acknowledged you. Don't wait for her to come over to where you are. Show you're proactive and confident by closing the distance yourself.  If she looks upset or bothered by your greeting, or tries to pretend she doesn't hear you, she is most likely not interested in getting to know you. Cut your losses and move on. You deserve someone who will be glad to see you.  By now, you should be comfortable talking to girls, and confident that you're an interesting person with things to say on a variety of subjects. This is your chance to make a great impression with the skills you've developed.   If you don't know your crush, introduce yourself and tell her where you've seen each other around. Once she recognizes you she'll probably ask you a polite question, like “what's up?” or “how's it going?” Don't answer dismissively; instead, think on your feet and say something in response that will move the conversation along.  If all else fails, say that you just saw her and thought you'd come over and catch up for a bit. This allows you to jump into a conversational lead with the next statement.  Ask her about people and places you both know. Respond lightly when she answers your questions, and use gentle humor to offer your opinions.   For example, if you both had a class with a teacher named Mr. Smith who always seemed tired, you could ask her about Mr. Smith, and respond with an observation about how tired he always looked when she answers your question.  Smile and don't be afraid to look at her while she's talking. Remember the old saying: “laugh and the world laughs with you; cry and you cry alone.” We make our best impressions when we make others feel happy to be around us.   Leave serious and sad topics out of this conversation. If one has to come up (for example, if she asks about someone and you know he just died), be honest, but don't let the conversation dwell in that spot.  If there's a lull in the conversation, but it's otherwise going well, tell her about a recent event in your life that has to do with one of your personal interests. Continuing with the musical example from previously, you might bring up a concert you recently attended or an album you recently bought.   Don't get too into your own interests. Keep it general enough that she can follow what's being said without having any special knowledge. Make plenty of room for her to interject or change the subject. The important thing is to keep your conversation interesting and alive.  Tell her it was great to talk with her and suggest that the two of you get together again soon, then ask for her number. Depending on how slowly you want to take things, asking for a phone number outright might not always be an appropriate step, but it's a good middle ground between simply saying goodbye and asking her out on the spot.   Alternatively, just ask to be Facebook friends, or request her e-mail address. This is less blatantly an invitation to date than asking for a girl's number, and most people don't mind giving out online information.  Tell her you'll call (or otherwise contact) her soon and leave her with a smile and a wave. If all went well, you should be looking at a get-together or possibly even a first date within a week or two. 

develop your interests.  practice saying things out loud.  talk to girls.  stay prepared.  make your approach.  talk the talk.  keep the conversation going for a little while.  stay positive.  take the initiative.  ask for her number.  walk away. 

 Is she really the girl for you?; , Hopefully, keeping this in mind will inspire confidence since you are already starting at a vantage point. Nothing ventured, nothing gained.  It's better to know that you two didn't have a chance, rather than living off false hope! Don't lead her on, but rather confront her with your feelings. Both of your emotions are important in whatever relationship you choose to have with her.  This is critical. It is important that your admirer accept you for who you are, not who you think she wants you to be. Any relationship will ultimately fail if you engage in false pretenses.  It is easy to sense when someone is insincere. Keep compliments brief and not overly personal until you really know her well. An insightful compliment that remarks on her behavior, personality trait or action can be powerful when delivered at the appropriate time and place. It allows her to see that you are not being trite or superficial and that you value her for who she is.  Make sure to make eye contact and include her friends in the conversation. This not only exhibits good manners but it will ingratiate you with her peers. It will also help to make her and others feel less self-conscious if you are friendly and relaxed.  This will increase both your comfort levels and give you a common ground on which to build a friendship. However, if you truly have no interest, do not force yourself to attend. (See #2 and #3 above.) If there is a predominance of girls in the club, don't let that deter you. Remember, your purpose for attending is to get to know her but if that should not work out, you will have expanded your network of other available girls to socialize with in the future. The fact that there are few guys in the club means that you have eliminated the competition.  Remembering that she likes you and probably suffers from the same insecurities that you do, should help to reduce your anxiety. If it is meant to be, friendship is a process that should develop naturally over time. Trust and respect are not earned overnight.  Take the initiative! When you pass her in the hall, say, "Hi So-And-So!" Do it often, too.  

be honest with yourself, first and foremost.  remember that she likes you.  choose rejection over regret.  just be yourself.  be honest when giving a compliment.  talk to her in the presence of her friends.  join a club or participate in an activity in which she is involved.  girls are human too.  say hi! 

 As you read, anything that makes you hesitate should be fixed.  If you get that wrong it’s over.  After all, the whole point of writing the letter is to impress her, right? Make your final copy look as good as she does.  

read your first draft out loud to yourself at least five times.  check your spelling, especially her name.  make it neat. 

 Try not to overthink the situation. Though you want to talk to this girl very much, remember that she is not perfect and may be as nervous as you. Girls have emotions and feelings just like you do and may be wondering the right way to approach you as well. Or she may be waiting on you to make the first move!.   Breathe deeply before you talk to her. Deep breaths help calm you down.; , When you see her, greet her with a sweet smile. Smiles indicate friendliness and warmth. You may have never smiled at her before, so she may have no idea that you want to talk to her. Smiling at her will plant a seed in her mind that you have some level of interest. She won’t be as caught off guard when you actually do speak to her.  If you see her in the mornings or walk past her on your way to class, tell her “hello.” This will likely begin to spark an interest in her to know more about you and to talk to you. This also will guarantee that she notices you.Unless you have spoken to her before, however, don’t use her name when you say “hello.” She might find it creepy if you know her name but she doesn’t know you or yours, especially if you go to a big school. Don’t look up any information about her either because this can come across as stalker-like behavior.  One way to begin having small conversations with her is to ask her for a small favor. This is another way to guarantee that she notices you. For instance, you might ask her something like “can you grab a cup for me?” if she is standing by the cups in the cafeteria.You might also ask something like “can you let me borrow a pencil?” if you have a class with her, just make sure that you give the pencil back.  Another great way to begin having small conversations is to ask her small questions. She will appreciate the opportunity to be able to help you if you ask questions like “what page did the teacher say we should turn to?” or “what is our homework assignment for tonight?”If you’re lucky, she may begin to rely on you when she has questions as well and then you can spark up conversations.  You can also begin the conversation with her by making small statements that don’t necessarily require a response. Saying things like “wow, it’s a nice day today” or “this lunch is so good” are great ways to speak to her without fear, because such does not require her to respond. However, she will likely respond to you if she is interested, so continue the conversation from there., One way to impress a girl that you have not yet spoken to is to always look great. Get up a few minutes earlier in the mornings and take a little extra time to get ready. A girl is more likely to notice you if you come to school looking handsome and clean cut regularly.   Pick your outfit out the night before and iron it so your clothes look neat. Maintain your hygiene. Shower regularly and wear deodorant. Brush your teeth and floss. Put on lotion and wear chapstick. Get haircuts regularly to maintain a sharp hairstyle. If you have long hair, wash it regularly and comb it to keep it neat. Wear cologne, but don’t overdo it. Most girls enjoy when boys smell nice.  Be very respectful to her and avoid staring or making forward comments. Many girls have guys approaching them on the streets or on social media making inappropriate comments often. Do your best to avoid being one of these kind of guys at all costs. A girl is unlikely to talk to you if she feels uncomfortable or if she feels that you only want her physically..   For example, avoid saying things like “hey baby” or “nice butt” to her. She may think these comments are strange or offensive. Avoid using cheesy pickup lines or making comments about her body.  Though this girl may be wonderful, you must remember that she is also probably looking to connect and make friends with people, too. Before you approach her, take some time to think about all of the good aspects about you, as well. If you are a loyal friend or a kind person, show those qualities to the girl when you speak to her, without being cocky or bragging., Confidence comes from experience, you cannot fake it or if you do, you can only fake for so long. Be honest with yourself and about yourself.   You are probably going to feel nervous to some extent. Accept it! Remember that she is just another person, do not put her on a pedestal or have any expectations when approaching her. Just be genuinely interested in what she has to say and let the conversation unfold as naturally as possible. Some ways that you can project confidence are to stand up straight and maintain eye contact with the girl., When you do approach her, don’t stammer over your words or mumble, even if you are nervous. Speak calmly, assuredly, and with earnest behavior. Most girls like boys who are confident when they speak and find it easier to have conversations with them.Speak slightly louder than you normally would if you have been told that you are soft spoken.Don’t overtalk her, either. Confidence is not about being the loudest or speaking the most. It might be best to let her do most of the talking. Try coming up with a list of open-ended questions to get her talking about herself. These are questions that do not have a simple yes and no answer. They invite elaboration. For example, you could ask her, “What do you like to do for fun?” or “How was your day?” This will help to show that you are a good listener and you can learn more about her in the process.  Don’t get caught up in thinking negatively about yourself or what could go wrong when you talk to her. Think positively and positive things will likely come to you. The girl will also likely feel this positivity from you and enjoy your spirit and personality. Most people don’t like hanging around people who are negative, so practice positivity before speaking to her.  Often times, lunch period can provide a great time for conversation because this is allotted free time during your school day. However, there are other times that work well, too. For instance, in the beginning of the school day, there is some time that you could make to speak to her. After class is another great time.   Speaking to her when she is around a large group of friends could be risky unless you are friends with some of them. Try to talk to her when she is alone or only with one or two friends.  After you have successfully began making small talk with her, you can now have an actual conversation. Ask her how her day is going to show that you are interested in her life. Most people enjoy talking about themselves, so she will likely welcome the opportunity and be flattered that you asked.   You can approach her and say something like “Hey, how’s your day going so far?”  , There is an old adage that says that “the way to a woman’s heart is to make her laugh”. If you don’t know her, making her laugh might be difficult since you aren’t aware of her sense of humor. However, you can work on picking out little funny things about your school that she is likely to find funny..   For instance, maybe your teacher does something that is funny to you like using the word “irregardless.” You could say something humorous like “I think it’s so funny how we have an English teacher who uses words that aren’t words!”  , Take some time when you talk to her to find out more about her as a person. If you don’t know her name, start there. If you don’t know what year she is, ask her if she’s the same year as you. She will gradually begin to open up and you can start asking more personal questions like “what do you like to do for fun?” or “what’s your favorite movie?”   Talk about yourself some, as well, but don’t overdo it. You don’t want to dominate the conversation. You might say something like “I’m in the 7th grade, too” or “I got into college and I’m really excited about it.” She will likely ask some questions about you, as well.  After establishing some rapport with her, you can pay her a small compliment. Don’t give compliments that are physical or that are overly detailed just yet. She may be put off by that and uncomfortable talking to you thereafter.   You might say something like “you’re really good at soccer” or “I saw you stick up for your friend to that bully. You’re a really nice friend, it seems.”  , If you have spoken with her several times, then you might try asking her to sit with you. For example, you can invite her to sit with you at lunch so you can talk some more. If she still wants to sit with her friends, don’t be pushy. You can try asking her again at a later time once you have had more conversations.   She may be intimidated to sit with you if you sit with a lot of your guy friends, so tell her that you two can sit alone if she likes.  The conversations with her don’t have to stop after this first real interaction. You can continue to speak to her after this, even when you are not at school. Ask her for her phone number and see if she’s okay with you calling or texting her sometimes.   Ask her something like “I really have enjoyed talking to you. Can I have your number so I can call or text you sometime?” She may prefer to give you her social media information. You can talk to her that way, as well. Her parents may be strict and may not allow her to talk to boys. If so, be respectful. You can still talk to her at school.  

stay calm.  smile.  greet her with a “hello”.  ask a favor.  ask a question.  make a small statement.  look your best.  try to make her comfortable.  focus on your positive attributes.  go easy on yourself.  speak assertively.  think positively.  find the best time to talk.  ask her about her day.  make her laugh.  find out more about her.  pay her a small compliment.  invite her to sit with you.  ask for her number. 

 Some people like to start their song by writing the lyrics, but if you’re not an experienced songwriter, it can be tricky to find a melody or track to fit those lyrics. Look for a beat that you like, then write the rest of the song to fit that beat. You should also consider using a slower beat if you are planning to write a love song that is sensual and sexy for your crush. Pay close attention to the melody and rhythm of the track and try to fit your lyrics into what’s already there. If your crush likes a certain genre of music, like pop or hip hop, you can also look for a backing track that falls within that genre.; , If you play an instrument or are musically inclined, you may be able to write the melody for the song yourself. Start by picking a simple chord progression, then build the melody for the song on top of that.Try strumming or playing the chord progression while vocally improvising a melody. Record your improvisation and listen to it back to see if there’s anything you want to keep. Start with a basic chord progression, like D-E-A or Am-F-C-G., Sometimes a melody will pop into your head, fully formed, but sometimes you have to work a little harder. Practice singing the melody of a hit song, then fooling around with the melody to make it your own.Change the pitches of the ghost melody to be higher or lower. Where the song usually rises, have the melody fall instead. Try syncopating the beat or adding pauses where there’s usually music.  The hook is the chorus of your song. Some beginning songwriters find it easier to write the hook first, then compose the rest of the lyrics. Familiarize yourself with the beat and melody of the song, then try to write the chorus to fit that beat and melody.Think of the hook as the thesis to your love song and try to sum up how you feel about your crush in a single statement. Brainstorm some ideas, then try to write the chorus based off those. You may write down a few keywords that come to mind when you think about your crush, such as “smart”, “strong”, “hot”, “brave”, or “sensual.” The lyrics for the chorus can be very simple like “Hit me baby one more time” or “Come on ride the train. Ride it!” You may combine a few keywords to create the chorus, “She’s smart, strong, and hot”, or “He’s brave, sensual, and strong.” Typically, the title of the song should also appear in the chorus.For example, if you use the chorus, “She’s smart, strong, and hot”, the song may be called “Smart, Strong, and Hot.”  , Part of what makes a good chorus is setting up and paying off a rhyme. There are many ways to set up the rhyming structure of your chorus and there’s no right or wrong way to go about doing it. Your options for the rhyming structure are:Repeat the same line at least three times. If you choose to do this, make sure the line is fun to say or sing. For example, you may repeat the line, “I think you’re great” three times. When writing a four line chorus, rhyme the first line to the third line and the second line to the fourth line. For example, you may have the lines: “I think you’re great/We would be so good together/You’re the perfect mate/I think we could be forever.” Make the first and third lines the same and make the second and fourth lines the same. For example, you may have the lines: “I think you’re great/We would be so good together/You’re the perfect mate/I think we could be something special.” Make the first three lines the same, then diverge from the pattern for the fourth line. For example, you may have the lines: “I think you’re great/The perfect mate/I can’t wait/For us to be together.” Make all four lines completely different. For example, you may have the lines: “I think you’re great/We would be so good together/You’re my ideal/I want to date you.”  , There are many different places a chorus can go within the confines of a song. Most people choose to alternate verses and choruses, but there is no hard and fast rule on this.Some songs repeat the chorus of the song over and over to help signify that the song is ending. If you choose to add a bridge, you’ll want to position an additional chorus after the bridge.  Your chorus will continue to reappear throughout the course of the song, so it’s important that the chorus be catchy enough that your crush will want to listen to it over and over again.Infuse the chorus with emotion to help show your crush how you really feel. You may talk about your feelings and emotions as well as the qualities that you appreciate in your crush. Another option is to write a chorus that sounds completely different from the rest of the verses. Try mixing up the rhythm or chord projections, changing keys or applying shifts in volume. If you know how, you can also add harmonies or instruments to enhance the chorus.  The verses will make up the majority of your song, so you want to use them to show your crush how you really feel about them. Brainstorm ideas by writing down your feelings, memories, or any moments you’ve spent with your crush that have made you happy.Read the writing out loud and look for keywords that stand out. Make a list of these words and use them as the foundation for your verse lyrics.  If you’ve ever written anything about your crush, you can use your previous writing in your song lyrics. Look back at old diary entries, texts, tweets or poems you’ve written to or about your crush.Try taking an individual line from something you’ve already written and building this into the verses of your song. You can also look at things your crush has written to or about you and mine those for inspiration.  Verses, like choruses, don’t always rhyme. If you want your verses to rhyme, check out a rhyming dictionary and look for places where you can change words to fit your rhyming pattern.Your words don’t always have to rhyme perfectly. Try using slant rhymes (like rhyming kiss and abyss). It’s better to have a song that doesn’t rhyme then to pick words that rhyme but don’t make sense in your song.  You are writing a love song for your crush only. You should try to make the lyrics specific to your crush, as this will make the song seem more genuine and heartfelt. Use personal experiences and details about your crush in the song.   You may include inside jokes that you both share, such as a funny moment at work or at school. You may mention the inside joke in your lyrics to add a nice personal touch to the song. You may also mention specific details or traits that you admire or like about your crush. Try mentioning a specific moment when you noticed this trait or detail, such as the time your crush helped you solve a problem on the computer, showing you that they are sexy and computer savvy. Or the time your crush helped you move into your new apartment, a moment where you realized your crush was strong and supportive.  Love songs can become familiar and generic very fast, as there are too many cliches out there about love. A cliche is a phrase that has become so familiar it loses its meaning. You should avoid cliches in your love song so it feels specific to your crush and makes the emotional impact you are hoping for.   For example, avoid familiar descriptions of love, like “my love is deep” or “my love is everlasting.” You should also avoid describing your feelings for your crush with cliche details, like “my heart cries for you” or “I want you so bad.” Instead, go for descriptions and details that feel unique and unfamiliar. Try describing your feelings for your crush in a funny and creative way, like “I like you more than cheese pizza and upside down cake” or “I think you’re cooler than anyone I know.” Make the lyrics fun and interesting so your crush gets drawn into your love song.  A bridge is used to break up a song – it’s a departure from the verses and chorus and can infuse a totally different feeling into a piece of music. Write lyrics for the bridge that are emotionally based and that heighten the feeling of love in your song.If you spend the entire song talking about how much you love your crush, use the bridge to describe the feeling you get when they’re not around. Build the energy throughout the bridge to help make your final chorus that much more powerful.  Since the bridge is meant to be a change from the rest of the song, you want to use the bridge’s melody to reflect that. Experiment with writing a new chord progression for the bridge.If the rest of the song is in a major key, switch to minor for the bridge. Borrow chord progressions from different keys for the bridge. Since the bridge is a heightening of the song, play around with setting the bridge in a higher key. End the bridge with an open chord or non-tonic chord.  Most songs are laid out like this: verse, chorus, verse, chorus, bridge, chorus. Your song does not have to follow this format, but you can definitely use it as a template as you construct the order of your song.Some songs include third verses. If you have a third verse, position the third verse after the bridge, but before the last chorus. If you only have two verses, repeat the chorus twice after the bridge to capitalize on the energy built in the bridge section.  

find a backing track.  write the melody yourself.  use a ghost melody to inspire the song.  start with a hook.  determine the rhyming structure.  put the choruses in order.  make the chorus memorable.  write down how you feel about your crush.  build on texts you’ve already written about your crush.  figure out the rhyming pattern.  make the verses personal and specific to your crush.  avoid cliche descriptions and details.  write the lyrics for the bridge.  switch up the melody in the bridge.  add the bridge to the song. 

 If they don't feel the same way, it's not the end of the world. You should feel proud that you had enough confidence to share your true feelings, and that you got the answers you were looking for, even if you didn't end up getting what you wanted. If your crush doesn't feel the same way, just say, "Cool, no problem," or "Thanks for listening to me anyway." Be polite and kind as you say goodbye -- don't make your crush feel worse by saying, "I knew this would happen," or "No one ever likes me back."   Remember that having the confidence to tell your crush how you feel will make you feel confident in your future relationships and choices.; , If your crush doesn't share your feelings, that's okay. If you are friends, then maybe you should take it easy for a while, but that doesn't mean you should run away or avoid them the next time you see them. Keep doing what you always do, and act happy to see your crush the next time you cross paths. Remember that your crush can't help how they feel, and just play it cool.  If your crush returns your feelings, then you should enjoy your feelings of giddiness and excitement. Be proud of yourself for sharing how you feel, and have fun hanging out with your crush or even dating them. You can take things slow and decide what you want to do next. Your crush will be impressed by your boldness and honesty, and will want to hang out with you as soon as possible.  

don't be disappointed if your crush doesn't share your feelings.  don't be weird about seeing your crush if you know they don't like you.  celebrate if your crush does like you. 

 Sure, you should look good when you plan to tell your crush how you feel. Just don't dress up to the nines if you normally rock a casual look, or put on a brand-new outfit if you're always seen in cozy clothes. You don't want your crush to think that you're trying too hard to send them the right message. Just try looking a bit more dressed up and well groomed than you normally do -- this will boost your confidence when you share your feelings.  If you want to get the best results, then you have to pick a time when you and your crush can be fairly alone in a stress-free environment. You may not want to do it between classes, when your crush may be caught off guard or worried about the math test they have to take next period. Instead, pick a time when you know you can be alone, like after school, or at a group event when you know you can pull them away to chat for a while.  Don't make a big deal about it -- make it sound like you could be asking for help with your homework or something. Let your crush know that you wanted to talk about something in a one on one setting, but that there's not a lot of pressure to have a serious conversation. The more casual you can be without making it sound too casual, the better. Just say, "Hey, I wanted to talk to you about something after school, do you have a minute?"  , You shouldn't immediately spit out the words, "I like you!" because your crush may still be a little uncomfortable or confused about why you're alone. Instead, put them at ease by making a silly joke, poking fun at yourself, or laughing extra hard at something they say. Laughing will put your crush in a positive frame of mind, and it'll make them more receptive to whatever you want to say.  There's no need to delay. Once you're alone and have made your crush comfortable, you should just tell them how you feel. The sooner you do it, the better, and the less likely you'll be to make yourself more nervous or likely to ramble on about something unrelated. Just be simple and direct. Say, "I wanted to tell you that I have a crush on you" or "I really like hanging out with you, and I want you to know that I have feelings for you."   When you tell your crush, look them in the eye and relax your body. Don't stand too close to them or look at the floor, or you'll look either too eager or too withdrawn. Use your crush's name when you tell them how you feel. "Michael, there's something I want to tell you..." sounds more personal than just saying, "I want to tell you something." Don't build up to the thing you have to say too much. This will only put pressure on yourself.  Don't immediately put pressure on your crush and say, "So what do you think?" It's likely that your crush is thrown off guard and needs some time to consider your words, whether they share your feelings or not. Take a few deep breaths, step back, and wait for your crush to respond. Your crush may immediately say that they return your feelings, but it's more likely that your crush may need more time and will say, "Cool, thanks for telling me," or "Can I have some time to think about it?" That's perfectly natural. If you want to increase the chances of your crush liking you, you should play it cool after you put your cards on the table.  

look your best without being too obvious about it.  pick the right time and place to do it.  tell your crush that you want to talk about something.  make your crush feel comfortable by laughing or making a joke.  spit it out.  wait for a reaction. 

 Though telling your crush in person will make you look more confident and mature, and saying it over the phone is sort of the worst way to do it, if you're really shy about telling your crush how you feel, then calling them and revealing your feelings is the next best bet. Just say hello, make them comfortable with a joke or casual comment, say, "I wanted to tell you something," and then reveal your feelings.   Talking over the phone will make you feel less nervous because you won't see your crush face to face. Still, if you're nervous, you can pace back and forth to get rid of some of that nervous energy. If you're determined to tell your crush how you feel over the phone, you can also practice by calling one of your friends and rehearsing what you'd say first.  Putting a cute note in your crush's locker, textbook, or backpack that tells them that you like them can be a nice way to tell them how you really feel. Just write something like, "Hi, Mark, I just wanted to tell you that I like you." Having your crush find the note at the right time can be a pleasant surprise -- just make sure the note will be easy to find.  If you're too nervous about saying, "I like you," you can sidestep the situation by just asking your crush to hang out. You can simply say you have extra tickets to a movie or a show and invite your crush along, ask your crush if they're hungry or want to grab a snack or coffee somewhere, or ask if they want to go for a walk in the park. Asking them to hang out solo will make your feelings pretty obvious, so you can let your crush do more of the work when he figures it out.  There are a few things you should avoid doing if you want to tell your crush that you like them and get the best results. Here are some things you should avoid if you want to look confident and mature:   Don't have your friends tell them how you feel. If you want to look mature, you have to do it yourself. Don't do it over Facebook. This will make you look like you're not serious or confident enough to have the conversation in person. Don't be too eager when you tell your crush how you feel. A simple "I like you" is far more effective and far less likely to scare them off than saying, "I've been in love with you since the second grade..."  

tell your crush how you feel over the phone.  tell your crush how you feel with a cute note.  ask them on a casual date.  know what not to do. 

 The best time to do this is when you're in the middle of a really great conversation. Drop the request in really casually and make it seem really low pressure.   Say something simple, like "Hey, why don't we trade cell numbers? By the way, I just got an iPhone. What kind of phone do you have?" The moment after a phone number exchange can be a little awkward. Make sure that you don't miss a beat. Keep the conversation flowing so that the number exchange seems completely natural.; ,   Before you send your first message have a plan of what you are going to say or what you want to achieve by the end of the conversation.  A simple "What are you doing?" or "What are you up to?" is a good conversation starter.   If your crush replies that he or she is watching television, listening to music or playing a game, reply by asking about what they're watching, listening to or playing. Whatever your crush says, you want to be ready with a follow-up question to keep the conversation flowing. Your crush may say something along the lines of, "I'm doing my homework." In reply, you can say something like "We got loads, didn't we? Mine took ages to finish!" Or if your crush doesn't go to your school you could say, "Oh poor you! Ha, did you get a lot?" Tell your crush what you're up to as well. When your crush texts you letting you know what he or she is doing, send a reply like, "That's cool. I'm just checking Facebook" or whatever else you're actually doing at the time.  Look for clues in the conversation to see whether the person is enjoying texting back and forth, whether the person has had enough of the conversation or whether you're ready to step it up and ask your crush on a date.   If the answers to your texts are really short or clipped, then you should probably text back something like, "Okay, catch you later," or "See you later alligator." (Cute texting move)Don't read too much into it. The person could be really busy or in a bad mood. Just make sure that you don't make yourself look desperate or needy by trying to push a conversation when it isn't happening. When your crush responds by asking you questions, like "What are you doing?" then you know that he or she wants to keep talking. Just let the conversation flow naturally. However, make sure they are the one to end the conversation. Be talkative and forward. Look for chances to take it to the next level. If the conversation starts to get intense or veers to really personal subjects, or if your crush starts to confide in you about a problem, then you can say, "Why don't you call me so that we can talk? I want to get together sometime, maybe." Be bold. If you know the time is right, ask your crush on a date. If they reject there are plenty of fish in the sea!  , If the reply is something like "Okay, I guess" or "Pretty normal," you could ask what he or she thought of the homework, the science experiment you did, the geography project you've been assigned, the book report due in next week or the exams that are coming up soon.    If you're texting your crush just before Christmas or right before his or her birthday, then ask your crush about the plans he or she has for celebrating. If you're texting the person just after a holiday, send a text that says, "Hey, did you have a good birthday? Get anything special?" Learn about holidays that you don't celebrate. For example, if your crush celebrates Hanukkah while you celebrate Christmas, ask questions to learn what his or her holiday is about. Text your crush around New Year's Day and ask if the person made any New Year's resolutions. Share your resolutions back.  Your crush could be complaining about a sibling, or maybe your crush has an older sibling who is headed off to college. If you have siblings yourself, say something like, "I can relate to the problems you're having with your sister. My sister drives me crazy." You can also ask questions about parents or even about pets.    If your crush is on the tennis team, ask how his or her latest match went. If your crush has other interests like band, school newspaper or academic extracurriculars, then ask what he or she has been up to lately in some of these activities. Has your crush recently been in a competition of some sort? Was the person on a winning quiz bowl team or did he or she get a part in the school play? Text the person to say "Congratulations."  , Maybe your crush had a bad exam grade, lost an important game or experienced something really sad, like the death of a pet or family member. Send the person a text saying something like, "I'm so sorry to hear what happened. How are you holding up?"  , With a text, you have 160 characters to send a great message. You don't have to reply to your crush's text instantaneously. Deliver a response after you've had some time to think about it.  Make sure that you have an unlimited texting plan or that you are tracking the number of texts that you send carefully. You don't want you or your parents to get a nasty surprise when the cell phone bill arrives., Abbreviations can make you look shallow and flighty. Save the abbreviations for your BFFs and use complete sentences and capitalization when you text your crush.  Smilies or sad faces are okay, but you need to be pretty certain that your crush likes you back before using a flirty emoticon. Definitely be at least 99% sure that he/she likes you before using a love emoticon.  Don't text him/her too often. Texting once or twice a week is good enough. You don't want to look desperate.  

get your crush's phone number.  have a plan!,  send your first text.  observe how your crush acts.  text your crush and ask, "what did you think of school today?",  use holidays and celebrations as conversation starters.  ask questions about his or her family.  talk to your crush about his or her hobbies.  text something sympathetic.  take your time.  avoid racking up phone charges.  skip the abbreviations.  use emoticons with caution.  make sure your crush starts the conversation at some point. 

 Do they seem to get more tense when they realize you're in the same room? Do they cross their legs towards you and keep their shoulders pointed at you at the same time? Do they try to appear good-looking? Do they every so often take a look in your direction to see if you're looking at them? If so, it could be a good sign that they're into you. Small things like this often can mean more than what it seems.   Another good sign is if you notice them hanging around you even though you're not having a conversation with them. Looking straight into your eyes (although they may be a little nervous doing so) means they're paying attention to you. If you feel like they are looking deep into your eyes, that could also be a sign. Most of the time, if a crush likes you, they'll jump at the opportunity to help you. Even with small things, they'll always be there to help out with your problems (especially if you ask). Do they sometimes show off and tell jokes around you to make you laugh? Do they look straight at you when they deliver the punchline? How do you feel around them?; , Do they ever tell you about something special they're doing, such as reading a book or playing a sport, out of the blue? Does He/She tell you secrets and random stories about their day? They might be trying to impress you.   Do they give you semi-personal information when you didn't ask for it? Giving people personal information is a sign that they trust you or want you to give them personal information back. Do they talk about their family, their ex, or about the past? These topics are all things people are usually pretty guarded about. If your crush is letting you in on them, it may be a sign.  Whether or not it's conscious, someone who likes you (more often girls) will generally find excuses to touch you.   They might put their hand on your shoulder, or accidentally walk into you in the halls, or wipe something random off your face. Do they tickle you or tease with their hands? Do they ask you for piggybacks, or throw random things at you in an effort to get your attention? Even gestures that don't seem playful or nice might mean they're attracted to you. Lots of people understand that their body language is giving them away, and try to make the body language mean or impersonal. Do they hit you lightly or play pranks on you? It might mean that they want attention from you, and they're trying to get it without telegraphing their true feelings.  Do you ever see them looking at you when they think you cannot see them? If you catch him/her looking at you and you look back, do they look away? If they do, that could be a sign of nervousness.   On the other hand, do they always avoid looking at you, no matter what? Not looking at someone might mean they're trying to keep their crush secret and don't want you to know. Get a trusted friend to look at them during class or at recess; have the friend see whether your crush looks at you, and for how long. If they're constantly staring in your direction for minutes at a time, they're really crushing hard.  Are they more shy or attentive around, or when talking to you, than with other people?   If they're normally a super-confident person, and the sight of you turns them into blabbering mush, it's a pretty good sign they like you (especially if they're nervously playing with their hands). Be careful, however, because shy people are usually shy all the time. You could misread whether your crush actually likes you. So it's best to use this information along with the other steps when you're making the call about whether or not they like you.  Does it seem that they make it a point to happen to be near you or walk back and forth in front of you? Then it means that they are trying to get your attention, but in a very discreet way.   Does their voice get louder when they're talking to other people around you? It could be a sign that they want you to listen or pay attention to them. Do they make little excuses to be around you? Do they ask you for the homework problems, or sit next to you in class, or pick you to be on their team for recess sports? It could mean something!  , If they act like a gentleman or gentlewoman to you, it's often a sign that they like you.   Does he or she open the door for you or give you parts of their lunch that they usually never give to other people? Does he or she stick up for you when you get in a fight or when someone badmouths something you're doing? Do they say to their friends," Stop saying bad things about him/her!"? Does he or she suddenly get along with a lot of your friends that they used to not care about? Do they constantly look at you during class periods you have with them?  , 

look at their body language when they're around you.  notice what information they give you.  pay attention to physical contact.  find out how often they look at you.  figure out their shyness around you.  notice how often they're around you.  find out how much they respect you.  during class, eye contact during a conversation is very important, if he or she does this, they are paying full attention to you and only you in a crowd full of other kids or even friends.  

 Plan out what you want to write, how you want to express it, what you're going to write on, etc. You simply can't say that you like them and leave it at that. Write some rough drafts until you get an idea of what to say.; , Ink pen or pencil, along with paper, of course! Additionally, you can get some stickers together to add some style to your note. Heart stickers are always a good option! A good idea for your note is to use red or pink paper to remind your crush about Valentine's Day!  , Fold the paper the way you want, add the stickers, whatever you want! Try to add little details that are romantic to set the mood.  Use your best handwriting! No one wants a note that they cannot read due to such sloppy handwriting. Be nice and write nicely so your crush doesn't have to strain their eyes to read your poor penmanship.  Would you like to stick it in their locker, have a friend pass it to them, or drop it off as you say your daily hello to them? Either way, find out a way to give it to them and stick to your plan.  You only live once. You never know, your crush could like you back. If you back out now and they DID like you, their feelings will soon fade off if they get the impression that you do not feel the same way. Also, it's not like writing them a note looks like a lame way to confess your feelings. It's a perfectly normal way to do it.  They might not feel the same way, but it's always nice to know that you don't have to worry about holding in your feelings forever.  If they say they don't feel the same way, then respect them for that. You can't expect someone to like you back just because you like them! If they do feel the same way, try asking them to meet up with you sometime. Wink when you suggest it so they get the right idea.  

think of what you have to say, first.  gather up your supplies.  assemble your note.  write your note inside of the paper.  find out a way to give the note to your crush.  do not back out.  give them the note and wait for a reply.  brace yourself for rejection. 

 It'll only be embarrassing for both of you if others are around and even more so if your crush rejects you. You could have a friend waiting in the wings to give you courage and be there for you afterward but don't have this person anywhere near you and your crush when you decide to talk.   Wait for a time when you're not in a group or surrounded by others. Be sure things won't be rushed. Don't leave it till the bell is about to ring.; , Don't do the whole "I have something terribly serious" routine. It is an immediate giveaway and also suggests that you are a bit clingy or dramatic, which could frighten off your prospective date. Instead, find the right moment and just say: "Can we have a chat... alone?" and suggest that you sit somewhere pleasant.   Ensure that the spot is comfortable and sufficiently private before talking.  If you're at the point of explaining your feelings, it'll mean you've already done the soul searching and deep thinking. Now is the time for action. Be confident and start with some small talk to ease yourself into the situation, asking how school is, what the weekend's plans are, etc.  There is no one single right way to explain it, that's up to you and how you'd like to express it. The main thing is to get to the point, to keep it simple and to avoid gushing. Here are some possible ways to open up:   "I have a crush on you. I was just wondering if you feel the same way, do you? If you don't I will completely understand". "I like you. I'd love to go on a date with you some time soon." "We've been hanging out together for a long time now. My feelings for you are deeper than friendship and I wanted to tell you I've been crushing on you for a while now. I hope you feel the same way too."  , He or she will either be receptive to your admission or a little taken aback. If they are of the same mind and tell you so, be happy and suggest the chance for a date. If not, well, at least you've expressed yourself and know the reality of the situation. However, give things some time; remember that your crush may be someone who needs time to digest things. Here are some suggested replies:   If he/she says yes, be happy and give them a hug. Say: "Thanks for letting me know you feel the same way too. It'll be much easier not having to keep my feelings to myself!" And you can suggest a first date. If he/she says no, be polite and kind. Say "Oh, that's okay, I understand. We have different feelings and that's okay, I just wanted to let you know what I felt. I'm sorry if I've surprised you, it'll all be okay." Then suggest you stay good friends and let things be as they've always been. Head off to find your friend for moral support. If you do get rejected, be polite enough to never speak of it again. Rejection is part of life, gossiping about or maligning the other person doesn't make it any better. Just let it go; there is someone else out there for you.  

talk to your crush alone.  keep it simple and friendly.  come out with what you want to say.  explain your feelings for your crush.  wait for your crush's response. 

 There are many different levels and types of attraction. In some cases, your feelings may not be strong enough to warrant moving forward with them; in other situations it's better to wait a while and see. If you feel you really want to admit your feelings however, you owe it to yourself to follow through with it.; , It's probably not the sort of thing you want to be thinking about realistically when you first become attracted to someone, but it is nonetheless important to consider just how likely your crush is to return your feelings. Has he shown you any signs of attraction beyond friendship, or has he turned you away whenever things have gotten personal?Weighing the risk of telling your feelings is important if you don't want to risk the friendship.   You can do more harm than good by letting a friend know your real feelings, especially if the whole thing is approached incorrectly.  Finding out about your crush's other potential interests is an important part of weighing your own chances. Letting someone know you have feelings for him is a big risk, especially if you really value the existing relationship you share together. With that in mind, it's a good idea to make sure someone hasn't beaten you to the chase before going in yourself. Even if someone might be interested in you otherwise, there's very little chance he'll strike up a relationship if he's actively pursuing someone else at the time.   Note the difference between real interest and passing attraction. If your friend has called a member of the opposite sex 'good-looking' or even 'hot', that doesn't necessarily mean he's wanting to date them. On the contrary, he may even be testing you to see if you'll react when he says something like that.  If your crush likes you, chances are you'll be able to sense it on some level. Does he go out of his way to shower you with attention and compliments? If your crush is a girl, does she avert her gaze a lot when she's around you, or laugh and smile more than usual when you're talking to her?   Not only will sensing mutual attraction give you a better idea of what your potential chances are, knowing the attraction is there will make you feel more confident when it comes time to admit your feelings.  Even if the two of you are both attracted to one another, admitting attraction is bringing new business into your relationship, and it should be avoided for the time being if you still have current issues to attend to.   If you had a recent fight as friends, it would be a good idea to hold off on admitting your feelings until the dust has settled and you've resolved your current differences. If you're starting a relationship together, you want to get it started off on the right foot.  Could you imagine someone admitting they have a crush on you if you were in the middle of going through a family tragedy? Even if you had feelings in return for that person, you wouldn't be able to deal with it at the time. Knowing when to strike is a key part of making the approach work., 'Dressing up' doesn't have to mean getting glamorous or ritzy. What it does mean, however, is that you should put slightly more effort into your appearance than you usually do.This isn't so much for your crush's benefit as for your own. We always feel our most confident when we're looking our best. If this means taking an extra few minutes to soak up steam in the shower, or wearing your favourite shirt, then so be it. In the end, you want to do everything you can to set your mind at rest.   Although confidence-boosting is the biggest reason why you should try to look good, it goes without saying that your crush is all that more likely to accept you if you put some added effort into your appearance!  , While it goes to show other people that you're feeling confident, using body language like good posture, eye contact and smiling will serve to make you feel even more confident. Even before you meet up with your crush, you should try making a habit of expressing confident body language. You should notice a firm change in the way you feel before too long.  A relationship is a two-way street, and both sides need to be getting something out of it. That means you should have a good idea what you'll be bringing into a relationship if it works out in your favour. Start by making a list of things you love most about yourself. Which of these things would benefit a relationship? Do you love your smile? Your crush probably does too. Do you like to laugh? Are you really clever or funny? Now's not the time to be modest!   Reflect upon this list and try to imagine how happy you could make the other person. If you know you have a lot to offer, you'll feel more confident when it comes time to admit your feelings.If you need any help thinking up things, you should try talking to a friend (who isn't your crush) about what things most stand out about you.  The worst injury anyone can cause their chances of starting a relationship with their crush is by doubting themselves. When you self-doubt, it shows in the way you act and carry yourself. You won't be able to act casual if you're worried about 'what-if' situations as you close in.Taking a deep breath is a helpful way to calm your nerves if they're acting up on you. It will take the edge off the stress, and give you a respite from the physical anxiety. Positive self-talk works as well. For example, try thinking something along these lines to yourself: "I have nothing to fear. I am worth my crush's time. Everything's going to work out just the way I want it." Keep telling yourself that until you start believing it. Whether you think it's plausible or not, positive self-talk tends to be a self-fulfilling prophecy, as the confidence you'll gain from it will have a major impact on how the interaction plays out.  It's becoming more and more common for people to confess their crushes online, or via text message. Talking through a screen will work in a pinch, but it robs the conversation of its full importance. Because so many of the signs of attraction come across through body language, you'll stifle your chances by keeping it online.Ask your crush out by saying something like "Hey-- I was thinking of going to the beach sometime this weekend. Would you be interested in coming with?" Keep it casual; admitting your feelings doesn't have to be the main point of hanging out with them. If you enjoy their company enough, it won't feel out of place to get together.  A big mistake many people make when it comes to approaching their crushes is that they put too much weight on the act. If the experience of being around you is extremely serious and sombre, your crush isn't exactly going to be open to starting a relationship with you, even if he's already attracted to you.A casual hangout could be anything from going to the mall or rock concert, to something quieter like the park or beach. Activities that limit interaction like a movie aren't as well suited for something like this, as it won't give you near as much opportunity to confess your feelings. Going to dinner is a very common type of casual hangout. If you go for food, the type of restaurant you go to will help decide the type of atmosphere. Something ritzy and formal may be inauthentic if you're not used to going to fancy restaurants. Go somewhere the two of you will feel comfortable and relaxed.  Eye contact is a way of making the emotions feel real; a lot of unconscious communication goes on with eye contact. Suffice to say, holding your crush's gaze while you admit your feelings will keep him focused on what you're saying.   Make a point of holding eye contact when your crush is speaking to you. Hold your crush's gaze while you admit your feelings. It may be appropriate to look away after you have confessed and are waiting for a response. Averting your gaze may help your crush to relax while he prepares a response.  Wait until you feel very comfortable with your crush to let him know how you feel.This is the point you've been waiting for, at it's probably pretty likely you're feeling frazzled at the thought of it. But worry not-- actually telling your crush is in itself a fairly simple action. With solid eye contact in place, tell your crush how you feel. Express it in simple terms, so that there's no room for interpretation. If you try to dress it up, you'll only distract from the point you're trying to make. Stay confident, and treat the experience like a positive thing.   You can list some reasons why you like them as well if you'd like. Use the following as an example: "You know, I don't know if it's already totally obvious, but I really like you. In a way that's more than a friend. I hope you feel the same way about me too."  , One method that tends to work fairly well is actually not to say anything at all. Instead, expressing your feelings non-verbally can say as much as any number of words. While a non-verbal expression will usually be followed by some confirmation that you do have real feelings for this person, letting your feelings through in a more subtle way can be a perfect way to break the ice.Physical touching is risky if your existing relationship has never included it, but it's much more likely to succeed if you go into it with confidence in yourself. Something as light as reaching for their hand, or more bold like a direct kiss, will leave little room for interpretation that you're interested. Giving a gift also works, especially if you're a male in pursuit of a female. Gift-giving is often seen as chivalrous, and definitely pushes past the boundaries of 'just friends' provided the gift is special enough. Buying flowers is a good place to start if you can't think of something more specific, but it's always best to pick out a gift that really relates to the specific connection and experiences you've shared together.Non-verbal ways of expressing your feelings are always best accompanied with some sort of verbal affirmation. Don't just take her hand or give her a gift; let her know exactly why you've done that, and make it clear the ball's now in her court.  Now that you've made your feelings known to your crush, it's time to go into a bit more detail as to where you'd like your relationship to go. Simply telling someone you're attracted to him isn't an end unto itself; if you see it going anywhere, you should arrange plans to see one another on a more regular, romantic basis, provided that's what you're looking for. Be specific about what you want.You might try formally asking your crush on a first date. Try saying something like "If you agree that there's something special between us, maybe you'd be interested in going out with me sometime? It would be great to get a chance to get to know each other on a deeper level." Gauging by the reaction of your crush as you told him your feelings, you should have a better idea whether things are going to work out.  The anticipation and nerve-wracking nature of admitting your feelings to someone is rarely about how you're going to do it, but the ways in which you think the other person might react. If you've admitted your feelings and possibly expressed clear intentions, the other person is bound to have some sort of response in store for you. Whether it's a positive or negative one will depend on the success of your advance, and the feelings they've had (or haven't had) for you all along. All the same, it is necessary you give your crush some time to properly respond to you.Stay calm throughout. Even in the worst reactions, it's better to keep a brave face and remain strong rather than let your emotions get the best of you. Breaking down into tears was never a good look on anyone.  If you get news you don't want to hear, it's important to remember that it's not the end of the world. As hard as it is to believe at the time, you'll feel much better about it as times goes on, and possibly even realize that you were better off without taking things to the next level. Even so, doing some damage control is often the best next step. Let your crush know that you care about him as a friend still, and you don't want to lose the friendship. Take some time to yourself if you feel you need to heal.Remind your crush that you care about him on multiple levels and aren't purely trying to get a relationship out of him. For example, you can say: "I know this might change things for us, but I want you to know I really value having you as a friend, and I don't want to lose you, even if you don't feel the same way about me."  

figure out your own feelings first.it's important to first ask yourself whether your feelings are really strong enough to warrant taking things to the next level.  consider your chances.  find out if your crush is already interested in somebody else.  check your crush for signs of attraction.signs of attraction, whether conscious or unconscious, will usually shine through in a given interaction, even if it's just a friendship on the surface level so far.  make sure there are no outstanding issues in your current friendship.  make sure your lives are relatively stable.  dress your best.  use confident body language.confident body language is a positive vicious cycle.  make a list of reasons why you would be great for your crush.  stay calm and upbeat.  ask your crush to meet up with you.  hang out casually.  make eye contact.exhibiting all forms of positive, confident body language is an important trick when it comes to attracting someone, but nothing's quite as important as holding eye contact while you admit romantic feelings to your crush.  tell your crush how you feel.  express your feelings non-verbally.  express your intentions.  let your crush respond.  work damage control, if necessary. 

 The way he talks to you can say a lot about his real feelings for you. The next time you hang out, pay attention to his tone and the level of attention he gives you when you speak. Here are some ways to see if he likes you just based on how you talk to each other:   See if he makes eye contact. Is he giving you his full attention, or looking around the room for something better to do? Is he breaking eye contact occasionally but smiling because he feels shy around you? See if he's giving you his full attention when he talks to you. Is he checking his phone and stopping to talk to other people? If so, then he may not be trying to impress you. But if he talks to you like you're the only person in the world, then he may have a big crush on you. See if he tries to impress you. Does he tell stories that make him look strong, funny, or adventurous? If so, then he probably wants to catch your eye. See if he talks more softly when he’s around you. This may be his way of telling you to lean in to get closer.; , If the guy has you firmly planted in his friend zone, then he'll talk to you differently than he would if he was trying to impress you and make you see him as more than a friend. You should pay attention not only to how he talks to you, but to what he chooses to talk about.   See if he reveals personal information. If he's opening up to you about trouble with his friends or family, then he values your opinion and likes you. But if he's opening up to you about a new girl he likes, then you may have a problem. See if he mentions his childhood. This is pretty private for most guys, and if he opens up about it, then he’s definitely trying to get closer to you. See if he compliments you. If he tells you that you look nice, or finds subtle ways to let you know you're interesting or funny, then he may be falling for you. See if he teases you. If he feels comfortable enough around you to tease you, then he might like you. See if he tries to be more refined around you. If you notice him burping, cursing, and being generally a little bit gross around his bros, but find him never cursing and speaking in a measured and polite way around you, then he's trying to impress you.  If he talks to you about other girls, it'll be for one of two reasons. Either he likes you and wants to make you jealous, or he just sees you as a friend and wants your advice. Here's how to find out what it means when he tells you about other ladies:   If he's always complaining about women he's dating or says, "None of them are what I'm looking for," then he may be hinting that you're the one. If he always asks you for romantic advice no matter who he's dating, then he may see you as a friend. If he says that you give the best advice, he may not be looking at you as more than a friend. If he's always talking about his latest conquest but not asking for advice, he could just be showing off to win you over. But be careful - you don't want to end up being just another number in his little black book. If he ever compares a girl to you unfavorably by saying something like, “She’s cool, but she’s not nearly as funny as you,” then he’s telling you he’d rather be dating you instead.  

notice how he talks to you.  notice what he talks about.  see how he talks about other girls. 

 Letting him/her have a basic knowledge of you will heighten the chances that he/she will say yes when you ask him/her. If your crush barely knows you at all, he/she will be less likely to agree and he/she might get a little scared.  If he/she declines, try one of the methods again on a different person.  

before the big event comes up, make sure you have established a good relationship with your crush.  try one of the below methods on your crush. 

 Almost all friends hang out, and often it'll just be one-on-one. If your friend has been suggesting lots of one-on-one hangouts, that's extremely common for both close friends and for flirty romances, and not necessarily a sign of a romance. But, if you've noticed that it's happening a lot lately, or more than usual, it might be a sign your friend likes you.   If your friend doesn't want to hang out with other people when you're hanging out together, that could definitely be a sign.; , You might see your friends often, but if you feel the need to check in with this person all the time, every single day, there might be a lot more there than a regular old friendship. Does your day feel incomplete if you don't talk to your friend? Do you miss your friend, even if you're just apart for the after-school period of the day?   Keep in mind texting as well. If you're regularly having never-ending text conversations, we're talking hundreds of messages a day, then you might like each other., Going for coffee, just the two of you? Going to dinner, or for long walks in the evenings? Are they going out of their way to invite you to something you love, but they don't care much about? That's a sure sign that your friend is showing you that you matter to them, a lot. Maybe they like you more than a friend.  If your friend likes you, they may start touching you more. While some people are naturally "hands-on," an increase in physical contact is almost always a sign of romantic interest. You may find that they're doing it to test your boundaries, like dipping your toe in the water to find out how cold it is. If you notice that it's happening quite frequently, it's a big sign.   If the contact makes you uncomfortable, then say something about it. It's never ok to touch someone inappropriately and out of the blue if you're not interested.  If they are giving you very personal gifts, such as poems, songs, or things that you specifically like, your friend may be trying to get a message across in big bold letters: I Like You.   Personal gifts and hand-made items are usually signs of romantic interest. Mix CDs? Huge sign of a crush.  Some people are just naturally flirty. The barista, the server, the bus driver might all be flirted with in the course of a day for the naturally flirtatious. Of course, you may find that your platonic relationship has suddenly turned flirty on a regular basis, where it wasn't before. They may not be so subtle or shy about their crush on you.   If your friend is paying you a lot of compliments, or making cheeky little flirty comments, it's a safe bet that they like you and are interested.  If your friend tells you everything–like, everything–then it's a pretty good sign that you've got a more-than-friends relationship. You might talk to friends about school, and your sports team, and other normal stuff. But if you're regularly talking to someone about your dreams, your hopes, your fears, and your deepest kind of stuff? That might be a sign that there's more going on there.Having deep conversations is also something that happens between very close friends. If you're just having good conversations but don't notice any other signs, it's not necessarily a sign of anything more.  If you're just friends with someone, there's not usually any reason to feel nervous about anything. If your friend seems to be suddenly anxious to be around you, that could be a sign that you're becoming more than a friend to them. Try to pay attention to their body language and their level of nervousness.  Does your friend seem to be making an extra effort at looking good in your presence? If you made plans to walk around the mall, but your friend looks like they're done up for a date, it might be because they think they're going on one.   Pay especially close attention to things like hair product, make-up, and fancy clothes. If your friend is putting in the extra effort, you'll notice.  Try bringing up a current crush that you've got. Even if you have to make it up, bring up the concept of dating someone else and see how your friend reacts. If they like you, they may get jealous, or become kind of down. They may make fun of the person you say you've got a crush on. This is all a sign that they're interested.   Ask your friend about their current crushes. If they get embarrassed or don't want to talk about it, it might be because their crush is sitting in your chair.  If you're wondering whether or not your friend likes you more than a friend, it might be because you're feeling those feelings yourself. But it can be hard to tell the difference sometimes. What's the difference between wanting to hang out with someone a lot and wanting to be "more"? Maybe nothing! All relationships move at different paces, and it can be hard to tell.   Do you think about your friend more your other crushes or love interests? If so, you might be having deeper feedings. Are you attracted to your friend physically? If so, you might like them, but you also might like them even if you never really noticed them before. You might like what you've gotten to know on the inside.  If you've noticed some signs that your friend might have a crush on you, it's important to give some thought to the way that you feel before you do anything about it. Decide what you'll do for either outcome, before you actually do anything.   Assume the answer is "yes," and that your friend likes you. Do you feel the same way? Would you like your friendship to be more than just a friendship? Assume the answer is "no," and that your friend doesn't like you. Might bringing it up make your friend uncomfortable? If you do like your friend and would like to be more, do you think talking about it might harm the friendship you do have.  The best and fastest way to find out if your friend likes you is to just ask. If you've noticed more than a couple of the signs listed in the previous section, there's a good chance that your friend might like you. Sit them down, say, "We've been spending a lot of time together. I just noticed and I started wondering – Do you like me? Do you want to be more than friends?"Even if they don't like you, if your friend is a true and caring friend, they won't be offended if you ask, or if you talk about whether or not you want to be more than "just" friends. If you think your friendship might suffer, and you're not interested in being a couple, then you might consider not asking. Don't worry about whether or not they like you and just continue being friends.  If you've noticed some signs of attraction, but you're just not sure, then ask around. Talk to a trusted mutual friend who knows both of you equally. Say something gentle and kind, like, "I've noticed that ___ seems to be paying a lot of attention to me lately. Do you think there's something there?"   Asking around doesn't mean "spreading rumors." Don't tell people that your friend likes you if you haven't talked to them first.  If you suspect they do like you, and you like them back, then tell them. Take a chance! You never know where it could take you. And if you don't like them, and they are making you uncomfortable, it's also important to tell them. You don't deserve to feel uncomfortable, and your friend probably doesn't want you to feel uncomfortable either.   Even if you don't like them back, it can be good to clear the air and be honest with one another. If you're made uncomfortable by your friend's advances, it might be important to spend some time apart for a while.  If your friend does like you and you don't, or vice versa, it might make it hard to keep hanging out like you have been. It's sad to think that your friendship might suffer, but in some cases, it's important to spend a little time apart so you can stay friends in the long-term.   In some cases, if your feelings are strong enough, it might be hard to stay friends like you used to be, if you feel differently about each other. You may find yourselves naturally moving apart from each other. That's ok. It's a big part of growing up.  

you hang out most often, just the two of you.  you see each other every day.  your hangouts are getting more intimate.  you have lots of physical contact.  you're receiving gifts.  there's lots of flirting.  you don't have any conversational limits.  your friend acts nervous around you.  your friend seems to dress up around you.  your friend gets jealous.  you like your friend.  decide how you feel.  just ask.  ask your mutual friends for advice.  tell them how you feel.  spend some time apart, if you're uncomfortable. 

 His body language can be a big factor in showing you if he wants to get closer to you, or if he just sees you as a buddy. If he puts his arm around you, you need to know it's because he likes you, not because he's just palling around. Here are some ways to see if his body language means he likes you as more than a friend:   Notice how he sits next to you. Does he always try to move closer until your knees touch, or is he sitting miles away? Try to see if you can catch him stealing a glance in your direction. If you catch his eye and he even blushes and looks away, then he knows he's been caught! See if he's always looking for excuses to touch you. Does he get physical if you're playing a friendly game of volleyball or soccer, and does he always ask you to be his partner when it's time for chicken fights in the pool? See if his body is directed towards you when you speak. Does he stand with his body towards you and his arms gesturing or at his sides? If so, then he wants to give you all of his attention. See how he touches other girls. Does he put his arm around every girl, or only you? See if he ever gently pats your hand, even when he’s joking. This is a very intimate gesture, and it may show that he really likes you.  He may just be a really good friend, or all of those favors he's doing for you may mean something more. Notice all of the things he does for you and think about what they mean. Here's how to tell:   See if he's being very thoughtful. Does he bring you coffee when you're having an intense study session, or get tickets for a movie you hinted that you want to see? If so, then he's probably hanging on to your every word and just wants to make you happy. See if he does nice things for everyone. Is he just "Mr. Nice Guy" and loves giving rides and buying lunch for everyone in town, or does he do these things for only you? Remember, if he likes you, then he'll treat you differently than everybody else. If he helps you out with your chores, like doing your laundry, then he definitely wants to be your boyfriend. If he offers to help you with your car, he's not just being friendly - he wants you to be impressed by his manliness.  You need to check out how he talks to other girls to see if he treats them just like he treats you, or if he thinks you're special to him. You don't have to stare or stalk to get a sense of how he treats others and to have a sense of where you stand with him.   See if he's a perpetual flirt. Does he flirt with every girl in the room, or only you? Remember, he may still like you if he flirts with other girls, but it makes it less likely that he's singling you out. You can also look for the opposite sign. Does he flirt with every girl except for you? Then maybe he’s not flirting with you because you’re the only one he really likes. He may respect you too much to tease or flirt with you like he does with every other girl. Does he seem embarrassed or shy if he hangs out with a new girlfriend in front of you? If so, then he may not want you to see his relationship unfolding because he’d rather be with you. See if the other girls he hangs out with know who you are. If he’s with another girl and she gives you an, “Oh, I’ve heard about you” look, then the girl may be jealous because you’re important to the guy.  If he likes you, then he’ll want to be around you as much as possible. He could try to do this in subtle and not-so-subtle ways. Here are a few signs that he wants to be around you because he sees you as more than a friend:   If he acts like you’re the only person in the room when you’re hanging out in big groups. If you’re at a party, concert, or a bar, and you realize you ended up talking to him for most of the night, then he definitely wants to get closer to you. If you have a class together and he always tries to sit next to you and even saves you a seat, then he may want to take things to the next level. Notice if he sometimes just happens to run into you in your favorite coffee shop or bar. If he’s always around, then he may have a stalking problem, but if he’s just “in the area” occasionally, then it may be because he’s hoping to run into you.  Paying attention to how and how often you hang out and to when and where you hang out can give you great insight into whether he just wants to see you ask a friend or if he wants all of your hang-sessions to be more like dates. Here are some points to consider:   Notice where you hang out. Do you see him in romantic locations like gardens, nicer wine bars, or places where you see couples hanging out for date nights? If so, then he may want the same for you. Notice who is around when you hang out. If it’s always just the two of you, then he may see you as crush material. But if he’s always inviting ten of his closest bros along, then he may see you just as another friend. Notice when you hang out. If you only see him once a month, then he may not be trying to spend more time with you. But if it feels like you haven’t gone more than a day without seeing him recently, then yeah, he probably likes you. Notice what you do when you hang out. Going out for coffee or a quick lunch is more meant for the friend zone, but going out for dinner or seeing a movie in the evening is a more-than-friend activity.  This may feel like a no brainer, but it may be harder to tell if he’s flirting with you than you think. Every guy has his own flirting style, and there will be a variety of ways to flirt with you to show that he definitely likes you. Here are a few signs that he’s flirting:   If he’s always trying to make you laugh if you have a class together, and even doodles in the margins of your notes, then he’s definitely flirting with you. If he sends you a lot of emoticons when he’s texting, then he’s flirting with you. If he’s always playfully hitting you or giving you a gentle shove, then he’s flirting with you. If he loves dunking you underwater when you’re in a pool, then he is definitely flirting. If he’s always trying to make you laugh or giggle, then he’s definitely flirting. If he blushes when you’re both laughing, then he’s definitely feeling flirtatious.  

notice his body language.  pay attention to the things he does for you.  study him in action with other girls.  see if he’s always trying to hang out with you.  analyze your hang-out sessions.  see if he flirts with you. 

 If you have some close friends who are always hanging around you two, then you may be able to ask them if they think he really likes you. You may be too blinded by Cupid’s arrow to be able to see the situation clearly, but one of your friends may have more insight.   Ask a friend you trust who already knows the situation well. If she’s seen you hang out a bunch of times, she should have an opinion. Ask a friend to study the two of you next time you’re together and to report back. Just make sure the friend isn’t being too obvious. Pick a friend whose opinion and judgment you value. Pick someone with good social sense to get the best answer. Tell your friends to be honest. If they really don’t think he likes you, or even know that he likes someone else, then you should benefit from the truth.  This is a very dangerous step. There are few boys who would break “bro code” and not run and report your question back to your crush. But if you don’t know who else to ask or if you really trust one of his friends, then casually ask how he feels about you.   Though this is a riskier step, his friends will have a better answer than your friends, since they have first-hand information from your guy. Ask his friend if he likes you could also just be a sneaky way to let him know how you feel. If you’re too scared to tell him yourself, this information will get back to him ASAP if you tell the wrong person.  Once you’re feeling fairly confident that the guy likes you and are tired of waiting around and reading the signs, it may be time to just tell him how you feel and ask if he feels the same way. He could be really shy and may be relieved that you’re taking the initiative. Here’s how to ask him if he really likes you:   Find some time to be alone with him. Make sure you don’t ask him when his friends are looking over your shoulder. Be honest and open. Just say you have a crush on him and want to know if he shares your feelings. Before he responds, let him know that it’s no big deal if he doesn’t like you. You should only do this if you’re pretty sure that he likes you. If he has exhibited multiple signs of liking you, then be bold and ask him. If he has shown no signs of liking you, then it may be time to wait to see what happens.  

ask your friends what they think.  if you’re feeling bold, ask his friends.  ask him yourself. 

 It's best if you get his/her number beforehand while you two have a friendship so that you won't have to scramble to find his/her number! However, make sure you didn't just get your crush's number from a friend, or else he/she might get upset or scared and it'll be awkward.; , Simply text, "Hey, I was thinking it might be fun to go to the dance. Want to?"   If your crush agrees, you're ready to go shopping. If your crush declines, do not freak out. It might be that your crush just isn't ready to start a relationship with you, or he/she thinks of you as a friend. Still keep maintaining that relationship with your crush and treat him/her nicely. It still has its chances of blossoming into a romantic bond! Keep in mind that if you take this calmly, your crush might change his/her mind.  

about a week or so before the dance/prom, text your crush to create a good, friendly conversation.  after a few moments of exchanging texts, ask him/her to go to the dance with you at an appropriate time in the conversation while it's still good. 

 Letters are a little more romantic than asking someone out by email or text, and your crush may be flattered by your thoughtfulness.   Make sure the letter contains no inappropriate content or anything that might make your crush uncomfortable. You don't have to use flowery words. Just simply ask them, "Would you like to go to the prom/dance with me?" Don't be afraid to sign your name, or your crush might not know who asked him/her out! Since letters have more impact than an email or text does, you'll want to give your crush some time to think about it if he/she needs to. Therefore, you should send your crush the letter a little earlier than you would send a text or email to him/her.  Consider the pros and cons of each option above, and choose the one that seems to go best with you.   Keep in mind that mailing letters may take a while, and you'll never know when your crush may receive the letter. Also, your crush's parents might see the letter and your crush might be embarrassed! Therefore, it's best to turn to other options rather than this one, although it is an open choice for you.  Don't expect him/her to reply by letter, although he/she might.   If your crush agrees, you can go shopping. If your crush declines, do not freak out. Still keep maintaining that relationship with your crush and treat him/her nicely. It still has its chances of blossoming into a romantic bond! Keep in mind that if you take this calmly, your crush might change his/her mind.  

about two weeks or so before the prom/dance, construct a sweet, simple letter asking your crush to go out to the prom/dance with you.  decide whether you want to mail your crush the letter, hand it to him/her personally, or slip it into his/her locker or backpack.  wait for your crush's response. 

 Make sure you talk to your crush in an empty area with none of his/her friends around, or your crush might feel intimidated.   If you find your crush with his/her friends, polite ask your crush, "May I please talk to you alone real quick?"  ,   If you're already scared by this step, tell yourself inwardly that you have twenty seconds of insane courage to do whatever you want and that it'll take one second of humiliation to get nineteen seconds of pride for your bravery.    If your crush agrees, you can go shopping. If your crush declines, do not freak out. Still keep maintaining that relationship with your crush and treat him/her nicely. It still has its chances of blossoming into a romantic bond! Keep in mind that if you take this calmly, your crush might change his/her mind.  

about a week or so before the prom/dance, approach your crush at an appropriate time when you know he/she isn't busy or upset.  simply and calmly ask your crush, "would you like to go to the prom/dance with me?",  wait for your crush's response. 

 Make sure the color goes well with your skin tone and that it won't look awkward or out of place on you. Check the price to make sure it's decent and that it fits within your budget. If you find that the dress is expensive, look in other stores to see if you can find a similar one for a cheaper price.   Sales and coupons are very helpful. Avoid dresses that are too tight or too big, as you won't look as good and your crush might think differently of you. Avoid creating a "sexy" look. It's fine to look beautiful, but it's not cool to wear inappropriate clothing. Plus, your crush might get scared and not want to go out with you ever again! Your reputation could also get destroyed. Remember that if your crush doesn't like you for who you are, your crush is a jerk and you shouldn't let him put you down.  However, it's best to avoid high heels, anything that makes your feet feel uncomfortable, or heightens the risk of you tripping and/or hurting yourself. You'll be dancing in those shoes, so it's best to stick with flats.   Make sure the price is decent. Look in other stores if you find that the shoes are too expensive. Make sure you will be able to dance in your shoes, and be sure they match your dress. There's nothing worse in an outfit than a clashing dress and pair of shoes!  , Slip into your dress and make sure all buttons or zippers are in their proper places if you have any. Be sure that there are no wrinkles, and that you have ironed out any beforehand.  Limit your accessories to two only to prevent the dreaded, overdressed appearance. Suggestions for cute accessories are:   A cute scarf that complements your dress is recommended, especially if you find that your dress is a little too low. A cute pair of earrings would be brilliant, especially if you already have a matching scarf on. A pretty necklace that isn't too sparkly would be good, but don't wear one if you already have a scarf on and vice versa. Don't wear a bracelet if you have a necklace and earrings on. Don't wear a necklace if you have a bracelet and earrings on. Don't wear earrings if you have a necklace and bracelet on.  Make sure the style matches your dress, but be sure it isn't too dressy either. Style your hair as desired, but refrain from doing anything to it that would destroy or mess it up.   It's best to have washed your hair one or two evenings before. Do not wash your hair on the day of the prom/dance, and then style it later, or it will not turn out well at all. If you find that you've already done that, try putting it up in a pretty bun appropriate for the occasion to hide your mistake. Don't put any hair accessories into your hairstyle if you already have two other accessories. Either remove one or go without a hair accessory. Make sure your hair accessory is small and simple, and that it doesn't draw too much attention (ex: sparkly hair clip is a big no).  Beware of putting too much on. Remember that you are only adding glow to your face and not color. Refrain from looking like a clown.   Sometimes, it's best if you completely go without makeup, as beauty is found deeper past the artificial appearance.  If desired, spray a little bit of perfume onto you and your clothes, but avoid being the only person that your crush can smell clearly!  , Leave at the appropriate time so you'll arrive right on time.  Avoid looking like a military soldier standing at command, but refrain from slouching! Hold yourself with confidence, as confidence is one of the key elements to winning over your crush, but beware of having too much.  Create another conversation again and be fairly casual while not looking stiff or creepy. Talk about school, your interests and his, or anything else that will entertain you both comfortably.  However, if there is a slow dance playing, ask your crush to dance with you.  However, don't smile too much or you'll start to look false and/or creepy.  Even if that doesn't happen, still have fun throughout the whole event and make it a night to remember. Be prepared for whatever is thrown your way!  

a week before the prom/dance, purchase a dress that both fits you and complements your body shape.  shop for a pair of cute shoes if you need one.  about a few hours before the prom/dance, it's best to prepare so that you won't be late.  pick out any accessories that match your dress, but beware of having too many.  look up prom hairstyles and choose one that appeals to you.  apply your makeup as needed.  apply deodorant to make sure you smell good.  slip into your shoes and pop on a jacket if needed, making sure not to mess up your hairstyle or wrinkle your dress.  hold yourself in a tall position by throwing back your shoulders the slightest bit and sucking in your stomach a little.  meet your crush and give him a friendly, "hey.",  don't be afraid to dance with your crush, but remember that you don't have to dance to every single song that is playing.  smile naturally, as this is one of the important keys to unlocking your beauty.  if you're lucky, you two might kiss or become a couple. 

 Allow him to make plans for getting together. Note how much of his free time he devotes to you. The more time he wants to spend with you, the more he cares.Allow some leeway if your schedules are busy or conflicting because of work, school, or family functions. But if he has all the free time in the world and only wants to see you once a week, consider that a sign of ambivalence.; , Note how frequently he calls, emails, or texts you. If he contacts you regularly, consider that a sign that he wants to be part of your life. Give him a little grace period if he’s extremely busy, but also note how much effort he makes to keep in touch in spite of that.On the other hand, watch out if he's calling way too much. If he calls you when he knows you're busy with work, family, or studying and still expects you to drop everything and talk to him, that probably means he cares less about your needs and more about his own.  When you aren’t going to see each other anytime soon, ask him what he’ll be up to. Gauge his willingness to answer. If he seems cagey and vague, consider that a sign that he doesn’t care enough about you to share all of his life with you. If he’s forthcoming and lets you know what his plans are at any given hour, take it as a sign of honesty and inclusion.Take him at his word when he tells you what he'll be up to. Don't sneak around and spy on him to make sure he's telling the truth (unless he gives you a very good reason to). If he does care about you and catches you stalking him, he might take that as a sign of mistrust, which could hurt your relationship.  Every now and then, say that you need a little alone-time, either by yourself or with your own friends. See how well he takes it. If he respects the fact that everyone needs a little break from each other from time to time, take that as a plus. But if he demands that you spend every available second with him, take that to mean he’s less interested in keeping you happy than keeping himself happy.Remember: this works both ways. Don't be upset if he asks for a night off every now and then so he can spend time with other people or by himself, especially if the two of you have been spending a lot of time together recently.  

see how often he wants to see you.  check how often he reaches out to you.  find out what he’s doing.  tell him you need time for yourself. 

 There is no one, perfect way to find out if a girl thinks you're cute, and signs that one girl likes you may be a sign from another girl that she isn't interested. The only way to get around this is to spend time with a women. The better you know her, the better you'll be able to read her and figure out if she thinks you're cute.   Shy girls often stay quiet, avoid eye contact, or maintain some distance, especially if they like a boy and are nervous he might find out.Louder, outgoing girls may act friendly or flirty with everyone, making it harder to see who they actually think is cute. The more you know her, however, the more you'll see how she treats the ones she really admires.; , If you can spend time alone, this is always going to be best. You cannot tell if a girl is into you if you're always off on your own, or if you're trying to judge her from afar. You need to spend quality time with her, even if it is just casual, to see how she treats you.   Sit down next to her in class or at lunch, or join her games at recess. Any time spent nearby will help show you how she feels. Invite her to group events, where the pressure to be together or romantic is low and you can casually see how she feels by her response to the invitation.  A big indicator of attraction is how she responds to conversations. Is she looking away, making up reasons to leave, or sitting silently whenever you're not talking? If so, chances are good she is not interested in you. However, if you give a pause or lull in the conversation and after a second or two of silence and she reengages you by asking you a question such as “where are you from?” “How about you? Do you like xyz?”, that is a sign that she wants to keep the interaction going on between you two and see where the vibe is headed unwinds. This is an important precursor to her thinking you’re cute.  Body language is not the only way to see if someone thinks you're cute, but it is a great way to gauge how someone might feel about you. Good signs include:   Touching you, especially on the arms or back. Smiling frequently at you. Making eye contact. Turning and facing you during conversations especially in group settings. Agreeing frequently, showing that she enjoys similar things., Teasing is one of the best ways to subtly see where her heart is at. You never want to be mean, but making jokes, having small, competitive challenges in class, at recess, or at work, and slightly making fun of her for mistakes is classic flirting. If she engages back, teasing and joking with you, there is a good chance she thinks you're cute.   Note, however, that some people are shy and don't show their affection this way. If she doesn't joke or tease back, but still smiles and seems interested, she might still think you're cute.  If you do this, observe whether the girl pays more attention to you or her friends. If it is friends, then you know she isn't crushing on you, but if she pays more attention to you, then you know that she is crushing on you. She may try to impress you, make lots of jokes, or spend most of her time talking to you.  Find a friend you both have in common and ask their opinion. Often another friend has the outside perspective needed figure out if their is mutual attraction. Know, however, that this can quickly turn into a rumor that leaves all of your friends asking "do you have a crush on her?" Only ask trusted friends their advice, and keep it to a minimum., You can't control what she thinks about you, but you can control how you act around her. Be a gentleman by listening to her when she talks and offering to help her out when possible. She may not think you're cute now, but with simple, easy gestures like holding the door open or asking how she is doing each morning you can give her a great impression to remember you by.  This may be the most terrifying-seeming action in the world, but that doesn't make it any less important. The only way to really know if she thinks you're cute is to let her know you find her cute. This doesn't have to be a grand, enormous profession of love. In fact, it shouldn't be -- it should be casual and lighthearted. Let her know "I think you're cute," give a light smile, and move on if she rejects you. More likely than not, however, this little complement will open her up to say how she feels as well.  

know that all girls are different.  spend quality time with her.  talk to her.  note her body language.  lightly tease and joke with her.  see where she puts her attention in a group.  talk to her friends.  be your best self around her.  let her know how you feel. 

 The same old "I don't want to wreck our friendship" or "Sorry, but I just don't like you that way" will come out sounding cold and heartless. Instead of just telling your friend that you don't want a relationship, list specific reasons why you think dating would be a bad idea. "I really appreciate that, but I just think we should stick to being friends. I mean, I tell you everything about me! That would be a little awkward for me if we were dating." And hey, if you don't feel the love for your friend at the time, but could see something blossoming in the future, don't be afraid to tell them that, too!; , Take a bit of time to reflect on your actions toward your friend lately. Have you said or done anything that they may take to be an advance? Or maybe you're just a particularly flirty person. Make sure you turn off the charm around your friend, at least until things cool down a bit.  It can be tempting to give your friend a little "space" to help them get over you. This isn't wise, simply because your friend is likely to take this as a clue to back off for good. It may also leave your friend feeling guilty about or ashamed of confessing their feelings to you. Let them know that things are okay between you two, and try your best to text, talk on the phone, and hang out just as much as you did before your friend asked you out. And if you're the one being cut off? Take this as a silent memo that your friend needs a little time to sort things out. Try to make contact after a week or two, and if there isn't any response, take this as a cue to put your friendship on hiatus.  "Why can't we date?" "Is it because I'm not as attractive as you?" "Are you embarrassed by me?" "Is there someone else?" These are all questions you should be prepared for in the event that a friend should ask you out. Take time and give the best answers you possibly can in a calm, gentle way. Make sure your friend knows that it's okay to be curious about what's going on in your head, but it's not okay to constantly badger you with annoying questions and pleadings. If the whys and what ifs haven't ceased after a week, give your friend a stern reminder that you just aren't interested and you don't owe him/her any other answers.  Sure, there are a million annoying things about the situation: the immediate awkwardness, the constant questions, and the broken-hearted look in your friend's eyes, just to name a few. It's important, though, that you don't get angry. If you lash out at your friend, they may think they are seeing a dark side of you that hasn't come out before. They may also feel like they somehow inconvenienced you by having a crush on you. When you feel like screaming at this friend to forget it, remember that all you're going to do is make them feel cruddy, which isn't what you want.  Naturally, the only thing on your mind is going to be what they're thinking about when you're together. Try to push this out of your mind though. Focus on what you liked about your friend before they liked you. Maybe it was their sense of humor or indispensable advice. Whatever it may be, keep that on your mind the first few times you hang out after you're asked out. Remember that your friend is the same person they were before they liked you.  Play things right, and slowly but surely, your friendship will go from being awkward to being the gemstone it once was.  

avoid tired old lines.  try not to encourage them.  don't disconnect.  be ready for questions.  don't get angry.  try to forget.  let things go back to normal. 

 Make sure the color goes well with your skin tone and that it won't look awkward or out of place on you. Check the price to make sure it's decent and that it fits within your budget. If you find that the tuxedo is expensive, look in other stores to see if you can find a similar one for a cheaper price.   Sales and coupons are very helpful. Avoid tuxedos that are too tight or too big, as you'll look awkward and your crush might think different of you.  Remember that tuxedos aren't mandatory. As long as you are dressed appropriate for the occasion, you will be fine!  , Put on deodorant or cologne, but avoid smelling like you literally took a bath in it, as this is a mistake many guys tend to make!  , If you find that you have trouble getting on your tie, don't be afraid to ask your mom for help.   If your mom has no knowledge of putting on ties, she is unavailable, or you're just too embarrassed, try looking up instructions on the Internet and learning it yourself. However, if you find that you still can't get the hang of tying a tie, either get over your embarrassment and ask your mom, or go without one.  Avoid looking like a slob, but don't look stiff or too dressed up either! Girls tend to go for the guys who don't appear uptight or too formal, but it's okay if you want to look nice - just don't look too nice.  Leave at the appropriate time so that you will arrive on time at the prom/dance.  Avoid looking like a military soldier standing at command, but refrain from slouching! Hold yourself with confidence, as confidence is one of the key elements to winning over your crush, but beware of having too much.  Create another conversation again and be fairly casual while not looking stiff or creepy. Talk about school, your interests and hers, or anything else that will entertain you both comfortably.  However, if there is a slow dance playing, ask your crush to dance with you. , Even if that doesn't happen, still have fun throughout the whole event and make it a night to remember well. Be prepared for whatever is thrown your way!  

a week before the prom/dance, purchase a tuxedo that fits you.  if you discover no tuxedos within your price range, a crisp, formal collared shirt tucked into formal pants with a tie and dress shoes would be perfectly acceptable.  on the day of the prom/dance, take a shower to make sure you smell fine.  put on the formal clothes that you have picked out for this occasion.  comb your hair nicely and apply gel if needed.  put on your dress shoes and a jacket if needed.  hold yourself in a tall, confident position by throwing back your shoulders the slightest bit.  meet your crush and give her a friendly, "hey.",  don't be afraid to dance with your crush, but remember that you don't have to dance to every single song that is playing.  if she smiles at you, let a friendly grin slip out from your mouth, but avoid looking creepy or smiling too widely.  ,  if you're lucky, you two might kiss or become a couple. 

 When you’re together, pay attention to where he orients himself in relation to you–especially when you’re out with other people. Think of the physical distance between the two of you as the emotional distance that he wants to maintain. The farther he keeps his body away when you’re sitting or standing together, the less he wants others to think of you two as being together.Take this less to heart if you know he tends to be shy or reserved. If that's your guy, he could be nervous around you because he cares about you, or he may want to avoid coming across as someone who's going to smother you.  If he hates romantic comedies, ask him to go see one with you. If he doesn’t particularly like one or more of your friends, ask him to come along when you go out to see them. Test how willing he is to keep you happy. If he’s happy to do things that he’d rather not do just to keep you happy, be assured that this means he cares about you.Be careful not to overdo it. If all you ever do is drag him to places that you know he doesn't like, he may start to resent it after a while.  If he goes surfing every weekend, say you want to come along to the beach even if you don’t know how to surf. If he has a regular hang-out that he goes to, like an arcade or coffee shop, suggest going together. See how willing he is to include you in all aspects of his life.Respect the fact that everyone needs to do their own thing if he doesn’t want to make a habit out of bringing you along every single time. But at the very least he should be willing to include you every once and a while just so you can see what matters so much to him.  When he says he’s going to do something, note whether he actually does it. Pay attention to how punctual he is when you’re supposed to meet or call each other. If he fails to show up on time, ask for the reason why and see if it’s a valid excuse.Everyone runs late or forgets to do stuff every now and then. But if he consistently fails to follow through on his word, consider that a sign that he doesn’t think of you as someone worth proving himself to.  Whether it’s big or small, see how quickly he offers to do it. If he fetches you another soda from the fridge just so you don’t have to get up, or gives you his jacket because you feel a chill, then he cares about you. If he does it without thinking twice about it or expecting a reward, he cares even more.Obviously, if it’s a really big favor, like “fix my car,” he’ll probably have to think things over at first, if only to figure out if and when he could possibly do such a time-consuming project.  In passing, refer back to a previous conversation you’ve had with him. If you told him a story about school or work last week, tell him how things turned out since then. See how much he remembers from the first story.Of course, he may not have the same job as you or attend the same class, so he may not have had a strong grasp on all the details in the first place. But expect him to at least remember the point of the story.  Mention your own hopes and plans. Ask him where he sees himself a year from now, in five years, in ten. Pay close attention to how he answers. See how much your two visions conflict with each other, and if they do, how much effort he makes into combining the two into one shared vision. The more he talks about “we” and the less he uses “I,” the more likely he thinks of you as someone to plan his own future around. 

note where he places himself.  suggest activities you know he’s not into.  ask to join him in his favorite things.  keep track of his promises.  ask him for favors.  test his memory.  talk about the future. 

 When you’re out with other people, pay attention to where he focuses his own attention. Stay quiet for a while and see how long it takes him to draw you back into the conversation, or if he forgets about you entirely. If you’re at a large party and separate to talk to different people, check how frequently he comes back to touch base with you, if only for a moment.Be sure to do this on a case-by-case basis. The situation will probably be at least a little bit different each time. If he hasn't seen a certain friend in a very long time, for instance, he may understandably focus more on them. Look for consistent behavior over time instead of singling out just one occasion.  Watch his reaction to the idea. If he seems reluctant to introduce you, ask him why. If he can’t give you a good reason, or if he says "sure" all the time but keeps putting it off, question why a guy who supposedly cares about you wouldn’t want other people in his life to meet you.Remember: he may have a valid reason for being reluctant. He may be more worried about what you think of his friends than the other way around. Or his family life may not be the best situation. Encourage him to talk freely about his concerns. The more he confides, the more he cares.  Observe how he behaves with your favorite animal in the whole world. See if they get along right off the bat, and if not, what sort of effort he makes to befriend it. You and he both know that your pet is going to be with you for a while, so use your pet to see what lengths the guy will go to in order to be part of your life, too. 

note how much he includes you.  talk about meeting his family and/or friends.  watch him with your pet. 

 When you disagree with him, gauge how he reacts. Reading his responses as “good” or “bad” is tricky, but generally, accept it as a good sign when he argues his own points with you. Take it to mean that he wants you to understand exactly where he stands so that you know exactly who you're with.No two people hold the exact same opinions, so be wary if he always agrees with you. If he does, consider it likely that he’s more interested in enjoying himself here and now than in building a long-term relationship, where knowing and resolving differences in opinion will really matter.  He doesn’t have to agree with you in the end, but, at the very least, expect him to consider what you’re saying before responding. But if he always barrels on with his own opinions, as if you never said anything at all, he probably cares more about being “right” than about having a real exchange of ideas.  Watch out for put-downs and insults. Judge how much he cares about you by his willingness to hurt you just because you disagree. If he calls you or your ideas “stupid” or anything like that, take that as a red flag.Also note the way he talks to you. Even if he doesn’t insult you outright, recognize when he’s still being dismissive and “talking down” to you. 

examine how he deals with conflict.  ask yourself if he’s really listening to you.when you argue, see if he absorbs the points you’re making.  listen to his tone and words. 

 This is an indirect but potentially effective way to get back in touch. This is something that you can do to build up your courage to talk to her, or this can be a primer for starting a conversation. Liking her posts or retweeting her tweets will remind her of you, and let her know that you are following her posts.   Do not like everything she posts. Choose one or two things that you genuinely like and space out the time between your likes to every few days. If you send too much attention to her all at once, it may come off like you are trying too hard. Do not like only the cute pictures of her. You can like one photo where you feel like she looks particularly good, but if you like too many pictures of her looking pretty, you may come off creepy. Consider liking a variety of things that she posts rather than just her pictures.; , If you have been liking or commenting on her posts, provide her with material to comment back on. Post clever or interesting thoughts you have about the world and people, share beautiful or interesting pictures that you have taken, or find funny gifs, pictures or quotes from the internet that you can post along with a comment about why you like it.   Consider what she would find funny or interesting. You don’t want to post things for her; however, you want to take into consideration that her internet style might be different from yours. Take a look at her posts and the things she likes to get an idea of her online interests and style. For example, if she writes a lot of posts about bands she likes and you share a band you like in common, you can post one of their music videos or the lyrics from one of their songs with a comment about why you like it. Stay true to yourself. Only post things that you genuinely like and are a part of who you are. It can come off fake if you are posting about things you haven’t shown an interest in before.  You should make a comment on a post that she writes early after it has been posted. If you write the comment early, she will be more likely to respond. Look for things that she is into that is a common interest you share, like your music taste, love of food, love of movies, etc.. Consider praising the post, asking a question about it, or commenting about something you find interesting about it.   For example, if she writes a post about going to a show, you can respond “I am so jealous you got to see them! Did you think they were good live?” Hopefully your comments will spark a chain of comments back and forth. If this happens, you should send her a message asking her how she is doing or extending the conversation. Say “Hey, I am enjoying our conversation. How have you been? Are there any other bands you have been listening to lately that I should check out?”  , Follow the inline citations to learn how to create an event on either platform. You can either create an event, or you can invite her to an event you are attending. For example, if you are going to a music festival that you think she would like, invite her to the event. There are several events that are open invite. You can send her an invitation by going to the page of the event and sending the invite from that page. Or if you and your friends are throwing a Halloween party, for example, make an event for it and invite her.   After you invite her, you should send her a follow up message saying hello and telling her about the event. Say something like, “Hey, my friends and I are having a Halloween party and I was thinking it would be great to see you again. Are you free for Halloween?” If she cannot come to the event, use the event as an opportunity to continue messaging her. Ask her about how things have been going, and start a conversation with her.  Whichever way that you decide to reach out to her, you can follow the same tactic as writing a comment. Send her a message with a praise, talk about some common ground that you have, or ask her a question. Send a message that praises her for something she has recently done or accomplished. For example, if she recently finished a program or got a new pet, for example, send her a message saying congratulations, and then ask her how she has been lately. Talk about something that you share in common. For example, if she did a hike recently and you also like to go hiking, send her a message that say something like “I saw that you went on a hike to Palm Canyon. I was just there a couple of months ago and really enjoyed the waterfalls- did you like the trail?”. Ask her a question about something she has posted. Say something like “I saw the pictures you posted of you surfing- what kind of board do you have? I love surfing and go every chance I get.”  

like or retweet something that she has posted.  post on social media.  make a comment on one of her posts.  invite her to an event through facebook or google+.  send her an instant message, a message through social media, or an email message. 

 If the boyfriend is one of your close friends, then yeah, it's a very good idea to back off unless you want to ruin your friendship. But if you don't know who the boyfriend is and want to get a sense of her relationship with him, then you can try to slyly get a sense of her relationship and how serious it is without prying too much. Here's what you can say:   "What are you up to this weekend?" "How long have you been with your boyfriend?" "I had a girlfriend, but we broke up a few months ago. It was hard, but I feel much better about it now."; , Though you can't just come out and ask her if she's happy, you can get a sense about it just by talking. Basically, if she complains to you about her boyfriend all the time then that is a strong sign that her relationship is not looking so good. See if you can get an idea of how she's feeling just by making casual comments and seeing if she responds in the negative or affirmative. Basically, you don't want to try to get with a girl who is in a great, or a particularly long, relationship; you don't want to deal with the emotional baggage even if she does decide to end things.   Say, "It must be nice to live with your partner. What's that like?" Or say, "You've been together for two years? That's a pretty long time…"  , Before you step further, see if the girl even cares about you in a romantic way. Read the signs. Does she go out of her way to talk to you? Does she light up when you walk into the room? Does she make excuses to always be at your side? Does she even flirt a little bit? If so, then yeah, there's a good chance that she may have a crush on you. Here are some other ways you can see if this is the case:   Talk about other girls in front of her. Without being too obvious about it, see if she gets jealous. Give her a compliment or two. See if she gives one back later.  If you want to get with the girl, then you can't turn into her best friend, the guy she can come to with all of her problems. Though talking to her about her boyfriend and relationship in the beginning can be a good way to get a sense of what's really going on, the last thing you want to do is to be the guy who she comes to with a carton of Cherry Garcia at midnight so she can cry about her communication issues with her boyfriend. You want to be seen as another romantic prospect, plain and simple, not as her new BFF.   Though you do want to be seen as a romantic prospect, that does not mean you want her to see you as a sharper, snazzier, version of her current boyfriend. She should see you as someone completely new, refreshing, and exciting, not as another guy she can take to the movies and hold hands with. If she starts complaining to you about her boyfriend issues, say, "Hey, you can save that stuff for your best friend. I just really don't want to go there, okay?"  , If you want to talk to a girl you like who has a boyfriend in the hopes of breaking up her relationship and having it lead to something more, then you should make sure you're talking to a girl who is worth it, a girl who is really interested in you and not just with flirting with you and then coming home to her boyfriend. Here are some girls to avoid:   The girl who lets you take her out to dinner and the movies only to go home to her boyfriend. Don't take her out like you're her boyfriend unless you actually are her boyfriend. She may just be using you for free food and drinks. The girl who flirts with you for months but doesn't let it go anywhere. Don't be with the perpetual flirt, who just likes to get attention from guys and nothing more. The girl with the crazy boyfriend. You do not want to get mixed up in that. The girl who is just looking for a guy-pal. (See above about avoiding the Friend Zone at all costs). The girl who is just using you to make her boyfriend jealous. Stay as far away as possible.  If you want the girl to like you, then you have to be respectful of her, and of the fact that she has a boyfriend. Don't make jokes about the boyfriend, be sleazy, always try to put your arm around her, or say demeaning things about the boyfriend or her relationship. If you really want her to like you, then you have to treat her like a lady. You can compliment her but don't make it look like you are perfectly OK hitting on a girl who has a boyfriend; let her start to see that there's something special about you.   Even if she is entertaining the idea of being with you, nothing will put it out of her mind faster than if you blatantly try to hook up with her.  Get her to the point where she really likes you and wants to spend more time together. Mention a movie you want to see and see if she asks to come along. Tell her about a party you're throwing and see if she'd like to be there. The ball should be in her court so she can make these decisions on her own and not feel like you're putting too much pressure on her. Play a little bit hard to get; you have a lot going on and plenty of girls who want you, and if she's interested, she should get in line.   Letting her realize how awesome you are just by being your charming self is better than degrading yourself by begging her to hang out with you when you know she is taken.  Whether you're studying together, going to the same party, or just randomly ending up at a cafe after class, make sure you spend some time with her. Don't just flirt over text or send her Facebook messages if you actually want to get somewhere. If you think it would be too weird to hang out alone, hang out with her in a group setting first. But try to get her alone when you can, so she can start thinking about you in a romantic way, and really noticing the fact that you two have a lot of chemistry.  Let her see that you see something unique in her, and that you're not just trying to get together with her because you think she's hot. Compliment her hair, an aspect of her personality, or her ability to work so hard in school. You shouldn't hit on her, touch her, or be too obvious about it, but you should let her know that you really see something in her. If she has a feeling that you really have a sense of the amazing person she is, then she will start to see that you may be the right guy for her.   Show her that you really care about what she thinks. Ask her what she thinks about your new shoes, your chemistry teacher, or a new band you like. Let her see that you really value her thoughts.  You don't need to spell it out for her, but you should let her see that you view her as more than a friend. You can do this through compliments, suggestions that you really care about her, or just by making eye contact and standing close to her when you talk. Here are some things you can say:   "I think your new haircut really makes your eyes stand out. It looked great before, but it's even prettier now." "You're one of the only girls I've met who loves sports and who is really fun to talk to about almost anything. That's so cool." "I really feel like I can talk to you about anything."  , You shouldn't have to fake it to impress the girl and make her see that you're a guy worth knowing. Stay modest while letting her see that you have potential, that you're smart, cool, talented, and interesting and someone who would be perfect for her. Just be your best self without feeling like you're being dishonest.   Open up to her about the things that matter to you. Just make sure that she's also opening up. After you tell her something that might be a bit private, you can say, "I haven't talked to anyone about that in a long time. It's just so easy to talk to you, for some reason."  , Remember what we said about how the last thing she wants is another guy who is exactly like her boyfriend? Well, it's absolutely true. Be spontaneous. Be fun. Don't call or text her every five minutes just to "check in". Come up with something completely random and fun that you can do together. Give her an original compliment or a funny little gift. Ask her to dance in the middle of the street. Just do whatever a normal, boring old boyfriend wouldn't do. Make her feel alive every time the two of you are together.   Don't be afraid to talk to her about something that you think may be a little random if it's funny or interesting. You don't have to fit any kind of mold.  This is a delicate balance to find. You want her to know that you want her without coming on too strong or always being up in her grill. Talk to her at parties, walk alongside her after class, but do not become the guy that she can flirt and have some fun with before she comes home to her boyfriend. Be around, let her know you're interested, but also let her see that you won't wait around forever for her to make the call.  If you just flirt around with her for months, she'll think it's perfectly okay for her to have a guy to flirt with and a guy she is dating. Well, that's not cool, and the longer you go for this, the more she'll see that she can string you along without ever making a move. So, it's time to make a move, have her respond, or get her to make a move already, whether it means kissing you and getting with her boyfriend. Ideally, of course, she'll break up with her boyfriend and then get with you.   Seriously, the sooner this can happen, the better. If you've been flirting around for over a month, chances are, she'll never make the break.  So, you've snagged the girl, she's dumped her loser boyfriend, and now you've finally gotten what you want. Does this mean you should go shopping for engagement rings or take a weekend trip to the Bahamas? Absolutely not. Even if the girl got out of a bad relationship, it's likely that she's still reeling, so give her some time and space. If you try to hang out with her every second of every day, she's likely to feel overwhelmed and to back away. Instead, give her space and hang out with her once or twice a week, or however many times she's ready for.   This is something people don't get: break-ups are always painful, even if you're the person who did the breaking up. You may think that she feels totally free and happy because she got rid of the dead weight in her life, but she'll still be dealing with pain, and the inevitable grief that comes from saying goodbye to something, even if it wasn't all that great, and you have to be understanding of that.       Though she shouldn't be the one to call or text you every time, make sure to give her some of the power. If you're the one who initiates contact every time, she may think that she's not ready for another boyfriend or for anything serious.  Whether she got out of a three month relationship with a real jerk or a five-year relationship with a nice but boring guy, you should never bring up the guy, especially if you want to make fun of him, call him a loser, remind her that he wasn't good enough for her, etc. Though your intentions may be pure and you may just want to make her feel better about ending something that wasn't working, she may take this as an assault on her former relationship, and may be offended, because it's likely that she still has tender feelings for her ex.   Give it time. If she was in a five year relationship, then yeah, she may not be ready to talk about that part of her life for a long time. Maybe even a year will pass before she brings up her ex at all, because it will hurt too much to do it before hand. Be patient. If you keep asking questions about her ex, you'll come off as jealous and she'll get annoyed. Yeah, there may be this whole part of her life that you don't have access to for a while because it has to do with her ex. Nobody said snagging a girl with a boyfriend was easy, or that it didn't have consequences. But if you wait out this painful period, it'll be worth it.  Okay, so you grabbed a girl with a boyfriend, and only now does it dawn on you -- if she was able to cheat (or just emotionally cheat) on her boyfriend with another guy, then what will keep her from being unfaithful to you with the next guy who comes along? Well, hopefully she got out of her last relationship because it was truly bad and because she saw something special in you, not because she was generally restless. If she has a pattern of this behavior, then that is something to worry about, but if not, unfortunately, the heart does wander sometimes if it's worth it.   Your job is to focus on your new relationship instead of worrying that she's seeing someone on the side; if you're constantly jealous and paranoid because of the way that you met, then your newfound love will never wok. If she just got out of something serious, the last thing she may want is to feel like she's smothered all over again and can't go more than ten minutes without checking in with you.  So, the two of you are together, maybe even officially dating. Sure, you might have met in a somewhat sketchy way, but that doesn't mean you have to bring it up all the time. Focus on what's ahead of you instead of looking behind, and work on building a solid foundation for your love, not one that's based on lies, deceit, and uncertainty. Even if you had a rocky beginning, you may be able to form a strong bond, though yeah, it'll be tougher than if you were just two single people who met at bar. If you do want it to work, focus on the things you will do together, instead of any of the pain that is behind you.   This doesn't mean you can never talk about the period when you were getting together on the d/l. But it does mean that you should focus on all of the great things ahead of you, not on the pain that you might have felt in the beginning. Find new things that neither of you have done that you have always wanted to try, whether it's making your own sushi or going on a long hike. Find things you can claim as yours and that you can use to build a solid foundation for your love. Then just sit back, relax, and enjoy the ride!  

talk to her about her boyfriend.  see if she's happy in her current relationship.  see if she's even interested in you.  don't get stuck in the friend zone.  know which girls are just not worth talking to.  treat her with respect.  let her make the calls.  find a way to hang out.  make her feel special.  let her see that you're interested.  show her how awesome you are.  be refreshing.  be persistent (without being annoying).  get together with her.  take it slow.  avoid talking about her ex-boyfriend.  don't get paranoid.  get a fresh start. 

 A lot of awkwardness can be avoided if you can find a good time to talk to your crush. A good time to start a conversation could be before school, during lunch or a break, or after school or after an event is over. Use down time as an opportunity to start a conversation. A good place to talk could be at a bus stop, in a bus or on public transit, in a lunchroom, at a dance, or at a get together.   Make sure you have enough time for at least a few minutes of conversation. There are some down time periods that are too short for a conversation. An example of a bad time to talk to someone would be if class is about to start. This is probably not a great time to try to have a conversation because you will be interrupted and will feel silly that you tried to start a conversation at that time. Avoid trying to start a conversation in a line or during a passing period. Think about the way your schedule and your crushes’ schedule overlaps. Plan on starting a conversation when both of you are free. Are there any events that are coming up? Think about if there are any dances, parties, or school events that are coming up that you can start a conversation with him or her at.  One way that conversations can become awkward is when one person is extra stiff with the other person; treating him or her like a stranger. Instead, treat your crush as though you are already friendly with him or her. Even though it may be true that you do not know your crush well, you should still talk to him or her with warmth and a friendly tone. You can even start a conversation with an introduction while using a tone of familiarity and warmth by saying something like, “Hi, I don’t know if we have actually met. I’m Tim, how’s it going?”   When you are talking to your friends, try to notice your tone of voice, the hand gestures you use, and the kind of expressions you use. When you are talking with your crush, try to be the same kind of natural and relaxed while you talk. Don’t be overly familiar with him or her as though you have a history you do not have. For example, you wouldn’t say “Hey dude. How’s it?”.  If you are familiar with your crushes interests, life, friends, likes, dislikes, etc., use that knowledge to your advantage. You don’t have to focus on those things in particular when you talk, but you can talk about things related to his or her interests. For example, if you know that he or she loves the beach, you can talk about the surfing you have done recently. And you don’t have to mention that you know that the person likes the beach. Just talk about it like you would talk to a friend who loves the beach.   Awkward conversation can happen when you pretend like you know more about the person than you do in the same way that it can become awkward when you act like you don’t know anything about him/her at all when that is not true.  This is an easy way to feel confident in yourself and avoid awkwardness. Buy a pack of sugarless gum with xylitol to take with you to school or wherever you meet your crush. Sugarless gum will cause your mouth to make saliva which will in turn make your breath better and make it easier for you to talk. Pop a piece in your mouth 5 minutes after a meal and a few minutes before you talk with your crush. If you are going to a dance or somewhere you might be up close and personal with him or her, you can gargle with a mouth wash after you brush your teeth to freshen your breath. Avoid eating food that will make your breath smell like onions and garlic. Drink a glass of water, this will flush out any of the food and bacteria that make for bad breath., Use your comment as an icebreaker to start the conversation. Look around and observe what is going on around you. Is there anything funny or interesting that you notice? For example, if it is lunch and the food truck hasn’t arrived yet, you can say “Are they going to get us water for this wait, or do they want us to die?” If you are going to remark on something simple, try to make it playful. Even if you don’t think of yourself as a funny person, you can still be playful. And playfulness is found to be very attractive to both guys and girls. This playfulness will make the conversation fun and will help keep the mood light.   Don’t worry, the first few comments you make to your crush are not going to make or break the conversation. Getting the conversation started is more important. So don’t worry too much about being smooth, and focus instead on continuing conversation.  Once you have broken in with an opening line, move on into something you can talk about more. Asking for an update is a good question to ask if you do already know the person a little bit or you are taking a class together, for example. It is good idea to acknowledge your familiarity with one another by talking about the thing you have in common. This will make the conversation less awkward, and you will also get a better understanding of what is going on with the other person in your shared thing. For example, if you are taking a class together you can say, “So how is your midterm paper coming together?”   You don’t have to mention the fact that you are in a class together unless you aren’t sure that he or she knows. If you want to remind him or her, do it without making a big deal out of it. Say “So in English class, how is your midterm paper coming together?” It is not weird that you know that you share a class. If he or she doesn’t know, you mentioning the class first will tip him or her off and he or she will probably apologize for not recognizing you.  Topics of conversation can go by pretty quickly, and so it can be good to have a couple of open ended and easy to answer questions lined up to ask your crush. You can start by telling him or her something that you do or know and then ask his or her opinion on it. This question can also be related to the context of where you are or what you are doing. For example, if you are eating an apple at lunch you could say “I personally know that Granny Smith apples are the best apples in the world, but out of curiosity, what kind of apple is your favorite?” Once again, being playful is a good way to make your conversation less awkward and more fun, especially when you are talking about simple topics and just getting your conversation going.   You don’t want to ask him or her something too controversial. Stay away from any hot button topics like politics or religion. , You should try to make a unique connection based on your conversation and the particular person you are talking to. You can ask your crush something unusual but fun. For example, you could ask him or her something like “Is there a celebrity that people say, or you think, that you look like?”. This kind of question could make him or her laugh. Once he or she tells you his or her celebrity look alike, you can say whether you agree or disagree, and you can tell him or her who your celebrity look alike is (and you can lie as a joke).   Avoid small talk or getting to know you questions. You don’t want to ask questions like “So where are you from?” because you will get an answer he or she has already used many times before. This kind of playful conversation helps you get more comfortable with one another.  If you don’t have many opportunities to talk to your crush and you see a good one, even if you don’t have everything mapped out, you may want to seize the opportunity to talk to him or her by just going for it. Part of having a crush will always involve some amount of awkwardness and that can be part of the fun. So you don’t have to overthink it- go for it.   Going for it is good because it will help you get over the barrier of initial contact. And remember, it isn’t very important how you start talking to him or her- the important part is continuing the conversation. Sometimes just going with your gut can bring out your most confident self.  Once you have established a good connection with your crush, you should start trying to get to know him or her better. Start with something that he or she has mentioned or that you have observed in your interactions. For example, “I see you have some books with you, what are you reading?” This is a low pressure question that lets your crush know you are interested in him or her. Then ask follow up questions.   For example, if he or she is excited to talk about the books, ask more questions/make connections related to the books. For example, “That is cool that you are reading that book. My favorite book by that author is blank.” Or, if he or she doesn't seem too excited about his or her books, you can move onto something else more open ended. Say something like, “So what else are you up to this week?”. Avoid bring up topics of conversation that show that you already know about your crushes’ interests because that might make you feel awkward. For example, if you know he plays soccer, avoid bringing that up directly. Don’t say “So tell me about your soccer season.” Instead, let the conversation get there naturally.  Your crush will enjoy him/herself in a conversation with you much more if you are a good listener. Once you have started conversation, you should be face to face or in a listening position where you hear and see his or her face easily. Another key part of active listening is making consistent (but not constant) eye contact during your conversation.   Avoid distractions. Don’t send a text or look at your phone while you talk. This will make it seem like you are disinterested and might keep you from really hearing what your crush is saying.Repeat the main idea of what your crush is saying. This will let him or her know that you are listening and will give him or her the chance to clarify anything. Repeat the most meaningful parts of what he or she is saying. For example, you can say “So are you saying that you are new to painting but it feels like you have been doing it forever?”. This will help him or her feel connected to you because you show that you understand important things about him or her. Avoid interrupting him or her in conversation. It is easy to get excited by what we want to say and interrupt during his or her turn in the conversation. But resist the temptation and wait until he or she has finished talking, and then show your enthusiasm for what he or she is saying. Be empathetic. If your crush talks about something hard that is going on with him or her, make sure you don’t skip over his or her feelings in the conversation. You could say in response to him or her talking about failing a test, something like, “I could understand why it would be really frustrating to have to retake that test.”  , One way to keep a conversation friendly and natural is if you seem like you are having a good time talking with him or her. A few ways you can show this if you make eye contact, smile often, laugh, lean forward slightly when you are talking, and use open body language. Use any gestures when you talk that are natural for you, and keep your arms open and not crossed.   Tilting your head to one side is another good way to show friendliness/playfulness when you are talking and flirting. , This is good to do around the three quarter point into your conversation. It is a good idea to suggest getting together or getting his or her number after you have made solid connections and before the conversation has become tired or worn out. Think about a couple of activities that would be right for you both before you have a conversation. Say something like, “You are really cool, would you want to hang out sometime?” Then suggest a couple of things you can do together and get his or her number.   Or if you want to play it safer, you can simply ask “Hey, can I have your number? I have really enjoyed talking to you.” If you feel like the conversation was just okay, you can always wait for a couple more conversations through texting or in person before asking to him or her to hang out.  You might want to talk to your crush about something he or she talked about at the beginning of the conversation. For example, you can say, “So how much longer do you think you need to spend on your midterm paper?” And then spend the rest of the conversation finishing talking about the points of conversation you have already started.   You can make inside jokes about what you talked about. For example, you can say “Well now that we have made it through this lunch period without water, I suppose we can get through anything together.” Making inside jokes can help you cement connections you have made, and it is a good way to make your connection last past the first conversation.  When you are feeling good and you have just finished laughing about something, you should politely end your conversation so that your crush is left with a good impression. Make sure to tell him or her that you enjoyed your conversation.   You can keep the end of your conversation casual. You can say something like, “I should be getting home now, but I had a lot of fun talking to you.” If you are going to be seeing your crush in the future you should say something about seeing him or her again. Say, “I look forward to seeing you in class and hearing how your paper turned out.” Send a follow up text in the next couple of days saying hello and checking in with him or her about the things you talked about.  

wait for the right time and place to start a conversation.  talk to your crush like you already know him or her.  think about what he or she might be interested in talking about.  freshen your breath before you talk.  make a funny or playful comment about the place you are at or thing you are doing.  get the update on something he or she has been doing, especially if you share something in common.  ask for his or her opinion on something easy to talk about.  ask him or her something unexpected but easy to answer.  go with an opening line that pops in your head.  ask questions about his or her interests, hobbies, or work.  be an active listener in your conversation.  show him or her that you are enjoying yourself in conversation.  make a plan to hang out again, and/or get his or her number.if things seem to be going well, ask your crush if he or she wants to hang out again or ask for his or her number.  bring the conversation back to something you already talked about.  end the conversation on a good note. 

 Remind her of something that connected you in the past to test the waters. Be confident in your connection, and you can ask her a question related to your question as well.   For example, you could say, “Hey, I saw the Lakers play yesterday, and I remember how you like them. How have you been? Did you see the game??”  , You can still bring up a connection that you have without having to give a reason behind why you texted. However, don’t bring up anything heavy from the past to break the ice.   Say something like, “Hey, I have been thinking about you lately and all of our fun conversations last summer. How have you been?”  , Because studies show that girls like guys more if they find them funny, humor is always a smart way to go when you are talking with girls. You can reference an inside joke that you had or ask her a question as a joke.   For example, say something silly like “How long has it been since we ate that giant tamale?”  , After you have broke the ice, you can ask her questions about how she has been and respond with interest. Try to approximately match the length of texts that she sends you and wait time. For example, don’t text her back within a minute with three texts if she answered you with a line or two of text a couple of hours after you texted.   Ask follow up questions like, “I didn’t know that you were working at a new restaurant. That’s cool! How do you like it?”  , If she has been responding to your texts with friendly texts back, you should ask her if she wants to get together and catch up in person. If you ask her to get together, suggest an activity that you two could do together.  Instead of doing what you have done before, try doing new things and going to new places. If you usually get together and eat, for example, try going somewhere new. Go to a new neighborhood to eat, or make food at your house.  

send her a text bringing up a connection that you share.  be direct in your text, and tell her you have been thinking about her.  send her a text that is funny or silly.  keep your text conversation going.  suggest getting together to catch up more.  make new connections with her. 

 Maybe you are not trying to go out of your way to see your crush, but you share a friend group and want to be friendly and cool with her- you can use these steps to help create a good connection with her. Or if you want to get into contact with your old crush and you can’t or don’t want to contact her directly, hang out with the mutual friends you have, and go to events she will probably be at.   You can call your friends and ask them about the events and parties that are coming up and then attend those events. Or if you know she goes to certain church activities, for example, you can start attending those activities again. Don’t use your friends to get to your crush. For example, when you hang out with your friends, be there to have a good time with them first, and consider seeing her second. That way if it doesn’t work out, you will still have a good time, and you won’t mistreat your friends.  When you first see each other, make sure you acknowledge her. If you see her across the room, give her a smile, and a friendly wave or greeting. If it doesn’t seem like a good time to talk, tell her “It is great to see you! I want to talk to you. Can you give me a minute?” You can finish doing what you are doing, and let her finish doing what she is doing, too.   Giving yourself a minute will help you compose yourself and can add a good element of anticipation for your conversation. Think about an interesting topic of conversation or something that you can ask her about as an ice breaker before you walk up and talk to her. For example, you can make an observation about the party you are at by saying something like, “I like that they really made sure that all of our chip needs are met at this party.” Then gesture to a table covered in 10 different types of chips.  Once she is free to talk, start a conversation. If you are somewhere where it is difficult to talk, ask her, “Do you want to find a better place to talk?” Look for somewhere quiet and relaxed where you sit down and catch up uninterrupted.  If you two have any awkward history together, break through that barrier by expressing your positive feelings at seeing her again. Once you two are settled, show her that you are happy to see her again by smiling, making eye contact, and simply saying “I am happy to see you.” Being positive and direct will make you seem confident and can help overcome any weirdness either of you might feel at the start of the conversation.  Use your tone of voice and hand gestures to show her that you are interested in hearing about her. This will make you seem confident and happy to talk to her again. It can be a little less intimidating if you ask her how she is doing now because having to recount everything that has happened since the last time you saw each other might require a lot of explanation.   Say something like, “I’d love to her how you are doing now.” Or you can start by saying what you remember of what she was doing last. For example, you can say “If I remember right, the last time we talked you were…” Avoid talking about anything awkward or difficult things from the past. If the conversation progresses that way naturally, you can talk about deeper topics, but at the beginning of the conversation you want to keep it light and positive.  When she tells you how her life has been, listen attentively by making eye contact, nodding along with what she says, restating her main ideas and asking her relevant questions. For example, if she says she has been having a hard week, ask her what has been going on that has made her week hard.  Think of positive, funny or lighter stories that will give her an idea of what you have been up to lately. Consider talking about topics that you know she is interested in.   For example, if she loves marine biology, you can say “I went on a trip with my school recently to Catalina Island, and we had a blast snorkeling.” Mirror or match her energy level and body language in conversation. For example, if she is talking energetically and using lots of body language, use lots of body language in response and laugh often. Or if she seems a little more reserved, you can talk quieter and give her more physical distance. Don’t copy her gestures; however, do go for a similar level of energy.  After you feel like you have had a chance to catch up and made a good connection in your conversation, tell her you really liked talking and ask her about getting together again. After you have finished laughing about something, for example, you can say “I really liked talking with you again. We should get together again and continue catching up.”  , If she seems interested in going out with you, make sure you have her correct contact information, and arrange to get together to do something in the near future. If she is ambiguous about whether she can hang out again, don’t push it. It is better to let her tell you when she is free. Sometimes people may be nervous in the moment and may come off uninterested, and at other times, they are sending you a message that they are not interested. Send her a follow up message or text to find out which is the case.   For example, if she says something like “I don’t know, I’m going to be busy for a while.” You can say, “No problem, it was really good catching up with you. I’m glad we got the chance.”  , If you got her information and you are going to get together soon, you should send a follow up text sometime in the next couple of days that says something like “It was really good catching up- I am excited to hang out again.” If she seemed like maybe she wanted to hang out again, then follow up with a simple message or text that says “It was really awesome catching up with you- let me know if you want to get together sometime.” This kind of text is low pressure while also getting across that you are interested in hanging out more.  

think about where you will see her.  go up and say hi, and tell her you want to talk.  start a conversation with her.  tell her you are happy to see her.  ask her genuinely how she has been.  ask her follow up questions.  tell her interesting things that have been going on with you.  ask her if you can hang out again.  pay attention to her response.  follow up with a text or message. 

 If you're talking to the girl, then you should stay focused on her face. If just looking into her eyes isn't enough for you, start to really study them. Note the color of her eyes, whether or not they are speckled, how they are shaped, what kind of eye makeup, if any, she is wearing, how long her lashes are, etc. Only do this if you don't think it's creeping her out, and if you're engaged in conversation.   Even if you're focusing on her eyes, you should break eye contact from time to time so the girl doesn't feel creeped out or like you're paying too much attention to her face.; , Pretend you have to give her description to a sketch artist and fixate on her facial features. Note the color of her eyebrows, the shape of her nose, the width of her cheekbones, whether or not she has freckles or moles, etc. If you’re an artist, try to memorize her face well enough to be able to sketch it later. Again, try not to stare. Keep your eye gaze natural and let it flit around the scenery around you two as well.   This is best achieved by looking at her whole face at once and mentally noting her various features, not by eyeballing every area of her face individually. Be especially careful not to stare at her lips, as this can also be taken the wrong way.  If you don’t know her that well or feel like you’ve been staring too long, alternate between looking at her face and looking off to the side like you’re thinking or remembering something. (Looking up and to one side is especially effective, as it keeps your eyes from straying downwards.) Though this may feel weird to you at first, it’s very common for people to get lost in thought like this when they speak.  So making eye contact is great, but you can't do it 24/7 without freaking the girl out, so decide on a place where you will rest your eyes from time to time. It can be the clock above the girl's head, it can be your watch or the books you're holding, or it can be the door to the left of you. Whenever your eyes need to take a break, return them to that same location so they don't end up wandering over to an inappropriate area. One of the reasons that you may be looking at the girl's chest is because you feel the need to break eye contact and naturally rest your eyes on an appealing place.   Sure, the girl may think it's a little strange that you're looking at the clock every minute, but that's better than staring at her chest, isn't it?  , Talk to her about anything -- movies, school, events, or whatever interests you enough to distract you from her breasts. Practice the art of good conversation and attentive listening. If you're having a great conversation, then soon enough, you won't be thinking about her boobs. Think of ways to make her laugh, impress her, or to make her feel special, and soon enough, you'll be focusing on the right things.  If you do end up staring at the girl's boobs, she will definitely notice. She may call you out on it and embarrass you, or she may just feel bad and like you think of her as a sex object. Either way, looking at the girl's boobs won't make your relationship any better and can only lead to bad things. Here are some other consequences that may happen as a result of you staring at the girl's breasts:   You may get an embarrassing erection from looking at her breasts for too long. You will likely lose any chance of asking her out or seducing her. She may tell other girls what happened and they won't want to hang out with you because they will think you're a pervert.  If nothing else is working for you, picture your mom’s face in place of hers. That should keep your eyeballs squared firmly above her shoulders. Though this may sounds a little bit gross, that's exactly the point -- do whatever you can to keep your eyes at eye level. Nobody said it was going to be fun. And hey, why not, you can also pretend she's your sister. Either way will keep you nice and respectful.  If the girl catches you staring at her chest and calls you out on it, then don't deny it, turn bright red, and call her a liar. Just fess up. Say, "I'm so sorry, I know that was disrespectful." Sure, that won't be pleasant for you, but it's better than looking like a wimp. Remember that seeing you looking at her chest probably wasn't all that pleasant for the girl, either.  

make eye contact.  pay attention to the rest of her face.  stare off to the side like you’re lost in thought.  find another place to rest your eyes.  get lost in conversation.  think of the consequences.  if all else fails, pretend she’s your mother.  apologize if you're caught. 

 Consider why she is asking. If you have an idea about how she feels, it will help you have a more productive conversation with her. We communicate mainly through our tone of voice and body language, so try to understand what is going on using these signals.If she is raising her eyebrows, she might be uncomfortable. This might mean that she does not want you to like her. If she is mirroring your body language, then you are probably connecting. Perhaps she hopes that you like her back or she feels connected to you and wants you to know that she doesn’t want the same thing. If she is making lots of eye contact, this shows interest. But it could go both ways, she could be interested in knowing how you feel because you are close and she doesn’t want to hurt you, or because she likes you. A group of gestures together shows that she feels connected to you. For example, if she is smiling, she has her head titled to the side, and she is holding or touching her face at the same time, this could mean that she does like you. However, always believe what she says over any of the signals you get. Crossed legs and arms may mean that she is trying to stay closed off to you. This might mean that she is anxious or resistant to your feelings. ; , Once you have considered how she feels and evaluated her body language, you do not have to over think her feelings for you. The truth is that you do not know for sure how she feels. And you will not know until you have asked her straight out how she feels. And believe what she says over the other signals you feel like you may be getting.   Do not feel bad about what you think she feels or thinks. This is not going to help you stay confident, and it is also probably not accurate.  This will help you to know how to talk to her. If she has a crush on someone else or is with someone else, you will want to approach this conversation differently. You would know because you may have heard other people talk about it, or she may talk about it herself.   If you do know she is with someone else, acknowledge it at the start of the conversation. You will need to say that you do not want to step on her relationship. Stay a little more reserved or distant in your conversation, while still remaining honest. You can ask her, do you want me to tell you about my feelings? Sometimes when a person asks a question they are not interested in hearing a sincere answer. For example, in this instance she may be trying to point out that you are acting like you like her. Being honest and straightforward in your question “do you want me to be honest?” will be the best way to deal with this possibility. Stay further away from her physically and emotionally if she is with someone. Getting close to her or being very open and honest might make her feel uncomfortable. You will want to keep your distance.  Do you know whether she is allowed to date? Some people may be interested in dating but have parents who are strict about dating rules. If you know that she isn’t allowed to date, you may want to acknowledge this fact in the conversation. Try to make her feel comfortable if she seems worried about her parents. Tell her that you do not want to step on her relationship with her parents.   In this case you may not need to tell her that you have a crush on her. You can simply acknowledge that she is not allowed to date. Keep your distance physically to help her feel comfortable.  

pay attention to her tone of voice and body language.  do not assume too much.  think about whether she is already seeing someone.  think about whether she can date. 

 There are many places where sitting next to a girl that you like can be a great way to introduce yourself or get to know her further. Ideally you want to choose somewhere where you can initiate a conversation. Somewhere where she is likely to have an empty seat next to her.Sit in the desk next to her before class. Try finding a seat next to her in the cafeteria.; , Timing is everything when talking to someone you have a crush on. You don’t want them to see you as a nuisance or an interruption. If the girl you like seems busy doing homework or talking to someone on her cellphone, this may not be the best time to approach her.Before or after class is a good time. Choose a seat next to her during study hall.  Show that you are courteous and thoughtful by asking her if you can sit next to her. You also want to make sure no one else has that seat claimed, like maybe a friend of hers, before you just jump into it.   “Is someone already sitting in this seat?” “Do you mind if I sit here?” If it turns out she was busy, apologize for interrupting.  No woman is under any obligation to talk to you. Also, if she says this isn’t a good time or that she would rather sit alone, you’ll go further toward earning her respect by be being mindful of her wishes. Say something like, “Oh, okay. Maybe another time.” And then walk away graciously.   Don’t sit down anyway if she says no. Realize that your crush may just be having a bad day or might be trying to focus on other things. Just because she said no today doesn't mean she'll say no next time.  When you sit next to your crush be sure not to intrude on their personal space. You want to be close enough so that you can easily carry on a conversation but not so close that your knees touch when you turn to face her.   When choosing the desk next to your crush in class, don’t pull it closer to hers. She may find this to be an overly aggressive gesture. If you strike up a conversation and feel like the desks are too far apart to continue comfortably, you may want to slide it over a bit, but generally you should just leave it where it is. If you take a seat next to her on a bench, like on the playground or at a table in the lunch room, leave several inches between you.  Don’t slouch. Sit with your spine straight and your shoulders back. Keep your head up. You might want to turn your body slightly so that you are facing your crush more directly.   Maintaining good posture will not only make you look more confident, it can increase your energy level and actually affect your hormones, making it more likely that you’ll be positive and clear headed while you speak., Tapping your fingers on the desk, shaking your legs, or constantly readjusting your glasses will just make you look nervous. It will also act as a distraction for your crush which will make it hard for her to focus on what you have to say.   Take deep breathes. Fold your hands and rest them on the desk or table in front of you. If there is no table, rest them in your lap. You don’t have to keep your hands still the whole time. Many of us use our hands to gesture while we speak, but when they are idle, keeping them folded will help keep you from fidgeting too much. Take a quick inventory of your body every few minutes. Maybe while she is talking or when there is a small break in the conversation. Check in with yourself. If you feel your leg bouncing or an urge to keep moving around in your seat, take a deep breath and try to relax. Bring your focus back to your crush.  

choose the right place.  choose the right time.  ask if you can sit down.  respect her wishes if she says no.  don’t sit too close.  sit up straight.  don’t fidget. 

 If you feel like she genuinely wants to know how you feel, you may want to have this conversation somewhere quiet. Think about going to a place where you can talk uninterrupted. You want to have this conversation in a space where you are comfortable to talk about how you feel openly.  ]]  This can be a great opportunity to show her how cool you are regardless of why she is asking. If you can tell her how you feel and remain cool, calm, and collected, she will respect you all the more. Going on a walk can be a good option for a conversation like this. Walking can take away some of the awkwardness involved in the conversation. Walking is great because you are moving, not sitting and looking at each other. Going to a restaurant or coffee shop can also work if it is not busy. If you can find a secluded table to sit at or a table outside, this can be ideal. Go to a park. Sit on the swings or find a bench where the two of you can talk.  In order to show her that you respect her space and boundaries, ask her to decide where you should go. If she does not have a preference, then you can suggest places to go.   Be careful not to try to force her to feel the same way. Say that you like her in a way that is free of further implication. Free of implication means that you are not communicating a different message through your body language or tone.  For example, do not look very intently at her in a way that asks her to like you back. Or do not lean forward into her space unless you know that she likes you. You could ask her how she feels before you say anything. However, it is more attractive and confident if you own how you feel and speak first.  She has asked you about your crush on her, and you can absolutely ask why she wants to know. Simply ask “why are you asking?” Do not assume that you know why she is asking.   Once again, keep your tone and body language free of implication. Do not suggest that you know why she is asking with a flirty or accusing tone. Focus fully on what she is saying. Show interest, nod, smile and communicate that you understand through your body language and noises. Try not to interrupt her. Let her speak her piece. You can ask for clarification later. Give her feedback about what she said. You can say "so what I hear you say is ...". This will let her know that you really listened and that you want to understand her. Do not be judgmental about what she is saying. This is how she feels and although it may involve you, do not take her feelings personally. Read on to the next method for more on not taking it personally.  If she likes you back, you can tell her “I’m so excited that you like me too!” If she does not like you back, you can tell her honestly “I’m sad that you do not like me, but I appreciate that you told me.”   You can also thank her for being brave enough to bring up the conversation. If she does not like you, do not make her feel bad for not liking you. Even if you honestly feel like she should like you, it is not your place to tell her that or make her feel that way.  If she doesn’t feel the same way, you might want to ask her if she still wants to be friends. If you do not feel like you two can be friends, ask if you can have space. If she does like you, ask her whether she would like to start dating.   Try not to assume what will happen between you two if she says she has a crush on you, too. Instead, communicate with her how she feels about dating. If you want to start dating, ask her about what dating means to her and explain what dating means to you. You want to make sure that you are talking about the same thing. You may also want to discuss relationship expectations you have and ask her about her's. This may be a full conversation in itself, and one you come back to periodically.  Because it can be an awkward conversation, you may want to avoid talking about it. However, embrace the awkwardness and be confident. If you are still friends but she does not like you, you can simply tell her “thanks for having that conversation with me; I appreciated it.”   You can also follow up over text message, but keep it brief. Do not try to change her mind, instead, acknowledge the conversation and then move on.  

ask her if you two can talk somewhere.  ask her where she would be comfortable having the conversation.  look her in the eye and say “yes, i do have a crush on you.” once you have had a minute and you are situated you can own how you feel, and be confident.  ask her how she feels.  respond with honesty and kindness.  talk about what you should do about your feelings.  follow up with her about the conversation later. 

 Whether someone likes you or not says nothing about you as a person. You are still awesome for all of the same reasons. Do not let her romantic feelings change the way you feel about yourself.  Think about it from her perspective. The more you understand her, the easier it will be to realize that it is not about you. Avoid jumping to conclusions. You don’t know why she doesn’t like you. Be careful not to assume that it is because of something particular about you. Make some space between you and your immediate reaction. Try to suppress any initial panicked emotions. Realize that your feelings will subside and wait for them to do so before you speak or do anything.  Liking yourself is more important than other people liking you.When you truly like yourself, it has an awesome effect- other people want to be around you more.   Speak to yourself as a friend. You should offer yourself the same compassion, love and support you would to a friend who is going through a hard time. Imagine yourself confident and free. In your mind visualize what you would look like if you were perfectly confident and happy. What would you look like? Strive for being that person. Think about that person when you are in doubt about yourself.  It is hard to be open and honest with someone you like. If she does not also have a crush on you too, at least now you know. You are in a better position because you don’t have to spend more time wondering about her.   Being open and honest is a good habit to get into. With the next girl you like, you will be better able to interact with her because you had this experience.  If you feel like you are not ready to start dating other people, work on yourself. Do not worry about liking someone again until you feeling better.   Go out with your friends. Spend time with good friends who make you feel good about yourself. These people will remind you of your interests and the other things that you love. Distance yourself from her. If you are having a hard time with your emotions, tell her that you’d like some time and space from your relationship. Having her out of your life for the time being will help you focus on you.  If you are feeling like you are ready to move on, pursue girls you are interested in. Hang out with groups of people that have new girls. Ask your friends about any get together coming up and attend them.   When you meet a girl you like, ask her for her number. You can be direct and say “I really liked talking to you- can I have your number so we can keep talking?” Go on online dating websites. There are a few free websites that you can join and meet people to date. Lots of people use these applications to find people who share their interests and personality type.  

do not take it personally.  work on liking yourself.  feel good about being honest.  take time to get over her.  start talking to new people. 

 Talking to a girl you like can be nerve-racking. You can ease some of the stress by having a few things already picked out to talk about before you sit down. If you are in the same class you could say something about the teacher or the content of the class itself. If you are at lunch or out with friends you might mention a popular movie or the antics of a friend you have in common.   “Professor Fink is so boring. I actually like physics, but he has a real knack for sucking all the fun out of it.” “Have you seen the latest episode of Supernatural? It was riveting.” “Today is my dog’s birthday. I’m so excited. Do you have any pets?”  , If you don’t already know the girl you like, introduce yourself as soon as you sit down. Tell her your name and maybe what you think of the class. Just a few sentences. “I’m Steven. I usually sit over by the Coke machine at lunch, but I thought I’d switch it up today.”  , When delivered with the right intentions, a sincere compliment can make anyone feel good. Avoid saying things about her body or comments that are lewd or sexual. Instead, tell her you like her shirt or her earrings. Even better, compliment her ideas while you guys are talking.Be honest. An insincere compliment is usually easy to pick out and can have the opposite effect.“I really like listening to you break down the thematic elements of the latest episode of Supernatural. It’s opening up the show in a new way for me.” “Those are really nice earrings. Where did you get them?” Avoid sexually charged compliments., Don’t just monopolize the conversation. Sitting next to some you like is a great way to get to know them better. Ask her about herself. What kinds of things is she into? How is she liking the class so far? What does she usually like to get for lunch from the cafeteria?If this is a first meeting, keep the questions light. Avoid extremely personal questions. Smile and nod your head. Say things like, “I see.” “Yes.” or “I Understand.” Make eye contact. This helps you appear confident. It also assures her that you are listening when she speaks and that you are engaged in what she has to say., If she is avoiding eye contact or leaning away from you, these may be indicators that she is not into the conversation. You can try redirecting the topic to something more neutral or inline with her interests. This may also be a sign that she needs more space or is feeling somehow intruded on. Try leaning back or scooting over a bit to give her more room.   If you notice her leaning forward, smiling, and/or making eye contact, then this is a good indicator that she is engaged in the conversation and having a good time. Keep it up! 

have some ideas about what to talk about.  introduce yourself.  compliment her.  listen and ask questions.  pay attention to her body language. 

 When class starts or an assembly in the gym begins, don’t try to keep the conversation going in a whisper. Instead, participate fully in whatever the activity is. This will show her that you have very clear boundaries and that you understand social norms.You may be able to make a few more connections with some non verbal communication. If the teacher says something funny, you might look her way and make some eye contact while you laugh., You’ll want to be at your best when you sit next to a person you like. The last thing you want is to come off charming and likable, only to have her become too distracted by any offensive odors coming from your body. Be sure to shower daily. Where deodorant and brush your teeth twice a day.   Carry mints with you. Have one before you sit down. Gum can work too, but it can sometimes be hard to talk while chewing gum. It can also be perceived as rude or gross. Where a modest amount of cologne. Don’t dump too much on. It shouldn’t burn the nostrils of the person smelling it. A few dabs on your neck and wrists is fine.  End the conversation by thank her for her time. Tell her you really enjoyed meeting her (or getting to know her even better). Be specific. Reference something you guys talked about. “I had a really great time hearing your views on the television show Supernatural.” “Thank you for telling me that funny story about your cats.” “I understand this physics problem so much better now that we’ve had a chance to talk it out together.  If you’ve just met, it might not be prudent to ask for her number right away. But you can try to set up an appropriate time to meet again. Or even better, ask if it would be okay if you sat next to her the next time the class meets. After you get to know her a little better, you can ask to call her sometime.   Be specific here as well. “I’d like to talk more about pet ownership with you if you are interested.” Let her know when you’ll be here again. This puts the power in her hands to decide if she would like to sit next to you again. Which she totally will if you followed these steps.  

know when to stop talking.  practice good hygiene.  tell her it was nice to meet her.  ask if she would like to talk again. 

 There’s nothing a girl wants more than a guy who is obviously enjoying himself and completely happy on his own. When you’re with your friends, enjoy laughing and sharing stories. When you’re walking to class, think happy thoughts that put a smile on your face. When you see her, show her that you’re in a good mood, and that you’re not a total downer. You don’t have to fake it, obviously, but you should let her see that you’re a person who is enjoying himself so she wants to be in your orbit.   If she sees you already having a great time, then she’ll want to be a part of what you have to offer. If she thinks you need a girl to have a good time, then she’ll think that you’re not quite happy with yourself.; , Gentlemen are all too hard to come by these days and if you are one, girls will take notice. You don’t have to wear a stuffy suit or act all formal just to show a basic courtesy to women. To be a gentleman, treat women with respect by opening doors for them, caring about how they’re feeling when you’re around them, and generally not being too vulgar or burping or being crude in their presence. Every girl wants to be treated like a lady, and you don’t want to make it feel forced to be a real gentleman.   Many guys you know may not have the greatest manners or politeness skills. Stand out from the pack by having good manners and by being polite both to the girl and the people around you.  Girls love confident guys and naturally gravitate towards them. If you want the girl to really go crazy for you, then you have to let her see how much you love being who you are. Be happy to just be in the moment, enjoy the time you spend with your friends, and just let her see that you’re happy and secure with the person who you are and that you don’t care about what other people think. Many guys are obviously insecure and girls don’t like that; they don’t want to spend their time building you up. If you’re happy with who you are, then the girl will be much more likely to want to be around you.   This doesn’t mean that you have to love every last thing about yourself. It does mean that you should be aware of your flaws, trying to change the ones you can change, and accepting the ones you can’t. You don’t have to act overly macho or brag about how awesome you are to come off as truly confident. In fact, this will be a turn-off for girls.  Though girls need guys who have time for them, they don’t want guys who have nothing going on except them, either. If you want the girl to go crazy for you, then you have to impress her with how cool and independent you are. You should be happy doing your own thing, whether it’s playing your guitar on the quad or going for a run in the park. If you’re a follower and just try to do what everyone else is doing because you can’t think for yourself, then she’ll be able to tell. Instead, impress her with your ability to think for yourself and to be comfortable on your own.   Though a girl wants a guy who can have a great time in a crowd, she doesn’t want someone who is completely bored on his own, either.  Don’t open up to her about every little thing you’re thinking right away. As you get to know the girl, sure, you can reveal a little bit about yourself, but at first, you don’t have to tell her about how much you love your dog Munchkin, or about your fight with your best friend. Let her see that it’s worth it to get to know you because it’ll make you open up, little by little. If she thinks it’s too easy to get to know you, then she won’t see you as a challenge. While you don’t have to lie to her or make up excuses to be mysterious, you should avoid telling her everything all at one.   If you have to go, don’t tell her that you have to go meet your mom. Leave her to wonder about your plans.  Nothing makes girls go crazier than a guy who is great a guitar, who has an amazing singing voice, or who is unstoppable when it comes to basketball. To put it bluntly, talent is hot. If you want to amaze and impress a girl, then yeah, it helps if you’re really good at something. That doesn’t mean that you should brag about it or show off in front of her or anything. It just means that you should work to be really good at something and lead her to find out about it.   Of course, you shouldn’t just pursue an activity or a passion just to impress girls, but because you care about it. Being really good at something will also boost your self-esteem, which will also be great for impressing the girls.  Stop thinking that the only way a girl will go crazy for you is if you keep bragging and talking about how awesome you are at various activities. If you really are great at something, then she’ll get word of it; if you feel like you have to tell her, then it means that you’re insecure and feel like you have to convince people about how amazing you are. You can talk about the things you love to do, but don’t say things like, “I’m the best at…” or, “I just killed it when…” or the girl will get bored and will start rolling her eyes.   If you’re always showing off and talking about how awesome you are, then girls will start to see you as social poison. Nobody wants to be around guys who are always talking about themselves.  This doesn't mean you have to spend all of your spare time at the gym working on those guns. It does mean that you should make an effort to think about how you look before you step out of the house, making sure you're showered, smell nice, have well-fitting clothes, and that you don't look super scruffy (unless that's part of your look). If you look like you just rolled out of bed, then the girl will wonder why she should spend time caring about you if you barely care about yourself. You don't need to look like a model to show a girl that you've made an effort to look decent.   If you're hanging out with a girl, it's common courtesy to show up looking nice. Otherwise, she'll take your lack of effort personally.  If you want a girl to go crazy for you, then you have to actually have a reputation for being a nice person. This doesn't mean you should let people walk all over you or that you should be nice to people who are mean to you, but it does mean that you should treat everyone around you, from the less cool kids in your school to your teachers or the girl who works at your local grocery store, with a base level of respect. Don't just be nice to the cool people and treat everyone else like dirt; treat all of the people around you like equals and girls will be impressed that you're a good person with a kind heart.   Contrary to what you think, putting people down and gossiping won't really win girls over. If you're always being negative about or to other people, then the girls will feel like they can't really trust you.  Girls love guys who can make them laugh, and who are comfortable enough with themselves to be able to make jokes at their own expense. This doesn't mean you have to sound insecure or self-deprecating, but if you find an opportunity to poke fun at yourself and to make her laugh in the process, then go for it. She'll think it's cool that you're not obsessing over impressing her or making her think you're perfect, and she'll begin to open up to you and want to be around you more.   If you get easily offended or mad when anyone else pokes fun at you, you'll come off as insecure and defensive. Learn to take a joke, and the ladies will be impressed.  One of the biggest mistakes guys make is to spend so much time talking about themselves or worrying about themselves that they never stop and realize that there’s a girl standing in front of them. You may even make the innocent mistake of thinking too hard about what to say to impress a girl to have the time to consider what she’s saying to you. That stops now. Instead, take the time to really listen to her, to let her finish talking instead of interrupting, and to make an effort to really understand what she’s trying to say instead of trying to relate everything back to yourself.   It’s really hard for girls to find a good listener. If you can be a good listener, this will definitely make you stand out as someone who genuinely cares for her.  A little bit of flirting can go a long way. If you want to get the ladies, then you have to know how to flirt with them without going over the top. Just be fun and light and playful, making harmless jokes and teasing them a little bit, and keep the conversation and banter going in a fun, lighthearted way. Don’t make overly sexual comments or insult the girl when you’re really just trying to tease her; instead, give her cute compliments and even laugh at yourself a little bit to make her see that you like her and don’t take the whole flirting thing too seriously.   Of course, if you want one special girl, you should give her most of your flirting energy while occasionally flirting with others to keep it interesting; you don’t want her to think that you’re just a big flirt who flirts with everybody and doesn’t really care about her.  If you want the girl to go crazy over you, then it helps a lot if her friends think you’re the best thing since sliced bread. If you’re only nice to the girl you like and are kind of mean to the rest of her friends, then she’ll get word of it and will think that you don’t really care about people. But if you charm her friends, without flirting with them or giving them the wrong idea, then she’ll get word of how nice of a guy you are, and will undoubtedly like you even more.   When girls hear other girls talking about how awesome a guy is, then they get jealous, which makes them like that guy even more.  If you want a girl to go crazy for you, then you have to make her feel special by actually taking the time to recognize her as a unique individual. Tell her, “You’re not like other girls…” or “You’re so different from your friends…” and make her see that she really does stand out to you. You can give her a specific compliment about her personality or mention something she said in a previous conversation to show that you’re listening and that you do care. Don’t do this to every girl, though, or it will get back to her, and it’ll look like you’re just a player. Girls want to feel unique, and if they can find a guy who makes them feel that way, they’ll be all in.   Take the time to really notice the things that make the girl stand out, whether it’s her confidence, her laugh, or her talent at dancing. Let her know why she’s special.  Though you want to win the girl over, you have to keep up the chase. You don’t want her to think that she has you in the palm of her hand, but that she has to do some work to win you over, too. It should be a mutual thing. Let her know you like her, but don’t shower her with compliments. Hang out with her, but make sure you have plans with other friends, too, and that you aren’t available the second she wants to hang out. If she calls you, stop picking up the second the phone rings; you’ve got other things to do, right? This will keep the girl interested in coming back for more.   This doesn’t mean that you have to play elaborate games to win the girl over. It does mean that you should keep things interesting so there’s never a dull moment when she sees you. If you put it all out there, she’ll be less likely to be crazy about the intriguing, awesome guy that you are.  You don't want to become that obsessive possessive guy every girl is afraid of, but you also don't want to be Mr. Aloof. Whether you're in a relationship with a girl or just starting to hang out, texting her every once in a while to ask how her day is going or to ask how her math test or soccer game went will show that you're thinking about her even when you're not together. This will make her see that you're a guy worth keeping around. Just make sure that you're not always the one to check in first or she may feel a bit smothered.   Don't text her to say hi more than once every other day or so. You don't want her to think that you have nothing better to do than to be in touch with her.  The best way to win a girl over is not to rush it and just to enjoy the moment instead of trying to find the best fifty ways to be the coolest guy ever. As corny as it sounds, at the end of the day, you want the girl to like you, not some overdone, fake version of who you are, so you should focus on having the girl get to know the real you and getting to know the real her in the process.   If you spend all your time trying to impress the girl, trying to play hard to get, or generally behaving in a way that just doesn't feel natural to you, then she'll catch on pretty fast. Instead, relax, charm the girl, and get ready for her to go crazy for you.  

let her see you having a good time.  be a gentleman.  wow her with your confidence.  be independent.  be a little bit mysterious.  be good at something.  don’t show off too much.  put some effort into your appearance.  treat others with respect.  don't take yourself too seriously.  actually listen to her.  flirt with her.  make her friends think you’re awesome.  make her feel special.  just remember to play hard to get.  check in on her occasionally.  don’t overthink it. 

 Often it’s as easy as making eye contact and smiling to get a girl to smile back. If it doesn’t work, keep trying, and you might get a smile yet. You might even try a sillier smile to see if it might make her laugh. Smiling is a good way to open up a conversation, because it makes both you and her happier.When you smile, it literally changes chemicals in your brain, making you feel happier, and smiles are catching. That means, when someone sees a smile, they want to smile, too, making them happier.; , Ask questions about her and what she likes. Find things you have in common. By discovering what you both like, she might see you in a different way than before. And she'll smile because it shows that you enjoy talking to her. It also sets you up with ideas of what to do in the future., Everyone likes to hear nice things about themselves, and so, a compliment is sure to make her smile. The best compliments are sincere, which means you really mean it. Take a moment to study her, so you can tell her what you really do like about her. You don't have to stick to looks. You can also compliment her brains, her brilliant smile, or her sparkling wit.For example, you could say, "The dress looks good on you!" You could also say, "You know, you're really smart! You always seem to have the right answer in class." Another option is, "You have the best hair! I love how wavy it is."  

smile at her.  talk to her.  compliment her. 

 You can't make someone laugh if they're not paying any attention to you. Make sure you have her attention before you try anything funny, such as walking up to her and saying "Hello" or making eye contact with her.  Poking fun at yourself shows you don’t take yourself too seriously, and that’s an attractive quality. Plus, any time you can crack a joke, even at your own expense, will help to make a girl smile, and it can help lighten up any tension in the room that may be the cause of the girl's frown.This type of humor works especially well when you do something a little silly or clumsy. For instance, if you trip over your shoelaces when she's around, you could say, "If only someone had taught me to tie my shoes, I wouldn't be in this situation." It can also work if she does something clumsy. You can take the attention off her by poking fun at yourself. For instance, you could say, "That wasn't clumsy. Let me tell you about clumsy. One time, I tripped on my own shoe and went tumbling down the stairs. Now THAT was clumsy. What you just did was just cute."  , Cracking a joke shows you have some confidence. Not every joke is going to be a winner, but just the attempt can make her smile. Some of the main ingredients of a good joke include finding the right target, having the element of surprise, exaggerating everyday life, and having the basis of truth.The "target" refers to what you tell the joke about. When telling a joke to someone, the target should be relevant to their interests. For instance, telling a combat joke to a teenage girl may not make much sense, since she's (likely) never been in combat. The surprise is the twist to the joke that makes it funny. Exaggerating makes it funny because it takes it beyond the every day while still keeping an element of truth. For example, if you're eating together in the cafeteria, try cracking a joke about the food. You could say something like, "This food is so terrible my dog would turn up his nose at it."  , Even in junior high and high school, being silly can make people smile or laugh. You can try silly voices, or you can attempt an impression of someone famous. You could even employ some slapstick humor, such as "accidentally" spraying yourself with the water fountain by holding your thumb over the stream. However, slapstick could backfire if the girl just finds it ridiculous.Think about what makes you or your friends laugh, as she'll likely find some of the same things funny.  Another way to make to make someone laugh is to do a silly dance. Of course, you don't want to just run up to a girl and start doing a gorilla a dance. However, if you're standing near her, and some music came on, you could start doing a silly dance in time to the music.  

make sure you have her attention first.  poke fun of yourself.  crack a joke.  be silly.  try a silly dance. 

 Text her fun messages or leave her voice messages to wake up to in the morning. Sending her little messages lets her know you're thinking about her and makes her feel loved and supported. It's sure to put a smile on her face.  When she lets you know that she needs or wants your help, make sure you are there. If she's upset, make sure you provide a shoulder to cry on. When you say you'll do something, make sure you're there. If you make a date with her, show up on time and be genuine about it. If she knows you are true to your word and a person she can depend on, she'll definitely smile more.  You could lightly arm wrestle with her or tickle her, too. Not in a mean way, but in a cute way that allows her to realize you want to share a special connection with her. Try holding her hand or hugging her by surprise. However, if she pulls back, make sure to let her go, as she may not want to be touched right then.  That's it, you've done it again. You've done something wrong, and now you're girlfriend's mad. The only way out of this situation is to apologize, truly and sincerely, by admitting what you did wrong and asking how you can make up for what you did. Only then will you have a smiling girlfriend again (eventually).For instance, just saying, "OK, I'm sorry," isn't going to cut it. Rather, you should say something like, "I'm sorry I forgot to meet you after school. I know I made you wait around for me, and that sucks for you. Maybe I can buy you a soda right now to make up for it?"  

stay in touch.  be there for her.  tease her or play with her.  apologize when you've done something wrong. 

 Nothing says you’re interested in her more than taking the time to make her something. It could be something as small as a bouquet of wildflowers you picked yourself and put in a homemade vase. Really, it's the thought and the surprise that count. You could also make her a braided bracelet out of yarn or beads. Another option is baking her something, like a batch of cookies or brownies.  If she talks about a particular band that you’ve never heard, find it and listen to it. She will probably be impressed that you went to the trouble of listening to it. Bring her things she mentions. If she said she likes coffee, bring her coffee one day. Show her that you are getting to know the real girl, and her likes and dislikes. Also, pay attention when she tells a story. It says something about her, and she'll be touched if you remember it later., It doesn’t have to be big, but it should be thoughtful. She should know that you’ve been thinking about her. It should also show that you know the kinds of things she likes and likes to do. In other words, it should be thoughtful.If she collects things, like stickers, pins, pens, or hair bows, bring her a new one that you know she'll like. If she likes to read, pick a used book to give to her. You could also bring her a piece of chocolate or her favorite soda.  It doesn’t have to be fancy, just something that will be new and surprising and bring a smile to her face. Think about the kinds of activities she likes, and come up with a plan. In fact, you could even ask some questions to figure out what she likes, without giving away the surprise, such as, "So what are some of your favorite restaurants in town? I love Betty's Burgers."Visit a free art gallery, or go have coffee and dessert at a coffee shop. Take a walk by the lake to feed the ducks. Join a free dancing lesson, or go browse the library together.  

make her something.  show you’re listening.  give her a gift.  take her on a surprise outing. 

 Gaining the trust of the girl you like, of the old friend you’ve let down, or of the husband you’ve betrayed are not all that different. Assuming that girls / young women have special requirements for gaining trust can easily devolve into stereotyping and unfair generalizations. Instead, universal advice like that provided by How to Build Trust makes a good starting point for anyone. In it, the basic requirements for earning trust include:   Being reliable. Being honest. Being open. Showing integrity. More specific ideas about how to get a girl to trust you should draw from basic building blocks like these.; , There’s a good chance that the old saying “once bitten, twice shy” may apply to your girl. At some point, she’s probably had her trust betrayed by someone important to her, and therefore may be hesitant to take the chance of being hurt again.Don’t take it personally if she is hesitant to trust you because of past disappointments. Accept the challenge to work even harder to earn her trust. For instance, getting help from “references” — mutual friends or acquaintances who can speak to your trustworthiness — may help you break through the walls of skepticism created by previous betrayals. Gather as much evidence as possible that you can be trusted, but expect your own words and actions to be most important., It is always easier to trust someone who is clear and unequivocal about his intentions, be it in business, in love, or in life.Evasiveness or deception about your real interest in a girl will make it easy for her to withhold her trust. In relationship terms, be up-front about whether you are just seeking some short-term fun, hope for something more lasting, or simply aren’t sure where you see things heading.   If you have any genuine care or respect for that girl you met at a party, for example, don’t lead her on by saying you’re interested in a long-term relationship if you are not. Show trust in her by being honest from the start, and you’ll be more likely to earn her trust in return.  Don’t try to be someone you are not in order to draw the interest of a girl, and then expect to be able to gain her trust. Even if you manage to “fool” her temporarily, she will eventually see through this fabrication, and then it will be nearly impossible to earn her trust after you have deceived her right from the start.Be confident in who you are, and expect that to be good enough to score her affections and, eventually, her trust. It is much easier to trust someone who looks, talks, and acts like someone who is comfortable in his or her “own skin.” If you know you are trustworthy, she will eventually see it too.  Reliability is always a critical factor in building trust, whether from a co-worker or a romantic interest. She needs to believe you’ll do what you say you’ll do (and not do what you say you won’t), each and every time. That is the kind of person who is easy to trust.Be consistent in what you say and do. If you say you’ll pick her up at 7 o’clock, do it. If you promise to drop a bad habit that bothers her, work as hard as you can to do so. Her trust will be the reward for your efforts.  Lots of girls out there (and guys, for that matter) appreciate an unsolicited hug, a hand to hold, a gentle kiss, or a shoulder to cry on. Proving that you understand her wants and needs, and that you are always “there for her,” will put you on the fast track toward earning her trust.Of course, realizing that she isn’t a hugger, or showing that you know and accept her current limits on the physical nature of your relationship, can also build trust. Sometimes what you don’t do is just as important as what you do in order to gain trust. If she feels like you don’t understand her, or are pressuring her to move things forward, she is more likely to withhold her trust.  Trust is almost impossible to build without regular, open, and honest communication. Prove yourself to be an active, involved, and interested listener, and speak to her thoughtfully and truthfully about your feelings, and you will slowly but surely gain her trust.   In the business world, people have found that certain simple, direct phrases tend to help build trust with co-workers or clients. The same concept holds true in personal relationships as well. Phrases like “thank you,” “yes,” “I will,” “What do you think?”, “I trust your judgment,” and “I understand” are unequivocal and demonstrate a focus on the other person’s needs., It turns out that trust is a lot like everyone’s favorite nursery rhyme egg, Humpty Dumpty: it’s easy to break, and very hard to rebuild afterward.Once you’ve betrayed a girl’s trust, “all the king’s horses and all the king’s men” may not be enough to get it back. Sometimes you’ll just have to accept that it is lost forever. But that doesn’t mean you shouldn’t try your hardest to earn it back.Never assume that you deserve a second chance, especially if you have seriously betrayed her trust, such as by cheating on her. Earning trust is hard, and re-earning it is that much more difficult. Don’t fool yourself about the substantial effort it will take on your part, and the reality that it may not be enough not matter what you do.  The first step to regaining trust is always to be completely honest (to her and to yourself) about what you did to lose it in the first place. Think long and hard about why you did the thing that broke her trust, and be prepared to patiently answer her questions and accept her anger and sadness.Never try to downplay what you have done to break her trust. It is serious business, and you need to always treat it as such if you want any shot at regaining her trust. That said, once you’ve “come clean,” try not to obsess over why you did it or the “gory details.” At some point, both of you have to be able to move forward if trust is to be rebuilt. You can’t control her pace in moving past it, but you can control yours., Never make excuses for your indiscretions that have caused a loss of trust. You screwed up, it was your fault and yours alone, and now it is up to you to do everything you can to rebuild what your actions have broken. As with coming clean with all the details, a full apology is necessary to “clean the slate” before you can begin working to restore trust.Saying “Sorry I messed up. I promise I won’t do it again” will not cut it. Try something more like: “I am very sorry that I lied to you about something so important. I know how much it has hurt you, and it is all my fault. I hope you will give the the chance to earn your forgiveness and regain your trust, even if I don’t deserve it right now.”  , Sometimes people can become so focused on admitting their errors and begging for forgiveness that they never get around to forgiving themselves. We all make stupid mistakes, and hurt people we care about. Without minimizing the seriousness of what you’ve done, you need to be able to accept it and leave it behind if you hope to move forward. If you can’t get past it, she’ll definitely never be able to.Regaining trust is hard work, and requires you to make real changes in your life. If you’re too busy still punishing yourself for screwing up, you won’t be able to put the work in that is necessary to regain her trust. Remember, you can’t take back what you’ve done. All you can do is try to make amends for it and prove that you’ve learned from this mistake and won’t repeat it.  Earning forgiveness and regaining trust take time, and they have to happen at the pace set by the person who has been harmed. Your actions and words will help determine if the process succeeds, but you can’t force things along. Sometimes, all you can do is wait and hope.Expect setbacks in the process. Things may seem like they are going well, and then all of a sudden she can’t stand to look at you again. The truth is that the sting of a betrayal is never going to completely vanish, and like any old injury, you have to accept that the pain is going to “flare up” every so often, and sometimes for no apparent reason.  You broke her trust, and you have to do much of the heavy lifting in order to stand a chance of getting it back. However, she has to be willing to put in the effort as well. Only by working together can trust be restored. If she can’t or won’t join you in making the effort to rebuild things, take that as a sign that the break is irreparable.If open and honest communication is important to building trust, it is even more vital to rebuilding it. Be willing to talk and listen a lot. Don’t hold back, and encourage her to do the same. Consider engaging the help of a therapist or counselor trained in dealing with broken relationships. If she raises the idea, never hesitate to agree. If it’s your idea, give her the time and space to consider it. 

gain a girl’s trust in the same ways you gain it from anyone.  assume she’s been let down before.  be clear with your intentions.  be true to yourself.  follow through on your promises.  be appropriately affectionate.  communicate with trust.  don’t take it for granted.  come clean but don’t obsess over the details.  apologize unconditionally.  forgive yourself.  be patient and understanding.  work together. 

 Think about the place you're going if you're looking to meet women abroad, and consider changing your choice of destination if it's that important to you. If you can imagine a vacation location as being exciting and potentially romantic, there's a good chance you'll be able to meet women there.   Cruises, for example, are generally intended for committed couples, unless the cruise is listed as being otherwise. Tropical resorts or festive cities on the other hand attract singles in droves.; , Because most everyone going will be single, a singles cruise will vastly increase your chance to striking up conversation with single women.   Conceivably, meeting someone on any cruise ship would be a romantic experience, but due to the fact that cruises are regularly associated with couples, your bet luck will be had with singles cruises.  Many of these involve resorts where other singles may congregate and make their own fun together. If you have a rough idea where you'd like to go, look into whether the region in question has any packages suited for your intent and situation.  While some people prefer to take it easy and lay back while they're on vacation, there are almost always good way of meeting single women when you're abroad. Once you have a destination picked out, look into the attractions. The best place for meeting women will be high-energy settings where alcohol is involved.Clubs, bars and the beach are all great places to start. Try to steer away from places that attract families.  Your party will also have a considerable impact on your chances of meeting women. Going with your family won't help your odds for example, but going with a group of fellow singles who are intent on the same thing will make it easier to find fresh opportunities during the vacation.  

consider the place you're going to vacation at.it goes without saying that some vacation destinations are better than others when it comes to meeting women.  go on a singles cruise.although most cruises are intended for married couple, there are specific cruises that capitalize on offering experiences for singles.  look into singles vacation packages.although the tourism industry is conventionally built around couples, families and groups, there are vacation packages catered specifically to singles as well.  plan your vacation activities with meeting women in mind.  go vacationing with the right kind of people.the people you go on vacation with will have a major impact on your experience abroad. 

 After you and a certain girl have spent enough time together, there will come a point where you should figure out what it is you want from the connection. Are you content with a short-term interaction, or do you think there's the potential for something greater? If you're unsure, you might bring this subject up with the girl in question. Finding out what her thoughts are may give you some clarity.  This is helpful if you want to stay in touch, and particularly important if you think she may be leading you on. Many people will show their relationship statuses online. This way, you can see if a girl is truly as available as she says she is.   Likewise, you should expect a girl to look you up online as well. This means you should avoid trying to start romance if you are already in a committed relationship with someone back home.  This is important to keep in mind going into the romance itself, as you shouldn't set yourself up for heartbreak towards the end. If anything, you should enjoy a romance for the short time it lasts. If the chemistry is really strong enough however, the two of you may want to take it further.  If the chemistry between the two of you is potent enough, you should try to keep a connection between the two of you, even if there's a major distance. Some lifelong romances have occurred in spite of originally living continents apart. Ask for her number or email information and take it from there. If the two of you manage to foster a longer-lasting correspondence, you may decide to meet up again later on down the road.  Like any romantic encounter, there is absolutely nothing to promise that the other person will feel the same way as you do. This is possibly especially true in a vacation setting, where a more prudent woman will recognize the folly of falling in love on vacation. No matter how bad it hurts at first, accept it gracefully and go back to enjoying your vacation. Don't let a rejection get in the way of the rest of your experience. It's quite possible that you'll meet another woman on the same trip and thing will turn out for the better.  Even if it doesn't pan out and you wanted it to last, the experience still leaves a lot to consider. When you return from your travels, you should take the time to reflect on what happened, and how it may have changed your opinions on your day-to-day life.  

decide what you want.  look up the girl online.looking up the girl's name on social media will give you a glimpse into her regular life.  be realistic.romances while out on vacation can be a lot of fun, but the truth is that the vast majority of them do not last for very long.  make plans to stay in touch.  accept the potential for rejection.  reflect on the experience.most romances while on vacation don't end up amounting to anything long-lasting. 

 Though you may be desperate for your woman to fall in love with you, you can't try too hard, at first, or you'll scare her off. Take it slow and let things progress naturally.If you've only been together for a few weeks, or a month or two, then you should keep things light and fun. Don’t say “I love you” yet, or it may not have the effect you're hoping for.   Of course, every relationship moves at its own pace. If you think you're both really approaching love after a few months, then dive in! But make sure that you're looking for love with this specific woman, not just love in general.; , Demonstrate your great personality to the woman you are interested in. By being positive, kind, funny, and thoughtful, you can show her that you are a great guy who would make an excellent boyfriend.Try making her laugh by telling jokes. Remember to be kind to people. Try to maintain a positive and upbeat attitude.  You don't have to ride up on a horse to pick her up for a date, but you should make an effort to treat her like a lady. Part of being a gentleman is having stellar manners and treating people well. If you do this, then she will take notice and will be on her way to falling for you. This doesn't mean that you should not be yourself and have to start acting formal all of the time. It just means that you should try a bit harder to be polite and considerate of her needs.Here are some things any old gentleman can do:   Give her your coat if she's cold Use proper table manners Put her needs before your own when it comes to having the best seat, the last bite of food, etc. Hold open doors for her Pull out her chair for her Be attentive to her needs in general  , If you want a woman to fall in love with you, then you have to show her that you see her as more than just an object or a trophy to be won. Show her see that you care about who she is as a person, about what she wants, what her dreams are, and what her experiences have been. You shouldn't interrogate her, but at the same time, you have to make an effort to know who she really is besides the fun-loving, beautiful woman you see in front of you. Here are some things to ask her about:   Her childhood Her favorite memories Her friendships Her relationships with her family members Her hopes for the future Her job or her career goals Her passions or hobbies  , Always hanging around and calling and texting a woman will not make her fall in love with you. In order to evaluate her feelings about you, she needs some distance and space to think about you. If you're always around, asking what she's up to, or telling her how amazing she is 24/7, that won't increase her feelings of love for you. If you let her know you care but give her space at the same time, then she'll be much more likely to fall for you.Just like guys are turned off by women who come on too strong, so are women. Find a balance between letting her know how much you like her and giving her space.  If you want a woman to fall for you, then you have to make her see that you're a person who is worth falling for, not just a puppy dog she can keep on a leash. Maintain your hobbies and work hard at a job that means something to you. The happier you are on your own, the more the woman will want to be around you.For example, you could hang out with your guy friends, spend time training for a marathon, play guitar, or pursue your favorite hobby.  Another way to win a girl over is to give her compliments that actually mean something. This means you should go beyond telling her how pretty she is, and dig deeper to let her know which attributes really mean something to you.Of course, complimenting her looks will make her feel good, too, as long as it's not the only thing you're complimenting. Look for unique aspects of her personality or her life that are really worth complimenting, and she'll see that you really care. Here are some things you can say:   "You always know how to crack me up, even when I'm having a bad day." "You're so good at talking to almost anyone. My Grandma Pearl could have talked to you for hours! What a gift." "I've never seen eyes that are the same shade of blue as yours."  , If you want to deepen your bond, then you have to open up as your relationship progresses. Don’t tell her everything about yourself at first, or she may feel like there's no mystery there. But once you've been together for a while, slowly let her know about the things that matter to you. This could mean talking about your real dreams for the future, discussing a complicated friendship from the past, or even revealing your biggest fears.   Try asking for her advice about things now and then to show her that you value her input., If you want a woman to really fall in love with you, then you have to be there to support her when she needs you. This means anything from going to support her in the school play or building her up before a job interview. You'll need to be there for her when she's nervous about something, having a bad day, or just figuring out her life. Women look for this quality in a life partner, and if you want her to really fall for you, then she has to see that you'll be there for her through the good times and the bad.   Try leaving an encouraging note in her lunch bag, sending her a confidence boosting text message, or just congratulate her on her accomplishments.  Trying new things now and then will help to keep things interesting and exciting in your relationship. This doesn't mean you should get a motorcycle and start doing backflips in your living room, but it does mean that you should keep an eye on the unconventional and exciting things that would take your relationship to the next level. If you do the same old thing or talk about the same old thing all the time, then the woman may begin to get a little restless.   Ask your girlfriend what she has always wanted to do, but never has. Then, plan an outing so that you can try that activity. For example, maybe she has always wanted to learn how to surf. You can arrange for the two of you to take a surfing lesson together. Vary your conversation topics as well. If you're always talking about sports or the same old thing, it may get old. Read the news, read literature, watch documentaries, and just do things that make you a more interesting person -- so that you can keep her interest.  If you want a woman to really fall in love with you, then you have to work hard to make sure that her friends and family also like you.Be kind and polite to her family, be fun and sweet around her friends, and most importantly, show that you really care about her. In the end, that's the biggest thing they're looking for -- not how much money you make or how cute you are.   Avoid getting in heated fights or political debates with her friends and relatives. It's just not worth it. If you really don't like one of the woman's relatives or friends, it's best to keep your mouth shut, in most cases. The woman won't like it if you're threatening one of the relationships she's had much longer than she's known you.  Surprising your girlfriend and doing thoughtful little things will show her how much you care. Though you shouldn't be her love slave, you should take the time to do little things that make her really feel loved and cared for.For example, you can send her flowers on a random day, send her a text to say you're thinking of her, cook her a meal when you know she's had a long day, or massage her feet if she's feeling tired.  If you want a woman to fall for you, then you have to make her see you as more than just a hot, exciting prospect who is perfect for right now. Let her see that you're responsible, caring, smart, fun to be around, and an all-around good long-term bet. Be your best self and show her that you're Mr. Right, not just Mr. Right Now.   Being responsible is a big plus. If she sees that you can balance your checkbook, cook dinner, and do what needs to get done, she'll be very impressed.  Listening is crucial to the success of a relationship. When she needs you to listen to her, drop your distractions, look her in the eyes, and take in what she's telling you. Don't try to solve her problems or give an opinion on everything -- just be there and listen when she wants to talk.   Demonstrate that you are listening by summarizing what she said and checking to see if you are understanding. For example, you could say something like, “If I’m understanding you correctly, you are feeling frustrated about your boss and the way she handles meetings. Is that right?” Ask questions to show her that you are interested in hearing more. Stick to who, what, when, where, and how questions. Avoid “why” questions because they may cause her to become defensive., Good communication is essential for maintaining a long-lasting, loving relationship. If you find that you and your partner are not communicating very well, take the initiative and try to find out what’s been going on. Ask her how she's feeling, ask about her day, or just ask if there's anything in particular that she wants to talk about.Tell your girlfriend how you are feeling and when you want (or do not want) to talk as well. For example, if you are having a bad day and need some space, let her know.  Forgiveness is essential to a long lasting relationship. All couples argue from time to time and your girlfriend is bound to make mistakes sometimes. If you hold a grudge and refuse to forgive her for mistakes, then your relationship will suffer. Practice forgiveness when she does something that upsets you and your relationship will stand a better chance of survival., Looks are not everything, but maintaining a healthy lifestyle is good for you and good for your relationship. If you want to ensure that you feel your best and she continues to enjoy the way that you look, you have to keep taking care of yourself. Make sure that you eat well, exercise daily, and get plenty of rest and relaxation., If you really want her to fall in love with you -- and to stay that way -- then you always have to keep making the effort. You've got to bring her flowers on random days. You should dress up for date nights. Come up with new things to do together. Never give up on trying to make her laugh.Don't quit on her if she's in a bad mood. Just keep working your charms and working hard to keep her. Don't think that, once you've both said you love each other, you've got this in the bag. You always have to keep making an effort, whether you're 20, 30, or 80.  Assess your relationship every so often to see what has changed or what needs to change. Research has shown that people undergo significant changes every 7-8 years and you will need to account for these changes in your relationship. Whether it is a new job or a new interest, it is important to address these changes in order to maintain a good relationship., If you want your relationship to keep going strong, then you should build a list of things that you do together. You have to have a few things that are just for the two of you, which you love doing together as you build your relationship.Consider taking some Sunday morning hikes, reading together near the fireplace, making Italian meals together, going wine tasting, or running races. Keep in mind that this doesn't mean that you have to share all of the same interests -- you don't have to go to yoga just to please her, and she doesn't have to watch your favorite TV show with you if it's not her thing. Having your own interests that you maintain will help you grow stronger, too.  While you should work on doing things together, it's important to stay focused on your own goals and pursuits, too. If you're always together, one or both of you may begin to feel smothered. Keep on doing the things you love while making time for the person you love.Try setting aside a day or night where you spend time with your friends and she spends time with hers.  If you want to make a woman fall for you, and make it last forever, then you have to tell her that you love her. Do it at least once a day and say it like you really mean it. These three words can make a big impact on your life -- and your relationship.No matter how secure a woman is in her relationship, she will always like to hear that you love her.  

keep things light at the beginning.  show her that you have a great personality.  be a gentleman.  ask questions to get to know her better.  give her space.  impress her with your independence.  give her sincere compliments.  open up to her.  be supportive.  keep things interesting.  win over her friends and family.  surprise her and be thoughtful.  show her that you'll be a good long-term partner.  listen to her.  communicate with each other.  be forgiving.  keep taking care of yourself.  do little things to impress her.  assess changes in your relationship.  build your interests together.  remember to maintain your independence.  never stop saying "i love you." 

 Whenever she is in trouble or worried about something, don't just sit there with her. Acknowledge that you don't have all the answers, and that you may not know exactly what she's going through, but try to help make the situation better for her.   Ask her how you can help, but don't insist that she let you. Be patient with anything she goes through and be supportive. When you can make a difference, do so without hesitation, but also cautiously, as you don't want to hurt her in any way. If she likes you already, go above and beyond the call of duty. Do something that she'd never expect you to do, like cooking her breakfast and then doing the dishes, and she'll fall even harder for you. You're showing her what you're made of. If she doesn't like you yet, or you don't know how she feels about it, play it cool. Be calm. If you're the kind of guy who gets sweaty and stutters his words when he's around a girl, then just calm down. Think of her as just your friend who happens to look different. If you can't calm down, no sweat! Girls think it is adorable when guys trip over themselves. You'll make her laugh in a good way!; , Be friendly with her without always being available. Girls love guys who are a bit mysterious, so try to cultivate a bit of mystery — don't always pick up the phone, let on where you're going, etc. Be honest, but not always totally up front.  Your guy-friends probably didn't care that you walked around in the same clothes you mowed the lawn in, but the girl of your dreams probably won't be very impressed. Here are three simple things you can start doing right away that will help:   Shower and shave every day. If you're not yet old enough to shave, don't sweat it. You should be soon. Smell nice and look clean by showering or bathing regularly. Wear clothes that actually fit. Not your older brother's clothes; not your dad's clothes. Wear your own clothes, and ones that flatter your figure. It doesn't matter how much money you have — every guy needs a good pair of jeans, a fitting t-shirt, a simple but elegant collared shirt, and shoes to fit the occasion. Get in shape. Lose that excess flab if you can and turn it into muscle. Most girls like guys who have developed muscles that aren't so chiseled they're intimidating. Find an intramural sports league that you're interested in and go for it. You might even be able to impress your lady with your skills.  Most men are charming in a couple different ways, but here are some charming ideas to think about:   Be a gentleman. This means opening doors, paying for a date, keeping your word, etc. Girls love to feel like a gentleman cares about them.  Be witty. Girls love guys who are great conversationalists, who can turn anything into a joke. Learn how to elegantly make fun of yourself. Be intelligent. You should do your best to be well-read, informed about current-affairs, and curious. Women like men who are smart but still relatable.  Every girl wants a guy who, at the end of the day, is reliable — dependable not because he has to be, but because he wants to be. Being reliable is all about telling a girl that she has security with you. Try to be the most reliable guy you know.   Do what you say you're going to do. If you talk the talk, walk the walk. Girls don't like guys who say they're going to do something and never follow through with it. Be punctual. Even though some girls are late to dates, a girl hates it when she has to wait on a guy. To her, it says: "I don't care enough about you to be on-time." If you're going to be late, let her know. Have a good reputation. Be the guy that other guys want to vouch for. You never know whether she, or one of her friends, could ask around about you. And if she hears how you cheated on your ex-girlfriend, your reputation is shot and you'll have to rebuild it.  A person is more responsive and receptive when relaxed. This is similar to being witty, but with higher importance. It helps you connect with her emotionally/intellectually. She should enjoy your company and not be bored.  It's a turnoff when you're always around her and touching her and flirting obnoxiously with her when she is not interested and has never shown any interest at all. Learn to give her the control, even if it's only the illusion of control.   If a girl doesn't want to make out, for example, or have sex, don't try to force it out of her. That's not the way to get her obsessed with you. Instead, listen to her wishes, understand why she has them, and respect them. You'll get more bees with honey than you will with vinegar.  Most women don't care how much you make, or who your parents are, so long as you can provide for them. That's nice, because most men aren't blessed with wealth. Remember these things about money around women:   Women, like men, want to be spoiled some of the time. It doesn't have to be extravagant, but they like to be spoiled. Save enough money so that you can spoil her every once in a while. Most women don't like men who flaunt their money. If you have money, don't flaunt it, because you just might scare her away.  A girl might really like you but if she sees you dancing or talking with another girl, that could be a dealbreaker. Make sure she knows you're interested in only her.   At the same time, have friends who are also girls. If you hang around friends who are also girls, she'll feel safer around you because other women are comfortable hanging out with you. If you never hang around any women, it could be a sign to her that you're illiterate when it comes to them. Sometimes, women engage in a little competition — just like men! Therefore, it's helpful to have other women around, provided you don't get involved or flirt with them.  Give her some good old-fashioned compliments. Don't compliment her ability to do every little thing perfectly, or you'll seem too needy or obsessive yourself. But a well-placed compliment can make a girl remember you for days on end!   Be sincere when you compliment. Figure out what you like about her best — what you think makes her most unique — and tell her. If it's the truth, it will automatically come out as sincere. Reinforce how she views herself. If she thinks of herself as an athlete, reinforce her competitive spirit or athletic skills. If she thinks of herself as a thinker, praise her smarts. Whatever she thinks of herself as, compliment that aspect of her the most. Focus more on her personality than her appearance. If you have to get in a compliment about her appearance, stay away from the more feminine areas and stick to complimenting these:  Smile Hair Eyes Lips Clothes (style, appearance, etc.)    , Sing or hum songs, talk about movies, share favorite places. Anything that, when she hears/sees it again, will make her think of you.  Girls like guys who are in touch with their feminine side without being girly at all. That means you have to understand where she's coming from but still be thoroughly manly if you can. Learn a lesson from the following cues:   It's OK to cry at a movie...if that movie is about sports. While most girls don't like sports, it's a badge of your manliness to her. Be prepared to stick with sports while still making time to see her. It's OK to dress well...but not too well. As discussed earlier, girls love a guy who can dress nicely. But as soon as the guy dresses nicer than her, that can be a big turnoff.  You should not make building a relationship with her a script. The most important thing to do when looking for a meaningful relationship is to relax around her, and let your true personality shine through. Do not force yourself to fit a stereotype. You're better off waiting until you can find a girl who likes you, not a stereotypical "cool" guy. A relationship in which you can be yourself is much, much more meaningful than one in which you have to pretend to be someone else.  Be yourself and be a gentlemen. Let her do what she wants and act like you care about her.  

be her hero.  don't fly too deep into the friend zone.  pay attention to how you look.  be charming:you must at least have some kind of charm to appeal to a woman.  be reliable.  try to be funny: this gives the girl a reason to relax.  don't be too pushy.  have financial independence.  don't flirt with other girls too much.  compliment her.  give her reasons to be reminded of you.  balance your sensitive side with your masculine side.  most of all, do not use guides such as this one literally.  girls have no idea what they want. 

 This is the simplest, most direct way to make a girl blush. Almost everyone appreciates a good compliment. If you choose the right words — walking the thin line between sincere and funny — she just might blush. A few tips are below.   Try to make the compliment about her, rather than about her things. As a simple example, you might say "You look great in that dress" instead of "I like your dress." Explore topics besides her looks. For example, her smarts and artistic abilities are also great things to bring up. Don't lay it on too thick. One or two compliments per conversation are fine. A constant string of compliments will usually make people feel uncomfortable.; , Sometimes a single look can say a thousand words. When you catch her eye as you talk, smile at her and keep your gaze for a few seconds longer than you normally would. If she is shy, even the slightest amount of eye contact may turn her cheeks pink. If she smiles back at you, this can be a sign she feels an attraction for you (though you shouldn't go off of this alone).   When something else catches your attention or someone else starts talking, break your eye contact. Don't keep staring at the girl — this can come across as creepy leering.  Not all girls will blush over something as innocent as eye contact. However, a little good-natured flirting can usually do the trick. Flirting is a skill that is a little too complex to explain in a single step, so see our article on it for detailed instructions.   One basic way to flirt is to give someone a ridiculous compliment with a joking or sarcastic delivery. For example, if the girl flexes to show off her bicep, you might say something like, "Oooh, soo sexy." It should come across like you're teasing her but being a little sincere at the same time.  This takes a little finesse, but it works great when you get good at it. Your goal here is to embarrass the girl, but only slightly and only about something that's not actually very important. You should always keep your teasing lighthearted. Back off immediately if you sense that she feels offended or deeply embarrassed.   A good rule is to tease her about her skills or decisions instead of her personality or appearance. For example, teasing her about her bad driving skills can be cute. On the other hand, teasing her about a few light wisps of facial hair is a bad idea.  When you're hanging out in a group of people, try making a joke that only she will get. It can be a reference to something from your past, something funny that happened to you two but not the other people, or something that references a mutual interest. If you pull it off, she'll feel special. Out of all the people, you singled out her for some humor.   Thinking up an inside joke is up to you — only you can search your shared history for something amusing to say.  Girls (like boys) listen to their peers. If she hears her friends or family talking about what an amazing, desirable person you are, she may start thinking about you in new romantic ways. Your best bet for this to happen is to simply present your best self. Look as good as you can, have confidence in yourself, and make an effort to be friendly to all of her peers.   If you're already dating, impressing her parents with your politeness and achievements can be a major plus. For many girls, the approval of the parents can mean the world. A little old-fashioned chivalry and good manners in front of the parents can make you look like an absolute gentleman. If you really want to look good, consider getting a clean-cut haircut as well.  If you're dating the girl that you're trying to make blush, you have more options at your disposal because you already share a level of intimacy. Let her know that she's extremely valuable to you. If you're comfortable with the idea and your relationship has reached this point, you can also bring the "L word" into the conversation. For the best effect, your actions should reflect your words. A few ideas for showing your seriousness are below:   Write her a sweet, hand-penned note. Make her a mix with her favorite songs on it. Take her to your favorite hiking or camping spot. Share a picnic somewhere with a gorgeous view. Treat her to a semi-fancy night out just because.  On the other hand, if the girl you're trying to make blush isn't your girlfriend, making your romantic intentions known can certainly make her blush. This can be something as simple as breaking the touch barrier (for instance, touching her shoulder as you laugh) or a little flirting. If you want to be drastic, consider asking the girl out. She's certain to be flattered, even if she doesn't feel the same way. If she does, you have an exciting new relationship to explore!   If you're ready to take the plunge, see our guide on asking girls out.  When it comes to complimenting a girl, you'll want to avoid anything that makes her feel like a sex object (or a "piece of meat") rather than a feeling, thinking human being. Keep you compliments about her beauty, her intelligence, her decisions, and her personality. Avoid the following subjects:   Her sex characteristics (e.g., bust size) How revealing or non-revealing her clothing is Her race or ethnicity Outward identifiers of her religion or social status  , While it's OK to be attracted to someone or be captivated by someone's beauty, getting too fixated on her looks can be a great way to ruin your chances. In extreme cases, this sort of behavior can constitute harassment. Actions and comments that are inappropriately personal or sexual or personal are off-limits. Avoid the following sorts of actions:   Staring or ogling — especially if you're looking below the neck Asking prying questions about her dating or sex history Pressing her for a chance to hang out together if she says "no" or offers an excuse for why she can't Making any sort of comment that insinuates that she should do something sexual with you  , Touching a someone inappropriately against their will is wrong. At best, it is cause for this person to get angry with you. At worst, it can be a crime. If you haven't already established that touching is OK, keep your hands to yourself except for harmless flirtatious gestures like briefly touching her shoulder as you laugh. If she appears uncomfortable or asks you to stop, stop — even if you don't think you're doing anything wrong.  As noted above, gentle teasing can be a great way to flirt with a girl and get her to blush. However, there's a fine line to be aware of here. Teasing a girl in a way that makes her feel self-conscious or under attack can lead to hurt feelings, anger, and even lasting grudges. Avoid the following sorts of topics as a general rule:   Negative comments about her appearance or weight Serious criticisms of her personal, political, or religious views Gossipy comments about her family or the people she spends time with Mean-spirited imitations of her tics or habits  , A few sincere presents or a fancy night out every once in a while can be great for showing that a girl means a lot to you. However, trying to throw your weight around by spending lots of money on your outings or buying luxurious gifts isn't a good idea. It may make her blush, but if she's intelligent, her blushing is likely to be out of embarrassment for you. Money is entirely separate from your ability to make girls feel special. People with lots of money can be romantic, but this isn't why they're romantic. Trying to woo girls with money is only likely to make you end up broke or in the company of women with poor life priorities.  

give her an unexpected compliment.  maintain good eye contact.  flirt!,  tease her gently.  crack an inside joke around other people.  impress her peers.  if you're together, show her how important she is to you.  if you're not together, make a move.  don't objectify her.  don't be creepy.  don't use inappropriate touch.  don't be cruel when you tease her.  don't rely on money or gifts. 

 Girl like when boys make the first move. If you initiate conversation, then she'll be all the more willing to keep it up, even if she doesn't have a crush on you.; , Try to be a little flirty all the time, too.   Don't underestimate the power of withdrawal. If she flirts, flirt back, but keep it short and leave her wanting more. Don't make yourself so easy to get that she becomes uninterested.  Hint to someone close to her that you're interested. They're bound to tell the girl you're eyeing! Don't make it seem desperate, though. You may find out if she already likes you from a mutual friend! If she does, your work is easy! Just let her chase you.  In case you didn't know, girls like that! However, don't let her EXPECT the compliments, then it's you doing the chasing. Also, be sure to compliment the right things. If you don't know the girl well, just talking about how hot she is will make her think you're just interested in the physical stuff, and you don't want that.  Be cool! Let her see you have a social life, but don't be cocky about it, and don't try too hard to be busy or it will show.   Be slightly distant without being rude. 'Treat 'em mean, keep 'em keen DOESN'T work. Many girls will become confused and hurt if you try this, and may lose interest all together.  Ask her out on a group thing, but spend a lot of time with her. She'll think of it as a date subconsciously if she spends most of the night talking to you.  Describe an ideal girlfriend, using a lot of the qualities that the girl you're talking to has. Don't come right out and say it, but by dropping hints she'll begin to think of herself as a good fit for you.  Overall, once you've established yourself as a usual person she talks to, ease back a bit. Don't ignore her entirely, just try play it cool. Once she realizes you haven't spoken in a while she'll be missing you, then she'll start messaging you first and seeking you out. Hence, chasing you. From then on flirt, sweet talk and play it hot and cold, it'll keep her constantly looking for approval and attention for you, but you'll hold the power. Just remember not to stay too distant, or she may think you're too hard to get.  

be friendly.  however, don't stick yourself in the friend zone.  let it spread.  compliment her.  hang out with your other friends.  hang out in a group.  drop hints.  focus on you. 

 First impressions make a difference. Good hygiene shows that you take care of yourself. Take a shower every morning. Wash your hair, put on deodorant, and possibly use a small amount of cologne or perfume. Bad odors, among other problems, are distracting and cause people to not want to be around you.   When you use cologne or perfume, add only a small amount to your neck, chest, and shoulders. She should be able to smell it up close without it overwhelming her senses.; , Clothes and hairstyle are also factors in how people judge you. If your hair is long and greasy and you wear stained sweatpants, chances are the girl will think of you in a negative way, making her feel uncomfortable. Buy yourself clothes that flatter your figure. A style that looks unique on you without being too flashy will help her appreciate you.  If you don’t feel comfortable, chances are she won’t feel comfortable either. Anytime you seek her out, display your best self. This means going up to her, maintaining eye contact, and speaking loudly and clearly. To do this, practice being natural. Look into a mirror as you speak, maintaining eye contact with yourself.Even if you feel nervous around her, slow down. Breathe deeply, speak slowly, relax, and focus on her. Be your natural self.If you’re going to be at the same place a girl is, such as school or a party, try getting to the place early. This gives you time to get accustomed to the environment before it becomes more crowded and busy. Avoid any bad habits that would make her uncomfortable, such as swearing, telling inappropriate jokes, or fidgeting.  Start with small questions, such as “That’s a nice tattoo, what does it mean?” Avoid asking deep questions, as these are too personal too soon. Instead, let her answer and then add to the conversation, such as by talking about something a little personal such as your own tattoos., Everyone has boundaries about how physically close someone cannot be. Moving into this space too fast and being unwelcome is a sure way to make a girl feel uncomfortable. Especially early on, avoid standing too close, putting your face near hers, or touching sensitive areas such as the face. Bad touches feel uncomfortable, but welcome touches associate you with positive emotions.As you get to know her better, add positive touches such as putting a hand across her shoulder to shield her when moving through a crowd at a concert. Other positive touches include touching her elbow when making a point or brushing her back and sides when laughing together.  Once you’ve established a base, find ways to be near her. This can be as simple as a shared activity such as lunch at school, or you can do an activity that you both enjoy. By talking to her, find out her interests and spend time together building positive, memorable experiences. Try to go to different places and have different experiences, as these stand out more than spending several hours watching TV at home.An easy way to spend time together is if you belong to the same group. Spending time with shared friends, doing a school activity, or doing a hobby together are all options that take some of the pressure off of you to be entertaining. Even if you’re interested in her romantically, don’t suggest that she go on a date with you. You’re better served building up emotional comfort without revealing a motive, as this shows you value her as an individual.  There are many ways you can inadvertently end up making a judgment that makes her feel uncomfortable. Try to avoid making jokes at the expense of her interests. If she’s quiet, don’t bring up her quietness or force her to be around people all the time. Instead, it’s better for you to be patient and funny in a way that shows you accept her.Instead of saying, “Wow, comic books are for nerds” or “Why are you so quiet?” talk to her about comic books or make commentary about the cafeteria food you’re eating. This applies too to her goals in life. If she wants to be a photographer, encourage her no matter what you think of the choice.  Be the kind of person that she can confide in. This means not giving up her secrets. She may start off by telling you something in confidence. Don’t talk behind her back and don’t tell your friends. Once she knows you won’t break her trust, she’ll feel closer to you because she’ll be able to tell you more of her deeper thoughts and feelings.   If you want to be more than friends with her, limit your availability. You need to be trusted, but you can’t become someone she talks to about her relationship problems or issues she doesn’t want to tell her relationship partner. Always avoid being the kind of person that’s there to provide money or food. Someone who frequently asks you to do this is using you.  Once you’ve begun building up trust between you, have deeper discussions when the timing is right. Ask her questions such as what career she wants in the future. When you do this, listen actively. Put down your phone, hear what she’s saying, and try to remember it. This shows that you care about her as a person.Remember important dates such as her birthday. Many people have a tendency to forget, so it will be impressive to her when you display consideration.  She’ll have a lot of pressures in life, including from friends and family. Don’t add to it. Never put her into a spot where she’d have to make a difficult decision, such as forcing her to leave a relationship. Give her some personal space.Don’t smother her with attention by calling or texting every day and spending all your time near her. Remember to live your life outside of your connection to her. Talk to other people. Take care of responsibilities such as school.  

clean yourself up.  dress well.  approach with confidence.  start a conversation.  respect her personal space.  spend time with her.  don’t judge her.  become trustworthy.  show sincere interest.  avoid making her feel pressured. 

 It pays to be prepared. You don't just take a math test without studying, or pass a driver's ed test without taking a class. The people who put time and thought into winning their crush usually have a better shot at winning them.  Try to strike a good balance between preparing and being creepily prepared. Your crush likes getting the extra attention you want to give them, but they don't want to feel like you've been thinking about them every single second for the past three days. That's a bit creepy, even if it might be true!; , Take deep breaths and practice letting your entire body go limp. This is sometimes easier when you aren't in public. Try relaxing in your bed before going to sleep or when you get home or in the shower.  You can get over your nervousness — or eliminate it altogether — by taking a moment to consider your options. Practice at home before actually approaching your crush, and you won't be caught in an awkward moment of silence. Take your time, especially if you're about to make a first impression on someone who's important to you.   Practice in the mirror. You'll want to make sure you know what you're going to say, but don't make it sound rehearsed. Imagine a variety of situations in which you might have the opportunity to talk to your crush, and act these out in front of the mirror. The more prepared you are, the more confident you'll be during the conversation itself. Have fun with it. Sure, try the serious versions of what you want to say, but also say it in a completely goofy way that makes you laugh. The less serious you take yourself, the more natural you will be when the time comes.  Take the time to notice what pictures they have in their notebook, or what they eat at lunch, or which sports they like to play. Knowing these small but important details will help you make conversation later on. It could help you say something like:   "I noticed those movies on your notebook. I'm all about movies from the '80s. Do you have a favorite?" Hey, my friends and I were going to play some pickup after school. Maybe you'd want to join if you're up for it?"  , One of the reasons you're probably afraid of being crushed is that it will hurt your confidence. Don't let that happen. It's crazy to let your confidence be swayed by just one person. Much of your confidence should come from how you feel about yourself. So find ways to boost your confidence before you really start getting to know your crush. That way, you'll be more attractive to your crush and you won't be crushed if something bad happens.   Look at your Facebook wall. Studies have found that simply looking at your Facebook wall for 3 minutes can significantly boost your self-confidence.It's worth a try! Spend a little time with your dad. Studies also show that kids who spend more time with their fathers during adolescence turn out to be more confident than those who spend less.Note: It's probably best to hang out with your dad several hours before talking with your crush. It's for the best.  What does that mean? It means put yourself in a position where you don't care whether your crush likes you back. Why is this important? It's important for two reasons. It helps you deal with rejection, which is ultimately something you're going to have to do. (If you're not getting rejected somewhere along the way, you're not trying.) And secondly, it helps you have a healthier relationship with your crush. Instead of building the crush up to be a superhero who will save everything in your world, you treat them like a normal, but special, person instead.   What? you say. Why would I do that? I don't even have control over it. You may not. But sometimes, we think about our crushes so much, and we imagine what life would be with them, that we start to develop unhealthy relationships with their imaginary selves. These imaginary relationships become so unhealthy that we can't imagine ourselves being without this person, all without the other person even knowing. If you're outcome-independent, your confidence grows. This is attractive to a lot of people. You don't feel that getting rejected from any one girl or any one guy is a big deal, and so you shrug it off. Your confidence is bigger than the rejection of one person.  The first time you interact on a personal level should be in a casual situation without too many other people around to distract you. The middle of the dance floor would not be great place to have a lengthy conversation, for example.   Go up to your crush during lunch time in the cafeteria. Ask him or her if you can sit next to them and begin to strike up a conversation. It's often honestly as simple as that. Talk to your crush at a party. Whether it's a birthday party or a pool party, if you're both invited, you have an excuse to talk to them. Interact with him or her through one of your mutual friends. If you're friends with one of his friends, go up to the friend and start talking, waiting for him to give you something to say.  If you've already formally introduced yourself, then all you need to do is say a simple "hi" or "hello." Remember to look your crush directly into the eyes when you say hello. You're unintentionally saying a lot if you stare down at your shoes while saying hello.  Ask thought-provoking things that relate to your current situation—"why" and "how" questions are typically best if you want to talk for awhile. These often lead to in-depth discussions that both of you can participate in, which is ideal when talking to a crush.   Remember to try to avoid simple "yes" or "no" questions. If you ask your crush "Did you go to school in Canada?" they don't have to give you a long answer. If you ask your crush "What was it like going to school in Canada?" they'll talk a lot more. Ask them about their background. Where are they from, what do their parents do, how do they know so-and-so, etc. People, your crush included, love talking about themselves.  Meaning ask a few questions while he/she is telling the story. This will show them that you are paying attention to what they have to say. If you come up with a story to tell, make sure your crush has finished talking before you begin, and keep it short and sweet so your crush doesn't think you're full of yourself.  Your body language communicates a lot, whether or not you want it to. Sometimes, your body will says things you can't help. But a lot of the time, if you're aware of what your body is saying, you can correct it if you ever notice it betraying you. Here's what to pay attention to:   Eye-contact. Making and keeping eye-contact says that you're interested in what the other person is saying. Face in their direction. Face your body in their direction. It means you're interested in what they're saying and aren't shy. Smile. Smiling says the other person makes you happy.  Flirt with body language. Especially if you're a girl. Gently bat your eyelashes, twirl your hair, or touch their shoulder. Laughing at their jokes. Even if the jokes aren't that funny, smile and do your best to humor your crush.  Whatever you do, don't use pick-up lines. They're horribly cheesy and they don't really work. If you're a guy and you can't think of what to use other than a pick-up line, read this article on how to start a conversation with a girl.  Seriously. If you're like a normal person, being close to your crush is going to drive you insane. And when you feel that way, you're likely to do, well, stupid stuff. Shrug it off. If you trip over your words, say something like "Wow. I can't speak. I guess being close to a beautiful girl will do that." If you trip over your shoes and he comes to pick you up, asking "Are you okay?!" say something like "Sure, I really thought I nailed the landing."  , If you feel like the conversation is going well, don't hesitate to ask when your crush is free again. This can be anything from a couple of minutes at lunch tomorrow to a bona fide date with movie and dinner — your request will depend on how confident you feel and how your crush acts while you're talking.   Once you've thought it through and you can tell they are interested in you, don't worry about asking when you can see each other after this.  You are not necessarily going to get a warm reception when you first try to initiate conversation. If your crush seems disengaged or bored, ask if anything is wrong; maybe it's been a bad day, maybe they've got something on their mind.   If there doesn't appear to be anything distracting your crush and his or her annoyance with you still seems to be heightening, excuse yourself politely, make a quick escape, and consider trying another day.  It's possible that your crush just doesn't feel the same way about you. If you determine that this is the case, the two of you can still talk, but you have to accept that a romantic relationship between you is unlikely.   There's nothing worse than feeling unrequited love for someone who's completely unaware of it, so if your crush friend-zones you, just accept it and move on.  

put in a little time before you go in and speak to him or her.  spend some time relaxing beforehand.  think before you speak.  get to know a little bit about them.  find innovative ways to boost your self-confidence.  be outcome-independent.  approach your crush when you are alone.  introduce yourself.  ask your crush about himself or herself.  remember to interject occasionally if your crush is telling a long story.  pay attention to your body language.  don't use pick-up lines!,  don't take yourself so seriously.  ask for a date.  be aware of the situation.  handle rejection calmly. 

 If her voice drops so that it is deeper and more breathy than usual, she may have feelings for you. People who study attraction find that girls may think that when they have feelings for someone it is more seductive to make their voice lower and huskier to attract that person. Whatever the case, paying attention to the tone of her voice could tell you whether or not she is asking you about your feelings because she has a crush on you too., If her gaze seems to be going to your face and eyes a lot in conversation, she may like you.If she blinks a lot when you are talking to her, more than 6-10 times in a minute, then this could be another sign that she does like you. If you notice the black pupils in her eyes get smaller when she is looking at you, again, she might like you.But pay attention to the lighting when her pupils get smaller; if the lightness in the room suddenly gets brighter, that may be the reason why her pupils are getting smaller.   If she raises her eyebrows often when she is talking to you, this could mean that she is worried and anxious. And the attention that she is paying to you may be because she is worried that you like her.  If while she is laughing she straightens up or positions herself so that she looks prettier, she may have a crush on you. Touching her clothes and tilting her head, too, can show that she has feelings for you, especially if they are all grouped together at the same time. For example, if she is smiling, touching her neck, and has her head tilted, that might be a very good sign.Be careful reading too much into these signs, some girls who are extroverted might act this way because they enjoy themselves in conversation. It might not mean that they have a crush on you. Notice how she gestures with her friends to see if she acts the same way in normal conversation. If she acts this way with her friends, it might only mean that she is an expressive person.  There is also body language that could mean that she is not interested in you romantically that you might want to look out for. This body language would most likely happen when you are flirting with her. If she fake smiles a lot during your interactions, for example, perhaps she is not interested in you. Fake smiling is pretty easy to spot- she will smile only with her mouth while her eyes and cheeks look normal. Another sign of possible disinterest is if she is raising her eyebrows often in conversation, this could be a sign that she is uncomfortable or nervous. Yet another sign is if she keeps her arms and legs crossed when you talk to her. This may mean that she is not interested or is closed off to you.   Ask her if she is worried about anything. If she responds that something is causing her anxiety or stress, perhaps her gestures aren’t about you. If she does like you but doesn’t know if you like her too, then these signs could mean that she is anxious about her feelings for you. If you notice that she is sending you mixed signals, you may want to ask her how she feels about you.  Both guys and girls are not always very good at guessing correctly that someone is flirting with them because flirting is hard to pick up on. Attraction can be difficult to pick up on because girls, and people in general, don’t want to be obvious about their romantic feelings if they don’t know how they will be taken. So make sure you have had lots of conversations before you decide whether she likes you or not. Most of all, it is important that you pay attention to the way that she acts toward you over time., If she asks you if you have a crush on her and you are in a place where it is difficult to talk, relocate to a better place. Tell her “I want to talk to you about this. Can we find a better place to talk?”. Go to a place where you two can sit down and talk. This could be a park bench, a coffee table, or a corner in a house that is quiet.   Ask her how she feels about going to a particular place if you are worried that she may not be comfortable leaving where you are at the moment.  Once you are situated you should bring back up the topic of conversation. Say “So you asked me about how I feel about you” this will bring a good level of anticipation to your answer. You can add a pause if you want to. Then say “I have a crush on you.” Don’t be overly confident when you tell her how you feel, this could make you seem arrogant or hurt you if she doesn’t like you back. Go for a slightly hopeful and matter of fact tone.   It is good to own your feelings whether or not you think that she likes you back. Even if you experience rejection, you will be able to move on faster because you were honest. You might be tempted to ask her why she is asking before you answer, but she will appreciate it if you are bold enough and answer her question without asking for an explanation. Also, this confidence will most likely make you more attractive.  You have a right to know if she likes you back. You can ask the question straight out- “Do you have romantic feelings for me?”. It is good to be specific with this question, even if it seems unnecessary to be specific or sounds weird. The reason why it can be better to say “romantic feelings” is because people can take “like” in lots of different ways. For example, it may be harder for her to answer you honestly if you use “like me” instead of “like me romantically”.   Remember that it is better for you in the long run to hear her honest answer about her feelings, rather than an ambiguous response. The sooner you know her honest feelings about you the sooner you can move on if she doesn’t like you. Don’t assume her reasons for asking you, so be kind and honest with her, even if you think that she doesn’t like you. Depending on her personality and her feelings, there are a variety of ways she could respond. Here are a few possibilities: she could answer with a straight yes or no, or she might not want to hurt your feelings so she may say things like “I really like you as a friend”. Finally, she might answer ambiguously because she doesn’t want to hurt you and/or doesn’t know how she feels about you. She might say “I kind of like you but I don’t know.”  , This explanation will vary a lot based on how she feels. No matter how she feels, it is nice to say something in response to her answer. Even if she doesn’t like you, you should be kind to her and respect her feelings.   If she likes you back or seems to like you back, you can tell her all the awesome reasons why you like her. You can talk about how pretty you think she is, how intelligent you find her, how funny you think she is, how caring and kind you think that she is, etc.. Be sure to use specific and concrete examples to compliment her. For example, you can talk about when you first knew you liked her and how you knew. Describe how you knew with a short story, “I knew I had a crush on you when we were sitting next to each other in Algebra. At first you were so annoying because you knew all the answers to the questions but after a while I found that I couldn’t stop smiling when I saw your hand raised.” If she seems confused or ambiguous, you can ask her if she wants you to explain your romantic feelings for her. If she wants to know then you can explain all the awesome ways you feel about her. Be careful while you explain if she doesn’t know how she feels about you because telling her how you feel might make you feel more vulnerable. If she doesn’t want you to go on, respond with the next response. If she doesn’t like you back, keep your cool and try to genuinely thank her for being honest with you. Tell her something nice and short. For example, “I think you are a really cool person. Thanks for being honest with me.” She will respect you for being a big person and taking the rejection well. If you are having a hard time with your emotions, you can say “I think I need some space and time. Thanks for talking to me.” Then you can find somewhere to go to be alone for a while.  You may feel intense feelings if you are rejected, but try to let your first panicked emotions wash over you. Your feelings will get less intense after a couple of days. Try to wait for them patiently to pass, and avoid talking about it to people who you might regret talking to later or doing anything that you will regret. For example, do not post on social media about her.   Exercise can help you process your emotions. Going on a run or doing your exercise routine if you notice that your emotions are getting out of control is a healthy way to handle your emotions. , We all talk to ourselves in our heads and sometimes we can be very hard on ourselves after we have been rejected. For example, you might say to yourself “No one will ever like me.” But when you start to think these negative thoughts ask yourself if your friend would talk to you like that. A friend would never say “No one will ever like you”, and not only because it is not very nice, but because it is an unfair and overly negative conclusion that a friend would not think. Focus on redirecting your negative thoughts to all of the good things that you did, the ways you can still grow, or the humor in the situation.   Reframe your negative thoughts into positive ones. Instead of “No one will ever like you”, think “She doesn’t like me but that doesn’t mean I don’t have great qualities.” Or focus on the good things you did. Say to yourself something like, “It was an awkward situation, but you were honest and nice.”  , Ask yourself what other things are going on in her life. This might be something difficult to do at first, but the more you can understand what is going on with her the less the rejection will probably seem about you. Remember her feelings are part of a bigger picture that doesn’t involve you.   Be careful about making assumptions about the way she feels about you. For example, you might think “She doesn’t like me because I have a funny voice.” But you can’t read her thoughts. She may have recently gotten out of a relationship or is interested in someone else, whatever the case, she is probably preoccupied thinking about her own life and feelings., Spend time with good friends who make you feel good about yourself. These people will remind you of your interests and the things that you love. Pick activities where you will laugh and have fun. For example, go out to a funny movie with your friends and then talk about it after. Laughter will release your endorphins and help you relax., If you are having a hard time with your emotions, tell her that you’d like some time and space from your friendship. Having her out of your life for the time being will help you focus on you. Start hanging out with a different friend group or talking to new people- this will help you distance yourself from her. When you feel like you are ready to move on, start talking to girls you are interested in.  

listen to the way she asks you if you have a crush on her.  watch for how she looks at you.  look out for her gestures and posture.  pay attention to the signs that she doesn’t like you.  hang out with her more before you decide that she does or doesn’t like you.  stop and find a good place to have a conversation.  tell her how you feel.  ask her how she feels about you.  give her an explanation of why you have feelings for her.  take some space for your immediate reaction to pass.  treat yourself like a friend.  think about her perspective and feelings.  go out with your friends.  distance yourself from her. 

 Remember: nothing is easier if you don't talk about it. Your close friends should be your trusted advisers when it comes to dealing with crushes. Even if you don't take their advice, it'll feel great to get this major source of emotional stress off of your chest, so speak up!   Another side benefit is that talking to your friends about your crush can force you to actually do something about it. Once your friends know about it, they'll subtly push you to take action. This can be a good thing if you'd lack confidence normally.; , To deal with a crush, you must crawl before you can walk. Try to limit your one-on-one time with your crush initially. Instead, try to hang out in groups. It's much easier to come across as charming when you have your friends around to do some of the "work" in the conversation for you. Being in the company of people you already know will also make you feel more at ease, so conversation will come more naturally.   Gradually move on to one-on-one hangout sessions. Eventually, if you want your crush to develop into something more, you'll need to spend some alone time with that person.  Try not to think of your crush as "perfect" or unattainable — s/he is not. Your crush has flaws, fears, and things s/he is bad at. In other words, your crush is a human being just like you. Letting yourself believe that your crush is somehow "better" than other people will only make it harder to keep your cool when you're together.   If you find yourself freaking out when you're around your crush, think back to some time that you remember her/him doing something wrong. This can be almost anything, like getting a fact wrong, making a bad play during a sports game, or accidentally doing something embarrassing. This is a good way to remind yourself that your crush is far from perfect, even if it may not always seem like it.  Staying calm about your crush isn't all about how you manage your thoughts and behavior. It's also about how you think about yourself. Remember that you are the most important one in your interactions with your crush. If you think to yourself, "My crush would be lucky to have me" and not the other way around, it will be much easier to talk to this person.   This can also protect you if your crush turns out not to be such a great person. If you're devoted to your crush from the start, it may be easy for him or her to take advantage of your kindness. On the other hand, if you value yourself, you'll have no reason at all to take any disrespect.  Once you can talk to your crush, this doesn't necessarily mean that you always should. Remember, your crush is like you — s/he most likely has responsibilities that take up a good portion of the day. Texting, talking, or calling this person 24/7 will make you an annoyance in your crush's eyes.   A good general rule is to always try to end the conversation a little earlier than you think you need to. Not only will this prevent awkward, drawn-out exchanges, but also leave your crush wanting to talk to you again.  Everyone makes mistakes — even you and your crush. Don't worry if you use the wrong word around your crush or have an embarrassing Freudian slip. These are things that happen naturally from time to time during normal conversations. Simply laugh at your mistake and move on. If you think your mistake has offended your partner, apologize, then change the subject. Stressing out will only call extra attention to any awkwardness.  Whether or not it goes well, a conversation with a crush isn't the most important thing in the world. Luckily, there are a few things you can do to calm yourself in the event that you feel your nervousness become overwhelming. Try these easy steps to get yourself under control as soon as you feel extremely anxious:  Remove yourself from the difficult situation. You can tell a white lie here. Something like, "Excuse me, I have to go to the bathroom" usually works. Let your emotions out. If you're sad, cry somewhere private. If you're angry, try punching a pillow. Take deep breaths. This will slow your heart rate and help you get your emotions under control. When you're ready, go back to what you were doing with your head held high.  Having a crush is great, but keeping it a secret isn't. If you really feel strongly about someone, consider telling this person how you feel. Opening up about your feelings may lead to a relationship, but even if it doesn't, it's often satisfying to get your emotions off your chest. See How to Tell Your Crush You Like Them for more help here.   However, remember that your crush may not feel the same way about you. If you get a response like, "I'm touched you feel this way about me, but can we be friends instead?", just say "Of course" and walk away.  

talk to your friends about your crush.  don't hang out alone with your crush at first.  always remember that your crush is a human being.  keep your self-esteem high.  don't pester your crush with constant attention.  don't be afraid to make the occasional mistakes.  don't let yourself get overcome with anxiety.  don't be too shy to ever express your true feelings. 

 Or, fake it till you make it––just thinking about being more confident can help even if you don't actually feel this way. Think of who you are, and if your crush likes you the way you are, they will accept you. Having confidence is one of the key ways to get your crush's attention. Not having enough confidence will show through your words and actions. Be proud of who you are!   Stand up straight. Good posture will trick your brain into thinking you're confident.; , Your crush may not like you if you pretend to be someone you're not. Plus, it gets tiring to have to put on an act every day. Your personality should shine through your words. Never be ashamed of who you are - don't try to hide yourself!  , Conversations can be easily started with just a simple sentence. All it takes is bravery and confidence in yourself. If you are passing in the hallways, just try to get the courage to greet them and softly smile. There is nothing more powerful than a genuine, acknowledging smile. Eye contact is also very important in this step.   If you have a crush on a girl, compliment her on things she does in class as well, or something you know she did like an event or win an award. It will mean a lot more to her if you complement her actions rather than her outfit or hair. You should show an interest in their personality, not just their looks. If you have a crush on a guy, you might want to compliment their looks and outfits (if you really like an item of clothing they wear well, like a hat, compliment it), or focus on something they did. For example, you could say, "Hey, that presentation you did in class was great" or "You did great at yesterday's soccer game!". Things like this will boost their ego and make them feel great about themselves.  Read some blogs or check the news. Read magazines, books, watch TV, have adventures, listen to different music, and watch different movies. If you expand your knowledge to a variety of topics, you'll have lots to talk about with your crush!  , If they enjoy a hobby that you don't, refrain from lying and telling them you like it also. Your crush will eventually discover the truth and their opinion of you will diminish.  Never give your crush mean looks or anything to draw attention unless they know you're joking with them. When you do tease or joke with them, make sure it's obvious and that you don't really mean it. However, too much teasing may lead to hurt feelings and a sour relationship! Keep your teasing to a minimum and light-hearted; tease them only about things you know that they won't mind. Keep away from touchy topics.  If you have any bad habits while talking to your crush, you'll be at a downside. Try to be yourself, but refrain from cursing excessively, calling everything retarded, etc. Keep your conversations innocent, clean, but entertaining in a positive way.  After talking to crush a lot, finally come out with saying you like them, but don't say the exact line! Your line should be something like a hint, but big and clear enough that your crush will get the point and understand. Come up with something original:   "Hey uh...I've been talking a lot with you because I like you" "Hi, nice to see you again, um, look, I like you" "Hey. I gotta tell you something. I maybe um, sorta kinda like you a little bit" "Uh hi.. um okay I know I'm shy and all, but I have feelings for you.." something like that might work. "Hey um, look, I have to tell you something, and you might like it, or might not. -sigh- I like you." "Hi, um, look, I think you're a cool person. I'm sure there's someone that likes you out there." will be good enough (see tips for more suggestions).  Refrain from sounding like you have practiced the line. One to three "um" or "ah" will make it sound more natural - stick them in appropriate places! Try not to use "um" and "ah" too much. It will make your crush think that you're far too shy! When confessing your crush on them, let them know about it with confidence. Everyone likes someone with confidence - the more confidence, the better. However, be careful about having too much confidence! Have eye contact when you're telling your crush you like him/her. It will make you appear more confident and it makes you look bold!    , However, if your crush doesn't feel the same about you, it's fine. There are plenty of other fish in the sea. The right person is out there, waiting for you to come around the corner. If you never get past this event, you will never find your true love! Move on!  

have confidence, even if you are shy.  be yourself when you speak with your crush.  start simply.  have an interesting topic to talk about.  don't lie or embellish when you talk to your crush.  be nice.  break bad habits.  make things clear.  ask him/her out if your crush likes you back. 

 Raise your hand, smile, and say hi when you see them. This simple exchange can allow your crush to start really noticing you. It’s also a great way to open conversations, and your crush may respond to your greeting by asking you a question., You might find that you’re too nervous to say anything every time you try to talk to your crush. To avoid this, come up with a list of simple questions that can allow the two of you to begin chatting when you bump into each other. Once you break the ice with the first question, it’ll be much easier to keep the conversation going., “How are you?” is the most natural question in the world. It’s an expected next step after someone says hello, so your crush won’t be weirded out when you ask them this question. It’s also not a question that you can answer with just a quick yes or no, so it’s perfect for opening up a more in-depth interaction.Try saying something like: “Hey Tom, what’s up? Did you have a good weekend?”  , Talking about the weather is easy, because everyone experiences it. It’s also not something that people usually disagree on. Most people enjoy sunshine and don’t love it when there are too many cloudy or rainy days in a row. These discussions can help you get comfortable talking to your crush without venturing into emotional or personal territory.   Ask: “Do you happen to know if it’s stopped raining? I forgot my umbrella today.” Or, “Have you been outside yet today? It’s beautiful!”  , Having a crush on someone who doesn’t know your name is especially scary and maybe even depressing. But just because they don’t know you now doesn’t mean it has to stay that way! If you walk past them in the hallway a few times a day and make eye contact, they’ve already noticed you. Add an introduction the next time you see them.   Say: “I see you around all the time, but I’ve never actually gotten your name. I’m Sarah.”  , You and your crush may be in a class together, or you may work at the same restaurant. You may even share a passion for Star Wars. These are perfect topics to discuss with your crush, as they’ll highlight your similarities and shared experiences. There’s nothing better than having an inside joke with your crush about your slightly odd manager.  You may find yourself over-analyzing every interaction you have with your crush. Maybe you’re feeling embarrassed because you stammered through a greeting, or revealed a strange, personal detail about yourself by accident. Take a deep breath. You probably remember the conversation much better than they do.   Tell yourself that you’ve got another chance to show them who you are tomorrow. There’s no point in dwelling on what happened yesterday or this morning.  It’s easy to gossip or complain about something or someone, so this may be what comes out of your mouth when you’re nervous. But try as hard as you can to keep your complaints to a minimum in interactions with your crush. Instead, focus on what you like about the world around you. This will allow you both to enjoy your chats with one another.For example, don’t say: “I really hate Mr. Smith’s class. He’s such a pain.” Instead, go with: “Mr. Smith is tough, but his classes are interesting. What do you think about his latest assignment?”  , Everyone enjoys receiving nice and genuine compliments about themselves. Try to avoid complimenting only your crush’s appearance. Instead, share comments that make your crush aware that you appreciate their personality, talents, and strengths.For example, if you saw them give a presentation that day, tell them how much you enjoyed it. You could also take the opportunity to compliment them on one of the aspects of their personality that you like about them. Say, “you know, you’re a really good listener.” Or, “It’s awesome that you take the time to help other people with their problems.”  

say hello and wave when you see them.  prepare questions ahead of time if you get tongue-tied.  ask your crush how they’re doing to keep it simple.  comment on the weather for a low-pressure topic.  introduce yourself casually if you’ve never officially met your crush.  talk about classes or interests you have in common.  avoid stressing out if you had an awkward conversation.  stay positive during casual conversations.  offer a thoughtful compliment to make them smile. 

 When you like someone, it’s important to show interest in the things that are important to that person. When your crush tells you a story or gives their opinion, use your facial expressions to demonstrate that you’re paying attention. Listening will also allow you to bring up the topic in later conversations., Be sure to stay focused on your crush’s eyes and face whenever the two of you chat. This will let them know you’re engaged in your interactions with them. This could also act as a subtle way to show them that you like them.Avoid making your eye contact creepy. Allow yourself to blink, and don’t be so worried about maintaining eye contact that you never look away from your crush’s face.  When you pass them in the hallway or have a casual conversation by your lockers, smile. This will light up your face and show that you’re a positive and confident person. This could also make them enjoy your interactions more and cause them to look forward to seeing you each day. 

listen attentively by tilting your head or nodding.  maintain eye contact while you talk to your crush.  smile when you chat with with your crush. 

 Follow your crush on the social media platform they use most often. When your crush posts something new, take the time to check it out. Let them know you’re staying updated on their activities by liking and commenting on posts you especially appreciate. They may reach out and do the same for you.Try commenting on a picture of a concert or event they attended by saying, “I love the Chainsmokers! So cool you got to see them live!” This will let your crush know you share their interests. If your crush posts a more routine photo that you like for its artsiness, say, “Artsy! I like this shot.”  , Sometimes, it’s easier to talk to your crush online than in person, so private messages may provide a good way to learn more about your crush. These two popular platforms are designed for sharing photos more than words. Because you need to limit yourself to a few sentences, keep it simple and just remind them you’re thinking of them.If your crush posts a picture from their vacation on Instagram, you could say, “Have fun in Paris! Can’t wait to hear about it when you get back!” If you’re feeling daring, try ending with, “I’ll miss you!” You can even add an emoji.  Following someone on Twitter and even Facebook will likely inform you of their likes, dislikes, and interests. If you share a particular view or activity with your crush, use a private message to start a conversation about it. This could allow the two of you to have an in-depth conversation about a common passion.Maybe your crush just posted about a lesser-known politician you also happen to like. Try saying: “Wow! I can’t believe you know who Pete Buttigieg is. We should totally talk about him over coffee.” Your crush may have just posted that they had a guitar class at the same music school where you go for piano lessons. Message them by saying, “This is crazy, but we both take lessons on Wednesday afternoons! We should carpool. And start a band.”  , Don’t like or comment on all of your crush’s posts, and stick to only recent posts. Otherwise, your crush may get a creepy vibe from you. You don’t want your crush to feel like you don’t have your own interests and life outside of reviewing their feeds., Just as you’re likely tempted to obsess over your crush’s posts, you may be worrying about what you should post to make your crush like you. Instead of trying to get in your crush’s head and imagining what they might want to see, post things that make you happy, laugh, or smile. This will allow your crush to use your feed to get to know you better., If your crush is closer with one of your friends than with you, ask that friend to use their posts to make your crush notice you. They can tag you in photos, or post when you’re going out together. If your crush sees these posts, they may ask your mutual friend about you. 

comment on your crush’s photos and posts.  use instagram or snapchat for one- or two-line direct messages.  use facebook or twitter for longer dms about mutual interests.  avoid over-liking or commenting on posts to keep it casual.  post fun things that reflect your personality.  ask a mutual friend to tag you to amplify your online presence. 

 Once you’ve spent some time getting to know your crush either in person or online, see if they’re willing to share their phone number. This will allow you to reach out and chat via text.Ask your crush for their number by using a shared class or project as an excuse. Say: “Hey, I could really use your help on the Pre-Calc assignment. Could we exchange numbers?” Once you have each other’s numbers, you can start texting each other just to say hello. Be bold and tell them you want their number to talk more. Try: “You know, we’ve been chatting a lot lately. Want to give me your number so we can text, too?”  , Texting can act as a good way to slowly increase the amount of time the two of you interact. Avoid sending your crush multiple texts before you receive one back, and use emojis sparingly. You can start by reaching out with simple questions, which may then lead to longer, more detailed communications.   Try starting a conversation by mentioning seeing them earlier during the day, and then asking them how they’ve been since you saw them. For example, “Hey! It was fun hanging out at lunch today. How was your afternoon?”  , See if your crush will join you in a group setting. Ask them to come to a study session, go out for drinks with friends, or attend a game with several of your acquaintances. Once you’re at the event, interact with your crush and use the time to flirt a little., Now that you know your crush a bit better, you’re likely aware of the interests the two of you have in common. These don’t necessarily need to be dates, and you can avoid defining them if you’d like. Instead, take the opportunity to increase your one-on-one time with your crush on activities that show how many interests you share!For example, there might be a movie coming out you know your crush is excited about because you talked about last week. Or you might have just found out that you and your crush are both avid rock-climbers. Take advantage of these commonalities! This question could look like: “So, I know you’re really excited about the new Wonder Woman movie. I really want to see it too, but my other friends aren’t into superheroes. Would you want to go together?” If they ask you if it’s a date, respond depending on whether you’re ready to “officially” ask them out. You could either say, “I don’t really know. How would feel about it being a date?” Or, “No, we’d just go as friends.” Your other option would be to go for it and say, “Yeah, it’s a date.”  , At some point, it will be time to take the plunge and be honest about your feelings. This conversation could be exactly what’s needed for you and your crush to become something more. They may even be too shy to tell you that they have a crush on you!If you’ve already asked your crush to hang out with you one-on-one, this confession might be less of a surprise to them. You can either confess directly, saying simply, “I really like you as more than a friend. Do you like me in that way too?” Or, you can be more subtle: “We’ve been spending tons of time together, and I feel like we enjoy the same things. We might have a lot of fun if we spent even more time together as something more than friends. What do you think?” Be prepared for disappointment, because it’s impossible to predict or control someone else’s feelings. Even though you’ve interpreted your interactions as flirtation, your crush may have thought you were just becoming good friends.  You don’t need to stop liking your crush, and, in fact, you likely can’t force yourself to do so. However, if they tell you to back off, you need to understand that they have the right to make that choice. This doesn’t mean the two of you can’t still be friends. Besides, if you stay friends, their feelings for you may change. 

ask your crush for their phone number if you don’t already have it.  text your crush to keep talking even when you’re apart.  invite your crush to a group gathering.  invite them to go with you to an event you know they’d enjoy.  tell them you like them.  respect their choice if they tell you they don’t like you. 

 Tell yourself you won't make a fool of yourself. Be confident! Take a deep breath, look natural and just approach him/her and start conversation.; , Do things he or she likes to do, if you like it too. Try reading your crush's favorite book, or join the sports team he or she plays on, and you like the sport too. If he or she doesn't know you exist, it's time to get noticed.  While you talk, you'll be able to use this to start finding out more about your crush, and will be able to have more choices of things to talk about.  Get a feel of what he or she talks to them about.  Don't know what to say? Try "Hi" first of all, followed up with a smile. If you have a chance for a chat, you can start by asking him/her what sports he/she enjoys, what are his/her after school activities or quiz him/her a brainteaser.   Start saying "hi" in the halls; even the simplest word can start a conversation.       Compliments are good too. In fact, they can be a great way to start a conversation.  Smile at him/her and be friendly. Wave hello or smile whenever you meet him/her. People are often attracted to a cheerful person!  , Once you're used to talking about simple things regularly, it'll get easier for you. Ask him/her a few questions like "hey, did you watch that movie which just came out?" or "hey, have you completed the English assignment that was given out last week?"  , If you sit next to him/her in a class, occasionally ask them "Hey, what did just say? I wasn't paying attention" even if you heard him/her perfectly. This will give you a chance to talk to him/her, and they might even have the impression that you weren't paying attention because you were thinking of them.   Another excuse to talk to him is if you couldn't write down the homework down, that is conveniently from a class you have together.  Go to events such as games, or a dance, perhaps as a group or just turn up when you know your crush will be around. You can then talk together about the event.  As you find more and more in common with each-other, he or she will begin to like you more and more.  Tell your crush that you like him or her, once you've plucked up sufficient courage and know it's the right time. 

have confidence.  get your crush to notice you.  write a up a list of things you know a little about, and both like.  talk to your crush's friends.  find simple things to break the ice.  ease the tension between the two of you.  talk to your crush frequently.  try to get as close to your crush as you can when doing an assignment.  begin to go to events with your crush.  keep talking often.  confess. 

 When you see your crush, extend a friendly greeting. Smile and make eye contact with your crush. Once you’ve locked eyes, exchange “Hellos” with your crush.   Don’t try to force the conversation. If your crush says “hello” and keeps walking, don’t chase after them. Your crush may not be interested in talking to you or they may be heading somewhere in a hurry.; , After saying “Hello,” strike up a conversation by asking your crush a question. You may choose to pose a generic stock question, ask them a school related question, or tailor the question to your crush’s interests and activities.   Stock questions include: “How are you doing?” “What are you doing over break?” “Were you at the game last night?” “Do you work at _____?” School related questions include: “Did we have homework in English class?” “Do you want to study for the test together?” “What did you think about the quiz?” “Do you need help with the Math homework?” Personalized questions include: “How did you play in the game last night?” “Have you ever seen (insert band’s name) perform live?” ” “What are you doing this weekend?” “Are you going to the party?” “How was your vacation?”, After asking the question, remain focused on your crush. Actively listen to their reply so that you can extend the conversation with another question or personal story. As you listen, make a concentrated effort to appear genuinely interested in what your crush has to say—when you remain engaged in a conversation, people are more willing to keep talking.Set aside all potential distractions, like your phone and computer. Make mental notes of potential follow-up questions or relevant personal stories to share., After your crush has responded to your initial question, both you and your crush have the ability to carry on the conversation. If your crush asks you a question, take a moment to reply to their question and then pose another question of your own. If your crush does not ask you a question, you have three options: ask a follow-up question, share a relevant personal story, or end the conversation.   Continue asking each other questions, telling jokes, and exchanging stories until one or both of you decide to end the conversation., During a conversation, the information you share about yourself is just as revealing as the questions you ask others. When talking about yourself, keep the conversation positive—negativity and bragging are unflattering qualities. You should also strive to keep the conversation balanced—give your crush a chance to talk.   Don't spend the entire conversation boasting about your latest accomplishments and avoid exclusively discussing your laundry list of failures. Instead, discuss your passions, your interests, and your dreams for the future. Your crush will come to see how awesome you are! Asking thoughtful questions demonstrates that you are caring, considerate, and genuinely interested in your crush., Body language is an extremely effective and powerful form of communication. You can use these non-verbal gestures to express your feelings and flirt with your crush.   Maintain eye contact with your crush. Your eyes can convey a variety of feelings, from love and lust to interest and attraction. Mirror their body language and facial reactions. Nod occasionally to let your crush know you are listening. Initiate appropriate contact by touching your crush on the arm or shoulder occasionally. Remain aware of your gestures and facial expressions. If your facial expression and gestures don't match the sentiment of your words, you run the risk of sending mixed messages to your crush. 

start with a simple greeting.  ask your crush an open ended question.  listen to their response.  share a relevant anecdote or ask a follow-up question.  present the best version of yourself.  communicate to your crush with body language. 

 If you are extremely shy, you may feel more comfortable texting your crush instead of talking to them in person. While this form of communication is easier and less intimate, it is accompanied by its own set of rules and social nuisances.   Exchange numbers with your crush or get their number from a mutual acquaintance. Text your crush the same day or night you receive their number. Don’t text your crush at odd hours, like early in the morning or late at night. Instead of texting just “Hi,” begin the conversation by asking your crush a question, telling them it was nice to see them, or asking them to make plans. Don’t stress about your crush’s response time. If your crush doesn't respond after the first or second text, do not try again. Your crush's phone number is privileged information. Don't abuse the privilege. Use traditional grammar and spelling in your text messages., It is possible to flirt with your crush on every social media platform, even Instagram. This form of flirting is extremely low stress and requires next to no traditional forms communication. Every few days, double click on one of their pictures to “like” the image. After a few weeks, your crush will notice that you're consistently likely their images and hopefully take the hint.   Don’t like every post. If you are feeling bold, comment on their picture., While you can use Twitter to post witty zingers and insightful comments about current events, you can also use this social media platform to flirt with your crush.There are several ways to catch your crush’s attention on Twitter:   Retweet their latest Tweet. Your crush will be flattered that you liked their clever comment or at very least be reminded that you exist. Follow them on Twitter. Everyone gets a small twinge of excitement when a new person follows them on Twitter—your crush won’t be any different. Direct message your crush. You can use Twitter’s Direct Message feature to talk to and flirt with your crush one-on-one. Instead of retweeting and replying to every one of you crush's Tweets, be selective. Choose one or two Tweets to respond to or retweet each week. 

text your crush.  flirt with your crush on instagram.  flirt with your crush on twitter. 

 The key to flirting and conversing with your crush is confidence. Your crush can’t see how incredible you are unless you truly believe that you are awesome. You don’t need to strive to be perfect, the most beautiful, the coolest, the smartest, or the funniest person in room—just be the best version of yourself.   Instead of criticizing your appearance, identify your best attributes. Write them down and repeat these positive qualities to yourself whenever you feel insecure. When you look in the mirror, you will start to notice your favorite features instead of focusing on your least favorite features. Make a second list of your best characteristics. Are you a great friend, a hard worker, an awesome teacher, or a talented musician? Do you show compassion and kindness to everyone, are you willing to give others second chances, or do you have the ability to make unbiased decisions? Your best characteristics are some of your most attractive qualities., It is difficult to accept compliments when you lack confidence. You may struggle to accept that someone thinks you’re attractive or talented. Instead of thanking them, you might say, “I’m really not ____” or “Thanks, but I’m not that_____.” Give your self-confidence a boost by accepting these positive comments.   When you start receiving compliments from others, you will start believing that their comments are true. Instead of saying “Thanks, but ____,” simply say “Thanks” and smile. As you grow more comfortable and confident, you can expand your reply., It is way easier to make the excuse, “I have nothing to say,” than it is to actually talk to a crush. This excuse, however, is not valid. You don’t need to have an arsenal full of bizarre facts, funny anecdotes, insightful comments, and probing questions to talk to someone. Instead, you just need to be genuinely interested in what your crush has to say and have a few stock questions in your quiver to jumpstart the conversation. These questions may include:   ”What have you been up to?” ”Have you seen the latest episode of _____?” ”What did you think of the test?” ”Do you know when the English assignment is due?” ”Are you going to the game tomorrow?”, Our fear of rejection is often crippling and debilitating. This fear often prevents us from taking risks, like talking to our crush. Instead of allowing the fear of the unknown to control your love life, step out of your comfort zone and talk to your crush.   Don’t assume that if your crush really wanted to talk to you, they would start a conversation with you. Your crush may be feeling as insecure, shy, and unsure as you. Instead of waiting for your crush to make the first move, take charge and talk to your crush with confidence. If it turns out that your crush isn’t interested in you, at least you’ll never spend time wondering about what could have been., When you talk to your crush, you want to present the best version of yourself. Speak with confidence, keep your emotions in check, and act appropriately.   Avoid gossiping about others Try to control your nervous ticks, like biting your nails or twirling your hair Don’t act pushy—if your crush isn’t interested in you, move on Avoid making offensive comments Do not tell lies about yourself 

learn to love yourself.  start accepting compliments.  develop a list of conversation starters.  don’t wait for your crush to make the first move.  stay calm, cool, and collected throughout the conversation. 

; , That way, your crush will be looking at either you or the teacher. Either way, it's in your general direction.  If they give you an honest answer, then you have their attention.  If you are still feeling shy, then talk to a different friend. Ask them subtly about your crush, what he/she likes, and what they do. Now, you know what they like, and you may find a connection between them and you. Maybe you both enjoy the same music or something.  Talk directly to them with a smile, and be yourself. Don't share anything really weird that you may do with your crush, though. If it's something like eating toothpaste in your spare time, then he may not want to know you very well.  Talk to each other frequently, and don't be afraid to ask them some questions. Maybe you could plan a get-together at your house or theirs. This will build an even deeper foundation in a relationship, if you hang out a bit.  The parents may either like you or hate you. You, of course, want the first choice. Talk with them about school, or how they have such a lovely kitchen. However, if it's not a lovely kitchen, don't mention it.  Don't just throw these questions out, though. And never say "I love you" at this time. Only when you both feel romantic may you say something like "You're really pretty/handsome."  , Don't be afraid to say,"I like them, and he/she likes me!"  

wait for a chance during a free period when your crush is crowded around a teacher with other people, randomly walk up to them, but not too close to him/her.  ask the teacher something random, or engage in a minor conversation with the teacher.  ask someone else (particularly one of your crush's friends) something random.  continue to talk to the friend.  remember, if you want to talk with your crush, and want to be their friend, then don't be shy!,  continue to find connections between you and your crush.  get to know their parent's too.  once you become great friends, your crush may feel comfortable answering personal questions.  if you start dating, let people know! 

 Girls like guys who are honest with them about things going on in their lives, but you don’t need to tell her when she isn’t looking 100%. Many people have rough days., Be direct to discover what specific things you should and should not do to ensure she stays happy. Having a relationship built on open communication and honesty is crucial to ensure that it's going to last.  A girl wants you to get to know her on a deep level so they don’t have to always explain herself. Learn to be empathetic to her and be able to understand things she is going through.Don’t dismiss her problems or concerns. Be aware of little things that upset her. Be willing to go out of your way to do the things she wants.  Girls like to talk; they want guys who truly listen and are able to open up and talk back as well. Communication is a two way street that requires both parties to listen and speak.Allow her to speak her mind without dominating the conversation. Listen without trying to solve all the problems. Rephrase what she says and repeat it back telling her you understand what she said.  Girls communicate with more than just words. Be aware of the signals she's sending when she isn't talking.Watch her body language to see if she likes something or if it makes her uncomfortable. Listen to the tone of her voice, not just the words, to find hidden inflections. Look into her eyes when she smiles. A true smile can be seen in the eyes and you can learn what makes her truly happy.  A girl likes to be complimented not only on her looks, but also about her abilities like her intellect, sports skills, or sense of humor.  Girls like to be appreciated. Show gratitude when they do things for you, even the small things.Recognize and thank her for the things she does. Let her know you’re grateful through your words and actions.  

be honest, but not brutally honest.  ask her what makes her happy.  be understanding.  listen actively during conversations.  pay attention to non-verbal cues.  compliment her to show her you care about her.  don’t take her for granted. 

 Strength is not just measured in physical prowess. Girls want a man who is supportive of their feelings, able to comfort them when they are feeling down, and provide a feeling of security.Take care of yourself financially. Girls aren't just after money, but most would like to know that you could provide if you have to.Be able to deal with situations that make her scared. Hold her during scary movies, and kill the creepy crawlies that get in the house. Help her move things that are heavy. You don't have to be a muscle man, but be able to help out when you're needed.  Girls want to see a man who is willing to put himself on the line to defend what is right. This does not mean throwing punches and getting into physical altercations, but it is important to be willing to speak up if things aren’t going well.   Send food back if it isn’t what was ordered. Stop people from bullying or picking on others. Sign petitions and be active in making the community better.  Being dependable is important to show that you can be counted on during hard times. If you are constantly procrastinating and telling a girl that you will do something later, she will wonder if you ever complete anything.  

be strong for her.  stand up for what is right.  follow through when you say you’ll do something. 

 Being jovial and light hearted can help you make the people around you feel good. Laughing releases endorphins and reduces stress levels in the body.Girls want to feel good about themselves when they are with a guy, so if you can make them laugh, you’re doing a good thing., Being cocky or a jerk makes you look like you don’t care about others' feelings. Girls like guys that show respect to them, their friends, and other people., Be willing to help her along the way to achieving her goals. It is important for girls to know that they have someone who is in their corner and will provide encouragement when they want to do something., Everyone changes what they want from time to time. Even if a girl liked something one day, it is not guaranteed that she will like it tomorrow. Be willing to accept changes and go with the flow to keep her comfortable and happy.  A girl wants a guy who is caring and compassionate. She needs to know that she is your number 1 and wants you to take an interest in her life. Showing true compassion in front of a girl shows her that you are capable of loving.  

have a good sense of humor.  be respectful to everyone around you.  support her dreams and desires.  understand that girls change their minds.  care about her and others. 

 Staying well groomed shows a girl that you can take care of yourself and are not lazy.Brush your hair and keep it well trimmed. Keep facial hair neatly trimmed or shaved.  Clothes that are not dirty or torn help you look presentable. You can personalize your style to make it uniquely yours; however, you want to make sure it isn’t too wild or you may end up turning girls away.  Girls like a man who smells good. Don’t overdo it with cologne or body sprays, but make sure that you don’t smell like a locker room either.  You don’t need to go to the gym daily to bulk up, but it is important to take care of your body. Girls like guys to be fit; you don’t want to look like you just sit and play video games or watch TV all day.  

keep yourself well groomed.  wear stylish clothing.  shower or bathe regularly to cut down on body odor.  exercise regularly. 

 Being a jerk signals that you are a bully and you are not being yourself.; , Don't fake who you really are, it forces the girl to not like you in an intimate way. She won't know who you really are.  If you are fighting make sure that it's not a petty reason. For example:Someone doesn't like your shoes.  Girls like boys who are funny, but not constantly. They don't like getting in trouble so don't always talk to them. Interact at times when you're allowed to. If you don't, it may be a turnoff. It also says that you can't be taken seriously. If you do get in trouble for talking, put the blame on yourself. It says that you are a gentleman. However, if the girl takes advantage of this, she is not the one.  Girls want to hang out with boys, but not all the time. They want to be with their friends too. So try not to: Interrupt her conversations, Follow her around, Sign up for all her classes,ETC.  If you want to ask the girl out, don't say, "Do you want to go out with me?" Try something more like... "Hey, I'm going to see this movie on Friday, I think you'd like it." When asking the question, don't use adjectives like fun and boring. These tell about your taste in the movie and that can be a kill. After she responds say something like, "Wanna come?" It works a lot easier and shows her that you want her to be in your life besides school.  Some girls aren't ready for that yet. They might prefer to be just friends and then work their way into a relationship. Make sure that the girl you are interested in does not have a boyfriend. If she does, distance the flirting but still remain friends. She will come around sometime.  Most girls secretly want to kiss a boy, but boys usually make the first move. If you ask them to kiss... they'll be clueless or think you might cause physical troubles later on in your relationship. After you both are comfortable with each other... then you can get into physical contact. Try not to touch parts of her body other than her face. It may seem as if you want something from her.  Girls like guys that are confident and if they don't like you as a boyfriend, most girls will let you down easily.  Questions, Comments, Concerns. If liked this article then click the smiley face to the right. Comment if you think it is necessary. And I will get back to you on any questions. 

don't be a jerk.  be yourself!,  try not to get into fights around the girl.  have a sense of humor.  let her have her girl time.  know how to ask her out.  don't immediately jump to girlfriend and boyfriend.  don't get physical too soon.  make the first move. 

 Is she looking you in the eyes longer or glancing at you when you're not looking? This is usually an indication that someone is attracted to you.; , This can range from subtle gestures like letting an arm rest against you to more obvious ones like an extended hug. Either way, consistent physical contact isn't something you typically do with your platonic friends. It's probably a good sign.  Does she seem to get upset when you're around other girls or try to jump into every conversation you have with one? She's probably jealous of the attention that they're getting from you. This is a clear indicator she wants to be more than friends.  

eye contact.  physical contact.  jealous tendencies. 

 Is she acting differently around you lately or asking for your input on major life decisions? Some people might read this as a sign of a strengthening friendship, but it could also be a sign that she's ready to take things to the next level.  Does she consistently return your phone calls and text messages? Does she show up at important events that you ask her to attend? Someone who consistently makes times for you could be interested in being more than just friends.  Ask your friends what they think about her attitude towards you. If the general consensus is that she likes you, you can feel comfortable about trying to move forward. If they all think she just sees you as a friend, you may want to back off from making any strong advances.  

general behavior.  her availability.  get input from friends. 

 If you look at her and she's already looking back at you, smile at her. Girls like it when the guy makes the first move. Hold the eye contact just for a second, then smile at her. If she likes you, she'll smile back. If she doesn't like you, she'll give you a weird look or turn away.   Smile with your eyes and make sure you have white teeth and a nice breath. Don't use the smile test unless you guys know each other. Don't try this with a crush that doesn't know you. Note: a smile and a cheesy grin are not the same thing. A cute grin is okay.; , Start with something simple like, "Hey, how was your weekend?" or if it's nearer the end of the week, "Hey, got anything planned for this weekend?".   If she likes you, she'll keep the conversation going by asking you questions about your weekend- and you'll get into her life. If she just mumbles something like, "It was fine" and then goes back to what she was doing, she's probably not interested.  A lot of guys think that if they talk to a girl a lot then they'll think he's pathetic, or clingy, but that's just not true. Girls love it when you hang out with them and actually try to talk about all sorts of topics.  Try to relate to what she says, but don't try to be someone you're not.   Don't daydream while she is talking, she'll hate that and find it a turn off.  This is vital before continuing on with the next steps. You can only keep testing her interest if you are good friends. So, become good friends!  , Find out all that you can about stuff like that.   If she likes you, this will turn into a conversation, because she'll ask you what your interests are too. If she doesn't like you, it will sound more like an interview. It sounds creepy if you're just sitting there asking her all these questions and she's responding with one-word answers. If this is the case, stop the "conversation" immediately.  Make sure you know each other a lot before you try this, or it will totally backfire!   Sneak up on her from behind, and gently grab her waist. Don't squeeze her skin or anything, just put your hands on her waist and leave them there. She may freak out a little at this––remember, someone has just sneaked up on her and put their hands around her waist! If she jumps slightly or screams and turns round, say, "It's only me!" and then smile. Do not laugh. Keep your hands on her waist. If she likes you, she'll smile back and maybe giggle a little bit, then return to her original position. Your hands should still be on her waist. Notice whether or not she leans in closer to you. If she does, tighten your grip ever so slightly, but then let go. If she is not interested, she'll probably just laugh and walk away. If you two are shy friends, she'll probably ask why you're doing this, and how do you explain that? Have a ready answer prepared beforehand, such as "I was just feeling affectionate".  Note: only attempt this if the waist grab test was successful. Go up to her and hug her for no apparent reason. Make sure you hug her gently, not like you would with one of your guy friends. Put your hands on her upper back (steering well clear of her bra!) and slowly rub your hand in up-and-down or circular motions. If she's interested, she'll hug you back.   Notice whether her chin is resting on your shoulder. If it is, there's some chemistry there. Rest your chin on her shoulder too, and bow your head a little bit so it looks like you're looking at the ground. If she doesn't hug you back and moves away, she's not interested.  If you're lucky enough to sit together in a class, attempt to hold her hand. But this has to be done very carefully. Make sure her hand is off the table and resting on her seat. If she's right handed, sit on the left side of her. If she's left handed, sit on the right side of her. Slowly move your hand towards hers and gently touch her wrist. She may jump a little at first; remember, this girl may like you.   If she doesn't pull away, take your hand off her wrist and touch her hand. Attempt to hold her hand by slowly sliding your fingers in between hers. If she likes you, she will definitely hold your hand back. If she does, try to stay holding hands for the remainder of the lesson.  If she has a strand of hair in her face, gently tuck it behind her ear.   If she's interested, she'll likely smile. If she's not interested, she'll likely move away.  If this girl does like you back, seeing you flirt with another girl will just make her feel stupid. She won't know you're doing it to see what her reaction is- she'll think you're doing it because you have a crush on the girl you're flirting with.  If you reach something out for her to take, see if she gently touches your hand before she takes it. This may be a sign of her eagerness to get closer to you.   Beware: It could just mean she bumped you by accident.  These are all possible signs that she's nervous and may mean that she's interested in you.  If not, it could mean she is nervous, or just doesn't make eye contact, or doesn't like you.  These include: Blushing, complimenting you often, giggling, making excuses to hang around you, teasing you, staring but looking away quickly when caught, hugging you and whispering to friends when you walk by.  

do the smile test.  start the conversation.  talk to her as much as possible.  listen carefully at all times.  become friends with her.  get to know about what kind of music she likes, her favorite tv show, her favorite celebrity, etc.  try the waist grab test.  try the hug test.  try to hold her hand.  play with her hair.  do not flirt with other girls to see what her reaction is.  notice whether she tries to touch you.  notice her playing with her hair, rubbing her lips, looking at her nails, or fiddling with her fingers.  notice whether she makes eye contact while talking to you.  notice some typical responses from a person who might fancy you. 

 If you two haven't met yet, and this girl likes you, then she may stare at you and smile to get your attention. Make sure you smile back, and watch her reaction. Shy girls may blush and outgoing girls may smile back. You're basically engaging in a little flirting., If she notices you're around and she likes you, she may want to appear more interested in her friends, so she'll start laughing. She may also feel nervous when you're around, and many people giggle or laugh when they're nervous., Does her face turn red when around you? She might stare at you for a long time, and smile when you look. Maybe when you look at her, she looks quickly away. These signs may mean she likes you. She may also look nervous because she has butterflies, meaning she likes you., If you notice she seems to drop things when she's near you, that could be a sign she likes you. It could indicate she gets nervous when she's near you, causing her to drop things or be a bit clumsier., Your friends may have heard whether the person likes you or not. Even if they haven't, they'll probably be better at guessing than you are. That's only because when it's you in the situation, you have a harder time stepping back and analyzing it, and you may feel a little self-conscious thinking about a girl liking you. Therefore, asking a good friend can help you analyze the situation better., One way to see if a girl likes you is to watch how she treats you on social media. Of course, you first need to friend her. Once you do, watch how she interacts with you. If she seems to pay extra attention to you, she may like you. For instance, maybe she "likes" everything you post or tags you in a number of her posts.For instance, if she writes "Cute!" on a selfie you posted, it may be she's flirting with you.  If a girl likes you, she's going to find reasons to be near you. Even if you've never talked to her, you'll look up, and she'll be at the next table in the library or a few benches down at the basketball game. It's not that she's stalking you. Rather, she's probably hoping you'll notice her.This approach may include things like walking through your line of sight or talking to people near you.  If you're trying to figure out if someone likes you by analyzing everything she does, she may not be that into you. If someone likes you, you'll generally know it in your gut, with the exception of very shy people.However, if you're not sure, it's always best to give it a shot by talking to her. The worst she can say is "No!"  , If you notice that she seems to go up and talk to everyone, but avoids talking to you, she may just be nervous about talking to you. In other words, she doesn't talk to you because she likes you, and that makes her scared., Another step you could take is to talk to one of her friends, particularly if you have a class with one of them. A simple, "Hey, you're Jess's friend, right? Can I ask you something? Do you think Jess likes me?" is really all you need.   You can also watch how her friends react when you're around the whole group of them, including the girl you like. For instance, they may start whispering to each other, teasing the girl, or even pushing her in your direction.  See if she wants to keep your attention or if her eyes move away from yours. If she is consistently making eye contact and sometimes blushing while doing it, chances are she’s interested in you. She may also try stealing quick glances at you when she thinks you're not looking.   Of course, you don't want to just stare at her because that will come off as creepy. Just glance in her direction, or try to hold her eyes for a couple of seconds. However, some girls are just shy, and they may not want to make eye contact with you. Try encouraging her with other steps.  Smiling shows your interest, and makes it easy for her to smile back at you. Sometimes, it might take a while for both of you to just make eye contact and smile before you’re ready to actually talk to each other. Even if you’re nervous, smiling is a good way to make contact because a smile actually acts as a reward to other people. In other words, when you smile at her, her brain perceives it as a reward, making her happier to be around you., Don’t just hang around with the same group of friends. It’s much easier to approach someone who is alone rather than someone who's with a large group, so if you make sure you're alone sometime when she's around, she might come over and talk to you. You could also try and go alone to a place you know she will be to make yourself a little more available. You never know what might happen.For instance, maybe you notice she spends time at the library after school. Make it a point to show up there, too. Try sitting at a table near her, where she can see you.  You don’t have to do much more at first if you’re shy. If she’s unwilling to say “hi” back, she might not be interested. Try it a few more times, but if she never responds, let it go.You might be nervous about approaching her, but the only way you can really test your theory of whether she likes you or not is to actually talk to her.  If she’s responded to your greeting, you can move ahead to actually talking to each other. Consider what you know about her, as that can lead to a conversation. Is she part of the drama club, or does she play sports? Engaging with her about school activities is a great first way to make conversation. You could even try to be funny, but that can be hard.You could ask, "Is your training on the track team really hard?" or "What did you think of the pep rally?" You could also say something like, "Wasn't the food gross in the cafeteria today? Isn't it awful what they call food?" or "Don’t you think Mr. Harrison looks and sounds a lot like Yoda?"  , Now that you have some possible questions, find a good time to talk to her. It should be a time when neither of you is hurrying off to class or activities, and hopefully when you’re both alone. It can feel really awkward the first time, but it does get easier. If she really responds and starts asking you questions too, chances are that she is interested in you. If she doesn’t really respond, it’s likely she’s not that into you.For example, if you asked whether her track training was hard, she might say, "Yes, but I love it!" In that case, you could say, "Cool! What do you love about it? I've always thought about getting into running, but it seems really hard."  

pay attention when she's around.  note if she likes to giggle with her friends.  watch her body language.  see if she gets clumsy near you.  ask your friends what they think.  watch for signs on social media.  notice how often she's around.  pay attention to what your instinct is telling you.  pay attention to when her shyness hits.  use her friends to your advantage.  make eye contact.  smile at her.  make opportunities for her to talk to you.  say “hi.” it’s an easy first step and a way to acknowledge that you’re noticing each other.  think about how to start a conversation.  engage her in conversation. 

 Typically, an increase an eye contact is a good sign that someone is into you. It’s particularly good if they hold eye contact for a while and don’t look away.   Continuously locking eyes with you is her way of letting you know it's ok to approach her.Keep in mind that girls who are shy may not make eye contact as often. If you know she’s shy, don’t take a lack of eye contact as a sign that she doesn’t like you.; , An easy gesture to understand and to watch for, is flirtatious behavior and touching.If she’s suddenly touching your shoulder or brushing her hand against yours, chances are she’s into you.   Asking for a hug before you part ways is another good indication of her feelings. Some women are more subtle in their approach. They may ask you to help them out or want to show you something on their phone. This is their way of closing the physical gap between the two of you. Be aware that not all physical contact is a sign that she likes you. A girl may tap you on the shoulder or ask for a friendly hug without having other intentions. It's important to look for other signs in addition to physical contact.  Whether she’s making fun of your hair or giving you a hard time about always being late; teasing can be a sign of affection. Teasing followed by a smile is even better!   If her teasing is followed by a smile, she's probably just trying to be playful. She may tease you about your age, past girlfriends or hobbies. This is her way of trying to get a reaction from you. Being mean or hurtful is not a sign that she’s into you, so don’t waste your time on someone who puts you down.  Of all the clues she might be giving you, facial expressions are some of the easiest to understand and to read.If she seems to light up when you come into the room, you can probably rest assured that the feelings are mutual.   If she's always smiling when you look at her (or even when you're not) this is a sure sign that she’s attracted to you.Smiling and laughter go hand in hand. If you notice her laughing at all of your jokes (even when they’re not funny), this is her way of affirming your feelings.  If she suddenly sends friend requests to all of your social media accounts, chances are that she’s trying to get to know you better.   You may see numerous requests from her all at once. If she not only wants to be your friend on Facebook, but would like to follow you on Twitter as well, this is a definite sign. If she mentions that you can find her on Facebook or should connect on Instagram, that’s probably a good sign that she likes you. A girl who likes you may take an interest in your friends as well. Find out if your buddies have received friend requests from her.  Whether it’s a status “like” or a message that just says "hey!", if you see a sudden increase in activity from the girl you like, she’s definitely sending you a sign that she has a crush on you.   For the shy girls, this may be one of the best ways to determine if they like you. Social media provides people with the opportunity to open up in a less intimidating environment. Look for an increase in private messages. Similar to texting, if someone is replying to you quickly, they’re giving you a clue as to how much you matter. You may notice that she posts and tags a lot of pictures of the two of you together. This may be her way of telling other girls to back off because she wants to be your girlfriend.  You may notice that she’s broadcasting her newly single status. If she seems happy about it and is trying to draw attention to the fact that she’s currently single, this may be her way of letting you know she’s ready to mingle.   If you’re uncertain as to how she feels about her newly single status, try sending her a private message. If she responds quickly and includes many positive emoticons, she’s trying to let you know she’s more than ok.  If you feel more comfortable broaching your feelings with a girl via social media, send her a private message. Let her know how you feel about her and wait for a response.   Though we're in the habit of sharing our thoughts and feelings via social media, that doesn't mean you should broadcast your feelings publicly.Send her a private message instead of putting your feelings out there for all of the world to know.If the girl is shy, this may be a good way of reaching out to her on a platform that she's comfortable with. This also gives the girl a chance to thoughtfully consider her response to your feelings, should she not share your affections.  If she’s canceling plans with other guys to hang out with you, keep that in mind. If you notice she's not as quick to talk about her latest beau either, chances are she views you as more than a friend and wants to be in a relationship.   This is particularly true if she has talked about other guy crushes in the past, but suddenly changes the subject if you mention them. When she stops viewing you as one of the girls and refuses to share anything about her love life, you can rest assured that the feelings are mutual.  In the past, you used to be able to get her take on your love life. Now she seems to blow up at the mere mention of another woman. If this happens, it’s probably safe to assume that she wants to be your only leading lady.   She may tease you about past relationships, but if you mention someone you currently like, it may not go over well.Past relationships may be her way of teasing you, but mentioning a recent crush will ensure she won’t be smiling for long.  In the past, you were more likely to hang out in a group setting. Now that she keeps asking to spend time alone with you, this may be a clue she’s into you.   If you're being consistently invited to places that her past boyfriends accompanied her to, such as weddings or dances, you should probably have a discussion about whether you’re more than friends.  If she's a good friend, she will appreciate your honesty. Though it may be awkward at first, you'll ultimately feel relieved once you've been honest.   Tell her how you feel. While it could be awkward and you may feel extremely nervous about revealing your feelings to her, you'll be glad you did it. It's much better to say something than to not say anything at all.You may notice a look of relief on her face when you share your feelings with her. If she lights up when you tell her about your feelings, it is probable that she feels the same way. Begin the conversation by telling her how much you respect your friendship with her and that you've recently been having feelings that are beyond that of a friend. Let her know that it's ok if she doesn't feel the same way, but that you felt it was important to be honest with her and to share how you really feel. Don't worry if she doesn't return your sentiments. If she's a good friend, she'll stay friends with you and will be able to joke about it later. Most importantly, If she doesn't feel the same way as you, don't act as if the whole thing was a joke and that you don't really care that much either. 

look for an increase in eye contact.  watch for more touching.  take note if she can’t stop teasing you.  notice her smiles.  see if she becomes suddenly interested in your social media accounts.  notice an uptick in activity from her.  watch for a change in relationship status.  wait for a message back.  take note if she cancels plans with other guys.  watch for signs of anger if you talk about other girls.  look for a suggestion to hang out alone.  observe her reaction when you admit you like her. 

 Body language can go a long way in helping you see whether or not the girl really likes you. Her words may not tell you that she likes you, but her body can give her away. If the girl really likes you, then she may turn her body toward you and try to lean in when she's talking to you so she can get a little closer. Here are a few more signs that she's into you:   See if she twirls her hair or looks down at her feet. This means that she's feeling shy and nervous about talking to you because she likes you. See if she shuffles her feet or plays with her hands or jewelry. This is another sign that she's fidgeting because she likes you. See if she breaks eye contact. If you share a moment of intense eye contact and then she looks away, it may mean that she's feeling shy about talking to you. Check out her smile. Does she smile when she's talking to you, even you don't say anything that should make her smile? This may mean that she likes you.; , Do you notice that she dresses up more when she knows she'll be around you? If you know you'll be running into her at the mall and she's all dressed up and wears more makeup than usual, it may be for you. If she knows she'll see you on the weekend and puts on a new dress, she may be trying to look good for you.   She may also put on a hint of perfume if she knows she'll be around you. If you don't think she wears perfume during school but suddenly puts it on when you're at a group hang at the movies, it may be for you.  This is a dead giveaway that she really likes you. If you catch her blushing after you look at her, or if her face turns bright red in the middle of a conversation with you, then she's feeling shy because of how much she likes you. Observe her for a while. See if she's the kind of person who's just really shy, or if she blushes only for you. If she only blushes in front of you, then she thinks you're special.  

check out her body language.  see how she looks around you.  see if you make her blush. 

   She doesn't mind you touching her. Try bumping into the girl, stand so that your arms touch, any kind of Kino will immediately be noticed (trust me she's a girl). Once they notice the touch, they have two choices, to either move or stay. If they stay, she is at least comfortable with you. "5 Points" She is willing to hold eye contact. Assuming of course that this girl is not incredibly shy, if you can look her into the eyes while you are talking to her, and you find her staring directly back, only turning away occasionally to smile, then you are definitely making a good impression. "2 Points" She always seems to have lip gloss on. Ok so, this is very key. As subtle as this one is, pretty much "every" girl does it. When a girl fantasizes about a guy, usually there is a lot of kissing involved. Whereas guys tend to skip the kiss and jump to the ravaging. If a girl is always keeping her lips nice and glossy around you, she is hoping that by the off chance a kiss does happen, she will be prepared. "2 Points" She always keeps you in her vision range. The average person's field of vision is about 150 degrees. This means that at any time, a person sees about 40% of the activity around them. If you somehow always end up in that 40%, well. She probably likes you. “1 Point” She brings up things you guys have talked about. Yea, you forgot that you mentioned how much you enjoy fishing last week when you saw her. Now she is trying to invite you on a fishing trip with half the people on her contacts list. "1 Point" She tries to get you to hang out with her best friend and her best friend's Boyfriend. AKA, she wants you for a double date but is too shy to ask for the "date". Even if it is just with her best friend, you're still pretty in. Think about it, would you show a horribly unattractive girl off to your best friend? Bonus points if this happens shortly after you meet her. "4 Points" She is naturally competitive with other women around you. Practice complimenting people often, just in general, not exclusively. You'll notice that girls who like you will pay a lot of attention to any compliments you throw out and subconsciously adjust themselves accordingly. If you tell someone you love it when a girl wears blue and the next week she starts to look like a smurf, you are in. "5 Points" She seems like she is always having a good time around you. When it comes down to it. This is the best indicator. Most girls in their 20s now start to realize that their lives aren't the exciting fairy tales they always thought they'd live. No daddy is around to love and care for them. No more boys are leaving love notes in their lockers. No more all day hikes and spontaneous camping trips. But wait, every time she is with you, all these childhood delights seem to be coming back. She is in that naive bliss once again and you have done your job as a man. She has checked you off as a possible Provider, Protector, and Partner. "10 Points" She never seems to have anything to do after seeing you. You know why? It's because she made sure of it. She didn't need an escape plan because she didn't plan on escaping. She cleared up her to-do's because she wanted to spend the entire day with you. If you didn't have to go home to save the world from an endless horde of Nazi Zombies, she would still be hanging out with you. "3 Points" After she said she has no plans, she turns out to have a few. If for some reason you bump into her later in the day or go back because you forgot your phone, and it turns out that she "is" hanging out with somebody. That means that she had a bunch of people she "wanted" to see, but kept putting them off to spend more time with you alone. "3 Points"; ,, However use common sense there is a difference between being persistent and being needy for example if the girl is saying No again and again but still smiling and talking to you then asking her again with another angle could be beneficial. On the other hand if she is saying 'No' again and again with a serious tone and body language this is a cue for you to back off and leave her alone.  

watch for signs.  be confident about how to react to her.  ,  when you ask her out be sure of yourself and almost insist that she join you for a bite to eat or a walk in the park. 

 If you've looked across the room in English class and have caught her staring at you, then she may like you. If she abruptly looks away, blushes, or doesn't look in your direction for the rest of the class, that makes it even more likely that she likes you because she feels like she's been caught. You can also see if you catch her eye in group hang-outs. Look her way from across the room at a party and see if she's staring at you.   If she's the type who just stares off and daydreams a lot, then she may not be directing her attention towards you.  If you talk to her and find her giggling for no good reason, or even outright laughing even when you haven't said anything funny, then this may be because she likes you. Laughter is a natural way to shed some nervous energy, so the girl is probably laughing or giggling because she's nervous or excited to be around you.   See if she laughs around everyone, or if you have a special effect on her funny bone.  If the girl passes you in the halls with her friends, and her friends are laughing and nudging her when you come by, this is a sign that they all know that she likes you and are teasing her. If she says "Stop!" or gently shoves her friends or refuses to make eye contact with you when this happens, then this makes it even more likely that she's into you.   If a girl in middle school has a crush on you, it's almost guaranteed that her friends will know. Watch her friends carefully for any signs that they know how she feels about you.  She'll most likely touch you in a teasing way like a playful shove, or tap you on the shoulder to tell you something. Still, this is her way of flirting and trying to get close to you. Notice if she touches all the guys around her or only you. If she only pays special attention you, then it's a sign that she likes you.   If she touches all the guys around her playfully, then she may just be a physical person.  If she gives you a bowl she made in ceramics class, or if she even went to the mall and got you something silly like a pencil with your favorite sports team's logo on it, then she's telling you that she likes you. If she brings candy or cookies to school and makes a point of offering you some, then she's trying to impress you and telling you that she likes you.  

see if you can catch her staring at you.  see if she easily giggles around you.  see if she's always laughing with her friends when they pass you.  see if she tries to gently touch you.  see if she gives you a small gift. 

 If she knows that the Warriors are your favorite basketball team and has suddenly started talking to you about them, then she may have picked up a new love for the team just because of you. If she knows you love watching Game of Thrones and suddenly knows everything about the characters, then she may just be trying to impress you with these new interests.   If she's never shown an interest in your interests before but suddenly seems to know everything about the things you like, then she probably likes you.  If she approaches you and asks a question that you know she can easily get answered by someone else, like how hard the math test was, or what new sport you played in gym class, then she's clearly just looking for an excuse to talk to you. If she asks what you think of a certain teacher or the new kid in school, she's just trying to spend more time with you by asking any question that comes to her mind.  If the girl teases you, then it's almost definitely true that she likes you. If she makes fun of you, from laughing at your shoes, giggling at your new outfit, or makes a comment about how messy your locker is, then she's just teasing you because she likes to be around you. Sometimes, her teasing can even get a little mean, but that doesn't mean she doesn't like you.   Just remember the golden rule: if she's paying attention to you, she likes you. Teasing is just one way of paying attention.  In middle school, teasing and flirting are almost interchangeable. Still, there are some signs that the girl is flirting with you. If she winks at you, even jokingly, she's definitely flirting. If she teases you about your new haircut and maybe even says it's an improvement, then she's flirting with you.   If she acts coy, playful, or just a little bit silly around you, then she's flirting with you. If she makes fun of you for liking another girl, especially when you clearly don't like another girl, then she's just flirting with you.  If the girl is suddenly interested in who you like and if you want to ask any girl out, then she wants to know if you like her -- unless she's playing matchmaker for one of her friends. If she's always bugging you about who you like or even throws out some names of people she knows you don't really like, then she's just trying to talk to you about your romantic life to get close to you.   If she makes fun of any girlfriends you've had in the past, or just makes fun of other girls around you, then she's probably just jealous because she really likes you.  Middle school girls love flirting over Facebook and texting. Remember the first rule: if she pays attention to you, then there's a good chance she likes you. If she's always texting you or posting on your Facebook wall for no reason, then she probably likes you.   If she posts a video or a link to something you like on your Facebook wall, then it's even more likely that she likes you. If she asks what you're doing over the weekend when she texts you, then she's interested in you plans because she likes you. Check out her Facebook activity. Does she talk to other guys on Facebook as often as she talks to you, or are you special?  

see if she tries to talk about common interests.  see if she looks for any excuse to talk to you.  see if she teases you.  see if she flirts with you.  see if she asks who you like.  notice what she says to you over facebook or texting. 

 If you ever touch her, does she touch you back or does she avoid contact? When you talk, does she lean towards you? Does she open her shoulders up to your when you’re talking or does she keep her distance and remained reserved? These aren’t foolproof ways of knowing that she does or does not like you, but they can help you get an idea. Some girls might be more comfortable messing around with and touching guys even if they don’t like them.; , If she avoids or finds excuses to get out of time that you would otherwise share together, she probably doesn’t like you. If she was thinking about how she liked you she would probably be making excuses to be around you more, not the other way around. Don’t take this as gospel – there is always the chance that she is really shy. However, if you find that she’s constantly scheduling her doctors appointments during the free period you have together that probably isn’t a good sign. , She might not be interested in you if she flirts with other guys, but she might be trying to make you jealous so don’t immediately assume the worst. There’s also no way to know if she’s really flirting with the guy or just being friendly.   It is a good idea to see how much attention she pays to other guys versus how much attention she pays to you. Again, if she’s really shy she may be more comfortable talking to guys that she doesn’t like versus someone she does – maybe you!  , Girls often tell their friends who they like. If her friends ever laugh at you or her, they might think it's funny that she likes you. They might act immaturely and tease you and her.   Not all friends do this, but if you pay attention you might catch a friend winking at your crush or giving them an elbow nudge. Keep your eye out for these types of clues.  Sometimes when you like someone all you want to do is stare at him or her. If you catch her looking over at you often, she might like you. If she never even looks your way, she may be trying to hide the fact that she likes you. Or she could just be focused on her work. If you often make eye contact across the room that is a very, very good sign. , When the two of you talk she will probably make lots of eye contact if she is interested in you. She probably will smile often and pay attention to what you are saying too.  

pay attention to her body language around you.  watch for clues that she is trying to avoid you.  observe if she flirts with other guys.  pay attention to how her friends act while you’re around.  notice if she ever looks your way.  look at her eyes. 

 If you tend to dress like a slob (ex: wrinkled, baggy untucked shirt, baggy pants, dirty sneakers), see what else you have in your wardrobe that may be more presentable. High class girls like boys who dress decently and neatly, but they must also have the ability to sweep them off their feet. Suggestions for clothing may be:   A nice fitting shirt that complements your face, hair, eyes, etc.       A nice fitting pair of pants that doesn't look off (jeans are also another option, but it depends on what kind of girl you're dealing with here) Combed hair (it doesn't have to look like you spent an hour on it, but messy bed hair may not be appealing to high class girls) A decent pair of shoes (it doesn't have to be dress shoes, but make sure your shoes aren't scruffy and dirty looking) The way you dress will depend on the preferences of the high class girl you're trying to win. If she tends to dress more casually, you can be a little more casual. However, if she dresses extravagantly and formally, you may have to lessen the casual look and go more for the formal look (but not too much).; , High class girls tend to look down on bad words, lazy vocabulary and pretty much any styles of talking that sound dirty, low class and unruly. Listen to how your crush talks and try to talk like she does, but not so much that you sound like an exact replica of her! Pick up words from her here and there, and dust up your vocabulary. Refrain from cursing or doing any bad talk in front of her, and definitely keep away from dirty and/or perverted jokes.   If you plan on telling her jokes, only tell her a couple that you know are uproariously funny to everyone, not just to your friends! Practice telling your jokes to other high class girls to see if they laugh; if they don't, you may have to rethink your jokes before presenting them to your crush!        , Confidence goes a long way. If you appear shy and nervous in front of her, the chances of her being impressed by you will be extremely low. However, if you talk clearly - not too loudly or it will annoy her - and appear confident in who you are, she will be interested and want to know you more. Speak up and don't be afraid of who you are!   Avoid practicing what you're going to say in front of her, as you will sound like you had prepared it. You will also sound mechanical and lifeless, almost like a parrot's words. Your conversations with her should be casual and flowing, not like stiff and resembling an interview!        , High class girls dislike these types of boys. Remember to never try to be extremely cool. High class girls understand that you are not meant to be theirs.  Start a conversation with a girl who knows your crush, and converse with her about your crush. Tell that girl that you like your crush - she could act as a common friend!   Never go and talk to your crush until that common friend introduces you to her.  Remember not to have personal talks with her that are direct. Either ask her about her hobbies, her favorite color, try to converse about what you two have in common, and so on. Slowly you will see that you two are sharing a good bond with each other.  However, make the question casual - ask her in the middle of a comfortable conversation and don't ask for all her personal information at once. Otherwise, she will see you as desperate and perhaps creepy.   Don't forget to give her your email address, phone number, etc.       Avoid asking for her address at this point. She may think you're trying to stalk her. Don't ask for all this information at once. If your crush wishes to tell, let her. If not, move onto the next step or wait a while before asking again. However, don't be pushy or whiny!  ,, Meet with her or say hi whenever she sees you. Always keep smiling (but not too much or creepily!), preferably when you're with your friends so that it attracts her attention.  Try to be or talk with other girls a little so that she will become a little jealous. You will notice the change in her.  Say yes if you have time. Otherwise, politely decline and say, "Maybe another time. I'm busy after school."   If you always accept, it creates an image for the boy next door.  If she says no, do not get frustrated. Only say, "Okay. Maybe another time?" Always make eye contact with her and do not be shy. Girls don't like to talk to shy boys. You should be confident while asking her so that she is not able to easily say no.  Tell her that you like her. If she says that she feels the same way, great! Before starting a relationship with her, tell her about your reality and that you are a middle class boy - not a high class boy. If she accepts you the way you are, she really does love you.  You two can still be friends and she may realize in the future that she does love you. There are plenty of girls out there and the perfect one for you is waiting in the world - you have to let go of your crush for now in order to find her. It will be worth it.  Don't put yourself down because of this, but don't get cocky either!  

take a look at yourself and see what changes can be made.  listen to yourself when you talk.  be confident.  always be neat and clean with no bad boy image.  try to be friends with her.  when you finally know your crush, try to attract her.  after three or four such conversations, or till you feel that you two are pretty close, ask for her phone number, email address, etc.  if you sense some signs that she likes you (ex: she gives you her phone number without you asking) and is more comfortable with you than any of the other guys, you might have succeeded.  ,  try to hold longer conversations with her on the phone.  after doing all this, if the girl notices you, move to the third level.  if she asks you about a coffee, you should not always say yes to her.  if your crush didn't ask you out, gather up all your courage and ask her - at least try your luck instead of staying quiet.  the next and final step, you must be alone with her and say that you want to have an important talk.  if she doesn't feel the same way, it's okay!,  whether you have won your crush's heart or not, know that you have tried your best and that's what counts. 

 If you find that she’s on her best behavior when you are around that is a good sign. However, don’t take it to heart if she is brief with you sometimes. She might seem in a hurry or she might not want to be around you right at that moment. Sometimes she might just be grumpy or having a bad day. Pay attention the theme of your conversations, not one specific instance.   For example, if she tries to engage you in interesting conversations then she probably thinks you are interesting.  If you're always the one to talk to her, she might assume she doesn’t have to put any work into the relationship. Talk to her a few times and then leave the door open for her to start a conversation with you. If she doesn’t then she probably doesn’t want to talk to you anymore. For example, if she asks you how your soccer game went or your piano recital it means she is paying attention to your interests. That's a good sign.  If she likes you, she might ask for help on a lot of things. She might ask you for help on the new homework in the hall, just so she can get closer to you.   She might ask you a lot of questions about your interests. She might even just say something about how she’s excited you’ll be living in the same neighborhood next year, or something like that. Keep an eye out for these clues. If she is a straight A student, and she asks you for the history assignment, she probably already has it and she just wanted to talk to you. But be careful, she might really need help, so don't get your hopes up too high.  This sounds simple, but honestly sometimes the simplest clues are the most important ones. If she is nice to you and asks questions, she probably likes you. There’s a myth that sometimes girls will act mean to you to get your attention. That’s not true. They might tease you flirtatiously, but they aren’t going to outright insult you. Take the teasing in stride because it’s probably a good sign. For example, if she teases you for being late to school that day she might like you. If she tells you you're dumb because you failed a test, she probably doesn't.  

listen to what tone she talks to you with.  wait for her to strike up a conversation with you.  keep an eye out for verbal gestures.  keep track of how nice she is to you. 

 Even if it’s scary this will answer a lot of your questions. Stop snooping around trying to guess her every intention. Everyone will respect you if you go up and ask her on a date. They will admire your bravery and wish that they had the guts to do something like that.   Even if it’s just a girl who works at the bookstore, go up to her and see if she wants to get lunch with you sometime. The worst that happens is that they say no and they will probably be really flattered. If they say anything mean then they weren’t worth your time to begin with. For example, just ask her what she's doing for lunch tomorrow. Ask her if she would be up to grab some tacos with you. It's as easy as that! It might be a good idea to find out if she has a boyfriend. If she does, she probably is more interested in him than you. If she has a boyfriend, the best thing to do is lay off of her. If she doesn't have one, she could be interested in anyone!  , This is another way of being direct and finding out the answer to your question. However, the benefit of this method is that you don’t have to follow through on a date and neither do they! If you’re on the younger side a date is a difficult thing to accomplish, just asking if they like you is a good way to start. You can build from there after your question has been answered.   You don't have to say "do you like me". Try telling her that you feel like you guys have a really good connection and you find yourself wondering if it might be something more than friendship. Then ask what she thinks.  This isn’t the bravest way to go about it, but it might work. Try to choose one of her friends who you are close to also. If the friend knows you are a good person they might be willing to help you out and tell you the truth. It might be hard to hear, but at least you won’t be constantly worrying about if she likes you or not. If they refuse to answer then that’s probably a good sign! However, the friend also might just say that they don’t know.  

ask the girl on a date.  ask your crush if she likes you.  ask one of your crush’s friends if your crush likes you. 

 Don't pretend to be jerk so that you can impress her. Both lying about your true self and being rude will put distance between you and the girl.   However, don't be afraid to tease her a bit. Once you've talked a few times, most girls will be comfortable with you making a few lighthearted jokes at her expense (as long as it's a two way street and she can do the same to you). It shows that you're confident enough in yourself to make a small gamble that she could be offended. If she takes a joke seriously and is offended, just apologize calmly and let her know you were only kidding.; , First, ask yourself why you want to impress this girl. Is it because she is the most popular girl in school, or because you truly enjoy her company?  , Hang out near her and listen to what the girl and her friends are saying. (Don't make it a dead giveaway that you're listening.) Then approach them and say, "I couldn't help over hearing BLAH BLAH BLAH". It should go naturally; if not then perhaps you should rethink this girl. Chemistry matters!  , Beautiful girls don't look around and see faces as attractive as their own - they see YOUR face and others like it. But they DO appreciate someone who makes them laugh. Be optimistic and cheerful.  You've seen people walk around with their heads hanging, shuffling their feet as they walk. They look beaten, unhappy, defeated. That isn't attractive to anyone! If you want to attract a woman who's out of your league, then show her you're confident. Hold your head up, walk like you're proud to be you, delighted with who you are - but not arrogant, maintain eye contact if talking to her. Watch how others walk and carry themselves and try to mimic the confident behaviors you see.  Don't wait for her to break the conversation off the first few times. Keep conversations short, interesting and active, and then go away. Let her know you have to go (she doesn't need to know why), wish her a good day, and walk away.  Find out what other qualities she has that make her an outstanding woman. Ask her about herself and who she is. Women who are used to being noticed for their outer appearance won't be swayed easily by comments on their physical appearance. Be different and find the inner beauty (you can still admire the outer beauty in your own thoughts).  Did she do an awesome job on her speech in history? Let her know, and be genuine. Highlight some parts that you enjoyed or tell her about an article you read on the topic.  Sometimes, you meet and upon spending a little time with a girl, realize you have very strong feelings for her that you won't be able to hide. Don't. Just keep it light and start hitting on her immediately. If you make a little joke of it and say things like, "She's crazy about me," or "Of course I'm staring at you, you're the girl of my dreams." (wiggles eyebrows up and down suggestively with a big, cheesy smile for her)to her friends while she's standing right there, it will just be part of the way you get along very early on. But careful: if she doesn't giggle or seem amused and a little bit flattered, this will not work and will become tiresome very quickly. Watch for her reaction and adjust.  Ask her out on a friendly date so you can see how much you guys really have in common. And if she is conceited then you will be grateful you didn't ask her out on a real date.   Be very cautious to only do the "friendly date" once or twice. If you do it too much, she'll start to look at your relationship as friendship, and this can be a difficult perception to reverse.  

be a gentleman.  figure out your intentions.  get close.  develop an excellent sense of humor.  confidence is key.  leave her wanting more.  don't tell her about her looks.  but do compliment her.  hide in plain sight.  friendly get togethers. 

 Getting a girl's attention and making an impression is much easier to do when you've surrounded yourself with others. If she sees you as being the center of attention, she may become curious about you, wondering what draws people to you. Try surrounding yourself with friends and getting along with those around you to catch her interest.Try meeting with your friends just before or after the class starts. Be somewhere in the class that she can see you and how well you are engaging with your friends. You might try walking into the class with your friends while you are telling a great story.; , If you want to make a good impression, it's always a good idea to treat others around you well. Chances are, if a girl is interested in you, she will be judging how you treat other people to get an idea of how you might treat her. Make it a point to show your character by supporting those around you in class.   Try complimenting good ideas that come up in class. Avoid saying anything negative or sarcastic to others. Remember to thank others who help you during class. Always speak supportively and kindly to those around you to help make a good impression.  If you want to get the attention of the girl you like, you will need to make yourself stand out during class. Sitting quietly and taking notes won't get anyone's attention. It's important to engage the instructor and answer or ask questions to help you stand out and make an impression.   Try not to be a show off during class. Answering too many questions might make a bad impression. Make sure your questions are actually aimed at furthering the topic under discussion. Don't make inappropriate jokes during the class.  Women are generally attracted to men who appear more dominant and confident. To show how confident you are, you can try to establish your space whenever you are around a girl you like. Simply taking up whatever space you need can be a good way to get her attention.When you sit down, feel free to relax and take up whatever space you'd like. For example, you might try extending your arm over an empty chair that you are sitting next to. Stretching your arms up into the air can be a good idea. Try to avoid being too aggressive or obnoxious. Make yourself comfortable, but not if it means making others uncomfortable.  There are few things more attractive than a person who is happy, joyful, and having fun. Whenever you are near a girl that you like and with some friends, it can be a good idea to be open about how much fun you are having. People are naturally interested in sharing in good times with others. Enjoying yourself can be a simple and easy way to make an impression.Talk about an exciting idea or project you and friend are working on. Let your enthusiasm show to help catch her attention. Try sharing a joke with your friends before class starts. Make sure you say it loud enough so she can hear it. Talk with your friends about something exciting you have planned, such as going to a concert or going on a trip.  Even though you haven't spoken with the girl you are interested in, you might still learn a few things that she is interested in. Knowing what she likes can help you steer your conversations and actions in a direction that can make an impression.   You may have noticed that she was reading a book about a certain artist. You can try asking a question about that artist during your art class to show your interest. Maybe she carries a backpack with her favorite band on it. You might try bringing up that band's genre during a music history course. Try talking about something you know she likes with your friends during class.  Making eye contact is a great way to show you're interested in a girl and to judge her interest. Whenever you feel it's appropriate, try meeting her gaze for a moment. However, don't stare too long as this may make her uncomfortable. Try to meet her eyes for as long as you feel is appropriate to get her attention.Remember to wear a friendly look on your face, offering a smile. Try not to glance away quickly as this might make you seem un-confident or nervous.  If you've caught her gaze for a few moments, you might want to make a playful gesture. This can be something simple such as making a silly face or sticking your tongue out. Playing around like this can demonstrate your confidence and interest to her., It's important that you feel and represent yourself as being friendly, open, and approachable. You want to convey that you are confident, comfortable, and have a kind personality. Use your smile to break the ice and make a good impression on the girl that you like.Don't force your smile. Let your genuine happiness show through. Don't put on a big grin or smile too long. This can cause you too look disingenuous or strange.  Your appearance makes an impression on everyone you meet. This rule applies to any girl that you want to impress. You don't have to wear a suit to make an impression, but you will have to wear clean and sensible outfits. Try evaluating what your clothes say about you to judge if you are making a good impression.Make sure your clothes are clean when you wear them. Check to make sure your clothes fit well. Clothes that are too big or small may give you an odd appearance. Make sure your clothes match or present an image that you think is appropriate.  A huge part of impressing a girl you like is by practicing good personal hygiene. Chances are, if your hygiene is lacking, you may actually make the wrong impression when being around the girl that has your interest. Keep some of these basic hygiene tips in mind to help you make a good impression:   Take a shower everyday. Wear deodorant. Brush your teeth at least once a day. Keep your fingernails trimmed.  Your body language says a lot, without you ever having to speak a word. Take a careful look at your body language when you are near the girl you like. Make sure to keep these tips in mind when you are trying to say the right thing with your body language:Don't hunch your shoulders down or forward. Have them naturally pushed back. Stand up straight at all times, keeping your head up. Avoid slouching whenever sitting down.  If you are nervous or guarded when you are near a girl you like, you're body language might demonstrate those feelings. Any kind of “closed off” body language will prevent people from approaching you. Taking an open and relaxed stance when standing or sitting can help show your confidence and send the message that you are open to interacting with her. Keep some of these tips in mind when trying to maintain open body language.Make sure you stand so that you are directly facing her. Keep your arms down, at your sides. Avoid crossing your arms or otherwise blocking the other person off.  

be the center of attention.  treat others well.  stay active during class.  establish your space.  have fun.  think about what she might like.  make eye contact.  get her attention with a fun gesture.  smile.  dress well.  practice good hygiene.  watch your body language.  keep your body open. 

 Talk to her in a friendly and casual way. You don't have to make it obvious that you like her, try just being friends first. While talking, be confident. Most likely, she's nervous too! Most girls will appreciate a guy that takes the lead. That way, they don't have to stutter and mumble their way into a conversation.; , Don't dress like a slob in a baggy chili stained sweatshirt and sweat pants, but don't wear a suit and tie everyday either! It's also important to smell good. Wear a scent that isn't too strong, and don't spray it on too heavy. There's nothing worse than the girl you like being covered in your cologne after she talks with you!  , Some girls are more confident than others, and some will take them well and some won't. If your girl is on the less than confident side, don't attempt a joke about her appearance. She might take you seriously and think you're a jerk. Also, make sure that your jokes are actually funny! If you are talking about that hard math test, don't relate it to your friend's pet turtle. It not only be a mood killer, but just plain awkward.  Maybe you're both book or band geeks, or love the same movie. If your girl is into something that you're not, try to be open minded about it. For example, if she likes painting, grab a brush and try it with her. You could also try something new to both of you! If you both have never tried photography, take a class together. Something you thought of before as stupid or boring could actually turn out to be really fun! Another thing to try would be dancing classes. Dancing is classically romantic, and taking a class will set the mood without being too obvious.  It's pretty embarrassing to show up without a present or at least something to say when it's a special day.  Go to her sporting events, recitals, concerts, art shows and performances. It's important to encourage her hobbies and interests by attending to show that you care.  It doesn't have to be anything fancy, just a stuffed animal, or a card. Maybe you don't have a lot of money to spend. That's okay! Just a heartfelt letter can be enough. Don't make a big deal of it either. Just slip something in her locker, or send her a text or an email. Even a cheery, "Happy birthday!" the next time you see her will make her pleased that you remembered.  It comes off as annoying, or even conceited when guys constantly brag. It doesn't hurt to mention something about your football practice the other day, but don't constantly say things like, "Since I'm the star on the football team, this will be no problem!"  , When guys always follow whatever the new trend is, they start to be less like themselves and more and more like other people. It's good for the world to have differences because if everyone in the world were the same, life would be really boring! Don't be someone you're not just to impress her. If she doesn't like you for you, she's not the right girl for you.  Sports are fun and healthy activities to be involved in, and help make you a well rounded person. But remember that it's good to be involved in more than just sports. There are a wide range of activities to choose from including music, theatre, dancing, photography, visual arts, singing, playing an instrument, book clubs, environment clubs, wood shops, writing workshops and countless others. Being involved will show your girl that you know how to live life to the fullest!  , It's good to remember to stay focused on schoolwork because it will benefit you in the future. Girls also enjoy studying with guys, and it's a good way to spend quality time with the girl you like.  Don't talk with your mouth full, and remember to use a napkin. When meeting her parents, say please and thank you. Don' burp, pass gas, sneeze or cough, don't do it in front of her. If you absolutely have to, leave the room for a moment. Sometimes this happens accidentally, and that can be really embarrassing! Just say excuse me and move on. Try to avoid making a joke unless she laughs. Then it's okay. Otherwise, It's just rude and disgusting.  Treat the girl you like as if she were any other friend at first. Don't be afraid to punch her on the arm, give her a high five, or give her a hug. None of these things have to be "romantic", so there shouldn't be any difference. Once you and your girl start to become closer, than you can start with the romantic stuff.  Don't go crazy and start bringing her flowers, but try to be subtle. When you two are alone and happy, lightly brush your hand against hers. Look at her face to see if she responds well. If she still looks happy, gently take hold of her hand. Be gentle, and don't make a big deal out of it. If she seems uncomfortable, let go. Most likely, she will be happy that you were brave enough to map the first move, and might be more comfortable seeing you as a romantic partner rather than a friend. If your girl is still responding well, put your arm around her. If she likes that, it's all downhill from there.  E.g., do not tell her "GM>tomboy-made Nissan" or "Nissan>recall-esque GM". This'll get her NOT to like you. 

make sure that you actually know the girl.  try to be nice in appearance.  don't overdo the jokes.  find something that you both have in common.  remember important information like birthday's, holidays and promises to hang out.  be her biggest cheerleader.  give your girl presents.  don't show off.  remember to be yourself.  try to be involved in a lot of different things.  get good grades in school.  try to be generally polite.  be normal buddies!,  when you think that you and your new friend are close enough to take it to the next level, go ahead and map her realize you like her.  don't brand bash. 

 Demonstrate your great personality to the girl before you even ask her out. By being positive, kind, funny, thoughtful, and well-mannered, you can show her that you are a great guy who would make an excellent boyfriend.If you feel like your personality is lacking in some way, focus on improving yourself. For example, if you tend to be pessimistic, make it your goal to identify three positive things about your life every day. Over time, you will begin to find it easier to see the positives in your everyday life and you will also benefit from higher self-esteem, better sleep, and improved empathy.Remember to talk to her. Research has shown that a great personality can make people find you more attractive. But if you never talk to her, she may never get to see how great of a guy you are.; , Looking and feeling good will help you to be confident around the girl you like and that may be enough to win her over. Take plenty of time every day to eat healthy, exercise, sleep, and groom yourself. Feeling good about yourself will help you project happiness and confidence, which are always attractive.Eat healthy and exercise regularly. Rest and relax every day. Make sure your hair looks good. Wear clothes that express your personality. Wear cologne and deodorant.  Some girls may find certain things attractive in a guy, while others will not. But the only way that you can find out if the girl you like finds your unique talents attractive is to look for opportunities to showcase them.For example, if you are an excellent guitar player, invite the girl you like to come to one of your band’s practices or shows. Or if there is a sport that you excel at, ask her to come to one of your games.  Some girls are impressed by guys who are passionate about their hobbies and make time for themselves. If you have things that you love to do, make sure that you make plenty of time to do those things. For example, if you are an avid reader, make sure that you keep doing that even while you are pursuing this girl. It will give you more things to talk to her about when you see her and she may even be impressed to find you reading in a coffee shop some random afternoon. 

show her that you have a great personality.  make sure that you always look and feel great.  look for opportunities to showcase your unique abilities and resources.  do things that you love to do. 

 Asking a girl out on a date can be frightening, but if you make a plan it might not be as scary. Think about when, where, and how you plan to ask her out. Try to work out what you want the moment to look like and spend some time visualizing a positive response.  You want to look your best when you ask her out for the first time. If you are wearing your grubbiest shirt and haven’t showered in a couple of days, she will not have a good impression of you. But you don’t need to wear a tuxedo or get a makeover before you ask her out either. Just make sure that you are clean, wearing some flattering clothes, and that your hair and facial hair are groomed., Confidence is sexy, and one of the most confident things you can do is look her in the eyes when you ask her out. While it may feel more comfortable to look at the floor and mumble your question to her, this will not impress her. Look her straight in the eyes and hold your head up high to show her that you are confident., The way that you stand can also indicate how confident you are. If you are slumping or crossing your arms, she might interpret this as fear or nervousness. Instead, stand up tall with your arms hanging loosely at your sides. Keep your shoulders back and your chest puffed out a bit. This will show her your full height and breadth, which will be much more impressive than if you approach her in a hunched over position., There’s no need to talk to her for an hour before you ask her out. In fact, if you take too long to ask, you might lose your nerve. Instead, walk right up to her, give her a quick compliment, and then tell her that you’d like to spend some time with her.If you’d rather call her, that’s fine too, just don’t ask her out via Facebook or text message or she may think that you are too nervous to talk to her.Try saying something like, “Hi. You seem really cool! Listen, I am in a bit of a hurry, but I thought I’d see if you would be interested in going out with me sometime. Can I get your number?”  , Sometimes, despite your best efforts, a girl will say no when you try to ask her out. The occasional “No” is something that you will have to deal with when you ask a girl out on a date.If she says no, don’t get upset. Just shrug it off, and try not to act like too disappointed.   Try saying something like, “It’s cool. You just seem like a fun person to chill with so I thought I’d ask. But no worries! Have a good day!”  

plan your approach.  be well dressed and groomed.  meet her gaze.  stand up straight and tall.  keep it short and direct.  shrug it off if she says no. 

 If the girl that you like says yes and you do get to go on a date with her, make sure that you do all that you can to make sure that she wants to go out again sometime. Little gestures like opening doors, helping her put her coat on or take it off, and paying for dinner can be very impressive to some girls. If you really want to wow her, show up at her door with flowers, take her somewhere fancy, and impress her with your food recommendations at the restaurant.To impress her even more on your first date, find out what she likes through casual conversation and plan a date that incorporates those likes. For example, if she is a big fan of horror movies, take her to see the latest horror flick. If she is a Chinese food fanatic, take her to a Chinese restaurant for dinner. If she loves to play mini golf, take her to play some mini golf!, When you first pick up or meet up with the girl for your date, make sure that you pay her a sincere, specific compliment. You can say something simple like, “You look amazing in that dress!” or, “Your hair looks really pretty.” Whatever you choose, just make sure that you deliver the compliment in a direct way and look her in the eye as you say it.Keep the compliments coming as you continue to date and get to know each other. Don’t just compliment her appearance either. Make sure that you also compliment her intelligence, her sense of humor, and her other talents as you learn about them. For example, you can say something like, “I really admire your talent at track and field.”  , When you are first getting to know a girl that you like, you should be careful not to delve too deeply into personal issues. Stick to things that won’t get her feeling uncomfortable or vulnerable For example, you can ask about her favorite music, movies she’s seen recently, or her hobbies.Avoid discussing topics that might be uncomfortable for her such as your ex-girlfriends, family conflicts, or your religion. Instead, focus on questions that help you get to know her better. Ask her about her likes and dislikes, her friends and family, her interests, etc.  It is important to have fun while you are getting to know a girl, so make sure that you also ask questions that reveal her personality. By now you should know a bit more about her likes and dislikes, so you can probe a bit further into those topics as well.For example, if she told you what her favorite movie was on your last date, ask her what she likes about that movie, how many times she has seen it, who her favorite character is, etc. She will be impressed by your memory of what she said and your sincere interest in something she enjoys.  Getting to know someone can take a long time and it may be a while before she falls for you. But don’t get discouraged or impatient. Just keep trying your best to show her a good time and get to know her. Try to look at each time that you go out or spend time together as an opportunity to find out more and show her what makes you worthy of her love.  

be an amazing date.  compliment her.  talk about safe subjects at first.  ask more questions to get to know her even better.  keep seeing her and be patient. 

 Saying "Hi (name)" and smiling as you pass her is a good way of doing this. Ask her questions about herself (e.g. "How are you?", "How did you go on the maths test?"). Be friendly.; , When she talks to you, show interest in what she has to say. Make eye contact. Try to keep the conversation flowing.  Even if they are lame.  Give her compliments like "Your hair looks nice today," or "That's a pretty dress." Every girl loves a compliment. , If she drops something, pick it up for her. If she doesn't understand a math question, explain it to her.  Sometimes a girl just needs someone to talk to about something bringing her down. Sympathize with her.If she brings up an issue of hers, make sure you listen attentively, and offer constructive advice (but don't over-do the advice).  If she is upset, be there for her. If you're good friends with her, hug her (don't do this if you think she definitely doesn't like you).  Don't over-do this step, but occasionally let her catch you staring at her from afar. When she notices you staring, you can either smile (or wink if you think you can pull it off) or quickly look away.  Playfully teasing her, poking her (gently), and stealing her pen from her are effective and easy ways of signalling to a girl you like her. If you want to take it up a notch, gently make contact with her hand.(You can incorporate this in other types of flirting, e.g. if you steal her pen, hold it in your hand so that if she wants her pen back she has to pry it from your hand). Also don't overdo it, the girl may get annoyed.  This gives her mixed signals, often resulting in her constantly questioning whether you like her or not.  Show her that you want to socialize more with her. Ask her to the movies, to hang out with some friends, or ask her over to your house.  And comment on some of her photos/wall posts on Facebook/Myspace but don't overdo this.  If you don't know when it is, ask (by casually bringing it up in conversation). Give her a card or a small present on her birthday, or maybe even a hug.  Every now and then, ring her, just to talk with her and see how she's doing.  This is quite obvious, but it gets the message across. Be confident, most of the time even if the girl doesn't like you she will let you down easy and nothing is more annoying than a guy that likes you but won't make a move.  

talk to her.  listen to her.  laugh at her jokes.  compliment her.  sit next to her in class.  ,  be helpful.  listen to her problems.  comfort her when she is sad.  stare at her.  flirt with her.  don't flirt with other girls.  invite her over.  chat with her online.  remember her birthday.  give her a phone call.  tell her how you feel (if you're gutsy enough). 

 Ask a friend that she is not entirely unknown to her, to ask her if "she" likes you. Like, "Do you like (this person) ? I was just thinking that the way you look at him. And the way you smile at him. That you've been hitting on him." , Your relationship with your crush may feel awkward and tight after she discovers your feelings for her. Not only may she avoid you, but she may also refuse to talk to you for a while. However, know that it is not necessarily you she doesn't want to see, but she may be only trying to ignore the awkward feelings in order to prevent herself from making stupid mistakes. If you don't believe in yourself and have confidence that you'll get through this with her, it makes the situation harder to solve, and you may not have enough courage to rescue your relationship with her.  Although things may not feel the same, act as if they are. It will cause her to relax and slowly let her guard down because she'll know that you're still the same person she is friends with, even though she now knows you have feelings for her. You may need to crack a few more jokes than usual in order to get her laughing, but making her feel comfortable with you should be your top priority right now.   It may be hard to act as if the awkwardness doesn't exist, but after a while, it won't exist at all if you try hard enough. However, avoid going overboard and acting fake. A fake smile and stiff words will take you nowhere, and it may worsen the situation.       Make no mention of your feelings for her. Although you may be curious, don't ask her how she feels about you. At this point, she may feel very confused, insecure, and uncomfortable. You don't want her to start avoiding you because this could lead to the death of your relationship with her. Keep romance out of your conversations and interactions with her. While the temptation to flirt with her remains, resist it at least until she settles down and is relaxed with you once more.  Despite the circumstances and how insecure you both may feel, act happy and go about your life normally. Happiness and smiles tend to be contagious, and you may be able to smooth out your relationship with her even faster if you have a joyful, bright attitude that makes her smile and laugh. However, avoid going overboard and acting extremely crazy. Unless if she is used to your insane behavior, you should refrain from this behavior at this point because you might unintentionally scare her off.  This will show that you have an interest in the conversation and what she is saying. Also, it will make her feel comfortable because she has the assurance that someone is listening to her. However, avoid staring at her or she might feel uncomfortable, but remember not to look bored or look away too often. Find a healthy amount of eye contact in order to benefit both you and her.  Although you have the option of sitting directly next to her, you may also choose to occupy the seat behind her or in front of her. Don't feel limited when it comes to your seating options. While you may believe that sitting next to her is the only way to get her attention, remember that sitting behind her and in front of her hold their own advantages as well. Use your seat near her as an opportunity to talk to her and work together with her. However, be familiar with the appropriate times to speak in order to avoid getting her in trouble.   One way to get her attention is to immediately take the blame if the teacher catches both of you talking. Not only will she feel grateful towards you, but she'll also think of you as a kind person, especially if you already are kind towards her. However, avoid treating her as if she is helpless because she'll only feel annoyed.       If you sit near her, you'll have the chance to ask her to work with her on group projects and assignments. However, avoid asking her too frequently in order to give her the chance to work with her friends and other students she may want to interact with.  Even if she rejects your offer, know that the thought counts. Try again another time when she seems in a good mood. Having a good relationship with her can increase your chances of being accepted. If she constantly rejects your offer, know when to stop asking her. This shows that she may not be interested in you. Stop before she has to ask you to stop.  It helps if you perform better in those classes than her, but remember not to act as if you are better than her or know more than her. Although one of the two may be true, you should never make her feel bad about herself. You want to make her feel good about herself when she is around you. Then, she'll want to be with you more often.   Only offer to tutor her if she asks you or complains about the poor grades she is receiving in the class. Depending on the type of person she is, she may take your kind offer as an insult, and she may refuse to speak to you afterwards.       If she accepts your offer to study with her/tutor her, make your times with her comfortable and memorable. Treat her as if she was a good friend. Avoid staring at her or inserting romance and flirting into your interactions with her. You'll make her feel uncomfortable, and she may not want to study with you.  She may feel surprised at first if you treat her like a good friend, but she'll eventually get used to it and enjoy it. Use this method to become good friends with her quickly.  You may have to start most of the conversations at first, but once she gets used to talking to you every day, she'll eventually start the conversations without you having to approach her first. However, if she is shy, she may enjoy talking to you, but she may not have enough courage to approach you. Know that it is not you she is avoiding, but she may be too shy.   During these conversations, subtly read her body language. Note how comfortable she feels and the physical contact she makes with you (ex: touching your arm or shoulder while laughing at your jokes). Run her words through your mind and search for any hints of her feelings for you.       Remember to have a healthy amount of eye contact with her. End the conversation before it turns into an awkward silence. While you don't want to abruptly end it at the wrong time, make sure you finish it in a polite manner when it is still good. Although you may not want to end it, it's best that you may her look forward to the future conversations since they all end on a good note. It may take a few conversations and some practice before you know when to perfectly end it, but keep persisting till you understand.  Have a good excuse when you end it so that suspicion and hurt feelings don't rise within her when you leave. Always end it in a friendly manner while showing you enjoyed talking to her and would like to have another conversation with her (ex: "It was nice talking to you, but I have to finish my chores now" or "Let's continue this conversation another time. I don't want to be late for class!").  This step should be performed only when you two have gotten to know each other well enough. Invite your friends to the movies along with her, but make sure she is not the only girl in order to avoid making her feel uncomfortable or insecure. Select a movie you know she would enjoy or ask her to choose one. Before the movie starts, purchase a separate drink for her if you wish - do not share a drink with her - and a bag of popcorn for you both to share. If you offer to share the popcorn with her before the movie starts, the chances of you being able to sit next to her increase. During the movie, make sure you occupy the seat next to her. One way to ensure that the seat is yours is to follow her behind. That way, you'll know where she is sitting, and you'll be close enough to immediately sit down next to her.   Avoid selecting romantic movies because it may lead to her to remember that you like her, and she may feel extremely uncomfortable. Select a comedy or an action movie to get you all laughing.       Act like a gentleman. This includes opening the doors for her and allowing her to go ahead of you. However, avoid acting as if she is helpless because this will only annoy her and make her feel bad about herself. Your conversations with her afterwards can consist of the movie and whether she enjoyed it or not. Afterwards, invite her to other group outings, but make sure they don't occur too frequently in order to give her the opportunity to attend other outings she would like to go to. If you play sports, invite her to your games, even if you know she doesn't enjoy watching sports. She may appear at your games just to support you if she has feelings for you.  However, make sure your gifts for her are not sappy or romantic. They should be the type of gifts that make her smile and enjoy them. An example would be to purchase her the CD album she has always wanted.   If you want to give her a gift on Valentine's Day, make sure your gift isn't romantic. Avoid going to elaborate lengths and making her feel uncomfortable. Instead, purchase an object as simple as a cute teddy bear.  Not only is this sweet, but this will make her feel more comfortable. She will have enough time to respond as she pleases, and she'll also have more time to sort through her thoughts and feelings. She may be able to come up with an answer that is better than the answer she may give you if you ask her right on the spot. She'll be able to think logically and ask for needed advice, and the choice that she makes will be much wiser and healthy for both of you, depending on her personality.   Add a small spritz of your cologne onto the letter so that it leaves a faint, pleasant smell. This will instantly make her think of you, and it'll be harder for her to get you out of her mind.       Avoid adding too much cologne so that it creates an overwhelmingly powerful smell. Annoyance may prickle her, and she may dislike you.  This requires a lot of courage and bravery, which will make her think twice before answering you. She might feel impressed if you yourself approach her, and she won't think of you as a coward. However, make sure you ask about her feelings for you in an area where she feels comfortable, but make sure no one is listening to your conversation.  because it is less intimate, and she may think of you as a coward since you have a screen to hide yourself behind.  Not only will you appear as a coward, but she'll also feel more intimidated because your friend might tell others about her answer. Pressure may influence her into making a bad choice or sharing her true feelings for her. This may lead her to come up with a lie or a sharp answer to discourage you from pursuing her.  Not only will she be unaware of who her secret admirer is, but she'll also be uncertain of who to reply to. Leaving yourself as anonymous tends to be cowardly, and it can make her feel annoyed. She may end up trashing the letter or leaving no response because she won't know who sent the letter or how to answer.   If you send her another letter in the future and sign it, she may connect the dots and instantly know it was you who wrote the anonymous letter. She may dislike you because of your cowardly move, and you will not leave a good impression upon her.        

make sure that she likes you too.  have confidence in yourself.  act normally.  allow happiness into your life.  make plenty of eye contact when talking to her.  sit near her in class.  offer to tutor her or study with her, especially if you are aware of certain classes that she isn't doing too well in.  engage her in daily conversations that rotate around a variety of interesting topics she enjoys to talk about.  invite her to group outings.  purchase gifts for her only on special occasions, such as christmas or her birthday.  write a letter to her.  approach her and ask her.  don't ask her about her feelings for you over text, email, internet, etc.  don't send a friend to ask her about her feelings for you.  don't leave your letter to her unsigned. 

 If you want to make contact with a girl you like, first try and relax your body. You want to make sure you don't communicate nervousness or defensiveness, as this may put a girl on edge. Try to stay calm going into the conversation.If you're nervous, you may lean forward and dip your chin down slightly. This can make you look aggressive. Try to be aware of your posture. Make sure your chin is straight and level. Keep your hands and arms loose at your side, or put your hands in your pocket. This will help make you look relaxed and nonchalant. This will make you look approachable.; , Another good way to initiate contact is eye contact. Eye contact can help convey interest and allow you to initiate a conversation. If you're interested in getting to know a girl from your class, try starting off with eye contact. Try to catch a girl's eye and hold her gaze for a few moments before looking away.However, be careful not to stare. This can come off as creepy. Try to make and hold hold eye contact briefly. If a girl is not returning your eye contact after a few seconds, look away and try again. You do not want it to look like you're staring.  A calm and friendly smile is a great way to grab someone's attention. Once you've made eye contact, try smiling. Try to think about something that genuinely makes you happy when you're smiling. You want your smile to look real and genuine, as a fake smile can easily give you away., Once you've gotten a girl's attention, you should make an effort to make conversation. It can be stressful to make conversation with someone you don't know, but with a quick observation or introduction you should be able to start a conversation.Start by introducing yourself. You can simply say something like, "Hi, I'm Paul." It may feel a little awkward, but if this is someone you see in class a lot, it's perfectly acceptable to introduce yourself. Try to open with an observation. When you're in school, there's a lot to observe and comment on. You could talk about the upcoming test or make an observation about what happened in class today. Try to give the girl the opportunity to share by posing an observation as a question. For example, don't just say, "Wow, that was a crazy test last week." Instead, say, "Wow, that was a crazy test last week, right?" This invites the girl to share her opinion as well.  During the average school day, it may be hard to stop and make conversation with a girl. However, if you join some extracurriculars, you may find it's easier to find people with common interests. Extracurriculars also provide you with the opportunity to socialize and make friends. This can help you meet girls.Find an after school club that caters to your interests and includes members of both genders. You're unlikely to meet girls on a boy's sports team. However, something like the school newspaper may help. The advantage of meeting people through a club is that you'll automatically have something in common. If you sometimes struggle to make conversation, you'll have something to discuss right away.  One of the easiest ways to establish a connection to someone else is through another person. It's easier to feel close and relaxed around someone if you meet in a casual social setting. If you have any friends who are close to girls in your school, mention you would like to try to meet some girls. See if that friend can invite you to parties and events where his female friends will be present., In order to get to know someone, you need to share your thoughts and feelings with that person. Long talks in which you communicate openly are what foster the closeness that forms a friendship, and possibly a romantic relationship down the road.It may take time to get to the place where you're sharing feelings with a girl in your school, so be patient. You may have to spend some time socializing with her outside of school or at an after school club before the two of you feel close enough to open up to one another. Be patient and let things happen organically. You cannot force intimacy. As you get to know someone, you'll find you begin sharing things naturally as you feel more comfortable with one another. The girl may mention her family, share her opinion on a social issue, or tell you how she's feeling on a given day. Try to listen genuinely to what she says, and share your own emotions in turn.  Social media can be a great way to get to know someone, especially if you tend to be shy. Many people meet in real life, and then strengthen that existing bond on social media. Once you've gotten to know girls in your school a little, add them on Facebook, Twitter, and other social media outlets. You can comment on a girl's Facebook post and talk to her through the messenger feature. Many people feel more relaxed talking online, and if you've established a bond online it may make face-to-face communication feel easier.   Keep in mind, however, not to overdo it. If you pester a girl too much on social media, she may get annoyed. Do not, for example, like all her statuses, or comment on all her posts. Use discretion.  Asking questions is a great way to promote the flow of a conversation. They help the conversation move forward and show that you're genuinely interested in what the speaker has to say. When talking to girls in your school, ask a lot of questions to get to know them better.Ask general questions to start a conversation. For example, you can ask something like, "How was your day?" or "How did you do on that last test?" As the conversation continues, ask questions about the topic at hand. For example, if the girl mentions her family is getting a new puppy, don't just say, "Oh, that's cool." Instead, ask about this. Say something like, "What breed? Are you getting him from the shelter or a breeder?"  , After you've talked to a girl a bit, and know her somewhat, try inviting her to hang out. You can invite her to hang out in a group with you and your friends. However, you can also ask her to hang out with you one-on-one.   If you want to go on a date, ask the girl to go somewhere with just you that feels date-like. You could ask her to go see a movie, to get dinner, or to grab coffee. You can also invite a girl to a social outing with your friends. This can be a great way to get to know a girl as a friend. You can also expand your friend's group by introducing a new member.  It can be hard to get to know people if you're shy. If social situations make you nervous, there are ways you can overcome shyness. It may sound strange, but rehearsing what you want to say ahead of time may actually help.If you have to talk to a girl on the phone, or you know you'll see her in class, try writing down what you want to say. Obviously, you cannot plan out a whole conversation, but try jotting down what you want to talk about. Try to rehearse these words out loud, in front of a mirror. When you end up talking to the girl, the conversation may not play out exactly as you planned. However, you may be less nervous as you have some kind of a plan.  It can also help to write down conversation starters. If you're going on a date, or getting together with the girl socially, conversation starters can be particularly helpful. Jot down things you could use to start conversations, such as observations ("I can't believe it's still snowing in March!), complements ("That's a great jacket on you!"), and questions ("Do you know what time the assembly is today?"). It may sound silly, but many people choke in the moment and fail to start a conversation. Having a plan can help., For many, shyness can be very difficult to overcome. It can help to talk out your issues with shyness with friends and family members. They may offer support, advice, and insight on how to cope with shyness.Choose people you feel will listen without judgment. Put-downs and lectures are unlikely to be helpful, so don't talk to people who like to give unsolicited advice. Select people who will listen and try to understand without trying to dismiss your shyness.  Talking to girls in your school can be very intimidating. Many high school students are shy around girls. It may help to practice socializing in other places. Make conversation with boys in your class, make small talk with a clerk at the drugstore, call a family member who lives far away. Practice socializing in situations where you're less likely to feel nervous. This can help you relax more when talking to a girl. 

relax your body.  make eye contact.  smile.  start a simple conversation.  join extracurricular activities.  meet girls through others.  share your thoughts and feelings.  talk on social media.  ask questions.  invite a girl to hang out.  rehearse what you want to say.  write down conversation starters.  discuss your fears with friends and family.  practice socializing. 

 Eating ice cream and binge-watching some television show on Netflix isn't just for girls who get dumped. If you want to be bummed and slop around the house for a while, do it. No shame. It's a necessary phase, sometimes.   Don't let it go on for too long, or it just becomes whiny and depressing. Good rule of thumb? Let yourself grieve one day for each month you were together. If it takes longer, it takes longer, but let yourself get over her.; , Whether you've been dumped or broke it off mutually, stop talking with the girl. If you're stuck on someone, maintaining your distance is the key. Stop texting with her. Stop calling her. Stop talking to her on G-Chat. Just stop all forms of communication.   If you have to see this girl, in school or elsewhere, keep it cool. Make your interactions professional and brief. If she keeps bothering you, say something like, "I don't have anything to say to you." Unfriend her or block her posts on social networking sites. There's nothing to be gained from constantly checking your ex's page to see who she's been talking to. That's only going to make it worse.  That jersey your girlfriend gave you? Get rid of it. The cute cards and notes she sent you? In the trash. There's little value in surrounding yourself with things that remind you of this person who hurt you.   If you really like something that reminds you of your girlfriend, or you just don't want to get rid of it entirely, it's still a good idea to box it up and put it somewhere you can't see it. Give it to a friend to take, or shove it into a closet where you can't see it.  Often, guys have a hard time talking about their feelings, especially with their male friends. If most of your conversations revolve around sports, music, or some other hobby, it's still good to just talk. Get together and talk about something to distract yourself, and bring up how you're feeling if it comes up.   Consider talking to your dad about it. While he might seem like a gruff dinosaur, he's also probably been there. Open up a little. It's also fine, and maybe even better, to talk to female friends, if you need to. Talk to a sister, cousin, or a close friend who you can lean on. Get advice, or just vent.  Sit down with a piece of paper and a pencil, and write about how you're feeling. Nobody needs to read it, and you don't even need to look at it when you're done. But if you're struggling to deal with your emotions, and you can't stop thinking about someone, try to write it out, then tear it up when you're finished. Just vent, then burn the evidence.   Write her name at the top of the paper, and address the letter to her if it helps you focus your attention. Tell her exactly what you wish you could. Then, of course, get rid of it.  Every breakup is like a coin. On the one side, there's loss and sadness and all the bad stuff. Yeah, you're alone. Yeah, you got dumped. On the other? You're free. Even if you were happy in the relationship, there's a lot to be said for being single, and having options.   Kick up your heels a little, when it feels right. Sometimes, going out for a dumb night with the boys is called for. You don't have to ask permission. try to think of something that you wouldn't have been allowed to do in your relationship. Blasting AC/DC at 9 am while you eat ribs for breakfast and watch MMA? Do it. Be responsible, even if you're hurting. A break-up isn't an excuse to abuse alcohol, tobacco, or drugs.  If all you're doing is padding around your room and moping, it's no wonder that you're stuck on some girl. Get out of the house and start doing things. Find something to occupy your time, so this girl won't. Skip to the last section for tips on distracting yourself and getting busy.  

let yourself be sad, but only for a while.  stop communicating with her.  get rid of any mementos from your relationship.  talk to your friends about how you're feeling.  write it out.  celebrate your freedom.  get busy. 

 Weigh your options and decide if you really want to pursue this girl. Going after a girl with a boyfriend is frowned upon, but it happens. Make sure you actually like this girl and not the idea of her. Sometimes the unattainable can spark desires, but before you do anything be sure you like her. Be honest with your feelings.; , Look her up on social media websites like Facebook or Twitter. See if you share interests. Imagine if you can really picture yourself with this person. Talk to someone who knows her. If you're unsure if she has a boyfriend, ask someone who knows her better than you do.   Don't stalk this girl in real life. It's only acceptable to look into her internet presence.  You'll need to be realistic with your wishes. Are you in her social circle? If she's always hanging out and making eyes at the football captain and you're kind of a gamer/bookish dude (or vice versa). It's just not going to happen regardless of what magazine articles, TV shows, or movies may want you to believe. You've got to be at least on her radar., This process could take years. Nobody knows how long a couple will stay together. The only ones who do know are the people dating, and usually, if they're young, they have no idea.  Throughout your pursuit don't limit yourself to only this girl. There is a high chance that she will stay with her partner. It is not healthy to hold onto the idea of someone without giving anyone else a shot.  Whenever you begin strong feelings towards a girl, you'll typically develop more energy than usual. Try to use this energy as a creative force. Write songs or poems. Draw or paint whatever is in your head. This will also give you something to show off when you're ready to reveal this to your crush.  Once you understand what type of friend clique she is in, you should have an idea of the type of style she likes. Don't go overboard with changing your appearances. You need to put effort into your appearance but not too much effort.  Don't change for a girl. Plenty of guys do this and it's not a terrible reason to change, but you shouldn't do it. Try focus on the qualities you think she would like about you. Accentuate these attributes about yourself., Younger girls typically like guys who are older and taller than them. Being in shape and having a good sense of humor are also positive traits for attracting a girl. Weigh your chances of this girl being attracted to you., When you start to develop a crush on someone forbidden, you should stay physically active. There is a chance of you becoming depressed and anxious at home. Staying active will help curb these feelings and keep your feelings in reality., If you see her around, make sure you say hi, even if you're with your friends or parents. If you've never talked before this could be weird for her. If you feel uncomfortable speaking to her, smile at her in passing., This should be a slow process. The goal is to try to truly make friends with the people your crush is friends with. Fake friends are no good. Go for the people you wouldn't mind hanging out with.   Careful making friends with her girl friends. They could get the wrong idea and develop feelings for your. This could also spark an interest from the girl you like. Gauge the situation.  Once she notices you and you actually have similar friends, you should talk to her. Don't flirt with her when you first start talking. Be genuine and try to be funny, but let it come out naturally. Talk about the things you know she likes. Share with her your opinions on whatever it is she cares about.Getting into a serious conversation about your interests is good, and should create an impression.  Add her on Facebook and Twitter after you've already had a conversation about something. Now she'll be faced, at home, with the thought of you. Like one of her recent status' or a profile picture to show that you've took time to look at her page.  Start to hang out with her outside of school or college. Invite her and her friends to join you and your friends. Make it a group oriented affair at first. Don't ask her to hang out alone or she may feel uncomfortable.  It helps if there is an event that you are both going to. Be as casual as possible, and don't make it seem like you are desperate. Be smooth and try to appear innocent.  Slowly but surely, start to talk with her, a little more each day. Try to talk as much as you can without being overbearing. A little communication will deepen the friendship, and potentially open more feelings to develop., Find out from her if she is happy with the way things are going in her relationship. Talk about the actual relationship with her and not just about her boyfriend. She might appreciate the chance to talk about things. This will also drop a hint to her that you are interested.  Don't be crude when you talk about another person. You're introducing thoughts about being attracted to girls. This is obvious, but if you talk about girls who are a similar type as her, she might pay attention.If she is slightly interested, she might become a little jealous by this. This can seem like a counter productive technique, but you're simply trying to add more attention to yourself.  Just don't make it obvious! Eye contact is a powerful agent in attraction. When appropriate try to touch her shoulder in order to get her attention. She could become very uncomfortable by this. Gauge her response and don't over do it.  This can be a tough move to make, or it could feel like the most natural one. Once you've laid the ground work for the big move, you need to talk to her. Be honest with both yourself and especially to her. Pick a time when you are both alone. Let her know that she doesn't have to do anything she doesn't want to do.   Tell her that you still want to be friends no matter what she decides. Even if she isn't ready to be with you now, she could come around if you're available.  If all her friends start acting cold towards you, you're probably not welcome to hang out anymore. Gauge the situation based on her body language and what she tells you. Most people are flattered to learn someone likes them. Other people can become creeped out by this, especially if they're in a committed relationship., Going for a girl who is "taken" can be controversial, but if you think she might like you, too, it's OK to try. After all, she's free to choose what she wants to do, even if right now she has a boyfriend. Think about interactions you've had with her. Did she give you reason to think she's romantically interested? If so, as they say, "all's fair in love and war."   However, make sure you aren't interpreting friendliness as romantic interest. Just because she's nice to you doesn't mean she wants to break up with her boyfriend for you. You should also consider your relationship with her boyfriend. If you're friends with him, you might want to consider his girlfriend off-limits, out of respect.  Maybe she's not in an exclusive relationship with her boyfriend. Lots of people date more than one person at once, so this could be an option she's open to. It's still good to make sure she's interested in you, though, before you go too far. Even if she's open to dating around, she may not see you that way.  Girls don't particularly like to be asked out after they've turned someone down - especially if they already have a boyfriend. Even flirting constantly could annoy her. If she seems happy with her boyfriend, let her stay that way. The best you can hope for is becoming her friend.  

decide what you want.  research your crush.  evaluate your chances.  be patient.  keep your options open.  focus on your passion.  dress nicely.  be yourself.  check your attributes.  stay active.  acknowledge her presence.  join her friend group.  talk to her.  friend her on social websites.  spend time together.  exchange numbers.  communicate with her.  talk to her about her relationship.  talk about girls around her.  flirt with her.  tell her your feelings.  respect her choice.  try it if you think she likes you back.  try it if she's open to dating other people.  don't take it too far if she doesn't seem interested. 

 If you can't stop thinking about a girl, but are too afraid to actually do anything about it, you should do something about it. Pining for someone who doesn't know you exist is way worse than getting turned down. At least you'll know, and then you can move on.   Don't make it complicated, or over-think it. Don't use any lines. Just walk up to this girl you've been thinking about a lot and introduce yourself. Say, "Hey, I know this might seem kind of random, but I've just always noticed you. You seem really sweet, and I like you a lot. Would you like to hang out sometime?" Read this article to learn more about talking to girls.  If you've got a major crush on someone that you can't be with, that can be a tough situation. Maybe it's a friend who is already seeing someone, or a girl who doesn't even know you exist. Whatever the case, it's always a good idea to form new and different relationships with friends, and try to find the group you feel most comfortable around.   Try to find some girls that you enjoy hanging out with, but aren't necessarily attracted to. Often, younger people will only focus on looks. Consider just getting to know some girls as friends and hanging out instead. You'll learn a lot. Hang out with a variety of different people. Make some artsy friends. Make some sporty friends. Make some friends from all sorts of different families.  Some people can get totally focused on what someone else thinks. But it's important, especially when you're young, to really focus on forming your own identity, and working on yourself. Pursue your fun hobbies, doing things that you enjoy. Throw yourself into your school work. Hang out with your friends. There's nothing wrong with just enjoying your life as it is.   There's plenty of time for dating. If you're pretty young, don't worry about these youth romances. It'll get better.  When you're young, a lot of guys will focus on the "popular" girls. If you're stuck on some girl because she's very social, or very pretty, or all the other guys like her, that's pretty normal. But, it's also usually not real. It's better to find people that you actually have something in common with, and enjoy being around. That's not always the super-attractive cheerleader type.   try to focus less on superficial things and more on making a genuine connection with someone. Open yourself up to people and be friends first.  When you're young and fixed on young love, it can seem like you'll never find anyone as perfect as this girl you're crushing on. It can seem like you'll be alone forever, even if you're just a teenager. But it's really hard to know what you want when you're young.   Remember how into that toy you were obsessed with when you were like 7? How do you feel about it now? That's usually how you'll feel about crushes and young relationships when you get older.  The single best way to move on from a crush that hasn't worked out is to turn your attentions elsewhere. Who else has got your eye? Who else seems like an interesting, attractive, and engaging person in your world?   Crushes are fun and all, but it's also good to look inward. Focus on having fun with your friends and spending time with your family. There's plenty of time for romance.  

take a shot.  make new and different friends.  work on yourself for a while.  change up your priorities.  don't worry about finding "the one.",  find someone else to crush on. 

 An excellent way to get both your mind and body under control is to start using your body in positive ways. If you're feeling stuck and down because of a girl, head to the gym, the track, or the basketball court. Get moving, and work out your frustrations and your sadness by getting in shape.   If you like sports, get together with some other people and play. Play touch football, basketball, or some other sport you enjoy playing. Turn all that energy into competing. If you don't like sports, find a cardio-strength training routine that you can do by yourself. Pick about 10 basic exercises that you can repeat in brief circuits to get yourself moving. Many studies report that exercise helps to reduce the risk and the symptoms of clinical depression.Aside from the obvious cardiovascular health benefits, exercise is proven to make you feel better.  Whatever you do, do more of it. If you have a job, start taking on extra responsibilities, spending extra hours on the job, and working hard at being the best worker there. If you're in school, throw yourself into your readings and your assignments. Distract yourself by bettering yourself with activity.   Alternatively, it might be good to take some time off. If you're struggling to concentrate and take things seriously, try taking a week off. Call in sick. Go camping for the weekend and get away from you responsibilities.  Use the opportunity to socialize more. Hang out with new friends, old friends, and your family. Hit up a new movie, a new dance club, a new bar. Go to shows, go on hikes, go out. Do anything that gets you out of your house and keeps you from moping around.   Try to be with other people as much as you can. It's cool to go out by yourself, but it's also a goo idea to hang out with other people, who'll be able to talk with you and take your mind off things. Try meeting people, if and when you feel ready. Give yourself the challenge of chatting up a stranger you're attracted to. It's a good exercise.  If you've shared an apartment or house with a girl, it can be really hard to stay there. Seeing the same coffee shops, restaurants, and neighborhood spots where you always spent time together can just be annoying. Find a new place, if you can. Explore a new neighborhood on the other side of town.   In some cases, it's a good idea to split up different hangouts. Give your ex one coffee shop, but take another. Make a rule the other can't go there.  If you're struggling to stop thinking about a girl, give yourself something new to think about and get obsessed with. There are all kinds of things that are better uses of your time than pining over a girl. wikiHow's a great resource for it as well:   Play Guitar Mountain Bike Make Art Appreciate Death Metal Make a Model Ship Collect Coins  

start exercising.  distract yourself with work.  go out more.  consider moving, or making some other big change.  pick up a new hobby. 

; , Don't stare at her for a long time, but if she likes you, she would be happy if you noticed her. If you look at her, and she looks back at you, smile.  If you are going to sit down, sit next to her. If you are standing in a room, walk over to her and say, "Hi, (insert name)!"  , If you are standing outside a classroom waiting to enter, go up to her and say hello, or hi. Ask her out, and then ask her for her phone number (But only if she looks like she is able to get out a piece of paper and write down her number.) If she likes you, she would probably say yes.  However, make sure its just the two of you, because if she's with a group of friends and she says no, you'll be humiliated. , Talk to her but not for too long. If she is in a group of friends, never shake her hand first or talk to her first. Talk to the group and go around. Make the whole group laugh. Have a friend with you so he distracts the group while you talk to the girl you like. Don't talk for too long.  When you leave say it was a pleasure talking to her, and then leave. As you are walking away, look back to see if she is staring at you. If she is, smile with a little smile, and turn around and keep going.  

make sure she actually does like you.  look at her sometimes.  sit next to her.  ask her out.  plain and simple, tell her, get right to the point.  make eye contact, it shows confidence.  ,  never ask her out right away.  talk for about 2 minutes to her, make it short and interesting, keep eye contact, then you say you have to get going. 

 A girl may not be interested in you if you seem insecure or lacking in self-confidence. Women are more likely to be interested in confident men, so it is important that you show her how confident you are. There are lots of different ways that you can project your confidence, but some of the most effective ones include:Make eye contact. Making direct eye contact is a great way to show a girl that you are interested and also project an air of confidence. Take up space. Taking up space projects your confidence as well, so walk around and stand tall. Joke around with your male friends. Demonstrating that you are social by laughing and joking with your male friends is another way to show her that you are confident.; , Strike up a conversation with her and show her what a great guy you are.Research has shown that you can increase someone’s interpretation of your physical attractiveness if you have a great personality. But if you never talk to her, she may never get to see how great of a guy you are.Try asking a favor to break the ice. Ask her if she can pass you a napkin or ask if she will watch your stuff for a minute while you run to the restroom. Try asking a question. Ask if she is enjoying her meal or ask how she usually takes her coffee. Try making a statement. Say, “I love this restaurant!” or “It’s a beautiful day today!”, Everyone has something that makes them special and some people may find these talents or resources attractive. Figure out what you have to offer as a special talent or resource that she may appreciate and then, look for an opportunity to show her this talent or resource. Just make sure that you find a genuine opportunity to show her this side of yourself. Avoid showing off or concocting an unrealistic situation to show her.For example, if you play in a band, invite her to one of your shows. Or, if you are bilingual, find an opportunity to use your second language it in front of her. Or, if you collect movie posters and you know that she is a movie buff too, mention your collection during a conversation and invite her to come and see it.  

demonstrate your confidence.  talk to her.  show her what makes you special. 

 Taking good care of yourself is essential for your overall well being. As an added bonus, she may be attracted to you more if she sees that you are a healthy person. Make sure that you are taking care of your basic needs, such as diet, exercise, and sleep, before you go looking for love. If you are not in good health, take some time to improve your situation before you try to get this girl to notice you.Improve your eating habits, such as by reducing fat and sugar, or eating more fruits and vegetables. Incorporate 30 minutes of moderate physical activity into your daily routine. Sleep for about 8 hours every night. Try meditation, yoga, or deep breathing exercises to help you relax.  In addition to tending to your health, you should also be giving plenty of attention to your looks. Looking your best whenever you run into this girl will make it more likely that she will take notice. Try to make grooming and dressing well a part of your daily routine.Shower and shave or groom your facial hair every day. Get a haircut if you have not had one lately. Buy yourself some new clothes. Wear nice smelling cologne and deodorant.  By keeping busy and active in your own life, you will show this girl that you are independent and that you have a great life. It will also prevent you from becoming too focused on her, which can be unhealthy. Keep your commitments and make plans with your friends often. If the girl asks to see you, be honest about your schedule and don’t cancel plans just to spend time with her., A girl may be more likely to find you desirable if she has to work for your affection. That does not mean that you need to start ignoring the girl you like, but she may take more interest in you if you also seem a bit uninterested. For example, you could greet her the same way that you greet the rest of your friends and avoid giving her any special treatment or compliments. 

take good care of your health.  make sure you are always well dressed and well groomed.  live your life.  play hard to get. 

 When you are first getting to know a girl, it is important to avoid sharing too much about yourself too soon. Sharing too much about yourself too soon can be overwhelming for a girl and also makes you seem less mysterious. Keep some of the mystery alive by withholding certain details until you get to know each other better.For example, you should avoid discussing topics like your ex, family conflicts, or your personal finances. Instead, focus on questions that help you get to know her better. Ask her about her likes and dislikes, her friends and family, her interests, etc.  Research has shown that prolonged eye contact can increase feelings of attraction between two people.If you are trying to win her over, try looking into her eyes with a penetrating gaze. Just keep in mind that she may break the gaze if she is not interested. If she is interested, she will most likely give you some encouraging looks and smiles, even if she takes her eyes away from yours now and then.   If a long gaze does not seem appropriate yet or you are just too nervous to hold a long gaze, try giving her frequent, quick glances., Mirroring her body position can show a girl that you are interested and provide opportunities for her to do the same. You might already be doing this without noticing it. But if not, make a conscious effort to start mirroring her body position. For example, if a girl is leaning in towards you with one arm on the table, you can lean in with the opposite arm so that you look like a mirror image of her., Smiling is an easy way to show a girl that you are interested in her and give her a chance to give you a smile in return. Smiling may also make you seem more attractive to the girl, which may work in your favor as well.Try to keep your smile as natural and relaxed as possible. Don’t force it or smile in a way that is unusual for you.  As you flirt and do other things to impress a girl, watch for signs that she is interested in you. If she is smiling, making eye contact, and mirroring your body position, then this might be a good sign. Other positive signs include touching her hair, adjusting her clothes, raising and lowering her eyebrows, or giving you a casual touch on the arm., Sometimes two people are just not meant to be together. If a girl does not show interest after you have done your best to get her attention, move on. She may never change her mind about you and, if you keep chasing her, you may miss your opportunity to meet someone else who really does like you.  

take it slow.  gaze into her eyes.  mirror her body position.  smile at her.  watch for signs of interest.  know when to move on. 

 Inspire a girl’s confidence in you by giving her your complete attention during a conversation. Make direct eye contact, nod and react while she is talking, and repeat things back to her to convey that you are listening. This will work to make you look charismatic and empathetic to her.For example, if she is telling you about her current project at work, interject with positive comments like, "I can imagine that involves a lot of commitment!" or "It sounds like you have great time management skills!"; , Women respond to humour and appreciate people who can make them laugh. Laughter may also reduce shyness or defensiveness and make her feel comfortable with you. Tell a joke, do an impression, or share a funny anecdote about yourself to make her feel happy and at ease., Bring up your skills and hobbies in a tactful way to impress her without seeming arrogant. Wait for the conversation to lead there naturally, or ask her about her interests or hidden talents to set up the topic. Interesting talents or pastimes will make you seem more intriguing and dynamic."For instance, talk about your surfing skills by saying something like, "It's a fun and challenging activity. I've been devoting a lot of time and practice to getting better at it."  , Create a rapport by looking for connections between the two of you. Shared interests, hobbies, or experiences can forge a bond between people. Ask questions until she reveals an aspect of life that you share, then highlight that mutual connection.For instance, if she mentions a love of zombie movies, express your appreciation for the genre by telling her your own favorite films.  

give her your full attention.  make her laugh.  talk about your skills without boasting.  establish connections with her. 

 Unless she's too full of herself, she's not aware that you think she's special because normally, women aren't scanning to see who wants them. Don't approach women like a salesman trying to close a deal, but rather with the attitude of trying to be friendly and pass the time.; , If you feel nervous, imagine you two are locked in the room and there's nothing else to do... So talk! Always start with "hello, what is your name?" this is a good opening because it's honest. You want to know her name, so you asked. If she doesn't want to tell you her name or seems timid, then some light-hearted playful questioning will show her that there's nothing to fear "aren't you gonna ask me my name?" or "Nice name, is there a story behind it?" or "you look like a Stacey, don't you think?" the goofier and dumber you think you sound, the less timid she'll become around you.  All you're doing here is relating. She says something, you think about a similar experience and tell her about it. Keep it short and let her ask you about it if she wants to know more. EX: "I love music, I'm always going to concerts!" then you could say "never been to a concert, sounds fun though!" or "what kind of music do you like?" Again, keep it honest! you don't have to like what she likes or be into the same stuff.  Eventually, they begin to feel more like people instead of "girl" and once you can see them as people, it becomes easy to just say hi. Once you take the intimidation out of it, you can see more easily as to how she feels. Maybe what you once saw as a girl that's not interested, was actually too nervous to talk to you! Then you can say the things you'd want to hear to calm her nerves. On the other hand, she might be comfortable talking to you and enjoys the attention. Either way, there's no shame in wanting to get to know someone.  

try role-reversal.  speak clearly.  don't feel pressured because you aren't trying to make a point, you're not trying to impress anyone, and you're definitely not trying to write a book about her!,  if you feel nervous, then you need to talk to every girl you see whether or not you like her. 

 Look for physical cues that may indicate how she feels about you. Postures and motions may reflect what she is thinking and feeling, and provide insight into how you should act around her. Some possible body language cues may include:If she mirrors your movements, she is likely intrigued by you. If she plays with her hair, she is likely trying to get or keep your attention. If she dangles a shoe off her foot, it is a sign that she is comfortable with you. If she locks eyes with you for several consecutive seconds, it likely means that she wants the interaction to go further.  Ask her what she likes to do in her spare time, and if she has any regular hobbies. Hobbies can tell you a lot about a person’s creativity, social life, talents, and passions. To really get to know her, ask to join her for a class, excursion, or event to experience her favorite hobby firsthand.For instance, ask if you can join her for a bike ride or yoga class.  A person’s favorite music is closely linked to their personality, so knowing what she listens to may give you more insight into who she is. Ask her who her favorite bands or artists are, or look for any preferences she might have listed on her social media accounts. Use a digital streaming service to preview or download songs or albums that she likes and listen to them, on your own, or with her., Understanding someone's relationship with their loved ones can provide a great deal of insight into who they are. Inquire about her family and friends indirectly by asking who the most influential people in her life are. How she answers the question (i.e. who she mentions and how she talks about them) will tell you a great deal about her life. 

read her body language.  find out about her hobbies.  listen to her favorite music.  ask about her family and friends. 

 Looking cool and confident will definitely make a better impression than being nervous or jittery. Right before seeing her, do breathing exercises to settle your nerves. Breathe in through your nose, hold it for five counts, then exhale through your mouth for another count of five. Repeat this ten times to achieve the full effect!, To sound confident when talking to a girl, speak clearly and audibly. Make sure that you’re not speaking in a soft or muffled way by talking slightly louder than you instinctually would. Practice beforehand to get comfortable with the tone and volume., Being laid back is a great way to convey that you are comfortable in your own skin, which is bound to get her attention. Use your body language to convey it by leaning back and facing forward while speaking to her, demonstrating openness and a casual vibe. Avoid getting insulted or worked up in conversation, and avoid looking over-eager.For instance, instead of asking, “Do you like this restaurant? We can go somewhere else if you don’t”, say, “I really like this restaurant and thought it would be a great choice. Hope you like it too.”  , Choose clothing that makes you feel confident but also reflects your original style. To look put together, opt for a fitted or tailored outfit and avoid anything baggy, shapeless, or ill-fitting. Wear a color or pattern that you feel most attractive in, and add unique accessories to emphasize your unique personality.Wear fitted jeans and a sophisticated black blazer, and add a colorful bracelet or favorite scarf to accent the look.  

do breathing exercises to relax before seeing her.  speak with a confident voice.  present an easy-going attitude.  dress to impress. 

 Is she your friend, or are you total strangers? If it's the latter, try to strike up a conversation! The best way to start a conversation is to find common interests. If this girl is emo, then you can almost guarantee that her interests will be music related, like listening to, writing or composing lyrics, maybe even art related pass-times.   It's even better if she has band merchandises on or has lyrics written over her stuffs. Find out what bands she likes and talk to her about them. Ask about her favorite bands or those bands members, how they look, act, or sound and what she thinks on the topics.; , You might be able to suggest them to her. These can include anything from hardcore, post-hardcore, metal, metalcore, heavy metal, emo, punk rock, pop rock or even alternative.  Don't pretend to know things just because she's interested in them. , Be yourself and talk as yourself but remain quiet and try to be personal.  Don't make inappropriate gestures or try ridiculous schemes to gain her attention. Don't try to impress her with skills you do or don't posses, but instead try to be a friendly, warm person who she can relate to.  That means talking with her and also becoming friends with her friends and trying to be accepted into their friendship group. Try to talk to her about everything, not just music or school. Show her that her opinion matters and that you understand where she is coming from.However, if she tells you to stop talking to her, respect her wishes. ,   Go to a concert of a band you both like. It is a great experience that you can treasure but may be slightly expensive. Local Shows- Seeing a small band in your town is an even better idea because you can be close whilst still being around others. This experience is much more special and you can find other like-minded people at these events while helping home grown talent. Going To A Small CD Store- Not many of these exist anymore, so if you do have one near you utilize it! They are great places to get music advice from other people whilst being in a beautifully quaint location that is probably relatively unknown.    Go To a Park- Sometimes you don't want to go too far away and a local park is just what you want. Set up a cute picnic or watch a local team play. You can go for a walk. Bring down a ball to kick around or even better, an instrument and play her a song. Stay Home- And sometimes you don't want to leave the house. Try watching a scary movie or a horrible one. Cook. Try new recipes! Explore your tastes together. Craft. Artisan crafts make great bonding experiences.    Try to get her something she has wanted for a long time. Be careful with clothes though. Ask a friend of hers to go shopping with you so you can get her size. Or try to buy something else like a necklace or a hat  , 

establish how well you know the girl in question.  find some music in similar genres that you both like.  be yourself!,  don't pretend to be something you're not.  ,  don't talk too loud, fast, or without taking breaks.  be appropriate.  hang out with her a lot.  be friendly.  ,  attend music events.  hang out together.  buy her band merchandise.  make her something  try making a collage of photos of you and her or of the things she likes or both  personalize an item of clothing for her (draw on some sneakers)  make art  write her a song and perform it for her.  

 Catch the eye of the girl you like, whether you’re in class or at a social gathering outside of school. Try to hold her gaze for as long as possible, and remember to smile while doing so!   If you’re shy or nervous and find it difficult to hold eye contact, try just catching her eye for a short period of time before looking away. Or, look at the center of her forehead or nose for the same effect if that’s easier.Avoid getting caught looking too much and getting distracted in class by making eye contact just a couple times per class period.; , Try to smile at the girl you like as much as possible, whether you’re passing her by in the hall, catch her attention in class, or you get to talk to her. Let her know you’re friendly and interested in interacting her with just a simple smile whenever you look at her.   Smiles are contagious! Chances are that she’ll smile back at you if you smile first, so you’ve got nothing to lose!, Be clean and fresh whenever you get to see or talk to her. Shower frequently to wash your body and hair, brush your teeth, use mouthwash, and put on deodorant.   If you choose to wear cologne or a highly scented deodorant or body spray, note that less is more. You don’t want the girl you like to notice you because she’s revolted by an overwhelming smell of cologne.  Choose clean clothes without a lot of wrinkles to wear to school or other places where you’ll see the girl you like. You don’t need to be extra stylish, just wear something comfortable that’s not stained or torn and fits you well.   You might not know her well yet, but if you know she likes a certain band, book, or movie, try wearing a t-shirt that features it. She might even strike up a conversation with you about it!  , Before you even work up the courage to talk to the girl you like, you can project confidence in yourself that she will take notice of. Have good posture, with your head held held high and your shoulders back, make eye contact with people, and engage in what’s going on around you.   Confidence is very different from arrogance. Be confident by knowing that you are successful and a pleasant person to be around without acting like you are the best in the universe. To help you feel confident on the inside, which will show on the outside, make an effort to accept compliments when people give them to you. Instead of brushing off your friend’s compliment of your shoes or shirt by saying, “Yeah, whatever, man,” just say, “Thanks, dude.” Also try making a list every day of five things, large or small, that you did well., If you’re not quite ready to talk to her but still want her to notice you, try slipping a sweet or funny note into her locker, a school book, or someplace else she will find it.   You can leave your note or letter anonymous by signing it with a code name or word and tell her she has to figure out who it is through clues you give her in each letter. Stick with a simple joke or compliment in your letters if you don’t want to be too forward with your feelings right away.  Observe her to see what kinds of books she reads, music she listens to, or teams she follows. Try picking up a book by the same author or wearing a t-shirt with the band or team she likes when you’re around her, and she might just strike up a conversation about it.Even if she doesn’t start talking to you, she will likely notice if you’re wearing, reading, or looking at something she’s interested in, too. Smile if she looks over at you, or even say “Hey, how’s it going?” to start up a conversation. There’s no need to snoop or be overly observant to find out the things she likes. Just pay attention when you see her wearing, reading, or talking about something excitedly. Chances are you already like some of the same things, or would want to learn more about them.  Start up a conversation more easily by having a question in mind to ask her. You can start with “Hey, how are you?” or “Hey, how’s it going?” but you can also be more specific with something like, “Hey, did you catch what the homework was for English? I missed it,” or, “Hey, did I see you at last week’s basketball game?”   Don’t be disappointed if your question doesn’t lead to much of a conversation or if you blank out on what to say after the question you had in mind. Just smile and thank her for talking to you before walking away. She’ll remember that you were nice and went out of your way to talk to her.  If you strike up a conversation with her, ask her questions about her family, hobbies, school, movies, books, or sports and you are bound to find some things in common. Say, “I really like art too!” or “I have a big family as well; three older sisters and one younger brother.” She’ll remember these things, and take more notice of you in the future.   You can use subjects you find in common with her to strike up future conversations. For example, if you’re both into learning about bugs and insects, you could bring a book you found on the subject to school and tell her, “Hey, look, I found this book with really cool pictures of beetles. I thought you’d like since we had that conversation about how we both like bugs.” Remember to be honest and tell her true things about yourself. Avoid the temptation to tell small lies or say you like something just because she likes it. The truth will only come out and make you look bad later if she continues to talk to you and get to know you better.  Let the girl know that you’re smart and funny by sharing fun facts, participating with answers in class, and telling jokes. Share the things you’re knowledgeable about with her and tell her a new joke when you talk to her.   Never downplay your intelligence or “play dumb” to get the attention of the girl you like or to seem cooler around your friends. Avoid boasting about the things you know or trying too hard with silly jokes. Just make funny observations, engage in school, and don’t pretend to know a lot about something unless you really do!  , Give her your full attention and listen carefully when she talks to you to show her that you really care what she has to say. Use polite language like “please” and “thank you” when you’re asking her a question, and wish her a good night or weekend when you’re parting ways.   Kindness and respect can really make you stand out if other people she knows just try to tease her or end up being mean to get her attention. Everyone likes to be listened to and respected, and being mean is an immature way to get noticed. Remember things she says that you can bring up in later conversations. If she talks about a TV show she likes, you can start another conversation the next week saying, “Hey, did you see that there was a marathon of that show you like on TV yesterday?”  , Show you are more mature than other boys by not engaging in some of the things you might see other boys doing, like teasing or taunting girls to get their attention. Know that girls mature sooner than boys, so even if you’re in sixth grade too, a sixth grade girl may be going through changes that you don’t know about yet.Never tease a girl about her body or call her bad names that you hear on TV or from other boys. The girl will not respond well or like you at all if you do these things. Instead, use respectful and polite language with her, and give her compliments on aspects of her personality, like her sense of humor or her taste in music, rather than on her appearance. If you talk to her about how you like her or ask to go on a date or start a relationship and she says no, don’t get upset or mad. Respect her feelings and don’t bug her about it. Understand that she may not be ready for a relationship yet, could have mixed feelings about you, or just not have those feelings at all.Be friends with the girl if she’s not interested in dating or anything else with you.  Join a club, sport, or other extracurricular activity that she does to spend more time around her and get to know her better. Talk to her about the club or sport, and even ask her for tips if you’re new and just learning about what you’re doing.   Avoid joining in on everything that the girl is a part of, as she might become suspicious or annoyed that you’re suddenly everywhere she goes. Instead, choose some of her activities that you are genuinely interested in getting involved with and learning more about.  Join her at a table at lunch, sit next to her in a class, or another occasion during or after school. You don’t need to sit right next to her at lunch, just at the same table and close enough that you can start a conversation and make eye contact with her.   Start with a simple “Hey, can I sit here?” Then you can move on to other easy topics, like school subjects or a school dance coming up. Don’t be afraid to talk to everyone else at the table, too, and not just her.  Talk to her friends individually or when they’re in a group and get to know them by being kind, asking questions, and finding things in common, just like you do with her. Learn more about her through them, and she will notice and feel comfortable around you when you’re friendly with all of her friends, too.   Don’t worry about trying to get her alone and away from her friends if you always see her with them. It might be hard to talk to her with others around, but if you talk to everyone in the group, not just her, it will be a lot easier to feel comfortable with them and get chances later to catch her one-on-one.  When you’re in a group or sitting together, stand or sit near her so you can be ready to start a conversation. Don’t violate her personal space or boundaries, or touch her without permission, but you can let her know you’re there with a wave or come up closer to talk to her.   If you don’t want to get too close to her, you can still subtly mimic her body language to send a signal that you’re paying attention to her. If she crosses her arms, leans her head on her hand, or stands with her hands in her pockets while she’s talking to you, wait at least 20 seconds and do the same or something similar., Don’t engage in teasing or taunting behavior that you might see other boys doing to get a girl’s attention; she will not like you or be interested in you at all. Never touch her or her stuff without asking first, tease her with names, or say anything about her body. Treat her with respect and be kind to her if you want her attention.   You can get suspended or expelled from school or get into other major trouble for touching or harassing a girl, so don’t do it. Even calling her names or teasing her when you’re chatting on the computer or texting is wrong, could get you in trouble, and should never be done. Don’t follow what you learn on TV or movies, from video games, or other boys your age or older if they talk about calling girls certain names or making any comments about how a girl’s body has changed or how it looks. Call a girl by her own name or what she prefers to be called, and say nice things to her, preferably about her personality rather than how she looks. Be friends with a girl if she’s not interested in dating or anything else with you. Also listen to what she says and leave her alone entirely if she asks you to.  

look her in the eye to get her attention.  smile to let her know you're interested.  practice good hygiene to make a good impression.  dress well to impress her.  be confident around her.  write her a sweet note or letter.  get her to talk to you first.  ask her questions to get to know her.  find what you have in common with her.  show her your intelligence and wit.  listen to her and be polite.  avoid teasing her.  participate in some of her activities.  sit next to her at lunch.  get to know her friends.  stand or sit near her.  beware of harassing a girl. 

 But it will take time for her to realize if she really likes you. If you get put into the friend zone, it might not be your fault. Maybe she's just not ready for something serious yet. Or, she may have a boyfriend.; , Ring!. If you ring her more than you text her, it may be good for is your confidence, because she will likely take it as your friend.  Especially if you want to get into a relationship with her, and get out of the friend zone.  No matter how much you want to, this will just push you further into the friend zone!  , No matter how much you want to, she will take notice of the ones you do give, and she will more likely to return the compliments to you.  The nice guy approach is good sometimes, but with some girls the nice guy gets nowhere. All girls are different and the 'bad boy' doesn't always work out all the time, either.  This is hard if you and her are close friends  , agree in a couple of things, this is good.. if you agree with her all the time, it means that she's winning, not you.  Be honest about your feelings, see what she thinks, and hopefully someday you two will be in a relationship. Although, don't worry yet, this is a hard task that may take some time!  , Get a plan, and make her yours!  , There are plenty of fish in the sea, have confidence. And most of all enjoy life, don't let her hold you back!  

it's hard!,  don't text!,  don't call her friend!,  don't call her by any cute terminology!,  don't give her as many compliments as you used to!,  have the balance of being nice guy and a bad boy!,  what if she calls you friend, bud, or anything platonic, just ignore it, especially if you like her or even love her.  don't always agree with her.  tell her how you feel!,  don't just sit around thinking about her.  if this fails, try moving on. 

 Don’t rush into pursuing your feelings. Remember, crushes don’t last forever. You may feel intensely for just a few weeks about this person before your feelings begin to mellow out.If you find you still have feelings for your friend's sister after a few months, then you may wish to pursue it. In the meantime, you may wish to keep your distance and figure out how you feel. Getting over a crush can almost feel like getting over an addiction. Crushes cause the brain to produce dopamine -- the same chemical that drives a drug addict’s next high. So if it feels difficult to step back, that’s because it is!; , Force yourself to stay away from your friend’s sister for a week or so and see if you feel any differently about her. You might just be attracted to her because you are seeing her a lot. Stop visiting their house and spend time with your friend elsewhere.   Sometimes people develop crushes on others just because they are around those people frequently. This is called the exposure effect (or the familiarity principle): the more you are around or exposed to something/someone, the more you will like it.If you are spending a lot of time at your friend’s house and their sister is always hanging around, for example, you may start to have feelings for her. Taking a break from seeing the sister will help you to discern if your feelings are genuine. Have your friend come over to your house instead, talk to them on the phone, or hang out somewhere else.  Find something else to occupy your thoughts and time, whether it is learning a new skill, taking up a new hobby, or earning some money. Surround yourself with other friends to keep your mind off your crush and keep an active social life.Go exercise at the gym. Go to the library and read. Start a babysitting program. Get a job. Do things for your own self-improvement. Have an active social life. Visit other friends and fill up your weekends with activities and social events. Plan a big party or outing for your friends.  

take your time.  take a break.  keep busy. 

 Yes, this may be an awkward conversation. You may want to be honest and tell your friend about your crush, however, particularly if you continue to have strong feelings.Your friend may be able to provide some perspective and advice.   You could say, “This is kind of embarrassing, but I really like Emily. I’ve liked her for a few months now. I thought I’d tell you because I’m not sure what I should do, and I’d like to hear what you think.” Keep in mind that your friend might have a strong reaction, like “Ew, no, she’s my sister!” or “I’m totally freaked out by this.” You could respond, “I know how weird it probably is for you. I thought a lot about whether or not I should tell you. But I decided to be honest with you about it, because my feelings haven’t changed.”  , Your friend might be angry, disgusted, or maybe even think it’s a great idea. Ask your friend what they think you should do. They may be able to see something about the situation that you are blind to.   You could say, “I was wondering if you think I should ask her out. But I don’t want to let this get between us and ruin our friendship. I don’t want to do it if it will be too weird for you.” Give your friend some time to think about their response if they need to.  If your friend doesn’t want you to date their sister, accept their answer and do your best to move on. If you go against your friend’s wishes to pursue their sister, you will likely damage your friendship.   Keep in mind that later in life, you will likely have a greater regret about losing a friendship than not pursuing a crush. 

talk to your friend.  listen to your friend’s response.  remember that friendships usually outlast romance. 

 Consider the possibility that a romantic relationship between you and the sister could have repercussions on your relationship with your friend.Family loyalty runs deep, and you may find yourself running into problems with both siblings.   If you and the sister break up, your friend may take her side and be angry with you. The sister may not want to pursue a relationship with you if she sees how upsetting it is to her sibling.  Observe her behavior and determine if you think she might like you. Because of the potential of damaging your friendship, you might not want to pursue her unless you know you have a good chance of being successful.   For example, maybe she is talking to you a lot, making eye contact and smiling. Those could be signs she is interested in you., If the only thing you know about her is that she’s cute and is related to your friend, spend some time learning more about her. Her personality may make her more or less attractive to you.Talk to her while at your friend’s house. Ask her about her interests and favorite things. Find out what you have in common besides your friend. For example, you could ask “Are you going out for the swim team again next year? Which events did you do this year?” or “I heard you have Mr. Winters for geometry. How are you doing in that class? It was impossible for me.” Try to get to know her without your friend present, but do not try to ditch your friend to do this. Wait until your friend leaves the room, for example. You may find out that while you enjoy hanging out with the sister in your friend’s presence, you may find that the dynamic changes when you and the sister are alone. For example, you may enjoy the way your friend and their sister tease each other in your presence, but you and the sister do not have that same component to your relationship.  If your friend is okay with it and if the sister seems interested, you may decide to ask the sister out. Find a moment when the two of you can be alone without your friend present and let her know how you feel.   Acknowledge that the situation is strange. The sister might be uncomfortable with the idea at first. She might feel loyalty to her sibling and not want to hurt their feelings. Give her some time to think about it. You could say, “I know it’s weird because I’m Brian’s friend. But we’ve been hanging out so much together this summer, and I’ve gotten to know you better and enjoy your company. So I was wondering if you wanted to go out sometime.” Let her know that you have talked to her sibling about it. You could say, “I told Tina how I feel and she is okay with me asking you out. We talked about it for a long time. I didn’t want to cause any problems in your family.” If she doesn’t seem interested, let it go and move on. It is not worth pursuing her to risk your relationship with your friend.  See how it is hanging out with just the sister. See if you have any romantic connection, or if she is just someone you care about as a friend or “like a sister.”   If she seems to like you, too, take things very slowly. Do not rush the relationship. You do not want to move too fast and cause hurt feelings that could damage your relationship with your friend. If it doesn’t seem like you have a connection beyond just a friendship, stop dating her. Don’t force the relationship to happen. It could complicate your relationship with your friend and their family. For example, you could say, “I really like you, but I think we are better as friends. I don’t want to hurt your feelings, but I also don’t want to end up hurting your family’s feelings, too. I really like your sibling and think that trying to make this work will just create bad blood between all of us.”  , Understand that a relationship with their sister changes the dynamics of your friendship.Your friend might be jealous that you are spending more time with their sister than with them.   Balance your time between the sister and your friend. You may want to be spending all your time with the sister, but keep in mind that you were friends with her sibling first. Make a special effort to do things with just your friend. Invite your friend over to your house, without the sister present, to do something that you both enjoy. Keep your relationship with your friend’s sister separate. Do not invite your friend out with you and the sister, for example. 

determine if it is worth the risk.  figure out if she is interested.  get to know the sister.  ask her out.  go on a few dates.  be sensitive to your friend’s feelings. 

 Girls are more likely to talk to a guy if they are not complete strangers. Catch her eye in class and smile, nod at her in the school hallways, or make an effort to sit near her at lunch. Of course, don’t follow her around (that might creep her out) but simply making sure she knows your face will make her more receptive to talking to you at some point.   Little things like asking her the date or hanging out at the same after-school spot will make her begin to start noticing you.; , While this might seem obvious, lots of guys struggle with the idea of approaching the girl they like. However, you’re just going to have to go for it. Walk up to her before class and strike up a conversation, talk to her in the lunch line, or say hey to her at a party. Make a passing joke about your teacher’s silly tie in math class or ask her what she did this weekend while waiting in line for lunch.   Be observant. What does she like to do? Are there any clues that can give you an idea of what she likes? Maybe she is constantly doodling in class, or carrying a soccer ball around. This little things you observe about her can help you to come up with ideas for what to talk to her about.  To do this, you’ll have to be bold. Once you’ve talked to her a bit, you should start asking her questions about herself. What does she like to do? What movies is she into? What’s her favorite sport, art or food? The possibilities are endless, but the answers will help you to form a friendship. However, keep in mind that you shouldn’t just pummel her with questions (that may be sort of weird) but ask a question and let the conversation develop naturally.  Once you guys have talked and she knows who you are, consider asking her to hang out. Start by asking her to do something in a group and tell her to bring her friends along (this will make her more inclined to say yes). Ask her to come to the movies with your friends, play a pickup soccer game, go on a hike, go to a concert, etc. When you guys hang out, be attentive to her but not clingy--just act like you would with anyone else in your friend group.  Everyone likes to complimented now and then--make her day and give her a compliment that you really mean. Its important to say something that you really believe--fake compliments can sound stiff and are easily spotted. If you like her dress, tell her her dress is really cute. If she just played a song for you on the guitar and it was great--tell her that!  , No matter what, you should always treat girls with respect--regardless of whether or not they are the one you are interested in. It helps to be extra nice to her friends. If they see you as the caring, sweet, funny guy you are, chances are they will tell the girl you like. However, don’t hang out with her friends (or just one of her friends) all the time--it might give her the idea that you are romantically interested in one of her friends.  Even if your heart lurches weirdly into your mouth, or you start sweating, act as relaxed as you can when hanging out with her, particularly if you don’t want to make a romantic move just yet (or clue her in to the fact that you want something more than friendship). Girls like a confident guy, not someone who becomes a hot mess whenever they approach him. Part of acting relaxed is reminding yourself that you’re a really cool and nice dude--any girl would be lucky to have such a great guy interested in her.    Smile like you mean it. A sincere smile is a very attractive thing. If she makes a joke, allow yourself to laugh. When you look at her, or wave bye when walking to class, smile genuinely.  Make eye contact. Look your girl in the eye when you guys are talking. Eye contact is a sign of confidence. If you look anywhere but at her face, she might think you are uninterested in her or that you have better things to do besides hang out with her.  Once you have established a friendship and you know that you want to make it something more, start making some romantic gestures that will clue her into the fact that you like her. Remember important dates like her birthday (and do something nice for her on that day), walk her to her next class (and then sprint to yours), or ask her to a dance.   When you feel confident enough to do so, ask the girl you like out.   

become familiar to her.  talk to her.  find out what she is interested in.  try to establish a friendship.  give her sincere compliments.  be nice to her friends.  act relaxed and confident when you are around her.  make small romantic moves. 

 Everyone loves to laugh. Humor is a great way to get (and keep) a girl’s attention, so long as it is the right sort of humor. While this might not apply to some girls, most girls are generally a little turned off by crude or mean humor. Of course, being funny doesn’t mean that you need to transform yourself into the next Chris Pratt, but throwing some humor into a conversation can definitely catch a girl’s attention. If you’re not a natural-born comedian, here are some tips on creating your style of humor:Don’t wait for the girl to laugh. Quick, witty humor that seems unassuming is a good way to go--if she thinks you’re funny, she’ll laugh. However, never draw attention to the fact if she doesn’t laugh--that will just make the situation awkward, and you a little desperate. (Example: Don’t say something like “Oh so you didn’t think that was funny?”) Find some inspiration in famous comedians. If you feel like you need a little help getting into the comedic mood, watch comedians on TV or pay attention to the funny characters in movies. Watch how they deliver their jokes, but don’t memorize their jokes and simply repeat them (that could come across as rather stiff). Use situational humors. While dishing out witty one-liners can make a girl laugh, try commenting on your situation or environment in a funny way. Don’t pick on the girl you’re interested in. While teasing may be funny at first, don’t rely on it as your only source of humor because that can definitely get old. If you find that teasing is something you’re pretty good at--tease yourself. Self-deprecating humor can be funny and will show the girl that you are confident enough in yourself that you can make fun of your own flaws.  Confidence is a very attractive quality. Feel good about yourself because you are an awesome dude--your inner confidence will shine through and your girl will notice. Walk with your head held high, volunteer interesting information, and don’t hesitate when walking up to the girl you like--just do it. Having confidence also means laughing at yourself and not getting in a huff when the girl you like has other plans or talks to another guy.   Being confident does not mean that you should act cocky. There is a fine line between being confident and being a self-involved jerk. When you are confident, you have faith in your abilities without holding that over others. When you’re cocky, you brag about how awesome you are. Avoid the latter. Girls are attractive to guys who are confident without telling everyone around them how great they are, constantly.  When you are talking to the girl you like, give her your undivided attention. Listen carefully to what she has to say--you may learn something you didn’t know about her, or find that you both have mutual interests, dreams, or ideas.   Ask her about herself. Not only will this show that you care, it will also give you information you can use to woo her later. Any questions that are sincere and respectfully asked are fair game--find out what movies she likes, what her dreams are, what her favorite meal is, etc. Give her time to answer. Don’t interrupt her a lot when she’s speaking--you asked the question so you should give her time to speak her mind. Plus, the fact that she wants to talk to you is a really good thing--don’t cut it short.  When you’re getting to know a girl, it is important to be polite. After all--a lot of girls feel like chivalry is dead. Show her that this is not the case. Open doors for her, offer to help her carry her stuff, etc. Avoid offensive behavior (sexist/racist/derogatory jokes are definitely off the table--but you shouldn’t be saying that kind of stuff anyway).  If you are really interested in something, show it. When you throw yourself into something you are really passionate about, it is pretty obvious (and attractive)--it shows that you care about something outside of yourself, and that you are dedicated. Try to be the best you can be--you’re sure to catch you girl’s attention.   Don’t be embarrassed about what you are passionate about. If you are enthusiastic, confident, and happy, people will become interested in what you are into (or at least respect your interests). If you are crazy about hiking, pick a hike that is gorgeous (and relatively easy) to take your non-hiking friends (and the girl you like) on--they’ll be sure to have fun.  This doesn’t mean that you need to sob like a baby when a sad topic gets mentioned, but you should allow some of your feelings to show. This means that you might need to say something like “When I watched The Notebook, I kept thinking about how hard it must be to have a loved one with Alzheimer's. It made me feel so sad for people experiencing that disease”. Saying things like this (and meaning them) will show the girl you like that you have a deeper side. 

show her you have a sense of humor.  be confident in yourself.  be attentive.  display good manners.  show passion for the things you are interested in.  let her know that you have emotional depth. 

 If you do nothing else, remember this--you should shower regularly and brush your teeth. No girl is going to want to cozy up to a guy who has stuff in his teeth and smells like B.O. Bust out that great-smelling body wash (and deodorant) and start thinking of your toothbrush as your best friend. Of course, there are plenty of other things you can do to get her attention with your well-groomed looks.   Going beyond the basics: Find a cologne that will make girls swoon, wash your face so that your skin is blemish free, add a little bit of styling gel to your hair to get that ‘I just got out of bed but I’m so manly that I just look this good all the time’ look--the possibilities are endless. If its going to make you smell good, look good, and feel good, it’s probably something you should try. Considering body hair: Clip that nose hair and pluck that unibrow! If you’re rocking some facial hair, props to you. Just make sure to keep it in check--its generally better to have no beard than a flowing, ‘I’ve just been asleep for 100 years’ Rip Van Winkle look. Clipping your nails: Do it. You don’t want to be thinking about holding her hand, only to cut her with your talons when you make a move. While you’re at it, scrape that dirt out from under there.  This doesn’t mean going out and buying a whole new wardrobe, but you should definitely give your wardrobe some consideration. Ditch any articles of clothing that are stained or torn. Everyone has their own style--but ‘slob’ style is definitely the least attractive. Don’t wear the same shirt every day of the week, and try to put a bit more effort into your outfit instead of just throwing on a sweatshirt and sweatpants.   Play up your style. Whether you are a hipster, jock, or have some style all your own, put a little effort into what you wear in the morning.  Believe it or not, your posture actually plays a big part in how girls perceive you. If you have a tendency to hunch, avoid eye contact and play with your hands, a girl is going to be less inclined to come over and strike up a conversation. Stand up straight, keep your eyes up, and get a smile going--you will look much more approachable.   Keep in mind that while you really should have good posture, you should also carry yourself with ease. Standing up straight does not mean walking around like a robot or holding yourself so rigidly that you look like Frankenstein. If you don’t know how to carry yourself with ease, draw inspiration from movies or TV. Watch how the lead guy holds himself (and eventually charms his way into the lead girl’s heart).  While this does not mean that you have to lift for your life, you should keep in mind that if you want to get that drop dead gorgeous girl to notice you, you’re going to have to keep your physique in mind. She puts effort into her looks, so you should too. Start an exercise routine that combines both cardio and weight-training for an all around toned look.   Keep in mind that most girls like a guy who looks fit, but not one that has muscles that are about to rip through his t-shirt every time he raises his arm in class. If your goal is to look like Arnold Schwarzenegger when he was Mr. Universe, you may want to tone it back a bit.  

groom yourself.  put a little effort into how you dress.  consider your body language.  stay in shape. 

 If you like a girl but haven’t had the chance to actually meet her, start with a simple introduction. Be relaxed and start with a simple greeting:You could say, “Hi! It’s so great to finally meet you. My name is John.” You might say, “Hello! My name is Susan. So lovely to finally meet you!”; , Although breaking the ice can be intimidating, try to find a way to keep the conversation going beyond an initial greeting. You might try an indirect approach, such as asking for a favor, making a statement, and expressing curiosity.If you are at the cafeteria, you could say, “Do you mind passing the salt?” If you are at a coffee shop, you could say, “Wow, the dark roast is excellent!”  , Although it may sound simple, girls love it when you say their name in a conversation. When you address them in a conversation, remember to include their first name.For instance, you should use their name when you ask them for a favor. You could say, “Susan, could you pass the ketchup?” You should also use their name when you ask them a question. For instance, you might say, “Susan, I was wondering, what inspired you to get into competitive swimming?”  , If you go to school or work together, you could ask her what she enjoys doing in her own time. By showing an interest in her life, you’ll be subtly hinting that you like her. If she shares something about her life, listen and learn!, Laughing is one of the best ways to drop a hint that you like a girl, especially if she has a sense of humor! If she cracks a joke, don’t be the person who ignores it or fails to get her way of seeing the world. Show your appreciation for her sense of humor!If you have an inside joke, bring it up often. Crack a joke! Even if it's lame, she'll laugh at the attempt and may even find it cute.  Since she makes you happy, express yourself with a nice grin! Be genuine and use body language, such as touching your face or hair while you smile. She’ll appreciate how friendly and genuine you are with her, and she may very well smile back!, You can develop a friendship with her by finding a common interest, such as a band or an artist you both like. Once you find a common interest, nurture the friendship by taking time to learn about your common interest together. For instance, if the band you like comes to town, you could see if she wants to go see them with you.Once you find a band you both like, you could ask her which album she likes best. If you are both really into the same band, you could ask her on a concert date. You could say, “I have an extra ticket to the Drake concert in July. Do you want to go?”  , Instead of pretending to be someone you think she will like, you’re better off simply being yourself! Share your true interests, beliefs, values, and opinions. By giving an honest picture of yourself, you’ll be showing how much you like and respect her. 

introduce yourself to her by saying “hello.” you’ll need her to know that you exist.  break the ice with an indirect approach.  use her first name.  ask her what she does in her spare time.  laugh when she makes a joke.  smile at her.  talk about shared passions.  be yourself by sharing your true interests and values. 

 Instead, try to get to know them or even be friends. They won't like or date you if they don't know you.; , Don't make a fool of yourself. Try to speak to them but make sure you don't do anything bizarre.  Tell them your problem and pay attention to any advice they give you. Since your friend is not the one in love, they are probably more clear-headed than you are just now.  Try to pay attention to your appearance and look nice, but don't overdo it. Just be yourself.  You don't want them to think you're a slob. Make sure you smell good - no expensive cologne needed, just don't reek. Whatever you do, don't wear a ton of anything scented -especially stuff like AXE. Everyone can get sick of this. Believe me. The commercials about people attacking you are wrong.  Know your topic, what you want to say about it, and what you want to ask them about it. Yes, you have to ask them questions, otherwise you are simply talking at them and you look dumb.  But don't go overboard. You have to make sure that you don't sound like you are going to force them to cry on your shoulder.  Although you should have some confidence in yourself, people really like it when guys are shy and awkward and cute. Too much confidence makes you look like arrogant or maybe even rude. But don't overdo the awkwardness, it will come naturally. Overall, just behave naturally, like you would around your friends.  Although you might not believe you're on a date with the person don't stress out about it because stressing can lead to a date disaster. Try to think about things they like if the conversation steers the wrong way.  

don't give them any signs that you are desperately in love.  if you're interested in getting a date with this person, stay calm.  get help from a trustworthy friend.  act cool and collected around them.  stay clean.  before you try to talk to them, have a mental outline of what you're going to say.  when dealing with a person that has had a recent break-up, let them know that they have your support and that they can talk to you.  don't act too confident!,  don't stress out. 

 If you find yourself at a party or an event with her, you should try to make eye contact. Although you don’t want to stare at her in a creepy way, you should make eye contact with her to show your interest and hopefully strike up a conversation!, Although you may feel too nervous to approach her out of the blue, you could express your interest in her by writing a short note. Use a nice pen or pencil. Write a short note and pass it to her at the end of class or after a shift at work.If you are writing a note in class, you should try to give it to her directly. If you have a business card, you could write your note on it.  If there is an opportunity for you to show your support for her, you should take it! Attend any performances she might be giving, such as dance recitals, concerts, and theatrical performances. It is a great chance to learn more about her, meet some of her friends and express your feelings for her.If she is performing a concert and shared a group invite with you on social media, go and show your support! Don’t go to her performances or events if you are not invited. She may get the impression that you are a creep, so stick to the events that she actually invites you to attend.  If you are at a bar or a coffee shop, try to remember what she orders. The next time you are at the establishment with her, you could order her the drink before she has a chance. She’ll likely be surprised and touched that you remembered, and may get the hint that you like her.When she is in line at the coffee shop, you could jot down a note of her drink order. It could also be a mental note. If she goes to the bar to get a drink, you could go with her and listen to her order. The next time she needs a drink, you’ll know what to order.  

make eye contact with her at an event.  pass her a short handwritten note.  show your support for something she is doing.  remember what she is drinking. 

 Pick her up a nice coffee, fancy tea, wine, beer, or any other drink that she enjoys. Although you’ll still need to express your appreciation for her in conversation, it may give her a hint that you really enjoy spending time with her., Find out if she has a favorite dessert. The next time you hang out, give her something she really likes. For instance, you could treat her to an ice cream, candy, chocolate bar, crepe, chocolate cake, or a piece of pie.Ask her what she likes best. You might say, “what's your favorite candy bar?"  , You could start finding common interests by sharing books with her. Although she may not have the same taste in reading, you can express how much you value her opinion and ideas by sharing a book that you really like. After she reads it, listen to her opinions about the book. If you show a genuine interest in her ideas, she’ll hopefully get the hint that you like her on multiple levels, including her mind!Don’t be offended if she doesn’t like the book. You can always find other things in common!  , Express your feelings for her by compiling a mix tape. Add songs that you have listened to together, as well as songs that you want her to hear because of their significance for you. Try to tell a story with the mix tape, such as a story about your growing relationship or your feelings for her.Instead of a tape, make a Spotify playlist for her. Give the mix tape after you have had a chance to get to know her.  

buy her a fancy drink.  treat her to something sweet.  give her a book you really like.  make her a mix tape that tells a story! 

 Use your weight to your advantage. Act confident and like you know you're overweight and don't care. A lot of of girls will feel that you offer protection. If you really like a girl, the important thing is for her to like you back. She is more likely to respond positively to you if you are a caring, vibrant and outgoing person who shows respect and interest in her. Girls respond to kindness, respect and displaying interest in their life and needs. She will be less likely to focus on your weight and see your wonderful personality if you do too.; , Try to get to know her first. Strike up a conversation over shared interests, such as books when in the library or nature when outdoors. After you have spent time talking together, start to compliment her in little ways here and there. She will notice and this will go beyond the matter of your size.  Brush your hair, take a daily shower using good smelling shampoo, conditioner, and body wash. Wear deodorant, and if you like, a little cologne. Brush, floss, and use mouth wash for oral hygiene. Clean your clothes, never wear them twice in a row.  Think of a place that the two of you can go together where you will feel comfortable and that you think she will also like to go. Suggest going there together in a friendly, casual manner.  If she says no, you are simply in dating land. Do not refocus on your weight. Instead, focus on the reality that dating is hard work! Your strength still remains in letting your potential girlfriend know what a great person you are by always being friendly, helpful and caring in your attitude toward her. And if you are naturally funny, share jokes and fun stories as well but don't force it and don't use humor to put yourself down - there is never any need to draw attention to your looks or weight in a derogatory manner.  A calm, smooth and confident voice will always command attention, as will genuine eye contact. Focus on all the dating techniques - there are plenty on wikiHow.  Join a gym or try to get hold of some home gym equipment and do some light weights and build up a regular cardiovascular exercise program. There are always ways to combat weight problems, they may take time and they may take a lot of effort but if you persevere you will get there.  If you only like her because she's "hot," it's probably not going to work out. You want a girl to see who you are as a person, so why not do the same for other girls?  

put aside your feelings about your weight.  spend time talking together.  be well groomed.  pluck up the courage to ask.  be persistent.  keep calm.  if you feel that you are unhappy with your appearance, see a doctor or a health professional and discuss your options.  as for the girl you're pursuing...make sure you like her for the right reasons. 

 Seeing your crush with another guy is not a good feeling, especially if you had no idea she was with someone else already. You thought you had a chance with her and suddenly you realize that you don’t. Your first instinct might be to panic or even get angry. Getting upset is a normal reaction. You might find yourself breathing very fast or holding your breath when this happens. This can make your anxiety a lot worse, unfortunately.   Take a moment to focus on your breathing.Breathe slowly and deeply. If it helps, close your eyes for a moment. Inhale while counting to five, then exhale while counting to five.; , The more you look at her with someone else, the more it will hurt. It’s going to be hard, but force yourself to look away. If you don’t, you might start getting visibly upset, which will make you feel even worse. If you're staring, she might notice and get uncomfortable. Her boyfriend might also notice and get angry. You'll feel better if you focus on something else.   Pull out a book or your class notes and focus on reading. Even if you’re too upset to read, do what you can to keep your eyes on the page. If you’re not in class, pull out your phone and text a friend or play a game.  This isn’t always going to be an option, but if you can, get up and leave the room. Try to do this as calmly and naturally as you can. Keep your pace normal as you head for the door. Find a quiet place where you can have a moment of privacy. Your thoughts will probably feel really negative at first. You might feel angry at yourself, or not good enough. This is normal.   For every negative thought you have, try to immediately follow it up with a positive one. For instance, you might think, “He is way more popular than me and better at sports, too. Of course she likes him over me.” Try to counter this with a positive thought right away. You could think, “But I’m popular, too. I have lots of friends. Maybe I’m not good at sports but I’m good at other things.”  , Make sure it’s someone you trust and can be open with. Tell your friend what happened, even if you feel a little embarrassed about it.   Chances are, your friend has experienced this very same situation. It tends to happen to everyone at some point! Talking about it with a friend can help you feel a lot better.  

breathe.  look away.  get out of the situation.  find a friend to talk to.one of the best ways to cope with this situation is to immediately track down one of your friends and talk to them. 

 Unfortunately, her social media will probably involve lots of pictures and posts of her with someone else. Stop following her Twitter, Instagram, and Tumblr accounts. You don’t have to unfriend her on Facebook – she will probably notice this and it could make your friendship awkward. Instead, use Facebook’s privacy settings to block her updates from showing up in your feed.   Having to deal with her presence constantly online will make the situation so much harder for you. Unfollowing her on social media will help you think about her less and keep you from obsessing over what she’s doing.  This doesn’t have to be a permanent thing, and you should never feel like a place is “off-limits” to you because of another person. However, you’ll probably feel better if you avoid her known hang-outs for a short time, at least at first.   “Out of sight, out of mind” is an old cliché that can be very useful when you’re trying to get over a crush. You’ll make it harder on yourself to get past the situation if it’s in your face all the time.  You might not feel like being around people and it may seem preferable to be alone in your room. Make an effort to focus on your school work or find a new hobby that will keep you actively thinking about other things. Look for activities that will get you out of the house and around other people.   It might take a little extra energy to focus on something other than your crush, but you can do it. Trying out new hobbies and making plans with your friends can help you keep your mind distracted.  

unfollow her social media accounts.this can be a tough one, because you’ll naturally want to see what she’s doing.  avoid the places where she hangs out.you probably know where she tends to spend a lot of her time, which makes it easy for you to avoid these places completely.  stay busy.it can be easy to isolate yourself when you feel sad about a crush. 

 If having this crush is affecting you too much or in a negative way, talk to your friends and family about it.Ask your friends to distract you and change the subject when you bring up your crush. Sometimes it helps to vent to someone you trust, like a parent or sibling.   If you feel too shy to talk to your parents or friends about your crush, consider talking to a guidance counselor or school therapist about your feelings.Sometimes it’s easier to talk openly with someone who you don’t have to see every day.  Many people find that writing their feelings down in a journal helps them feel better about bad situations. If you don’t enjoy writing, there are lots of other ways to express your emotions. Try doing something creative, like art or music.If you respond better to physical activities, get involved with a sport or take frequent walks. Try loading your favorite songs into your iPod and hitting the jogging trail. Physical activity can help you focus on something else and it can have positive effects on your well-being.  Being upset about a crush can have a lot of negative effects. You might have a hard time sleeping at night. Sometimes people lose their appetite and they start skipping meals. These are normal reactions to sad feelings. Even if you don’t feel like it, try to practice self-care during this time.   Drink plenty of water and eat well. Get as much sleep as you can. Whenever your body gets run down, dealing with emotional issues is much harder. Keeping yourself physically healthy will help you move on faster., Not only will this keep you distracted, but it puts you in a good position to meet a new crush. For a short time, it might feel like your current crush is the only girl in the world. You may think you’ll never like another girl as much as her ever again.   This is a normal feeling and it will pass. Remember, there are other girls out there! It’s okay to feel sad for a little while, but not forever. Meeting someone new can help you get over your crush and move on.  Resilience is a quality that helps you to keep moving forward when you encounter difficult situations. Try to develop your resilience to help make moving forward easier on you and to protect yourself in the future. Some things you can do to develop your resilience include:Develop a positive view of the future and of yourself.  Set realistic goals.  Get to know yourself.  As you move forward, it is important to recognize that this is probably not the only time that you will experience disappointment. However, you can develop your ability to deal with disappointment so that you will be better equipped to handle it in the future. Some things you can do include:Facing your disappointment head on. Instead of avoiding the situation, acknowledge it and look for learning opportunities and solutions. Let yourself feel the emotions you are having for a little while. It is okay to feel express your feelings when you are disappointed. Just make sure that you do not dwell on these feelings. Try telling a friend how you feel or writing about your feelings to help you get them off your chest. Do something nice for yourself. When things don’t go your way, you might also find it helpful to do something kind for yourself, like you might do for a friend who is feeling down. Buy yourself a new book, pair of shoes, or an outfit. Take yourself for a massage or manicure. Or, just give yourself permission to spend the day doing whatever you want, whether that is playing video games, watching movies, reading, or hiking in the woods.  

get support.  find an outlet for your feelings.  take care of yourself.  be open to a new crush.make an effort to hang out with people who you share similar interests and hobbies with.  build your resilience.  learn how to handle disappointment. 

 Staring makes it obvious that you're checking a girl out. Instead of keeping your eyes on her, pretend like you're looking around the room naturally. As you're moving your head and eyes around, sneak looks at the girl that you want to check out.For instance if you notice her at a sporting event, you can pretend to watch the game but steal looks at her instead. If you share the same lunch period you can act like you're looking around the cafeteria or looking at your friends, when you're really checking her out.; , Sunglasses will hide where you're looking and enable you to check out a girl without her thinking that you're looking directly at her. If you want to use sunglasses, make sure that you get ones with dark or reflective lenses so that she can't see your eyes., If you're far enough away from the girl, she won't be able to see your eyes or where you're looking. If you don't want her to notice you, wait for her to walk at least five feet (1.5 m) away before turning to look at her.  Don't follow the girl around, just check her out when she's around you. Don't do this repeatedly or she and her friends may think you're creepy.  Instead of looking directly in the girl's direction, you can use your side vision, or your peripheral vision, to check them out. You can practice this in your room by keeping your head straight and trying to look at things on the side of you. Instead of turning your head or facing the girl, look at her from the side., There's no reason why you need to stare at someone. Instead, just take a quick glance, check her out, and then look at something else. If you check her out for too long, it could come off as creepy and isn't a habit you want to get into. 

shift your gaze around.  wear sunglasses to obscure your eyes.  watch her from afar.  use your peripheral vision.  check her out quickly. 

 Put a book or a newspaper in front of you and pretend that you're reading it. When the girl comes near you or walks past you, you can lift your gaze and check her out without her noticing. If you pull it off correctly, she'll just think that you were reading., If the girl's concentration is on something else, she won't be looking at you and you can check her out without her noticing. She could be talking to someone else, eating, exercising, or her head could be turned. Just make sure that her attention is on something else so that she doesn't catch you checking her out., If the girl's attention isn't on anything, you can create a distraction to misdirect her. Drop something on the ground or ask her to help you with homework and then check her out while she's concentrating on it. You can also ask her opinion of a piece of art, show, or event, and then sneak a look at her., Try to come up with valid excuses of why you might need to be around her. Group up with her for group projects or try to sit next to her if you share classes together. If she regularly shops at a certain place, you can start shopping there so that you have more opportunities and excuses to be around her. 

pretend that you're reading.  look at her while she's preoccupied.  create a distraction.  pretend that there's a reason to be around her. 

 If you keep checking the girl out and staring at her, it could make her feel uncomfortable and threatened. If the girl looks or tells you that she feels uncomfortable, stop looking at her and walk away., If the girl catches you, don't try to avoid the situation. Instead, admit that you were checking her out, apologize, and stop doing it. She will appreciate your honesty and your apology.You can say something like, "I’m sorry, I didn’t mean to stare; I just think you’re really pretty. I won't anymore."  , If you think a girl is pretty and want to look at her, you can introduce yourself to her. Go up to her and introduce yourself by telling her your name and then asking for hers. Take a look at her body language. If she seems interested in talking to you more, make small talk with her.  You can say something like "Hey, my name is Dan. What's your name?"  , Instead of checking out a girl, you should really try looking them in the face or the eyes. This shows respect and is a gesture that girls can reciprocate. If you have a bad habit of looking at women in an inappropriate way, try looking at them in the face more often., If you're checking out girls around your significant other, it can do more than just make the girl that you're checking out feel uncomfortable. It can also cause your significant other to get jealous and mad at you. Avoid checking out girls around your significant other or keep it as stealthy and unnoticeable as you can. 

don't make the girl feel uncomfortable.  apologize and stop checking her out if she catches you.  introduce yourself to the girl instead of checking her out.  look at girls in the eye.  don't check out girls around your significant other. 

 Many people think that you have to lift weights to get fit. This is not the case. You can do a full work out without a gym membership. Push-ups work your chest and triceps massively while crunches work your abs. You also want to try step out of the house for your cardio by biking, running, or swimming.  Do sit ups by putting your calf/feet on the seat of a chair, with your back on the ground. Then put your hands on the back of your head and move your head towards the ceiling. Exercising not only tones your body to promote your attractiveness, it also gives you more energy and confidence.; , Dressing your age tells a lot about your personality. It is proven that a guy who dresses like he is 16 isn’t as attractive as a guy wearing a mature look. You don't have to wear a sport coat but a simple upgrade to your style will help. Invest in chinos and nicer jeans instead of continuing to wear old worn out denim. Go for slim cuts in both your top and bottom. Try out several colors and pick the ones that accent your attributes (hair, skin, and eye color) the most.   Look after your shoes. Discard your sneakers after they start to rip or loss their thread. Care for your leather shoes by treating them twice a year.Also a good thing to take into account is the feel of your clothes. When you break the touch barrier, girls like things that feel nice and it's also important that you feel physically comfortable in them. One technique to attract someone is by wearing an eye-catching outfit. Scientifically, women are more inclined to be attracted to a man wearing red. It’s the same reason a cop is more inclined to pull over a red sedan over a blue sedan. Red catches the eye., Take care of your body and smell nice. Take a shower everyday and use shampoo and soap products that compliment your body. Find a deodorant that smells good with a pinch of musk. Consider a touch of cologne for those special dates, but never use more than two squirts. Brush your teeth regularly, at least twice a day, and use other dental hygiene-related items like floss and mouthwash.   Consider using lotion for the colder months so your skin stays moist and healthy to the touch., This is something simple that'll increase your daily presentation. It is easy to miss this when most jobs require you to slouch over a computer at a desk. Straightening your posture will make you look taller, stronger, and more confident.  Imagine your upper torso is molded on a coat hanger.  Eating well not only helps with your body image, but it helps yourself in several ways. Improving your diet can increase your energy, confidence, and your general well-being. These factors will help embellish other features of yourself that a woman may find attractive. Start small and be sure to drink enough water everyday (about eight glasses).   Increase the amount of fruits and vegetables you consume. Avoid carb heavy meals like bread, potatoes, pastas, and rice. You can eat these as long as they are paired with other foods that hold higher nutritional benefits. 

become physically fit.  dress to attract.  maintain your personal hygiene.  uphold good posture.  eat well. 

 Women are attracted to men with a passion in their lives. It is attractive to live outside the cookie cutter routine of eat, work, sleep, and repeat. Pick up a hobby and plan to change your hobby into your passion. Try your hand at a musical instrument, a craft like pottery, cooking, writing, running, rock-climbing, and more.   When you express a sincere passion she will respond positively.Life is too short not be passionate about something. Don’t be bashful and try your luck at something. There is nothing to lose unless you get into extreme sports.  Just relax when you’re talking to a girl. Women like it when a guy is direct; they are not mind readers. Speaking to someone you don’t know can produce a lot of anxiety for some. You can approach someone without opening yourself up to being evaluated. Eventually, you'll be confident enough to talk to them in a normal conversation. Try some of these cues:   Ask a small favor like “can you watch my stuff while I get coffee?” This creates attraction from the person doing the favor. Ask a question. Use whatever situation/location you are in to your advantage. Ask a relevant question like “have you seen this band before?” or “you think Texas could be a country?” Be whimsical if you are feeling it., A great way to prove yourself to a woman is showing her that you not only respect her, but all women. It is too common for guys to view picking up girls as a macho competition instead of wanting to get to know a woman. You can show respect by listening to what she has to say, respecting her personal space, making sure not to interrupt her, and refraining from making statements like “you wouldn’t want to do that, it’s a guy thing.”Never make fun of a girl when you’re trying to tease them. A little bit of joking is okay, but avoid anything that could be taken as offensive by someone. Generosity also goes a long way. No one likes a guy who is too stingy to have a good time. The same can be said about someone who refuses to give a dollar from time to time.  Be a fun person by acting on spontaneity. It is attractive and more interesting to be around someone willing to go on an adventure. This can also show her how interesting you can be.Being silly and having fun also shows you’re confident and not afraid of taking risks.  Careful not to be a know-it-all or overly pretentious. Most girls will like a guy who reads from time to time and is interested in the world around him. Put down the video game and pick up a book. Try getting into the habit of reading the news every morning. You’ll have more to add to a conversation when you are on top of current events.Not every girl cares about this.  Making someone laugh is a great thing and it is attractive. It is one of the most desirable traits women look for in a man. Don’t modify your humor to appeal to someone in particular. Your natural humor will attract the type of person who you’ll be able to relax around.   Laughter affects people on a chemical level. It increases the level of serotonin in our brains which causes our brain's function to work more efficiently., This doesn't always have to do with your looks, but how you think of yourself. Have confidence that you'll achieve your goals. Change your mentality: if you think you're attractive you will be attractive. Thinking positively is the first step, but then to ‘’act’’ positively will increase your self esteem even more. This can be simple like talking to people in a positive manner and focus your energy into acting this way.   Have ambitions for your life. When you have a serious drive for your life, women will take notice. Change one of your bad habits. Start small like waking up without hitting snooze two or three times or drinking 64 ounces of water a day. Start small and progressively work to improve yourself in larger ways. Do something you’ve been procrastinating. There is no time like the present. It can even be a small thing like cleaning your room. 

pursue a passion.  talk to women more often.  practice respect and kindness.  take risks to have fun.  be intellectually curious.  use your sense of humor.  be a confident person. 

 There are some universal signals that are used frequently. This is a classic flirt used by women: a girl smiles at you and then lifts her eyebrows quickly while locking into eye contact.Don’t rely on someone to initiate flirting. This will not always happen candidly. Be on the lookout for eye contact and a smile.   Don’t be afraid to make the initial flirt with someone.  Guys and girls are typically attracted to those who are in their league. When people date out of their league, relationships typically suffer because of jealousy or lack of interest.Take a moment to look at yourself in the mirror and ask yourself how attractive am I? This could be hard for some and most people need help if they don’t understand what “league” they fall into. Your physical appearance doesn’t take into account everything.   Your attractiveness also depends upon your personality (including your humor), your dance moves, your hobbies, your friends, your family life, and more. There are successful relationships where members of the couple are out of each other's league. Take this with a grain of salt and know that keeping this in mind will simply make things a little easier for you. In general if you feel a connection with someone, you probably have a shot. You are also probably in the same “league” if you feel some type of chemistry. Just go for it!  , Never limit yourself to where you should try to attract someone. You never know when the magic spark will light up. There is still a chance even if you’re working late and on the subway at night. Never shy away from an opportunity to attract a woman.   Flirting in an unusual place like a subway or waiting room shows confidence. You never know until you try it. Don’t come off as too strong. It is important to seize the moment, but do it in a way where the girl doesn’t feel uncomfortable. Employ active listening when talking to someone. This will give you more of an opportunity and show her you care. Listen to obtain information, to understand her, for enjoyment, and to learn. 

look for signals of flirting.  seek out someone in your league.  never shy from an opportunity. 

 Talking to a girl you like can be a scary experience and requires a lot of bravery and belief in yourself. Before you go and talk to her, create a list of your best attributes. Once you read over your list, you'll discover that you have a lot to be confident about. If you stand up straight you’ll automatically feel more confident. Keep your arms uncrossed to signal with your body language that you are open and friendly. Remember to try and look your best. Put on an outfit that you feel comfortable in and makes you look good.; , If you’re very nervous about talking to the girl you like, practice what you want to say in front of the mirror. Be careful not to practice too much or you may sound robotic when speaking to her in real life.  Look for the perfect opportunity to run into the girl you like. If you go to the same school, you could hang out where you know she has lunch or if you work at the same job, you could take your break at the same time she does.   Be sure to pick a place that is casual and comfortable for both of you. For example, you wouldn’t want to run into her outside of her house if you’ve never been there as that may seem creepy and scare her. Pick a time to run into her when it’s a good time to talk. For example, if she is running late to an after school activity, waiting for her after class lets out would not be a good idea as she would be rushing to leave. Try to find a time when she won't be surrounded by a big group of friends. It can be hard to approach a girl if she is with a big group of people.  The easiest opening line is a genuine compliment. Your compliment should show that you pay attention and should be specific to the girl you like. A good compliment can easily lead into a conversation.For example, if the girl you like scored a goal at her last soccer game you could say, “Congratulations on that goal! You’re an awesome soccer player. How long have you been playing for?” This compliment shows that you noticed her soccer skills, paid attention to the last game and are interested in learning more about her. Avoid generic compliments like “You’re pretty” or “You’re nice” as these can sound insincere and impersonal.  A great way to start a conversation is to ask her for help on something she has expertise in. People like to feel useful and share their knowledge.   For example, if you run into the girl you like at the library you could ask her for a book recommendation. If you both enjoy reading, this could lead to a great conversation on the latest things you’ve read or your favorite books.  Do a little detective work and discover some things your crush likes or dislikes. You may find you have some interests in common or at least something to talk about.To help figure out her interests, you can talk to some mutual friends to learn more about her. You can also check out her social media pages to see what sorts of things she likes to do. Most people love to talk about the things that they are interested in. Once you find out one of her interests you can ask her about it to learn more. For example, if you know she is interested in basketball, you can ask her how long she has been playing. This can also lead into the two of you going to play basketball together.  In order to spend more time with the girl you like, it is helpful to join something she is part of like an after school club, a team or a volunteer organization.For example, if the girl you like volunteers at a retirement home on the weekends, you could also sign up to volunteer at the retirement home. If she is part of the debate club at school and you’re interested in debate, you could join that club and spend more time with her there.  It may be tempting to hide behind a screen but you need to spend time with the girl you like in real life. Your relationship will develop when you have connections in the real world and not only over the phone or computer.  Don’t ever try to be someone you’re not. You want the girl you like to like you, not a persona you’ve invented.For example, if she is part of the school band but you don’t play an instrument, you shouldn’t join the band just to spend time with her. You could attend the band’s concerts to support her while finding another activity or interest you have in common. Remember to keep up your own interests as well. If you're spending time doing an activity that she likes, still make time to do activites that you like. Girls like when you have your own interests and hobbies.  Good communication is the key to any relationship, romantic or not. You should try and communicate everyday, whether in person, over the phone or through social media.Remember not to overdo it with your communication. If the girl you like is pulling back or cutting your conversations short, take a break from communicating. She may be busy or simply uninterested.  Make sure you are listening attentively when she talks. Keep comfortable eye contact and nod while she speaks so she knows you’re listening. Follow up with relevant questions to really show that you’re paying attention and care about what she has to say.  If she is sharing something with you, try to commit it to memory. This shows her that you care about what she is saying and that you're interested in her.   For example, if she says, “My brother, Carson, really loves basketball. He has a game this weekend,” you should remember her brother’s name. That way, after the weekend, you can say something like, “Hey! How was your weekend? How did Carson do at his game?”  , Girls love when people make them laugh. Embrace your natural sense of humor and ensure you are both having a good time whenever you hang out.You don’t have to be a stand-up comedian to make the girl you like laugh. You can share a funny story you’ve heard or a silly pun one of your friends came up with. If you’re shy or don’t think you’re funny, don’t force yourself to tell jokes. Focus on making the girl you like smile while you learn what sort of things make her laugh. For example, you could watch a comedy special together or go to an improv show and laugh together.  Drop small hints, like compliments or hanging out one on one, that show this girl you like her as more than just a friend.   For example, if you notice she is wearing a new sweater you could say, “Wow, that sweater looks great on you. You look really beautiful today.” This type of compliment is sincere, shows you notice small details and sounds romantic, which may help her to see you in a romantic way. You could also ask her to hang out one on one. For example, you could suggest a study date by saying, “Do you want to go to a cafe and study for our Spanish test tonight? Just the two of us. I’ll treat you to a cup of hot chocolate.” A great hint that you like her is giving her a gift. You want to make sure the gift is a small and thoughtful token and not something expensive and impersonal. The gift should be something you bought because it made you think of her and shows that you care.  If the girl you like is interested in you as well, she may begin to drop some hints that she wants to be more than friends. Look for moments when she is acting flirty, touching you or making plans to spend alone time with you.   She may also be dropping hints that she is not interested. If she invites other people to hang out with you or talks about other people she has feelings for, she may not be interested in anything more than friendship with you. Everyone has a slightly different way of showing that they’re interested. Just because she is showing lots of signs that she likes you doesn’t mean that she does for sure. And if she isn’t showing any signs, it doesn’t mean she’s not interested.  It’s important to be honest with the girl that you like as you’re building up your friendship. Be direct and tell her how you feel. If you think she might be feeling the same way, you could follow up by asking her on a date.For example, you could say, “I’ve enjoyed all this time we’ve been spending together lately and I really like you. Would you want to go out with me?” Make it obvious that you are inviting her on a romantic date because you have feelings for her and not just a hang out as friends. Give the girl you like time to answer. Whatever her answer, be respectful of her decision and accept how she feels.  

build up your self-confidence.  practice in the mirror.  find a way to run into her.  start with a compliment.  ask her for help.  figure out her interests.  join something she is a part of.  hang out in person.  be yourself.  communicate often.  pay attention.  remember the important details.  make her laugh.  drop hints that you like her as more than a friend.  look for signs that she likes you.  tell her how you feel. 

 If you want to attract an older woman, then confidence is absolutely key. If you're a teen, then you're probably still figuring out who you are, who your friends are, what you want to do with your life, and how you fit in. That's all fine, but when you see or hang out with the older woman, this stuff shouldn't come to the forefront. Instead, you should show her the positive thoughts you have about yourself. Hey, you may still be figuring it out, but you love who you are, you love hanging out with other people, and you love having a good time.   If she sees you noticing her, stand tall and proud. Show the woman that you're comfortable with yourself instead of trying to fit in all the time. You should speak clearly, make eye contact, and act like you know what you're talking about -- even if you don't. It's natural to have insecurities, and as you get to know the woman or older girl, you can bring those out, but you should come out strong out of the gate. Remember your competition -- older guys who are in college or who are maybe even starting their careers. If the woman sees that you're still struggling to find yourself, she'll move on.; , Being assertive means that you're comfortable enough with yourself to know what you want, and to be okay with telling people what you want. Instead of being wishy- washy or unsure, you should be clear about your needs -- whether it's that you want to get to know her, you want to take her out, or that you have a great idea for a date. Though you should respect her age and wisdom, don't defer to her all the time just because she's older, or she'll start to think that you don't have much to contribute.   Once you see the woman you like, let her see you notice her. Don't be shy about it. You can even smile at her, or approach her, if the timing is right. Don't cower in the corner. Just come up to her, even if it's only to say hi. If you want to be assertive, you have to say what you mean and mean what you say. Be clear, even if you're only introducing yourself. It's okay to get nervous, but try to minimize fidgeting, stumbling over your words, or looking at the floor because she's too beautiful.  It may be hard to get experience when you're only sixteen years old, but every little thing you do counts. This doesn't mean that you should try to hook up with as many girls as possible or to backpack across Europe to understand what life "is really all about." It does mean that you should do what you can to broaden your horizons, so the older woman will see that you have depth and that you have some things to teach her, too. If she constantly feels like she knows everything and has to "train" you to be an adult, then things will get old fast. Here are some ways to get some experience:   Travel. Spend your summer or even your spring break traveling to a new place, whether it's to Costa Rica on a service trip or just to visit a relative a few states away. The more places you see and people you meet, the more you'll see that the world is bigger than your own backyard or hometown. Date. You shouldn't date girls just to get experience, but dating even a girl or two can help you understand how to deal with women, and can also help you get some experience when it comes to hooking up. An older woman will be less likely to date you if it's obvious that you've never even had another girlfriend, because that's a big burden for her to take on. Immerse yourself in a variety of activities. You may love baseball, but if baseball is the only thing you know and love, you may run out of things to talk about with the older woman pretty quickly. Spend your Sundays volunteering, join the French culture club or school paper, or just do a few things that can help you develop a passion about a variety of subjects.  Again, though it may be difficult to feel or act mature when you're a teenager, you'll have to do your best to impress the woman. Women already mature a bit faster than men, and the difference in your maturity levels may be more noticeable if you're a few years -- or more -- younger than the woman. You should work on controlling your moods, having reasonable reactions to disappointing or upsetting situations, and minimizing your vulgar language, fart jokes, and other loud noises that may go over well with your buddies on the football team.   Part of being mature is being in control of your feelings. Let the woman see that you don't get easily angry or upset, or she'll think you're throwing a temper tantrum. Another part of being mature is to not complain about every little thing. If you complain about the minor things that irk you, the woman will think that you don't have the good sense to appreciate all of the wonderful things in your life. Avoid gossiping about your friends or other people the woman may know. She may love to gossip too, but try not to do it too much, especially at first, or she'll think that you're not mature enough to respect people who aren't in the room. Be polite to everyone you see. If you take her out, be polite to servers and anyone else you encounter. This is a big sign of maturity.  

be confident.  be assertive.being assertive is really a part of being confident.  get some experience.  be mature. 

 You should work on developing the characteristics that would make you appeal to an older woman, but you shouldn't forget to keep things fun. There must be something she likes about hanging out with or even dating a younger guy -- one of those things could be that younger guys have less baggage than older guys, and less worries about their college classes, jobs, or whatever it is the guys in her age bracket normally worry about.   There's a difference between being immature and goofing off. Every woman loves to goof off from time to time, so don't be afraid to show her the silly aspects of your personality. Make her laugh. If your sense of humor is one of your best features, don't hide it because you worry it'll make you look immature if you try to make her laugh. As long as you pick relatively tasteful jokes, you'll be fun. Keep it light. Though you want her to see that you have depth, you don't have to talk about the most serious thoughts you have late at night the second you meet her. Have a good time first -- the rest will come later.  Don't think of being younger as a hindrance -- instead, it should be something that appeals to the woman. Your boyish good looks, amazing dance moves, or goofy jokes can be exactly what the woman likes about you. Don't say, "I know I'm only seventeen, but..." Instead, act like you love being seventeen and that the world is your oyster.   Maybe you haven't done that many things, but you can impress the woman by talking about all of the things you will do, and how excited you are about life. Impress her with your energy and enthusiasm. You may be a lot more energetic than guys her own age -- and that's a good thing.  Though you obviously can't -- or shouldn't -- hide your age, you should avoid topics that make her realize how young you really are. If she's a college student and you're only in high school, then you shouldn't talk too much about the Homecoming game, your tenth period math class, or about that time when you got detention for talking back to a teacher.   You shouldn't hide high-school like aspects of your life, but you shouldn't emphasize them either. Talk about your family, friendships, or current events -- make her see you outside your high school bubble. If you're both in high school or college but you're a freshman and she's a senior, talk more about the things you want to do later in your coursework instead of what it's like to be brand-new at a school. It's likely that she's matured a lot between her freshman and senior year, and if she's constantly reminded that you're only a freshman, she'll see that you may have a lot of growing up to do.  An older woman will have more mature friendships, more varied and intense interests, and a more busy schedule. Though you may want nothing more than to spend as much time as possible with this woman, you need her to see that you have your own friends, your own schedule, and your own needs.   If you start dating each other seriously, then you may start spending a lot of time together, but if you're just trying to attract her and get her attention, you can't be clingy or she'll be turned off. If she does hang out with you, don't say, "When can I see you again?" right away. Play it cool and ask her out a few days later. Talk about your schedule. Let her see that you have a lot going on too. If she thinks that all you do is sit at home and play video games and wait for her to call, she'll be less eager to hang out with you.  

keep things fun.  use your age to your advantage.  avoid topics that make you sound young.  be independent. 

 If you want to treat an older woman right, then you absolutely have to be a gentleman. This may be a foreign concept to you, but all it really means is that you should treat her like a lady and give her kindness and respect. If you pick her up in your car, hold the passenger door open for her, and hold the door open for her if you enter a restaurant or any other location. If she comes over, take her coat and hang it up. Here are some other ways to be a gentleman:   Show up on time, or even a little early. Let her see that she means a lot to you. Always complement her. Tell her she looks stunning, beautiful, or however she may look that day. Don't be embarrassed to tell her what you really think -- this will win her over as long as you do it in moderation. Don't spit, scratch yourself, burp, or do other un-gentlemanly things. Always look nice. Make an effort to shower, groom yourself, and to wear unwrinkled and well-fitting clothing. This will show her that you've put thought and effort into seeing her. Take her out on nice dates. Don't take her to the local Burger King. You may not have a lot of spending money, but you should make an effort to do something that is at least romantic, even if it's eating at a dimly-lit sushi bar or taking a long walk on a starry night.  Don't make her think that you just have a fetish for older women and that being with her or talking to her means you've won some kind of prize. Instead, you should ask her about her interests, what she likes to do on the weekends, and about the relationships that mean the most to her. As you're getting to know her, you don't have to pry or interview her, but you should show that you want to know who she really is -- it's cool that she's four years older than you, but that's not her defining characteristic.   When you see her, ask her how her day was. It can be as simple as that. Ask her opinion on a variety of subjects, from her favorite bands to a new political candidate.  Older women tend to be more confident and experienced than younger women, which means that they can keep up a better conversation a lot of the time. While recapping last night's football game for an hour may be okay with your buddies, you should make an effort to read the papers, watch the news, and read interesting literature that makes you a more well-rounded person. This way, you'll not only broaden your horizons, but you'll have more to talk about.   If you read something really interesting that day, talk to her about it. See what she thinks. Talk about relationships. You can discuss you relationship with your siblings, or your bond with a close friend -- just don't talk about your ex girlfriend. Talk about your travel experiences. Even if all you did was spend a summer a few states away, discuss the interesting aspects of your trip. Maintain a witty banter. If she says something funny, don't just laugh, but counter her comment with another funny statement. This will show her that you can really keep up.  Though it may have been amusing or fun for her to be talking to a younger guy at first, you don't have to keep joking about how much younger you are, or how she's so much more experienced. Unless you want her calling you "junior" and thinking of you as a kid brother, you should avoid mentioning this too much, or she'll think that you're obsessing over it -- or worse, she may start obsessing over your age difference too.   Don't bring it up in front of others, either. If you're meeting her friends or introducing her to your friends, keep it cool. Her friends may not even notice that you're a bit younger if you play your cards right.  You may be so focused on trying to impress and attract an older woman that you may be forgetting who you really are. You shouldn't act like a different person completely, or she'll see right through you. No woman wants to be with a guy who isn't genuine. Remember that you're building your maturity and developing desirable qualities that would make you appeal to a woman -- or any woman, really -- but that it doesn't mean you have to be someone else completely.   If you have a secret "dorky" hobby, don't be afraid to tell her about it if it means a lot to you. Let her see the best qualities that your other friends see. The friends who are your age must like you for some reason, so don't hide your strongest qualities completely.  

be a gentleman.  show a real interest in her.  keep up a good conversation.  don't bring up your age difference all the time.  don't forget to be yourself. 

 Yes, you've all heard this a million times, but it works! If you're in the same Youth Group, talk to her about the Bible study. Ask her if she's planning on going to the meeting next week, or if she's planning on going to the up coming worship night. That sort of thing. Those are great conversation starters! Don't say, "Oh, so you help your dad clean here on Saturdays. How Interesting!" Ask her opinion.; , You can't truly love someone without getting to know them, so if you have a crush on some girl, start trying to get to know her better! Look for opportunities to share God's love together. For instance, try sitting next to her in Bible study. Don't be afraid to talk to her. More than likely, she'll be happy to start a conversation with you.  There is no greater joy than God's gift of laughter. Everyone loves to laugh. Try making a habit of engaging in some good-natured humor with your crush, you have an opportunity to strengthen the bond between the two of you, making way for greater love.  God gave every person talents and interests - capitalize on the ones your crush and you share! If the object of your affection is in to drawing and you are too, then try drawing together sometime. Or better yet, draw each other simultaneously - this is a real challenge that will probably make you laugh at how bad you both are at it.   If, on the other hand she's into something that you aren't, like queuing for hours to get an autograph, you don't have to lie and pretend to like it, but do try instead to give it a shot. Try finding out why she likes it ("So, did you learn the Yakima flute gradually, or were you a natural?") You don't have to like everything she does, but she'll really appreciate your attempts to become interested in what she likes.  Girls want to know the real you. Usually, the reason girls want boyfriends is because of the special bond a boy-girl relationship offers. Serious relationships allow a soul-to-soul intimacy that even being best friends can't replicate. A relationship, especially one founded on the love of Jesus, is no place for masculine posturing or for playing a a predefined role. Christian women appreciate strong and honest yet sensitive men - men that can laugh and can cry as well, men who can fess up, and men who can protect them yet still be kind and gentle.  Self-respect, demonstrated through the care you show yourself, is just as important to them as it is to anyone else. Pay attention to your physical appearance and hygiene. Try to stay healthy with proper diet and exercise. Keep a busy but reasonable schedule. By doing these things, not only do you make yourself more attractive, you also show the proper respect for the body you have been granted by God.  Religious people have fun too! Take your girl to the movies, a sporting event, a skating rink - anything she'd like based on her interests. Enjoy yourself, but maintain your respect for her and your love for Christ at all times by acting with tact and kindness. Above all, never, ever, force her into an uncomfortable situation.  Don't let a successful first date lead nowhere! After your date, drop hints that you would like to see her again. Say things like, "See you soon," or "Do you want to hang out next week?" If she seems game, follow through with it! Over time, it should become natural, even expected, to be dating each other.  

talk to her!,  spend more time with her.  make her laugh.  find common ground.  don't be afraid to be yourself!,  take care of yourself.  go on a date.  follow up with a second date (and another, and another...). 

 Girls are often very insecure and don't want to embarrass both themselves and you by coming on too strong, so you should make the first move. One thing that may be going through a girl's mind is, "What if he doesn't like me back? If he likes me, he can get off his shy butt and come over here and tell me!"; , If you ask a girl for her number and she rejects you, move on, as she's obviously not interested.  If, however, she does give you her number, try to only use it to arrange dates. It is all too easy to give a girl the wrong impression about how you feel. For example, constantly texting her will probably give her the idea that you are in love with her, and set very high expectations for your relationship.  Don't lead a girl on if you are going to change your mind. Of course you should not go out with her after the first date if there is no connection. If you feel there is no connection, say so early on and don't leave her hanging, this will result in resentment from her.  Let her know you are interested, but don't be too eager. See how she reacts when you start the conversation, and go from there.  Girls are much more likely to fall for you if you be yourself, rather than falling for the person you're pretending to be.  Don't behave strangely towards her around your friends. Many boys think that their friends will tease them if they are all "loved up" with their girlfriend. To make it easier, see your friends separately from your girlfriend. If you are together though, be yourself with your friends but make sure you don't leave your girlfriend out.  To get a girl to kiss you, you should be sure first that she likes you back. Then hint, touch her arm and look into her eyes, or look at her lips then at her. It is a good idea to make some contact before the kiss, so holding her hand or tucking her hair behind her ear is a good start. Lean in - but slowly so that if she doesn't look up for it you can just touch her arm and say something instead. If she leans toward you as well then good! Move your head slightly to one side first and she will follow. If she pulls away before you expected, don't be awkward, just act like you wanted it to end then as well. Don't pressure her into anything.  If a girl is hitting on you and you aren't interested, make it clear. Sure, she might get upset, but that is better than going along with it and breaking up with her later. 

make the first move.  accept rejection.  be careful.  don't trick her.  be friendly.  act casual and be yourself.  be consistent.  the kiss.  be clear.  remember, the most important thing: be yourself!  

 Often, one of the things a Christian girl will find most attractive in a guy is a heart for God. A great way to display this love is to become a devout believer. You'll probably want to attend mass regularly (especially the masses she attends) and to take an active interest in scripture. However, you'll want to avoid extreme forms of dogmatism - don't use your religion to criticize her or impose limits on her. Everyone hates condemnation - any conviction should come from HER conscience, and if she asks you for advice, listen and share.  She's a Christian girl, so, chances are, she'll want a boy who will treat her like a real woman. Conduct yourself like a Christian should, by treating her with respect. Be a gentleman to her in whatever way you know how. To some, this will mean opening doors, carrying her books, and offering her your seat, while, to others, such traditional displays of respect will seem outdated. Never be casually lewd around her. Talking dirty may impress your friends, but most Christian girls will be off-put by this sort of talk. Some will show a wild side when they're more comfortable around you, while others never will.  If you are both very religious, you may want to pray for the object of your affections and (cautiously) ask her to do the same for you. You may ask for general well-wishing prayers, or for guidance from God for something specific you are struggling with in your walk with God. This has the potential for awkwardness, so try to avoid sharing intensely personal details until you are very close with this person. Instead, you may want to speak in generalities - sometimes, just asking for a prayer with no other explanation is enough.  Your Christian girlfriend should be a very important part of your life, but not your reason for living. If your love for Jesus isn’t motivation enough to grow in maturity and pursue godliness, then you are not ready for a Christian woman. Your first goal as a Christian man should be to grow in your relationship with God and to keep him at the center of your life. Do this before you think of starting a close relationship with any Christian woman. Only when Jesus is placed in the middle of the relationship and, more importantly, your own life, you can truly experience love as it is meant to be.  Most Christian girls are very classy, and they want classy men. Open the doors for her, pull out her chair, and always pay for the date. Remember to be polite and respectful around her family! Most Christian moms, and especially fathers, look for this in guys. They want a guy to treat her daughters right and be polite! By doing that, parents will probably approve of your relationship with her much more quickly, and it might give you a better chance to be alone with her quickly!  

have a strong, healthy love for the lord.  treat her with respect.  pray for her and ask her to pray for you.  put the lord first.  act like a gentleman! 

 When a girl likes you, she will face in your direction. If a girl has her torso turned towards you in an open manner, this means that she is confident talking with you. If she has a closed body position, namely crossed arms or legs, she may be shy or nervous to talk to you or she may simply be creating a barrier to signal that she is uninterested.When she is sitting with her legs crossed, watch her feet. If they are pointed towards you, it might mean that she likes you and wants to get closer to you.; , If a girl likes you, she will tend to either hold her gaze on you for a few seconds or glance down the moment your eyes make contact with hers. Either of these responses could mean that she likes you. If she pulls away quickly, it often means she is nervous or not ready to reveal her true intentions yet, but she may still like you.   When a girl likes you, her pupils might dilate, though this will be hard to tell.If you happen to glance at the girl and you see her staring back at you, this could mean that she likes you.  The way you interpret a girl's body language will vary depending on the context. For example, if you're talking one-on-one with a girl, her touching your arm for a few seconds could be considered flirting. However, if she quickly taps your shoulder to get your attention and tell you that your friend is looking for you, she may really just be trying to help, not flirt.   If you are having an intense conversation, a girl may look at you without breaking eye contact. This does not necessarily mean she likes you. It could just be a conversational practice of hers. However, if she makes eye contact with you for an extended period of time without talking, or if she looks at you and breaks away the minute you look back at her, she may be intrigued by you.  When a girl likes you, she will often try to touch you, as this is a noticeable yet still subtle way to flirt. It allows a girl to size up how responsive you are. She may touch your arm when you say something funny, “accidentally” brush your shoulder or hands with hers, or gently place her hand on your knee.   Not all girls will feel comfortable reaching out using touch. In this case, don't assume that she doesn't like you just because she doesn't try to touch you. She may be too nervous to do so. If you like her, don't be shy––break the touch barrier yourself and see how she responds. She may also find other reasons to touch you, such as softly punching your arm. These "one-of-the-mates" moves can be a thinly disguised way of getting closer to you without it being too evident to your friends and hers.  This is especially significant if her random hugs are reserved mostly for you. Hugs are a friendly, affectionate way of getting closer to you and touching you without it necessarily compromising her stealthy flirting skills. Return the hug if you like her back, or gently refuse her hug if you don’t want her to get the wrong impression.  If a girl imitates you - for example, if you run your fingers through your hair and you notice her do the same a few seconds later - she may be subconsciously mirroring your movements. This can be a tell that she likes you., Gently twirling strands of her hair or partaking in other grooming behaviors like running her hands through her hair could be signs of flirting.  When a girl likes you, she will touch her lips, collarbone, or neck to draw your attention to these areas. She may even apply lipstick in front of you., This may be her way of signaling to you that she’s comfortable and happy in your presence. When a girl likes you, she may also laugh at your jokes (regardless of how funny they actually are).  

look at her stance.  pay attention to eye contact.  take context into account.  notice if she touches you or tries to get closer.  pay attention to whether she randomly hugs you.  see if she mirrors your moves.  notice if she’s playing with her hair.  look for signs of nervousness or fidgeting.  notice if she smiles around you. 

 If a girl compliments you, she could very well like you. This may be her way of making you feel desired.   She might say things like “you have amazing eyes” or “you’re so athletic - do you play any sports?”  , If you see most of her friends glancing back at you and smiling or giggling, this probably means that she has told her friends about you and they're "in the know." In some cases, a friend may actually be bold enough to come and tell you that her friend likes you.   When she is having a conversation with her friends and you come over, they might stop talking all of a sudden. This likely means that you were the subject of the recently ended conversation.  When a girl likes you, she will often try to impress you with her style. She may choose to wear slightly revealing clothes or put on lipstick to catch your eye.Every girl has a different sense of style, and not all girls will try to dress as aforementioned when they like somebody. However, if you notice that the girl you’re wondering about dresses a little more nicely around you, it could be a sign that she wants to impress you.  When a girl likes you, she may tease you lightly about certain things you do or say. Ways of teasing include calling you out on a joke that actually wasn’t that funny, poking fun at something you’re wearing, or lightly telling you that you’re trying too hard.  She may “friend” you on social media, talk to you in person every day after class, or text you randomly. These could be signs that this girl is intrigued and wants to get to know you more.   This alone is not a definitive sign that a girl likes you. A girl who just wants to be friends may also try to engage in conversation with you. But if a girl tries to talk to you often, exhibits a number of flirty body language cues, and compliments you often, she may be trying to tell you that she likes you.  When a girl likes you, she will want to know whether you are single or not so that she can decide if she should flirt with you. She may directly ask you if you have a girlfriend or she may use a subtler approach.   She might tease you by saying things like “I bet you went to see that movie with your girlfriend.” If you like her, use this as an opportunity to flirt back. You could say “I don’t have a girlfriend, but I have been meaning to see that movie...want to go with me Friday night?”  , When a girl likes you, she may pretend to be in a mildly vulnerable situation to test your response. For example, if you're outside and the girl you like starts saying "I'm cold!" that's a subtle hint that she wants you to give her your sweater. Doing so is a very sweet gesture, especially if you want to show the girl that you like her.   Sometimes a girl will pretend to be really bad at doing something, like saying she doesn’t understand the homework. That is your chance to offer some assistance; be aware that she will most likely be doing this on purpose just to test your reaction in hopes that you will help out. When offering assistance, if she doesn't fancy you but there is somebody she likes in the room, she may pout or show other signs of disappointment if you offer to help first. In this case, at least you'll know how she feels and will be able to move on.  If she's always there for you when you need her, she might like you. But don't assume that she's into you only from one experience. Ask her occasionally for small things, like chewing gum or a pen, and notice how she reacts. If she's eager to help you and shows other signs of liking you, then she very well might.   Don’t use this approach too much or a tasks that seem too difficult, she may think you're lazy, testing her, or are even a bit of a nuisance. So don't overdo it; you don't want to risk her ceasing to like you if she indeed does.  If a girl flirts with you, it doesn’t necessarily mean that she likes you. She may just get a thrill out of flirting, or she may not even notice that she’s flirting. The best way to see if she is just flirting with you and it’s not just her naturally flirty demeanor coming through is to notice how she acts around other people.   If she treats you differently than she does others, be it by holding eye contact just a bit longer with you than with anybody else or by being gentler in her teasing with you, then she may like you.  

be receptive to compliments.  observe her friends’ reactions.  notice her style.  be mindful of gentle, friendly teasing.  notice if she makes excuses to talk to you.  notice if she mentions your relationship status.  look for "damsel in distress" moments.  test her interest by asking her for help.  notice how she acts around others. 

 A natural, genuine, carefree smile is the perfect way to let a girl know that you like being around her. It will also let her know that you’re a happy person, and since happiness can be contagious, she’ll associate positive emotions with you. If she returns your smile, you can bet she feels comfortable around you., This is a great way to gauge her interest level. As you talk, notice if she gives you any signs or hints that she likes you or if uses vaguely romantic language. She could also show her interest in you by nodding frequently or repeating some of your phrases.   To start a conversation, you can ask her an open-ended question about class, work, or pop culture. It could be something as simple as “what do you think about this band?” or “how’s your day going?” Don’t fret if the girl you like doesn’t initiate a conversation with you. If she likes you, she may be too shy or nervous to do so! Even if she seems like the most confident girl you know, she may have had a bad experience in the past or simply may not be ready to approach you yet but will be receptive if you start the conversation first. If you’re already friends, starting a conversation will be easy. In this case, the most effective way to tell if she likes you is to pick up on body language cues or to see if she treats you differently than she does her other friends.  If you like the girl, put your best foot forward by remembering a few small details about the things she tells you. Listen carefully to the things she says so that you will have them for future reference.   For example, if she tells you the name of her favorite band, bring up one of the band’s songs during your next chat. She’ll be impressed that you took notice! If she wasn’t already interested in you romantically, she might start to reconsider once she sees how attentive you are. Talking also provides another opportunity to observe her body language, so watch for physical cues such as subtle touches.  Only do this if you actually do like her and if you get the sense that she likes you back. This is a blunt move which can seem daunting, but if you like the girl and are fairly certain she might like you back, a bold approach which could open the door to you asking her out on a date with the certainty that she likes you back.   You can let her know you’re interested by saying something like “I really like having you as a friend, but I’d love to be more than friends.” Don’t tell her you like her if you are just looking to satisfy your curiosity about her interest in you. This can be hurtful and can sever her trust in you.  If you like the girl but aren’t sure if she likes you back, you can test the waters by saying “I’ve been hearing great things about this movie,___. Would you like to come see it with me?” Keep the tone casual. If she says yes, you’ll know she’s interested. If she says no, you can change the conversation to something else.  Back off if you get the sense that she actually doesn’t like you or engage in a flirty banter if you sense there is mutual interest.   If the girl you like objects to your romantic advances, even when you thought she liked you back, don't take it personally. A good relationship starts with a strong mutual connection. Moreover, there are plenty of other girls who will be right for you.  Trying to figure out whether a girl likes you can be all-consuming and distracting. Over-analyzing her behavior may result in your becoming obsessed with simply "winning her over" rather than getting to know her as a person.   Rather than investing tons of time in determining whether or not she likes you, take opportunities every now and then to spend time with her and her friends. Just make sure to make your intentions relatively clear (via subtle flirting), or else you may become permanently "friend-zoned."  

smile at her.  strike up a conversation.  be attentive.  suggest that you like her.  ask her out.  be receptive to her signals.  avoid overanalyzing. 

 This is the first and most important step. It doesn't matter if she is younger than you, before you ever engage in a relationship, you need to get a better understanding of each other. For most girls, a good conversation is a turn-on and may open her eyes to you. Ask questions about her, her family, what she likes to do, etc. This could also help decide if she is the girl for you, or if maybe you don't like her as much as you thought you did. If you have your eyes set on a girl in her young teens, remember how young she is. Maybe not ready for the kind of relationship that you are ready for, at whatever age you are. So you may have to wait or dismiss the idea that you will ever go out; , She'll be able to tell if you're constantly mentioning it, which will make you seem less genuine and truthful.  Resist the urge to just ask her out. Real relationships take time and effort to build. Besides, randomly asking her out will confuse her and increase your chances of being turned down.  Ask her how she's doing today. Don't ignore her in front of your friends just because she is younger. Show your interest, first in a platonic sense. This will let her know that you care, first as a friend, and then later as something more. A really good idea is to invite her along and get her to feel included.  But only when you feel like your relationship has progressed to that point. Subtle romantic gestures are cute, such as random flowers. Use your knowledge of her to think of specific ideas that will make her swoon. Perhaps wait until she starts to flirt with you  , Maybe she doesn't want to date you. Maybe she isn't ready. Above all, you must remember that a relationship takes two people. Don't pressure her into anything she doesn't want to do.  Any skill worth having is worth developing, and like anything, this is a skill that takes time. If at first you don't succeed, keep trying with someone else. There's plenty of fish in the sea, and the best fishermen don't fish for the fish itself, they fish just for the experience of fishing. Try catch-and-release for a while until you get comfortable. You can learn what to do with your catch later.  

get to know her.  show her that you like her regardless of her age.  don't rush into it.  be friendly and caring.  flirt!,  be understanding.  practice, practice, practice! 

 Naturally, don't change yourself; just try to see if some of those interests enthuse you and adjust a little.; , Do this progressively, so as not to freak her out with your sudden interest in her sporting activities.   Ask her about some sports and video games, riding bikes and outdoor activities. Try some things she does and see if you like the game or the sport or activity.  Most girls love funny guys, even if they are tomboys. Even if it's bad puns, be funny. It's vital.  It is not really a good idea to compliment a tomboy on her outfit. The chances are that she became a tomboy to avoid the whole girly-girl cutesy thing.  Girls (and tomboys) don't like guys hitting on them when they have a boyfriend already.  Do this in a way that isn't that noticeable and more by way of mate-ship. If you persevere and keep it casual but kind, after a time, she will start to find herself liking you.   Show affection. Talk to her as much as possible. Joke around.  After awhile, if she shows signs that she likes you too then you can turn up the flirting a notch. Don't play too easy though; then she won't feel that she is powerful, and most girls like thinking they have a sense of power over love. Love should be shared, not be a power struggle.   Make physical contact. Hold her hand and look them in the eye and say something funny, then smile. It's often the way that tomboys make friends and it gets easier for you both if the guy puts his hand on her shoulder or just tries to grab her hair.  If she is the confident tomboy many tomboys are, then she might either ask you out or tell you she likes you. If she doesn't do this, then ask her out.  For example, a baseball game or a Minecraft night. Most definitely don't ask to go to the mall or a restaurant that requires anything fancy, since tomboys would show up in jeans anyway.  

learn about what her interests are and start getting interested in them.  play sports with her or hang out with her.  find out some funny jokes.  leave the clothing compliments aside.  make sure she is available before making your move on her.  slowly but confidently start flirting with her.  build things up.  be patient.  ask her out to a place where a tomboy would go. 

 Talk to her like you would to anyone else. If you ignore her, she'll think that you are angry with her. That is not a good place to start a relationship.; , Explain it to her that you are sorry for any upset you have caused her (girls love to know that a guy truly cares). Straighten out any rumors that are flying around. Make sure that in doing this, you're not pressuring her.  It'll help her feel more relaxed and show that you take time for her.  Compliment her, but not too much or you'll sound obsessive. Make sure you only compliment her if what you are saying is sincere.  Talk to her, but act like she doesn't know you fancy her. Do not pretend not to like her because its not polite or nice to her and then you will never have a chance with her.  Just because you like her does not mean you withhold any helpful views from her. If you feel that she must know something, say it frankly but gently. She will appreciate you.   If she is mature enough, she may also consider you to be a gentleman.  The message is to be nonchalant. Liking someone puts one's dignity under risk as most feel vulnerable and curb the desire to hurt the girl. One way you could maintain a stand or save face is by being relaxed and minding your own business. For that you must have some business. Engage into productive and positive activities and see yourself appear brighter before her and the rest of the crowd. Being busy will also guard you against being overtly exposed to any shock or disappointment if any.  

give her a few days to think about your offer, but don't avoid her.  find some time alone with her.  talk to her in other places that you normally see her.  be encouraging.  act normal.  don't rule out frankness.  have a life. 

 Eye contact and smiling are signals that indicate that you are interested in someone else.If she returns your glances or smiles back, then it might be a sign that she would feel comfortable talking to you.   Other signs that she may like you is if keeps looking into your direction or plays with her hair when she's looking at you.Don't stare into her direction and make her feel uncomfortable. Just look at her long enough for her to notice.; , Keep your shoulders back and your posture straight while you maintain your smile. Doing this will show the girl that you feel confident in your actions and may make her more receptive to talking to you. Don't slouch, look scared, or look unsure.Don't rush up to the girl. Walk slowly, deliberately, and with confidence. It's easier to approach a girl if you know who she is or have interacted with her in the past. If she's talking to someone else, wait until their conversation is over before walking up to her.  If you haven't interacted with the girl in the past, she may not know your name. Make sure that you introduce yourself, then ask her a question to get the conversation started.   Good questions include "Are you having a good day?" and "Don't we have the same class together?" If you share the same hobby or interest, ask them a question about your hobby. Say something like "My favorite artist is Drake. Who do you like?"  , Once the conversation dies down, go and do something else. If she doesn't want to talk to you, she may just be nervous. In both cases, walk away and then try to talk to her again in the future.   If you aren't good at maintaining a conversation, that's okay, because chances are the girl you'll be talking to will have a lot to say.Pay attention to what she's talking about and respond to what she's saying. The more you listen and allow her to talk, the more likely she will want to talk to you in the future. Don't interject or try to speak over her. Don't be overbearing with advice if she asks you for it. Suggest what you think is best, but say "It's up to you in the end."  , If you go to the same school as a girl, you may have a chance to approach them during lunch or recess. If you have the same teachers, see if you can speak to them before or after class. If none of your classes are the same, then try to catch them in the hallway between classes or at other events that your school is hosting.   If you play the same sport, see if you can talk to her before or after practice. Take opportunities to be in the same group for classroom assignments or projects. Don't expect it to be a long conversation when you first start talking to a girl. Start with short talks until she feels comfortable with you.  Try to find common interests with the girl. It could be a video game, music, cartoon, show, movie, or comic book character that you both like. If you can find a shared interest, you'll have a lot more to talk about.   Try to notice things about what she owns and wears. For instance, if she has a shirt with her favorite show, then you'll know what kind of shows she's interested in.  Fifth grade is a hard year for both girls and boys. Girls are usually undergoing changes physically and emotionally, so it's important you try to see things from their perspective.If she doesn't like you, it's not your fault. It just means that she prefers other things.   Try to find another girl to approach if the one that you like is giving you the cold shoulder.  An excellent way to put someone at ease is to be funny. If people know that you're a funny person, it won't be as stressful for the girl if you approach her. This is particularly the case in situations that would otherwise be awkward or tense.   If you can make a girl laugh at your jokes, it will make approaching her feel much less stressful.  

smile and make eye contact to get her attention.  walk up to the girl with confidence.  introduce yourself and ask her a question.  don't try to force the conversation.  find a good time to talk to her.  talk about things that she finds interesting.  don't be upset if she doesn't want to talk to you.  try to be funny and don't be too serious. 

 You can say "hello" in the morning or make eye contact during class to get her attention. The point is for her to notice you, so that when you approach her it's not awkward because she already knows who you are. Also, making eye contact with her will show that you're interested in becoming friends.   Don't stare at them because it could be considered creepy or rude., If you feel nervous and anxious about approaching her and you just can't do it, then it might be a good idea to pass her a note or leave it in her locker. Make sure to include a way for her to contact you, like email address or phone number, and let her know that you want to be friends.   Keep in mind that she may be nervous too. If she doesn't respond to the note, you might have to approach her. If you want to be safe, don't make the note romantic. It might come off the wrong way and scare her off. Talk about being friends at first.  Talking to her or passing her a note at the wrong time could get you both in trouble, which is a terrible way to start things off. Don't talk to her while your teacher is instructing or any other time that you should be silent. Wait for times where you're allowed to talk, like during lunch or recess, to start a conversation.   Your note can say something like "Hey Jessica, I think you're cool and noticed you're into Drake. Would you want to hang out anytime and listen to his new album?"  , Many girls in fifth grade tend to a have a lot of good friends, so you can talk to one of them before approaching the girl. Be aware that in fifth-grade girls care about social cliques in school. Consider who the girl's friends are, and if they like you before talking to them.If her friends pick on your or tease you, don't try to talk to them. Say something like, "Hey, you know your friend Anna? I think she's cool. Do you think she would want to talk to me?"  , Most kids in fifth grade still have assigned seats. If this is the case, ask if you can get your seat switched to sit next to her for the day. It doesn't have to be a permanent thing, but it will give you the time to talk to her.   You can tell the aid that you want to speak to the girl about a class assignment or project. If you don't have assigned seats, check to see if there are open seats around her.  

get her attention during class.  pass her a note or leave it in her locker.  wait for the right time to avoid getting in trouble.  talk to one of her friends.  ask an aid if you can sit next to her during lunch. 

 If you both share the same friends, it might be less stressful if you ask one of them to introduce you to the girl you want to approach. In this case, you can approach the girl with your friend, and she will most likely already be open to meet you.   Ask your friend "Do you mind introducing me to Morgan? I want to be her friend." When your friend introduces you to the girl, some good things to say are, "Are you having fun here? What's your favorite thing about this place?" or "What school do you go to?"  , Girls look for confidence in people, and it's important that you don't take too long to approach her.The longer you take, the more awkward it will feel when you finally decide to approach.   If she doesn't like you, you weren't meant to be friends in the first place, but there isn't anything wrong with you. Practice makes perfect. The first time you approach a girl, it might not go well, but you'll learn from every experience and become better at it over time.  Stay respectful at all times. Don't make negative comments about her appearance, or make fun of her. Even though your friends may laugh, it can ruin your relationship with a girl.   Stay away from sexual jokes or things that are disgusting. You can tease a girl a little bit, but don't go too far and hurt her feelings. If she's not smiling or laughing, you know you've gone too far.  If it looks like she's having fun with her friends, then you may want to wait till after she's done. Some girls in fifth grade are concerned with social status, and will probably want to make sure that you're cool enough to her friends. She may be pressured by her friends to ignore you. 

get a mutual friend to introduce you.  overcome your fear and go for it.  don’t make inappropriate jokes.  wait until she's alone before trying to approach her. 

 If you and the girl who likes you aren’t close but it’s clear that she likes you, start small and bring up a common interest. This will break the ice, make things less awkward, and establish a bond that you can progress from.If you’re on the soccer team and she’s on the volleyball team at school, consider starting a conversation about sports. Start a conversation about a class you have together by saying something like, “I’m so glad that last chapter is over with. What did you think about last night’s reading?”; , A unique, tasteful compliment can go a long way. Whether you’re referencing a physical characteristic or personality trait, giving a girl a compliment is a great way to express your affection, especially if you remain composed and relaxed when you do this.Complimenting her here and there is better because too often might make her annoyed or uneasy.   If she tells you that she did well on a test that she got back today, you might say, “That’s great! It doesn’t surprise me at all; you’re very smart and hard-working.” If she has particularly attractive blue eyes, you might say, “I really like your eyes. They’re a very pretty blue.”  , Smiling a lot and looking her in the eye at appropriate moments communicate that you’re confident and interested. This is a good first step in beginning to flirt with her. Be careful not to stare, because excessive eye contact often seems creepy.   Acknowledge her in the hallway by giving a casual wave, smiling, and making brief eye contact.  Since she likes you, she might lean in closer when talking to you or turn her hips, torso, and feet to face your direction.Mirror movements like these to show her that you like her too.  Holding a door open for someone is always a nice gesture, but doing it every time seems a little over-the-top, even to someone who likes you. Avoid big gestures like giving her flowers because this might be off-putting and overwhelming. It isn’t an appropriate time in your barely budding relationship to give a gift like this. Wait until you’ve been dating someone for a while., If you’re shy, liking one of her statuses on Facebook, leaving her a sweet comment on an Instagram photo, or even just friending or following her on social media are easier ways to show that you like her and are paying attention to her., Especially since you like her back, it might be tough to not text her several times in a row, write long passages, or confront her about not responding.This usually comes off as clingy, so as a good rule of thumb, stay relaxed and text her as much as she texts you.  In today’s world, texting has become the norm and calling a love interest is seen by many women as an act of courage.If your conversations in person and via text are long, comfortable, and natural, calling is the next step to take.  

strike up a conversation if you want to get to know her better.  compliment her from time to time.  smile often and make eye contact.  mirror her body language.  be chivalrous, but don’t overdo it.  communicate with less pressure via social media.  text her frequently, but not too eagerly.  be bold and give her a call. 

 The best way to show that you don’t like her as more than a friend is by acting like it isn’t happening. If you just act normal while she’s making her feelings obvious, she will probably eventually realize why., Exhaust all other options before you tell a girl directly that you aren’t interested in her. Since she has feelings for you, she will most likely be hurt and embarrassed if you reject her so harshly. Keep your conversations with her relatively brief and don’t deviate too much from small talk. If this doesn’t do the trick, try hinting in one or more of the following ways to insinuate that you aren’t interested in a more subtle way:   Be unreceptive when she tries to make plans to meet up in the future. Tell her that you’re in a relationship with someone else. Tell her you’re really busy and don’t have time for a relationship right now., She will probably make small movements and position her body in a way that is welcoming. To show that you don’t feel the way she does, counter her movements. If she sits a little too close to you, scoot away from her a little bit.Also consider crossing your arms sometimes when she approaches you. This is a natural sign of resistance., If you’ve tried to be clear in other ways and she’s still being forward, it’s probably time to be direct. Remember to speak to her the way you’d like to be spoken to if you were in her position. Try using “I” statements to keep the conversation more about you. Listing reasons why you don’t like her is rude and will damage her confidence, so don’t do that. Instead, try saying one of these statements:   “I’m really sorry, but I don’t see you that way.” “I think you’re great, but I’m looking for something else right now.” “I’ve enjoyed talking with you, but I’m not really feeling a romantic connection between us.”, Since you don’t like her more than a friend, keep your texts friendly, but short and relatively infrequent. Texting her too much can give her the wrong idea, which could get her hopes up and make her feel more disappointed later on.  

ignore her advances if you aren’t interested.  drop hints before you tell her you don’t like her.  counter her body language.  be honest, kind and clear if she’s not getting the hint.  text her in a kind but minimal manner. 

 There are lots of different ways to tell a girl that she's beautiful and they don't always mean just saying "You're beautiful" to some girl. Anyone can do that. If you want to stand out, you've got to get a little creative.   Choose how you want to deliver the compliment. Do you want to talk to the girl in person, or do you want to do something like write her a letter or text her telling her about how beautiful you think she is. Writing a letter is fun and old-fashioned and something very few people do nowadays. She'll definitely remember a letter telling her she's beautiful.; , Instead of just telling her she's beautiful, accompany it with an action. This could be as simple as giving her a flower (or an origami flower) or small, individual token when you give her the compliment.   You could give her a small item and say 'I just wanted to make sure you know how beautiful you are.'  , Just saying "You're beautiful" is very vague. What about her do you find beautiful? Does she have gorgeous green eyes or long, thick curly hair?   You should also consider inner and outer beauty. Instead of telling how beautiful she looks, say something like "I love how you manage to light up an entire room just by being you."  , Just blurting out 'you're beautiful' to a girl probably isn't going to do much for her or you, especially if either of you are drunk. Telling a girl she's beautiful (if you're looking to do it properly) needs to be properly timed.   Try to do it at an unusual time. Most girls have been told they're beautiful when they're all dressed up for a night out. Try telling her she's beautiful just after she's come back from the gym, or when she's not wearing any make-up. It'll feel more meaningful and sincere.  Instead of looking at this moment as you putting yourself out there, try to think of it as you trying to make someone's day brighter. This way you'll feel better about yourself and you'll find it easier to tell the girl she's beautiful.   Being nervous is okay, though. You can even tell her "I really wanted to tell you how beautiful you are, but you make me really nervous."  , When you're telling her that you find her beautiful, be authentic about it. Focus on what you do indeed find beautiful about her, in terms of looks and in terms of personality.  Words like "beautiful" and "pretty" and "hot" have been way overused and don't have that much meaning, anymore. try to find different words to describe her that mean beautiful, or can get across how beautiful you find her.   To name a few fun and different ones: "radiant," "breathtaking," "elegant," "riveting," or "dazzling."  , Telling a girl that she's beautiful can be part of your way to let a girl know that you'd like to have a better and more meaningful connection with her. Tell the girl that you love to be with her, that you find her beautiful and her presence makes you happy.  

choose the right means.  link it with an action.  consider what you want to highlight with your compliment.  pick the right time.  be confident.  be authentic.  use more creative words.  take it deeper. 

 Pay attention to the scenario, and mold your invitation to the circumstances. Don't, for example, ask her a random astronomy question when she's shopping for shoes. Here are a different ways to accomplish this:   If you want to strike up a conversation with a girl you don't know, try making a recommendation. For example, if you see a beautiful girl at a coffee shop, and she looks undecided about her order, then recommend your favorite drink or tell her that you're going to guess exactly what she wants just by looking at her. When you already know the girl, start with some common ground. If you're in school together, then make a comment about classes or talk about your extra curricular activities. If you're working together, then start a chat about some workplace news, or ask for her help with something that you're working on. Ask her for a minor favor. For example, ask her to watch your stuff (like your phone) while you go get her something to drink. Girls will feel more interested in you if they've done a favor for you. It will also make them feel trustworthy and maybe even curious.Pay her a compliment. If she looks great that day or if she said something amazing during class, then tell her so. Compliment her hair, or her smile, or her dress. Stay away from her more feminine features. Make sure your compliment is genuine and not phony.; , You want to show her that you're interested in her while at the same time deciding whether she's really worth your interest.A great question will make her think, laugh, and like you, all at the same time.   Avoid "yes" and "no" questions. A question like, "Did you like the new movie that came out this weekend?" will get you either a "yes" or a "no" but may not launch a meaningful conversation. Instead, ask her what other movies she's seen and why she likes them. This type of question will get a much longer answer from her. Girls often like guys to make the first move. Instead of waiting for her to ask you questions, be proactive and do the asking first. Once she's answered your question, nod and then provide your own perspective. You want a balanced conversation in which you find out what she's all about while also sharing parts of yourself. Find out what she's passionate about. If you like this girl, then chances are you find something about her really fascinating. Ask her why she likes what she likes, or why she thinks what she thinks. Ask her something that you genuinely want to learn more about instead of asking questions just to get her to talk. If you're insincere, she'll know, and your conversation will be dead in the water.  People love to talk about themselves. If you find out what she's passionate about, the conversation will go naturally and easily. This is the easiest way to build a connection.  You want to find out as much as you can about her, but you also want to make sure that you show yourself at your best.   Talk about a subject that makes you feel passionate and persuasive. When you're talking about something really positive, you're going to be at your best. If you're passionate about music, then talk about your favorite bands. If you have something that you love to do, then talk about it with her. Make sure that you give her equal time. You definitely want to share something about yourself, but if you only talk about you, she's going to think you're self-centered, and she's not going to talk to you. Don't offer opinions about subjects you know nothing about. Your goal is to impress the girl with your wit, your conversation, and your intelligence. If you blather about something you're opinionated but uninformed about, you won't come off as very intelligent.  You're not going to be able to think of something to say at every point during the conversation, and that's completely okay. Pauses are a natural part of conversation. Get her comfortable with the idea of pauses by using pauses or deliberations sparingly in your own speech.   Smile at her, take a sip from your drink or look around the room until you come up with something new to say. As long as you seem confident and interested, she'll wait with a lot of anticipation for the next step in the conversation. If you look nervous or stare at your feet, then she'll feel uncomfortable, and she's likely to say "see you later." Use pauses throughout the conversation. When you pause, look as though you are carefully considering what you want to say. She'll be invested in trying to find out what you're going to say next, and she may feel compelled to fill the silence with her own conversation. People's rate of speech naturally synchronizes when they're talking. That means that people unconsciously mimic how quickly the other person is talking. So if you talk slowly, she'll talk slowly, and the conversation will last longer. The secret to talking slowly is being confident, not nervous. Think of the pauses as her chance to impress you. Don't feel like you need to generate topic after topic for conversation. During the pause, you want to silently invite her to take the initiative. If she does, then you'll know that she's enjoying talking to you., Don't delve into any controversial subjects or anything that she may find uncomfortable. Also, don't gossip about other people, because she may think that you're not genuinely nice.   Use your sense of humor. Don't dive in with a really off-color joke or something that could be shocking to her. Keep it light and test the waters before you say anything that she might think is mean or offensive. Practice funny stories. More than simply jokes, people love hearing stories about funny things that happened to you. So keep track of funny or entertaining things that happened to you and rehearse the story you want to tell with friends. Know your pop culture. Keep up on the latest celebrity news and what's new in movies and music. When you know what's going on out there, you'll always have something light to talk about. Plus, you might just impress her with the number of things that you know.  For yourself, use great eye contact, sit up straight and smile warmly. When you do these things, she'll feel as though you're focused on her.   Watch the way she uses her body. If she makes eye contact with you, lightly touches your arm or leans in toward you while you're talking, then you can feel confident that she's into you. Make sure you're projecting good body language, too. Don't cross your arms, tap your feet, sigh or groan audibly. All these tics are signs that you're bored or dissatisfied with her. If she's constantly looking away, fiddling with her drink or her jewelry or looking like she can't wait to escape, then you may be losing her interest. You can try saying something like, "Are you having a bad day? You look like you're a million miles away." Or, if the conversation hasn't been all that interesting to begin with, just politely say, "Nice talking to you" and walk away.  Let her know that you think she's important. Don't be cagey about turning the spotlight on you. Instead, focus it mainly on her.   Turn off your cell phone while you're having a conversation with a girl. If you go outside to take a call, you may come back and find that she's moved on. If you run into friends, introduce your friends to her but remain focused on your conversation. Try to send nonverbal signals to your friends letting them know that they need to talk to you another time.  Tell her that you enjoyed talking to her and getting to know her. If you felt a real connection to her, ask for her phone number. The next morning, send her a text saying that you had a great time, and wish her a good day. You might get a second chance at continuing that initial conversation if she texts you back.   A good rule of thumb is to wait a least a day before you call her, especially if you approached her as a stranger. You don't want her to think you're too forward, and you don't want to appear too needy, so it is best to delay for a day. When you call her, keep things short and sweet. Unless she's really enjoying the conversation, simply ask her if she'd want to see a movie or go out for coffee and leave it at that. You want to impress her in person, where you can do better damage-control if something goes wrong. Keep it low key until you know that she really likes you. She may feel a bit weird if you're pushing really hard and she's not, so try to get a good balance going. And at all times, keep the conversation flowing.  

start things off to invite her to talk.  ask her some questions.  make yourself look good throughout the conversation.  accept pauses.  keep the conversation light.  focus on body language.  keep the attention always on her.  end on a good note if she tells you that she has to leave. 

 Walk over the entire pasture and check for anything that could harm your horse. Such things to watch out for would be: glass,ragwort, barbed wire, splintered wood, large (or even small) pieces of metal, and holes. These can all cause serious harm, or even death, to your animal if not removed, so take careful note.; , Do not pick up or fill in anything in the first run-through of the pasture. Make a map of the pasture, and mark where there are problem areas that have any of the aforementioned problems. This will help you later when you are doing the final run-through, as well as help you notice any pattern in the locations of debris. If you see broken glass or pieces of man-made materials in a certain area more than once, make a mark on the map, and check the surrounding area extra carefully, just in case something was broken or dumped around that area, and spread.  With a large plastic garbage bag, thick rubber gloves, and a shovel, address any problem areas in the pasture. If you already have a horse living in the pasture, make note of if they are afraid of plastic bags- some horses are. If this is the case, steer clear of the horse while doing this, or place the horse in another pasture entirely.   Fill in the holes. This will take a while, of course, but is one of the most important parts to ensuring the safety of your horses. Take dirt from an area where there is some extra, such as from the embankment of the pond, and where you can expect the dirt to fill in relatively soon. Fill in any holes large enough for you to stick your fist into. Take care- if you cannot see the bottom of the hole, it very well may be a snake or gopher hole. If you are not prepared to deal with such animals, make a red mark on the map where that hole is, and come back later when you are prepared to do battle. For all other holes, fill in liberally, tamp the dirt down to make sure it's packed tightly, and come back in a week to make sure that the dirt hasn't settled into the hole, causing another hole. Dispose of the garbage. Recycle if at all possible. Otherwise, it'll end up being trash in someone else's pasture, or just dumped into the ground, and that's not much good in the long run, is it? Eradicate any weeds. Not only do weeds reduce the feeding value of your pasture, but some plants can make horses sick, so find out which species are common in your area. Learn to identify them so that if you see them in the pasture, you can remove them with a shovel, root and all. Keep an eye on those spots for regrowth and use herbicides if necessary.    Walk the length of the fencing you are using for the pasture, and make sure it is intact. If you have fencing that breaks often, you may want to replace the entire fence. Barbed wire is not a good idea for horses- they can easily hurt themselves by various means with barbed wire, and, to boot, many rescue agencies don't allow you to adopt a horse from them if you have barbed wire.  Wooden fences are a safe bet, but break often if you don't maintain them well. Electrical fencing may sound like a good idea, but only in moderation. Using one cord of electrical fence on the top of a wooden fence is normally a relatively safe idea if you have a horse that jumps the fence a lot, but, for the sake of the horse and your electrical bill, turn it down as low as possible.   Examine all entrances and exits to the pasture. These are normally the weak points in fencing, since gating may all be dependent upon one half-inch thick rope, and that's it. If your gating situation is similar, seriously consider purchasing a metal gate that has an actual lock on it. Even if your horses are quite tame and docile, the sweetest horse can still take any chance to escape. It's quite a hassle to round them up again. In addition to keeping the horses in, a strong gate is vital to keeping other things out of the pasture. While a determined person probably could just jump the fence, a large animal is easily stopped by maintaining the gating and fencing situation. Talk to your neighbors if you share a fence with them. Tell them that you are preparing to bring in a new horse and need to be sure that they are not planning on changing anything about the fencing if the current fence is acceptable. If the current fencing is not acceptable, tell them before changing anything about the fence, as they may have a reason for leaving the fence as it is. If that is the case, you may have to build a second fence on your side of the pasture. This cuts off your land earlier, but solves any neighbor problems you may be having, and helps control any unruly animals they may have that could pose a danger to your horses.  Now that it is clean, take this chance to make sure the pasture is actually habitable by horses.    Make sure the food supply is adequate. Are your horses going to eat purely grass from the pasture, and survive off of that? If so, see the Tips below. Or are you planning on feeding them hay and horse feed? Make sure that the feeding area is near water, and if you have multiple horses, set up multiple feeding areas broken off from one another. Very often, one horse dominates over the other, and will steal the weaker horse's food. If they are just going to graze for food, verify that there is enough grass. If you live in a dry, arid climate, there may very well not be enough grass growing to feed your horses. Buying bales of hay in the winter is a very good idea; you can simply place a bale out in the pasture, and let the horses eat off of it when they wish to. Ensure adequate water is available for your horses. This is absolutely crucial. A larger paddock may have a dam in it, or it may have a river running through it. In many horse paddocks, you may have to ferry water to a water trough or tub. Simply take a couple of old wash tubs and place them out in the pasture. Fill with water whenever possible. Take another tub and place it where you can easily get to it, and keep it supplied with water at all times. Ensure that the troughs are clean, and away from over hanging branches, as falling leaves will cause the water to become unsanitary faster. Have the trough close to a fence, so as it won't become a hazard to running horses, and so you are able to remove the trough (if portable) in a case of emergency or situation. If you have two adjoining paddocks, an old bathtub may be useful, as you are able to have it in both paddocks by cutting a hole in the fence and having half of the bathtub on each side. Make sure that the tub is clean and free of cracks and sharp edges. A plug is essential to prevent the water from draining out. You can pick up old bath tubs from recycle plants or you can inquire at your local bathtub specialist.  Bring your horses in during daylight hours, preferably 3 or more hours prior to the sun setting. This way, your horses can learn about their new surroundings, and there will be a less of a chance of finding an injured horse in the morning. Watch them carefully for a couple of days and inspect any wounds that they may develop. If any wounds do develop, and you have reason to suspect that it had something to do with the pasture that could have been avoided (e.g. a long gash along the side, indicating barbed wire somewhere in the field), remove the horses and go back to step one. You want the horses to be as safe and as happy as possible.  Checking the fence at least once every 2 or 3 days is also a good idea. If you have time, do a quick check of the pasture and fence once a day. 

check the pasture.  note the problem areas.  clean the pasture.  deal with fencing.  examine the pasture's resources.  bring in the horses. 

 Keeping a horse in a field seems simple, but a good field needs regular care to provide enough grass to eat. Each horse or pony needs at least 1/2 a hectare ( one acre) to graze, or more if possible. The grass should be healthy, and free of poisonous plants such as ragwort or yew.; , A clean water supply is vital, as horses drink about 36 litres (8 gallons) a day. Ideally, there should be a trough which refills from the mains water supply automatically. If this isn't possible, fill the trough each day with buckets of clean water. If it becomes cloudy, the trough needs draining with a scrubbing brush which is clean, but with NO DETERGENT.  Horses need shelter to escape from flies, the sun and bad weather. A high dense hedge is enough for some ponies, but ideally they should have a three-sided shed. The open side has easy access to in and out of the shed and prevents one horse from getting trapped in the corner by the others.  Dividing the field- If horses live in one field for a long time, the field may become horse sick. This is where some areas are over grazed, and the grass become sparse, but around the horses droppings it becomes lush and infested with worms. To prevent this, fence the field off into 2 sections and graze one section at a time. The other left- section has been allowed a rest from grazing for a time to grow back more grass.  When a horse lives out for most of the year and no one is riding him, he doesn't need any extra food in the summer months and only needs hay in the winter. If a horse is being ridden regularly, he needs other food, such as horse cubes or nuts, grains or sugar beet, to keep his energy levels up. The amount he needs depends on how big he is, and how much work he is doing. Chaff is chopped up hay. It is a good addition to a horse's winter diet. Pony cubes are an excellent all round source of energy for a working horse. ,, Being herd animals, Horses get lonely if they are kept in a big space on their own. If possible, a horse should be kept with at least one other horse for company. Even another animal such as a sheep will be better than nothing.  

provide suitable grazing.  provide water.  be sure to provide shelter.  be sure to divide the field.  know what to feed your horses.  do a daily clean up droppings.  ,  examine the grass for holes or sharp bits of material.  ,  prevent loneliness. 

 What facilities are there? What needs to be changed? Will there need to be renovations made or is it just a matter of sweeping the corridor and picking the manure forks up? How long will it take? Will it cost money, and how much? If big things need to be done, such as replacing a door of a stall or fencing a meadow, ask the proprietors permission first. You don't want to get in trouble, but they may praise you for pointing out a danger., These are especially good in livery stables, because it's almost certain that people would buy a raffle ticket to help raise money for new equipment in their yard! However, if you are a private stable, get creative. Lemonade stands, car boots sales and anything else could help you save up some extra cash. If you plan on doing things like busking, get the local counsels permission first, as you may need a licence., Gather a team if needed, many people would be happy to help, and having people that are handy is even better! 

assess your area.  hold a fundraiser if you don't have enough money for all the repairs.  start your work! 

 Start with your tack in the tack room/stable lounge, take it apart and polish it. Well cared for material is safe material., If something looks uncared for, gently encourage the person to do something about it, don't pressure them though., Give the floor a good dusting and sweeping.  Clean the lounge, too. In the lounge (if you are so lucky to have one) put everything away so it can be found easily and vacuum or sweep the floor.  

.  don't touch other people's stuff though.  put your things correctly on their hooks and stands, clean out your locker if you have one. 

 Sometimes, friends won’t know if you’re not comfortable with their teasing until you say something. They might even think you enjoy it, since it gives you a chance to talk about your crush. Try simply telling them that you don't like to be teased about your crush. Express yourself and don’t give your friends the impression that you’re okay with their comments and remarks if you’re actually not.Don’t try to make your friends guess how you feel. If you smile and laugh on the outside, but secretly wish they'd stop, it's up to you to be more straightforward about the effect their teasing has on you. If your friends usually treat you well and respect your feelings, they will be glad you said something, and they'll probably stop teasing you right away.; , If you aren't used to confronting people, it can be difficult to get your point across clearly. You might be tempted to joke about it or act like it's no big deal. However, your friends might not understand how much you dislike the teasing unless you take a more serious approach.   When you bring up the teasing with your friends, use an assertive tone. Assertiveness helps with honest communication and helps cultivate genuine relationships. It allows you to be absolutely clear about your needs.Being assertive isn't the same as being condescending or rude. There is nothing rude about politely telling them how you feel. Start your discussion with phrases such as “I don’t like it when you tease me because…” or “Your teasing make me feel…” Be honest and direct without any intentions of hurting or offending your friends.  Wait for a time when everyone is feeling relaxed and has time for a full conversation. Ask your friends if they understand how their teasing makes you feel, and really listen to the answer. If you can create a dialogue of understanding, your friends will be much less likely to keep teasing you.   Communication is also a two-way street. Be receptive to getting feedback from your friends. They will be more willing to listen to you if you’re willing to listen to them in return. Ask follow-up questions such as “how does that make you feel?” in order to understand any feelings or reactions your friends may be going through. Deep talks on subjects that feel personal can lead to even better friendships.  If they just don't get it, even after you tried to have a serious discussion, you may want to stop talking about your crush with them. You may even want to reconsider whether they are really your friends if they decide to keep teasing you after you've asked them to stop.   When the subject of your crush comes up, don't reveal your feelings; you'll just give them more fodder for teasing. Consider talking about your crush only with people you trust not to use the information to get laughs.  

be honest with your friends.  make sure your friends know that you're serious.  seek to have a two-way discussion.  reevaluate your friendships if your friends refuse to stop. 

 The goal is to divert their attention to anything else other than your crush. Get your friends talking about what they’re up to or the things that they’re interested in.   Make the conversation less about you and more about them. Ask questions about their day, any plans they may have for the weekend, or about the latest movie they watched. Be excited about what they are saying in order to encourage them to keep talking more about them and less about you and your crush. Encourage your friends to open up. Ask them about the love interest in their life or if they have their eye on someone. Your interest can make them feel comfortable with expressing themselves about what's going on in their lives.  If your friends insist on bringing up your crush, you don't have to talk about the person if you don't want to. When it seems like they're about to start teasing you, try one of these approaches:   Tell your friends, "I don't want to talk about that right now." Shrug, then turn it around and bring up one of their boyfriends/girlfriends. Act like you didn't hear what they said, and change the subject entirely.  If unwanted teasing starts happening, transition into in a more welcoming conversation. If there's something you have in common that you could both talk about happily for hours, jump straight to that instead of lingering on the subject of your crush.   For example, if your friend is a huge sports fan, bring up their favorite player/team or recap last night’s sports highlights. Friendly banter about whose player/team is the best can help switch the conversation gears to more pleasant conversation.  

occupy your friends’ attention with other things.  guide them away from the subject of your crush.  have a go-to topic ready to discuss. 

 More often than not, your friends will find pleasure in ruffling your feathers. Let your outer image exude confidence and nonchalance about their banter and teasing.If they see that you aren't phased by their silly teasing, they won't bother doing it anymore.   Be as cool about the situation as you can. Even if you may feel uneasy about your friends' teasing on the inside, your confidence and carefree attitude will show them that their words and/or actions won’t throw you off your crushing game. Deflect with humor if you’re having difficulty with ignoring your friends’ teasing. Come up with a witty phrase or comeback that lets your friends know that their teasing is nothing more than a laughing matter.  Your friends don’t need to know everything that goes on between you and your crush. Avoid giving your friends too much teasing ammo and pull back the reigns on over sharing. A little mystery goes a long way.   Your friends will still more than likely bug you about spilling the beans about you and your crush. Share only the details that you’re comfortable with sharing. You could even tell them that you don't have a crush on the person anymore.  Playing it cool might mean spending more time with people who respect you. Teasing might seem like it's all in good fun, but it stops being fun with it begins to hurt. Find people to hang with who are mature enough to leave you along when you've asked nicely.   As a last resort, you could even tell your friends that you don't want to spend time with them anymore because of their behavior. If your friends apologize and want to earn back your trust, it's up to you whether you want to give them another chance. It could be a learning experience for both you and your friends. If you feel that the teasing has gone past the point of playfulness and into bullying territory, tell your parents or another trusted adult. You deserve to be treated well by your peers, so don't be afraid to seek help if you need it. 

don’t let them see you sweat.  keep some of your crush details under wraps.  spend time away from friends who won't stop teasing. 

 For one, he'll think you're a tiny bit lifeless if you're always sitting at your keyboard, not to mention if you're not there in the first place you aren't tempted to talk with him. Plus, extended times in front of your computer gives your skin a funny look, which won't make him like you any more.; , While they are wet you can't type so fast without smudging them, and it looks nice and shows you care for yourself.  Having five other conversations going at once will stop you answering him straight away, especially if you tell yourself not to answer him until you have answered everybody else first.  If you can close your eyes and enjoy your favourite song it distracts you from him.  If you look at what he's said , then you can start thinking about a great reply that will make him laugh, or make him think, or generally think you're an all-round great person.  If he logs on and your hand flies to the 'start conversation button' he will probably get annoyed. Wait around a bit, and if he doesn't start a conversation with you after ten minutes or so, say 'hi', otherwise let him do the talking.  Racing games are good distractions as you can't just stop and go back five minutes later. Avoid the pause button and finish your game when he says anything. , If you feel it's been going on a long time, just say that you've got to leave. If he asks, answer vaguely to create an air of mystery  

spend less time on im.  paint your nails.  talk with a lot of other people.  listen to music you enjoy.  plan your reply.  let him start the conversation with you.  play a game.  get an egg timer and set it to ten or twenty seconds, whatever feels right, and set it ticking if he says something, and forbid yourself from answering until it pings.  ,  end the conversation yourself. 

 Running can scare the horses, and is dangerous for you too a you can easily slip. Walk, or power walk if the horses are calm.; , Yelling/shouting can scare the horses. Use a calm quiet voice at all times.  This is thought of as threatening. Look just below or around the shoulder.  Go calmly towards their shoulder.  Spooked horse's can often panic and hurt themselves.  These can spook even the most quiet of horse's.  No splashing water at your friends or "galloping" around the yard. Save this for the park.  If they are tied up, tacked up, etc. this can be quite dangerous.  This cause's them to drop. Open them them like everyone else.  Smoking is prohibited in all yards for obvious reasons. One cigarette in the straw and you have a barn fire on your hands. , They may be trying something difficult, and not only may you throw their concentration, you could also spook their horse. 

never run in the yard.  never yell or shout.  never look a horse in the eye.  never approach a horse from behind.  never make loud noises as you may spook the horse.  even if it is raining, don't use an umbrella or were flapping waterproofs.  don't be silly.  never leave a horse unattended.  don't climb over gates.  no smoking.  be kind and polite, especially to the yard owners.  ,  don't distract people who are riding.  obey any and all rules that the yard may have in place.  

 Many people meet someone and jump straight into a relationship because they prefer not to be single. While this does fill one of your needs, you have no way of knowing of that person will make you happy in the long run. The first thing that you should do is reflect on what you want out of a relationship and out of a partner, and what attracts you to someone else. Think about things like:Do I want to be with someone who is career or family oriented? What physical features do I find attractive in a person? What about a person’s personality attracts me? Do I want to be with someone who is spontaneous or predictable? Think about your list, but remember that no one can ultimately make you happy but yourself. Think about the traits that would compliment what you want in a happy life, rather than depending upon someone else to bring fulfillment to you.; , The best way to meet people that have things in common with you is to go out and do the things you love doing. Inevitably, you will meet someone that enjoys doing the same things. This is a great start to a potential relationship, as you will naturally attract people when you are doing something you enjoy.For example, if you are an avid book reader, you might join a book club for people around your age. There are many organizations and groups from book clubs to adventure clubs that can help you spark a relationship with someone who enjoys similar things.  The friends you already have are likely to have common interests and know other people with interests like your own. Sometimes, a friendship can transition into a relationship easily if there’s an attraction between the two people. Friends can also introduce you to someone that they know and think you’d like.   Do not try to force a relationship with a friend. This can lead to a failed relationship and a failed friendship.  Though the internet makes it easy for people to create a false representation of themselves, there are people out there who are looking for genuine relationships. You can explore dating sites and social media to meet people and get to know them. Just be careful when going out with a person you meet on the internet. You should always meet in a safe, public place. 

make a list of qualities you find attractive.  do things you enjoy.  consider your social circle.  explore the internet. 

 Once you find someone that you are interested in, spend time with them. Go out on dates, meet up for lunch, or even just go for a walk and talk. Seeing each other frequently will give you the chance to connect with the other person.You should not see each other constantly. A few times a week is usually healthy, but smothering each other every day can actually be damaging to a new relationship. Moreover, coping with space may show you are not needy, which can also be attractive.  While you are spending time with the other person, it is important to ask genuine questions and pay attention to their answers. The more you learn about the person, the deeper your relationship can grow. They will also appreciate your honest desire to understand and care for them.For example, you might ask them about what things they liked to do as kids or whether or not they have any family nearby. Delay sexual intimacy until you feel comfortable communicating with them. That way you are less likely to have a misunderstanding when you finally do hook up.  Creating trust takes time. You have to be consistent and show up when the other person needs you. You have to keep promises that you make to them, whether it’s showing up for a date or helping them clean their house. It is also important to always tell them the truth, and if they ask something that you are uncomfortable sharing, tell them that.For example, if they asked you something deeply personal on a second date, you could say “I’m not really comfortable talking about that right now, but we can discuss it when we know each other better.” Trust often happens when you make yourself vulnerable. Opening yourself up to someone and showing them both your positive traits and your fears and insecurities help create deeper, lasting connections. 

spend time together.  learn about the other person.  create trust. 

 Even though you are seeing each other frequently and going out on dates, the other person can’t be sure of your intentions unless you tell them. Let the person know that you are ready and interested in a relationship. You should also be willing to hear whether they want the same thing or not.For example, you could say “We’ve been going out for a while, and I know that we both enjoy being around each other. I just wanted to let you know that I am interested in a serious relationship when the time is right for both of us.”  , Once you agree to be in a relationship, there are certain rules that come with that. The tricky part is that these rules are not the same for every person or couple. You should both sit down and discuss what boundaries you expect to be followed in the relationship.For example, your partner might be okay with staying friends with exes, while that makes you uncomfortable. You discuss both sides, and agree on a set of boundaries that makes you both comfortable. Creating boundaries can help you to find a happy medium between what makes you comfortable and what makes your partner comfortable. For example, you might agree that being friends with exes is okay, but constantly communicating with them is crossing the line.  One of the hardest things about a relationship is that both people must be willing to compromise to make it work. That means you will have to do some things that you don’t like, and so will the other person. Keep an open line of communication about the relationship, and make sure that both people are giving and taking.For example, you might both hate doing dishes and laundry. As a compromise, one of you could do dishes, and the other do laundry. Work to keep your lines of communication open throughout the course of your relationship. Unspoken issues may arise and create even larger problems later on if not addressed.  

express your interest in a sustained relationship.  discuss boundaries.  be willing to compromise. 

 Pay attention to what your crush does for fun. People generally enjoy talking about things that they know and like. Look for common ground between you two for topics to discuss.   For example, find out what their extra curriculars are or what they do on the weekends. You can ask their friends or just pay attention to what they say they're doing.; , Are they shy? Maybe they are very social and extroverted? Taking cues from his or her social interactions will give you an idea of how to eventually approach your crush.   For example, if they're shy, talking to them around other people or being very open with your affection may scare them, and this should be avoided.  You can only have a conversation if you are both in the same place at the same time. This information will increase the likelihood that you will have an impromptu "run-in" with your crush!   If simply paying attention doesn't help, you can always recruit one of their friends to help you out. Good friends will want to help their friend get a boyfriend or girlfriend. Just make sure they're trustworthy.  You want to look you best, to show your crush that you think they're worth the effort. Feeling comfortable with your outward appearance will also give you an extra boost of confidence! Take special care with:   Hair - Get a fresh haircut or style your hair in a nice way. Don't go for a totally new hairstyle though...it will look out of place! Clothes - Wear an outfit that your crush might like. Above all, make sure your clothes are clean, fit your body, and are free of wrinkles or stains. Grooming - Washing, shaving, and smelling pleasant will go a long way! Check out information on grooming here.  Depending on what you learned about your crush, choosing the when and the where of your conversation could be very important. If you want to have an intimate one-on-one conversation, start the conversation when your crush is alone. If you are in a group or in a loud location, the conversation can be more casual.  Speak clearly and make eye contact with your crush. Your body language says much about your interest. A smile wouldn't hurt, either!   Remember that they are just another person, just like you. You don't have to be nervous, and even if things don't go exactly as you plan, everything will still be okay in the end.  These are questions that can't be answered with a simple yes or no. The goal is to get them talking and keep them talking, because this will give you the most opportunities to have something to respond to, creating a real conversation!   Open questions usually start with "why" or "how", or deal with complex subject matters. For example, you could ask: "What was it like growing up in New York and then having to move here?", "Why did you want to take this class?", or "How are you liking working with _____?"  , Try asking follow-up questions on topics that your crush seemed genuinely interested in. Tone of voice and body language can give you an idea of how the conversation is going.   If they seem very disinterested or distracted, quit while you're ahead. You don't want to give them the impression that you're super awkward. Just excuse yourself ("Sorry, I forgot I was supposed to call my Aunt for her birthday!") and try again another time.  Once the conversation gets rolling, express your opinions and interests while giving your crush space to express theirs. Just make sure that you're focusing the conversation on them in the early stages of getting to know each other. You don't want them to feel like you're self-centered.  You can start a conversation by talking about what you're guaranteed to have in common: school or work (depending on how you know each other).   "Have you taken Math with Heiser? I'm trying to figure out if I want to take it next semester." "Did you hear that they're going to remodel the break room? I'm holding out for a new TV. What about you?"  , You can also comment on something that's happening nearby, while you're standing near each other. Just be sure it isn't critical of or insulting to other people (since this will give your crush the wrong impression of what you're like).   "Did you see that? I wish more people were considerate like that these days. It's so nice to see." "Such a shame how he's talking to her. She deserves more respect. She works really hard."  , Comment on something that they're wearing, asking a question about it's origin or story. Try to look for things that they're clearly proud of, such as badge pins, nice shoes, or tee shirts with band logos.   "That's a cool Burning Man tee. Have you ever gone? I've always wanted to go." "Sweet Adventure Time button. Who's your favorite character?"  , Ask them a question about something that you think they might know about. This is a good way to get yourself talking to them, but the subject will usually need to be changed pretty quickly if you want a conversation to keep going.   "Do you know where the Smith Building is?" "Do you know how to open this? I've been struggling with it but I can't tell if I'm dumb or just have really weak wrists."  , Ask them for a tiny favor, something that takes less than a minute of their time. People like to feel useful and it will give you a way to start a conversation with positive feelings.   "I don't suppose you could help me reach the stuff on the upper shelf? None of these chairs are safe to stand on." "Can you hold this coffee for a second while I put this away? I don't want it to spill."  , Ask them about how or why they're in a specific place. For example, if you're at a party, ask how they know the host. If you're at school and just hanging out in class or with other friends, ask them if they've always lived in the area.  Talk about something that's happening in the news, either nationally or in your local area. This can be a good way to launch into more serious topics, if you're really wanting to get to know them as a person.   "Did you hear about that protest rally for this weekend? I was thinking about going." "Did you hear the city is planning on tearing down that highway? Traffic is going to be murder."  , Comment on or ask about a recent movie or TV show, either one that you like a lot or one that you haven't see yet. Get their opinion and use it to launch into a conversation. Even if they haven't seen it, you can turn the conversation into a usable topic.   "Have you gone to see the new Spider Man yet? I'm trying to figure out if it's worth seeing." "Oh man, please tell me you watch Game of Thrones because I need someone to be excited with! You don't? You should...it's awesome!", etc.  A compliment about something not-creepy is a great way to start a conversation. Try to compliment them on something they control, like their clothing choice or something they've done or made, instead of something that they don't, like their hair or eyes. Complimenting things like hair or eyes might as well be a compliment for just about anyone and isn't unique to them.  Just tell them that you want to talk to them because they look interesting or fun and you want to get to know them. Many people will appreciate the honesty, especially people who are on the attractive side and are used to people trying to be manipulative or coy in order to talk to them.  

learn your crush's interests and hobbies.  get a feel for your crush's personality.  get a rough idea of your crush's schedule.  look good to feel good.  pick the time and place.  start the conversation with confidence.  use open questions.  listen actively and pay attention to your crush's body language.  be yourself and allow your crush to do the same.  talk about something going on with school or work.  comment on something happening around you.  comment on something about them.  ask a question.  ask for help.  ask about their history.  talk about a current event.  talk about a movie or tv show.  compliment them!,  be honest. 

 Physical attraction is often the first step in developing a crush. Don’t feel shallow for initially being drawn to someone because you like how tall they are or because their eyes make you swoon.When it comes to attraction, humans have biological impulses.Look around you at work or at school. If someone makes your heart flutter on first sight, try to meet them. Find excuses to spend time around them like asking them to help you with a school or work project. Don’t discount people because they aren’t your “type.” Sometimes crushes come in the least expected packages, so don't lose opportunity by being close-minded. ; , Not all crushes come out of initial physical attraction. Look at the friends and acquaintances you already have. Who do you find yourself wanting to spend the most time with? Have you ever had an inkling of something more than friendship with any of them?   Look for the laughs. Genuine and frequent laughter is often a good sign of initial compatibility. If someone makes you smile, it’s worth a lot. If you know a friend has a crush on you but you’re not sure if you’re physically attracted to the person, ask yourself some questions about the emotional side of things. Try writing a list of all the things you like about that person. Ask yourself how the list makes you feel. Often, as emotional attraction grows, physical attraction follows. , It’s simple—if you don’t put yourself into new situations, you won’t meet new people. Try attending events and joining activities that reflect your interests. This will help you meet like-minded people and give you an automatic conversation starter. , It’s not for everyone, but it’s an undeniable part of dating today. Online dating can be an easy way to break the ice and find people with similar interests. If you use online dating, be sure to meet in person as soon as you can. There’s no substitute for body language in conversion, and you’ll be able to determine if the spark is really there.   Research dating sites. Like dating in real life, different dating sites are right for different people. They all offer different types of services and levels of customization. Don’t overlook social media. Social media can be a great way to reconnect with old flames or old friends or to meet new people. It takes some of the risk out of online dating. Through someone’s social media profile, you can see a slightly less curated version of their lives and check if you have mutual friends or interests. Sending a quick, personal message is painless, and there’s no pressure for the other person to respond if they aren’t interested.  Sometimes crushes are unavoidable. Know when you should let your crush in on your attraction or keep it to yourself.   If your crush is in a relationship of any kind, let it go. Period. You don’t want to break up your crush and their significant other, and chances are they won’t return your feelings. Even if they do, it’s sure to become messy quickly It should go with out saying, but only approach good people. If you have any knowledge that your crush has done or said something violent, cruel, or illegal, run in the other direction. No matter how romanticized in books and movies, the “bad girl” or “bad boy” never makes for a good partner. If you do like a friend, make sure it’s worth the risk. Letting a friend know you want more out of the friendship might lead to awkwardness or distance. Make a pros and cons list, and think about how this specific person might respond if they don’t return your feelings. , If you decide your crush is worthy of your attention, begin with small gestures of attention. This way you can clue them in on your feelings without scaring them away.   Invite them to group events. You don’t have to start out asking your date to a romantic dinner for two. Try inviting them to casual hangouts with your friends. You can show them how fun you are in a social setting without the pressure of private conversation. Extend an open-ended invitation. For example, if you find out this person likes sushi, say something like, “We should get sushi sometime!” If they say “yes,” it leaves it up to them to make the actual plans, and if they never follow up, they probably weren’t truly interested. Use body language. When you’re hanging out, give them a small touch on the arm, or sit slightly closer to them than you would one of your friends. Gauge their physical reaction to your closeness. If they return these small gestures unconsciously, chances are good that they like you, too., Simple flirting can help you win over your crush. Flirting doesn't have to be stressful or complicated.Add emojis. If you're texting, try adding just a few smiley faces to your messages to let your crush know that talking to them makes you smile. Tease him a little. Don't be mean, but little bit of playful teasing can go a long way. Use your eyes. Let him catch you staring and quickly look away.  Being shy can make talking to your crush that much more difficult.Work on your confidence so you can approach your crush.   It's okay to be nervous. Don't try too hard to hide it. Your crush will think it's sweet. Focus on your crush, not yourself. Think about all the great things about them. Shyness often begins when you are too focused on your own insecurities. Start with a common interest. Talk about something you love and are very familiar with. This will help you avoid awkward pauses. Text. Communicating through texts can be a great way for a shy person to get to know someone. It will help you become comfortable and make it easier to talk in person.  After you have hinted your affections subtly for a while, let your crush know how you feel. Don’t think you have to wait for your crush to make the first big move. Keep your statement short and simple.   Don’t feel like you have to initiate in person. Write a quick note or send a text message after a hang out sessions. After this, invite them to do something that is clearly a date. Say something like, “I have really enjoyed getting to know you better! Would you want to go out to dinner with me on Thursday?” Keep it simple and specific.  If someone doesn’t respond to your flirting or rejects you outright, let them go. Don’t dwell on what you could have done differently, and don’t try to change their mind. At this stage in the relationship, take what your crush says at face value. Look at a “no” as an opportunity to meet someone even better. Remember, this will take time. Don’t be discouraged if you continue to have feelings for your crush. Just do your best to interact with new people, and don’t be tempted to continue trying to flirt with your crush. Let yourself be sad. It’s fine to take a day or a week to wallow a little. Vent to your friends. Treat yourself to a nice meal.  If you’ve been flirting with your crush for a while, but you’re still not sure whether or not they return your feelings, it can help to ask friends. Try to ask friends who know your crush fairly well. Sometimes, an objective opinion can help you understand what someone really feels.   If your friends think your crush is interested, it may be time to be more blunt with your crush about their feelings. Just ask them like this: “Hey! I have a confession to make. I have been really crushing on you lately. Just wondering if maybe you felt the same?”  , If your crush returns your feelings, let yourself enjoy the moment. Keep flirting, and keep things light-hearted for a while. Don’t feel pressured to progress into the serious stage of a relationship too quickly.  

explore your attraction.  take a second look.  put yourself out there.  try online.  be honest with yourself.  start subtle.  practice flirting.  conquer your shyness.  keep it straightforward.  learn to take a no.  get a second opinion.  celebrate returned feelings. 

 It’s a simple first step, but it’s an important one. Your crush can't know you if you never talk to them. If you're not comfortable with talking to your crush, saying "hi" is a good way to break the ice and build your confidence. This will make it easier to talk to them in the future.; , Once you’ve gotten used to saying “hi,” it will be easier for you to engage your crush casually. Keep it simple and light early on, showing an interest but without getting too personal:   Ask how their day is going. Talk to them about the latest events happening in your town or at school. Ask them how any school activities they participate in are going. "How did football practice go today?" "When's the next event for the Debate Club?" Ask what they like to do in their spare time, and ask follow-up questions about that. Getting to know your crush's interest is a great way to both learn more about him and make him feel appreciated. For example; almost everyone likes music; "What kind of music do you like?" is a great icebreaker.  Once you’re comfortable enough to talk to your crush, don’t forget to incorporate body language. Eighty per cent of human communication is nonverbal. Doing these things can help indicate your interest:   Smile at your crush when they look at you. This shows you’re happy to see them, and will engender good feelings in them about seeing you in return. Meet your crush with uncrossed arms and a gaze upward-- don't look down at your shoes or phone. This shows your availability to being approached. Make eye contact. Eye contact is a great way to both show your crush has your attention, and to establish intimacy.Lean closer when you talk to them. This indicates both an interest in what they are saying, and will over time make them more comfortable with sharing space with you. Brush their arm or lightly touch them occasionally as you talk. Making someone comfortable with physical contact with you is a great way to build intimacy. It also shows you're comfortable with them.(Generally, this is a better approach if you are a woman and your crush is a man, but it can still work if your crush is comfortable with you doing this.)  , You don’t want to overdo this, or it comes across as flattery, but try to remember it when you see them. Everybody likes to feel appreciated, and like many of the other techniques described here, this will grow positive feelings in them about seeing you. In particular, if they shows up looking different in some way, compliment that. "I like your new haircut." "Is that a new outfit? It looks great on you." If you’ve been talking to your crush a bit, and know more about their activities and hobbies, you can find ways to compliment them on their efforts there, as well. The more genuine you can be, the better: If, say, your crush is an athlete, watch them practice or compete, and compliment something they did well, rather than trying to guess at it. "I saw you make a great catch at practice the other day" goes a lot further than "Well, I don't know anything about football, but you must be good!"  , Once you and your crush are more comfortable with each other, you can make plans to spend more time together. At first, you may want to suggest something where something is going on, or where other people will be, to take some of the pressure off having to maintain conversation the whole time. Some examples might include:   A local sporting event, particularly for one of your school’s teams (if you’re at the same school). "The basketball team is playing Friday night; do you want to go?" Invite them to see a show of some sort: a band, a movie, or a theater production. This one is great for people uncomfortable with conversation because it creates a shared experience, an important part of getting closer to someone , while also not putting too much pressure on either party to talk. Invite them to a party or social gathering coming up.  If you’re trying to fake an interest in things you don’t like, or in behavior that isn’t you, because you think it will impress your crush, then they'll eventually notice your awkwardness and discomfort with it. He’ll respect you more and you’ll get along better if you’re honest, rather than if you lie about your tastes in order to try to please him. , Many people practice staying in the moment through meditation or other exercises. You don’t need to become a Zen master for your crush, though. Simply pay attention when they're talking and respond appropriately. They'll appreciate your interest and attention. Today’s world is full of distractions; don’t let things like your smartphone take your attention away from the person you're spending time with.  Many people value the opinion and respect of their peers. It isn’t strictly necessary that you get to know your crush's friends, but if your crush is feeling interested in you but unsure about whether to proceed, the encouragement and approval of their friends will help. You don’t have to please them, but just letting them get to know you a little better can go a long way in winning their endorsement.  Since you've already established a comfort level with spending time together in social situations, you can propose activities where it’s just the two of you spending time together. Going out for a cup of coffee, or going for a walk in the park, are two good examples.  Your crush may be showing signs they are interested in you, too. Some of these signs differ in men and women, but here are some keys to look for:   If a guy straightens his posture or fixes his hair when he sees you, it's because he wants to look his best around you. Similarly, women will smooth their clothing and toss their hair back to allow their face to be better seen. How a woman handles her purse can tell you a lot about what she's thinking. If she is holding it tightly or in front of her, she's uncomfortable. If she holds it to her side or loosely, she is comfortable with you, and doesn't want it to get in the way of getting closer to you. When you’re talking, if your crush touches their face, fidgets or stutters, or is on the edge of his seat when you talk, these are signs they're nervous-- because they are feeling attracted to you, too. Wanting to get physically closer to you, or whisper in your ear, is a great sign for you; these behaviors indicate your crush desires intimacy., Nothing says you have to wait. If you think your crush is interested in you but hesitant to make the first move, you may want to go ahead and make it. Sometimes your crush is shy or intimidated by you, and in these cases you'll have more luck making the move yourself.Ask them on a date, tell them about your feelings, or even make the first move physically, like with a kiss on the cheek. "I really like hanging out with you; would you like to go on a date sometime?" Tradition dictates that men ask women out, but that is less strictly true in this day and age, so no matter your gender, if you feel the time is right to make a move, go ahead and make it.  

say hi.  make casual conversation.  use body language.  compliment them.  suggest an activity and make plans.  be yourself.  stay present and focus on them.  get to know their friends.  invite your crush to activities where the two of you can be alone.  pay attention to your crush's body language.  make the move yourself. 

 Don’t overthink it and try to be too deep or clever. Just show her that find her interesting enough to talk to. Start the same sort of conversation that you would with anybody else. Use whatever situation that you find yourself in to pick a starting point, For instance, you could:Request a small favor, like: “Hey, could you show me your laptop? I’m looking for a new one,” or “What just happened onscreen? I looked away for one second and missed it.” Ask her about something relevant. For example: “What did you think of that band that just played?” or “I like those patches on your bag. Where’d you get them?” Make a simple comment about whatever, like: “I don’t know about you, but I think I’m freezing in here,” or “That had to be the most ridiculous fight I’ve ever seen.”; , Being a good listener is important in relationships. Active listening can help you to grasp more of what someone is saying while also making the person feel like you are listening closely. Try to practice active listening whenever she is talking. Some things you can do include:Making eye contact and facing her. Don’t look at your phone or glance around the room when she is talking. Nodding and making neutral statements, such as “yes,” “uh-huh,” “I see,” and “go on.” Asking probing questions to keep her talking and show interest, such as “What happened next?” “How did you feel?” and “What are you going to do now?” Clarifying what she says when necessary, such as by saying, "It seems like you are saying ____. Is that right?" Or, "What do you mean when you say ____?"  , Once the conversation gets rolling, let her steer it. Respond to what she says. Follow up with questions to learn more about her. Show her that you are genuinely interested in her.When she tells a story, ask her what happened next. Or, back up and ask for a little more backstory to this or that plot point. When she shares an opinion, ask her what led her to form that opinion. Share your own stories and opinions, but be sure to tie them back to what she last said. For example, if she was talking about how she’s scared of the ocean, don’t brag about that time you successfully fought off a great white shark! Instead, use that story to show that you understand her fright.  Don’t try to pretend to be to the person that you think she wants. Don’t adopt your friends’ tactics, either, if they go against your own personality. Remember: just because one tactic works for one person doesn’t mean it will work for you. Instead, impress her with who you really are.Don’t make her feel tricked later on.   Don’t fake interest in stuff that you couldn’t care less about. For instance, don’t pretend to love football just because you’re at a Super Bowl party. If you aren’t ready to share this or that part of yourself just yet, leave it unmentioned. For example, if you feel embarrassed about writing poetry, don’t tell her that you think poetry is stupid.  Don’t take “intimacy” to mean “romance.” Instead, simply try to forge a connection that she can’t replicate with someone else. Make her feel special by building a private language between the two of you. Use elements from your surroundings and your conversation. For example:, Try “Furiosa” if she loves cars, shaves her head, or drives aggressively. Call her “Slick” if she trips. But make sure she finds it funny, and quit it if she doesn’t.  Poke fun at your surroundings, other people, or even yourselves.For example, say you both met someone whose name sounds like an action hero’s name. In the future, whenever the two of you have a flat tire or get lost, cry, “Jack Gunner, please save us!”  , Make an act of sharing a “secret” with her, even though it’s not something that you really hide. Again, say you’re at a Super Bowl party but hate football. Make a show of hushing your voice and whispering your confession. Make her feel as though the two of you share something special, even though you both know it’s a joke.  

open with something casual.  listen actively.  follow her lead.  be honest.  create an air of intimacy.  christen her with a new nickname.start calling her “hermione” every so often if she shares a whole lot of facts and useful tidbits.  create inside jokes.  “confide” in her. 

 Invite her along whenever you plan to go out. Make her feel part of the group if you are going with other friends, or make her feel special by suggesting that the two of you hang out one-on-one.   You can also try to relate the conversation back to her from time to time. For example, you might say something like, "Hey Ted, did you know that Karen is into that new video game you got too? She's already on level 5!"  , If you’re going to an event (like a concert or movie) that requires tickets or travel or permission from her parents, give her plenty of notice. Don’t wait until the last minute. Show her that you’re thinking about her needs. For example: “Hey, me and my friends are thinking about going to see the Rock’s new movie up at that theater in Brockport next Friday. You interested?”  , If you only made your plans at the last minute, consider surprising her with a ticket. Only do this if you can afford it, or if you know someone else who can use the ticket as a Plan B if she can’t go. Then offer it to her casually: “Hey, I was online last night buying tickets. The show was selling out fast, but it was too late to call you, so I just bought you one in case you want it. No biggie if you don’t.”  , Don’t stare off at something else when the two of you are talking. Demonstrate your interest in her by giving her your direct attention. Make strong eye-contact when you are together.At the same time, don’t just stare at her without blinking, which might make her uncomfortable. Instead:   Look her in the eye when she is speaking to show her that she has your attention. When it’s your turn to speak, shift your gaze to something else. Gather your thoughts before you respond. When you’re ready to speak, look her in the eye again. By doing this she will feel that you are drawn back to her face again and again. This is much more flattering than being stared at.  Create a deeper sense of intimacy between the two of you by touching her. Remember, though: be respectful about it. Start by simply standing closer to her, so that you could easily touch without having to reach. If she seems fine with you standing in her personal space, make light, casual touches as you talk. For example:!   If you’re in a crowded space, lean into her when people brush by, then joke about it: “Dang, I’m starting to wish I brought my mints!” Touch her elbow, hand, or shoulder whenever something new occurs to you: “Oh! Hey! I forgot to tell you . . .” Nudge her sides or her elbow with your own to underscore a point or tease her: “I bet that one shot of Ewan McGregor’s butt was your favorite part of the movie, eh?”  , Once the two of you are used to making playful physical contact, step it up! Add hugs or even light kisses to the mix. Even though this might seem like crossing the line between “subtle” and “obvious,” don’t back down. As long as she's receptive, show her that you care with more direct signs of affection.When she’s upset, draw her into a one-armed hug around her shoulders. Give her a polite peck on the top of her head. If you haven’t seen each other in a while, throw your arms open for a hug. Greet her with, “There she is!” Or, just put on an act as if you haven’t seen each other in forever and do the same thing, even if it’s only been ten minutes. If she has made a point of dressing up (or even if she hasn’t), take her hand. Bow, give her a gentlemanly kiss on the top of her hand, and tell her how smashing she looks. Quit saying goodbye at night’s end and just give her a hug instead.  Attend events that she is participating in, such as sports games, plays, concerts, recitals, etc. Forward her links to posts, stories, and memes that you think she would like. “Like” her comments, links, and posts on social media. Don’t go overboard on this last one, though. Avoid making her think that you’re just liking everything for the sake of it., When she tells you that you should check out this or that band, show, book, or whatever, give it a chance. Show her that you value her opinion. At the same time, use this opportunity to learn more about what she likes so you have that much more to talk about.However, don’t take this to mean that you have to like whatever she likes. Speak from the gut, be your own person, and share your honest opinions. 

include her in your plans.show her that you think a good time is always a better time when she is part of it.  give her time to plan if needed.  buy her a ticket anyway.  look her in the eyes.  make physical contact.  embrace her.  support her interests.  follow her recommendations. 

 Remember: even though you may want her to become your girlfriend, you aren’t there yet. For now, show her the same amount of attention that you would to any other girl or friend. Value quality over quantity when it comes to hanging out., Only give her presents when it is appropriate, like her birthday and holidays. Make the most of these occasions by using inside jokes and knowledge to find her a gift that she will really love and appreciate. Don’t go overboard and smother her with flowers every Friday and chocolates every Monday., Always arrange to hang out ahead of time. Don’t make her feel backed into a corner by just showing up on her doorstep.Only surprise her by showing up unannounced if you’re part of a larger audience, like at a concert or play that she is performing in.  Make it clear that she has to fit herself into your schedule. Don’t tip your hand by putting your friends, family, and other interests on the backburner. If you already have plans with someone else, stick to it., Note how much she wrote whenever she texts, messages, or emails you. When you write back, limit yourself to the same length, or even shorter. Resist the urge to outdo her and write a novel. Instead, keep it to a simple back-and-forth so she doesn’t feel overburdened by keeping up with you.Also take note of how often she messages you. Stick to the same level of frequency. Text, call, or email her at random to show her that she is on your mind.But don’t do it so much that you come across as obsessed or needy.  Remember that she has other stuff going on in her life. Take a breath and relax. Give her time to text or call you back, even if it takes a few hours, or even a couple days. Show her that you respect the fact that other things require her attention.Don’t badger her by following up with a second call or message just to see if she got your first one. If she never gets back to you before you bump into each other again, let it go unmentioned. Remember, calling her out on not calling you back will only hurt your chances in the end.  

show her an appropriate amount of attention.  go easy on the gifts.  don’t show up out of nowhere.  keep active elsewhere.  match the length of her messages.  be patient when waiting for replies. 

 Although you may want his attention, it's important to give him his space. If he feels that you respect him and his personal space, he may be more likely to interact with you. Otherwise, he may view you as a needy person and stay away from you. For instance, if he doesn't respond to your text within five minutes, understand that he has his own life.   If you notice that he replies to you with very few words, don't become upset or demand that he says more. Instead, it may be helpful to ask questions in your texts so that he has something to respond to. Rather than sending him yes-or-no questions, try to come up with ones that may require him to reply with more words (ex: "What did you think of the soccer game?"). If he still gives you a short reply, you could wait for a short time to indicate that you want him to say a bit more.; , Although you should avoid being overly talkative, initiate conversations with him to show that you're interested in his life. Come up with interesting subjects that engage the both of you. Be sure that you give him a chance to express his opinion. Don't hesitate to ask questions about himself, as most people enjoy talking about themselves. If you don't have time to talk to him, a simple greeting is enough to grab his attention.   If you have trouble selecting conversation topics, think of events that are occurring around you. For instance, if you recently had a biology test, talk to him about it and ask whether he did well or not. However, try to branch out and talk about other subjects rather than only focusing on school. If you notice that he isn't talking much, consider the possibilities. Are you dominating the conversation and not allowing him a chance to speak? Is he not interested in the subject? Or is he just naturally quiet? Do your best to remedy the situation so that he enjoys talking to you.  Although you shouldn't stay in the spotlight for too long, it's a good idea to share some facts about your life with him so that he can get to know you more. Tell him things about you - such as your hobbies - that will stick in his mind and show that you're a unique girl. You may even discover common interests, which may open the way for more conversations.  Although you shouldn't overdo it, treat him nicely. For instance, if he doesn't have a lunch, offer to give him some money or share your food with him. If he tells you about something bad that happened to him, sympathize with him and listen to what he has to say. Show that you care about him and his well-being.   Be careful when treating him nicely. If he isn't a good person, he may take advantage of your kindness. If you notice that he is using you, immediately stop and don't allow him to manipulate you. Although you may be attracted to him, it can be dangerous and painful if you let him control you.  Although you may want to impress him, changing who you are isn't the right choice. You're not only presenting a false image of yourself but also hurting yourself and perhaps even others in the process. By staying true to who you are, you're showing that you are proud of yourself, which may attract his attention. Don't pretend to be someone you aren't.   Avoid changing for him. It may be tempting to mold yourself into his type, but maintaining that facade will be painful and exhausting. Showing how unique you are will attract the right kinds of guys.  While it may be easy to worship him, allowing your crush to take over your life is a dangerous route. It can be easy to overlook his flaws and focus only on his strengths, which can be harmful. If you feel that you are becoming too obsessed with him, you may want to take a step back and place some space between the two of you. Participate in different activities to get your mind off of him.  

avoid being clingy.  talk to him.  tell him about yourself.  be kind to him.  be yourself.  remember that he is human. 

 Hanging around your crush can make you look creepy if he or she gives obvious signals they’re not interested. Examples of signs that convey lack of interest are delayed responses, failure to make eye contact, and crossed arms., Staring can seem aggressive and predatory, and make your crush feel scared or uncomfortable in your presence. Try to casually glance over at your crush from time to time, or admire him or her using your peripheral vision.   Try smiling or winking when you do make eye contact with your crush. These are common ways to flirt with your crush from afar using eye contact.  Facing your eyes, torso, and feet toward a person can make him or her feel cornered and uncomfortable, especially when the interest isn’t mutual. Instead, face your body in a slightly different direction so your full attention isn’t centered on your crush., Constantly frowning and maintaining a serious expression can make you appear too intense and creepy, while smiling and laughing are more effective at lighting up the mood and making your interaction seem more friendly and casual., Hanging around your crush at every possible moment can make you appear needy, clingy, and creepy as a result, especially if you’ve just met. Instead, say hello to your crush when you cross paths or make definitive plans to spend time together.  While it’s important to be honest and upfront about your feelings toward your crush to prevent misunderstanding, sometimes being overly direct can scare him or her away, depending on how you present your feelings. For example, inform your crush that you’re interested in getting to know them better, rather than professing your love and intentions to marry and bear their children.  Feelings of nervousness and fear around your crush can lead to trembling, sweating, a shaky voice, and other signs that could make your crush feel awkward and uncomfortable in your presence.Practice deep breathing, smile, and laugh to help yourself stay calm when spending time with your crush.  While you may constantly look for opportunities to make physical contact with your crush, touching him or her at the wrong moments or too soon after meeting can make you seem creepy and predatory. Try to maintain a respectable physical distance and avoid seizing moments to touch your crush whenever given the chance.  This is helpful if he or she misinterprets your intentions and avoids spending time around you as a result. For example, apologize for staring at your crush, and explain that you allowed your gaze to linger because he or she looked especially attractive on that particular day., Poor hygiene, ill-fitting clothes, and clothing with derogatory logos and sayings are examples of things that could make you seem insensitive, scary, and creepy from a physical standpoint.   Improve physical hygiene if necessary, and avoid wearing clothing that offends your crush. For example, if your crush openly announces his or her distaste for gun laws, avoid wearing t-shirts that advertise your views on pro-gun laws.  Showing up at your crush’s favorite hangouts or place of work can seem creepy, especially if you run into him or her repeatedly on more than one occasion. Keep a fair distance, and avoid going out of your way to run into them during staged meetings.  

look for signs that indicate your crush isn’t reciprocating interest.  stop staring at your crush.  avoid facing your entire body directly toward your crush.  stop acting overly serious around your crush.  spend time with your crush in moderation without being too clingy.  avoid being overly direct about your feelings toward your crush.  appear relaxed in front of your crush whenever possible.  avoid touching your crush inappropriately at the wrong moments.  deliver a sincere apology to your crush if you suspect you’re being too creepy.  determine whether your physical appearance is making you seem creepy to your crush.  avoid stalking your crush to arrange “accidental” meetings. 

 When you form a friendship with him, it is okay to create reasons to get together. The more time you spend with him, the better. He may not be interested in you yet, but you should take this time to comfortably show him your personality and truly get to know him.; , This part is very important and only possible if you’re friends with him. Mention his crush in a conversation and see what he says. Don’t settle for answers about how physically attractive she is. There must be more to her that he is attracted to you and you have to find out what those traits are.  Don’t speak poorly of her. You may think that this will make her look bad, but you’ll be the one looking bad in the end. If you speak poorly of her, he’ll think you’re a negative person. Plus, guys love a supportive girl. If you’re bashing his opinions, you’re only hurting yourself.  While you don’t want to speak poorly of his current crush, you can start to get his mind out of that relationship by talking him up. Tell him that he’s the full package and that he deserves the best. Tell him not to settle and that he should go after someone that he is friends with because the relationship will be stronger if that connection is already existent.  While you’re still in the “friend zone,” it is a great time to show him your playful side. Guys like a girl that laughs at his jokes. They are intrigued by girls that aren’t always serious about everything.  While being his friend, you should have learned his likes and dislikes—about girls and in general. Use these things to your advantage. Show him that the two of you have similar interests in hobbies or activities. Also, show him that you have the personality traits that he is attracted to.  Don’t lose the friendship that you have created. This shows him that you appreciate him as a person. When he realizes that you are attracted to him, it will help create the image of you as “the whole package.” Men want to be with someone that they are friends with and are attracted to.  While you want to adopt the personality traits that he’s attracted to, you don’t want to completely change who you are. Find a way to merge the traits that he likes with your own. This way, the relationship has a chance long-term.  When he first told you what he was attracted to in his crush, he probably mentioned a specific look that he liked. Try to mimic it. If he said that he liked a certain part of her body, try to accentuate yours through your outfit. Guys are undoubtedly attracted by looks, so make yourself appealing to him., Make your conversations flirty. Lean into him more when the two of you talk, keep laughing at his jokes, and create a physical connection. You can touch his shoulder when you’re laughing, take his hand to lead him somewhere, or run your hand through his hair and comment on how nice it is.  He will love your compliments because he’ll trust you, as a friend, that they are genuine. Also, it will show him that you notice his physical appearance. When you compliment him, he may feel the need to give one back, which gets him looking at you.  

put yourself on the radar.  find out what he likes about her.  speak nicely.  tell him his worth.  be fun.  use what you’ve learned.  stay close to him.  do not change who you are.  dress to impress.  interact with him.  compliment his body. 

 Even if you're shy, talking to your crush can be really easy. Just treat him/her like a good friend.  Don't run up like you're a crazed fan! Try to meet him or her as casually as possible. If one of your friends knows your crush, ask to be introduced. This way, the meeting will seem very friendly and not too out of the ordinary.   If you're really uncomfortable talking to your crush, and you have a friend that knows him/her, bring your friend along and ask your friend to do most of the talking. Use your friend to your advantage! Get your friend to talk about you to your crush, and use him/her to help get a conversation going.  It's not that difficult to say your own name - just try not to get tongue-tied. Remember that this crush of yours is a normal person like you, and there is no real reason to get nervous.   If you need an excuse to meet your crush, go up and say that you heard that he/she needed help with, for example, some math homework. Give your name and phone number, and let him/her know you are willing to help. This is also a good excuse to see him/her again after your first meeting.  This works especially well if your crush is a girl, since girls love compliments! But even guys like to be complimented on things like their shirt or their shoes. This will start your relationship on a good note.  It's can be hard to get a conversation going when you first meet someone. If you've already broken the ice by giving a compliment, build on that. Follow up with questions and comments like: Where did you get those shoes? Oh, really? I've been there before. It's a great place. If you don't feel ready to have a conversation, skip to the next step.  If you both have cell phones, ask to exchange phone numbers. You can also ask them if they have are on Facebook, Twitter, MSN, Google+, or whatever other social networking site you use. This will show that you're interested in staying in touch with them.  Don't rush off like you have something better to do, but don't just stand there in awkward silence, either. When you feel that you've said enough, or if things are taking an awkward turn, find a casual, realistic reason to say goodbye. If you're talking between classes, say you have to go to class. If you're not, say you have to get going (someone is waiting for you). Add a "See you later!" to top it off. This will hint that you'd like to meet and talk again.  

look and feel confident.  go up to your crush casually.  introduce yourself.  compliment your crush.  keep the conversation going.  find a way to stay in touch.  to end the conversation, come up with a casual excuse to leave. 

 When you see your crush and start feeling excited and nervous, focus on your breathing. Remember that your lungs get less oxygen when you take quick, short breaths, which makes your heart speed up and your body tense up. So make a point of taking deep, long breaths to calm both your body and mind.Inhale through your nose and exhale through your mouth. Encourage deeper breaths by imagining that your lungs are down in your abs. Practice on your own so it’s easier to do when your crush is around.; , This may sound odd, but it’s actually a yoga trick called the Gyan Mudra. Form an “O” by joining the tip of your index finger with the tip of your thumb, just like you would to signal “okay” to someone. Refocus your attention from the inside to the outside. Instead of focusing on the excitement building up inside you, just concentrate on the feeling of your thumb and fingertip touching.You can do this right before you see that special someone, or even while you’re talking to them. Just hold your hands behind your back when you see them, or use whatever you’re holding (like a textbook) to hide it from view if you think it looks odd.  If you know you will be seeing your crush any minute, listen to something relaxing beforehand if you can. Create a playlist full of calming music on your device. Otherwise, just play a song that usually calms you down in the back of your head.Whatever music you choose, the keyword is “relaxing.” Your body’s rhythms will naturally fall in sync with the music’s. This means your body will start getting worked up if you play something too exciting.  Get rid of your anxieties by dancing them out before you see that guy or girl who makes you swoon. This is a proven way to relieve stress, so if you’re all alone (or if you don’t mind busting a move in public) go all out and dance it off. Otherwise, just move your feet around by taking a walk, stepping on and off a curb or stair, or something similar.Depending on what type of music you like to dance to, this might seem to contradict the whole bit about listening to relaxing music. But don’t worry about that. Dancing will increase your blood flow throughout your body and deliver more oxygen everywhere, which help tense muscles relax and feel better. So if you’re going to be active, the more active the better! Then, as the hour draws near when you expect to run into your crush, switch over to your playlist of your relaxing music to get yourself squared and centered.  Don't fret over those little imperfections that you'd like to wish away. Also, don't worry about trying to morph into a certain "type" that you think your crush might like. Dress the way you like to dress. Style your hair the way you like it. Be yourself and own it!   Sure, people are definitely attracted to certain looks. But it's been proven that people are likely to respond much quicker to your level of confidence than your appearance. So, if you're a brunette or redhead who's worried that your crush only seems to date blondes (or vice versa), stop worrying! As long as you act confident in your own looks, they'll be more blown away by your self-assurance than your hair color. 

just breathe.  make an “okay” sign with your fingers.  use music to relax.  dance a little.  be confident in your looks. 

 When you see your crush, just go right up and start a conversation.Show them how confident you are by going straight for it instead of shying away.Don’t give yourself time to overthink things and grow anxious (or give someone else the chance to swoop in and steal their attention). Just walk on up and open with something casual. Try:Asking a question about something you share in common, like a class: “Hey, do you know which pages Mr. Kingsley asked us to read for tomorrow? I didn’t write them down, and now I can’t remember.” Commenting on something that peaks your interest, like their new sneakers: “Hey, nice kicks! Where’d you get them?” Using something incidental to get the ball rolling, like the book they’re reading: “You know, that one’s been in my to-read pile forever. Is it worth getting into?”  , Once you draw them into a conversation, keep the spotlight on them at first to draw them in farther. Think of yourself as an interviewer and ask a lot of follow-up questions. This will flatter their ego by showing that you’re interested in what they think, and give you a chance to grow more comfortable with them before the spotlight turns on you. For example, if you opened the conversation by commenting on the book they’re reading:Ask if they’ve read any of that author’s books. If they have, which would they recommend reading first? Say the book they recommend was turned into a movie. Ask which they liked better and why. As you go on, let the conversation flow naturally from topic to topic, but keep the focus on what they think of that topic, whatever it may be. So, if they really liked the movie adaptation because their favorite director made it, ask why they like that director, which film is their favorite, and so on.  Make direct eye-contact when you walk up to them and maintain it as you talk. Show them that you’re interested in what they have to say by keeping your attention on them. Avoid glancing away and staring off at something else, which might make them think you’re bored, distracted, or feeling defensive.That isn’t to say that you should stare at them without blinking, though, because that could be creepy. Take natural breaks. Shut your eyes or look away when you laugh. If someone else shouts or zips by on a bike a few feet away, glance at them. Just keep your breaks brief and bring your attention back to your crush immediately. Don’t forget to smile when you first approach. Show them that you’re happy to be talking to them and that they should be happy, too!  , Focus on what’s happening outside of you instead of your internal emotions. Tune all of your attention to what your crush says and does. Empty your mind of everything else so you only react to the conversation, not any anxiety that you might be feeling inside.Of course, don’t take that too literally and stand there empty-headed like a zombie. The trick is to quiet any thoughts that don’t have anything to do with what the two of you are talking about right here, right now. This way you won’t overthink things and make the conversation awkward by worrying about stuff that has nothing to do with it.  Asking your crush lots of questions at first shows your interest in their thoughts and opinions, but remember to start sharing your own as you grow more comfortable around them. Don’t make them feel like this is a police interrogation. Make the conversation an equal give-and-take as you go on.Let’s say you’re still talking about their favorite director and movies. If one of their favorite movies is one of yours, too, say so and tell them why you love it. If not, play the desert island game and ask which five movies they’d bring with them to watch for the rest of their lives. Then share your own picks and the reasons why. As you go on and ask them more questions, share your own answers after they do. For instance, if all five of their desert island picks are horror flicks, say, “You’re really into horror, huh?” Then share your own opinion on the genre. By being bold, asking lots of questions, and sharing your own answers, you can make them feel like the conversation is equal parts give-and-take. At the same time, you get to direct the course of the conversation so you can reveal exactly what you want to share about yourself.  Make the conversation enjoyable by sticking to topics that you both enjoy. Leave serious talks for the future, when the two of you are officially together. For now, just show your crush that you’re a fun person to talk to, and keep the conversation carefree.Avoid being negative. Say you absolutely hate their favorite movie. Don’t put them off by picking it apart. That isn’t to say you have to lie and say you loved it. Be honest, but carefree. Just say you couldn’t get into it, and leave it at that. Then use some aspect about it as a springboard to something you can speak positively about. For example, if an actor in that movie was in a movie you do love, switch topics by saying something like, “Oh, but you know what Tom Hardy movie I do love . . .?” On the other hand, if you both think a movie was terrible, feel free to bond over picking it apart if you both enjoy doing that!  , Don't assume everything's destined to go wrong. That will just increase your chances of self-fulfilling that destiny and acting like more of an idiot! Instead, keep an open mind. Stop yourself from trying to read too much into every little thing your crush says or does. Unless they flat-out say, "I don't like you," take it easy on yourself. Go with the flow and assume everything will work out for the best.You're not a mind-reader, so give yourself a break if they seem withdrawn when you talk with them. They could be tired, distracted, or depressed about something else entirely. Focus on what goes right instead of worrying about what goes wrong. For example, if you made them laugh with a joke, cherish that moment instead of dwelling on the fact that you stuttered a few times. Keep a sense of humor about yourself. Remember: everyone acts like an idiot sometimes, so don't beat yourself up when you do. Showing your crush that you can laugh at yourself will make you seem even more confident.  

be bold.  keep them talking about themselves.  look at them.  concentrate on them, not you.  offer your own take on things.  keep things light.  keep a positive frame of mind. 

 Don’t worry about imperfections. Remember: everybody has some. Instead of worrying needlessly about hiding this or that feature, focus instead on showing self-confidence through your body language. So fix yourself up and dress according to your own style instead of trying to force-fit yourself into a “type” that you think your crush might like better.People are far more likely to respond to your self-confidence than your appearance. Focus less on what your face and body look like, and more on how you carry yourself.  Try not to fidget or act jumpy. Avoid nervous behavior like tapping your feet or fingers or playing with your hair, ear, or anything else. Whether you’re standing or sitting, remain composed. Only move when it’s called for. Show you own the room by not acting like you’re ready to flee at the drop of a hat.Keep your feet from tapping or your knees from bouncing by concentrating on keeping both feet flat on the floor. Use your hands to make gestures if that’s what you normally do. Just try to keep it to a minimum and be graceful about it so your special someone isn’t distracted by wild flailing. If you feel like some part of you absolutely must move, focus your attention on your breathing. Breathe deeply and concentrate on how your chest rises and falls.  Avoid the temptation to stick your hands in your pockets. Also fight the urge to cross arms. Your crush might see these as signs of boredom, anger, or defensiveness. Keep your arms hanging relaxed by your sides when standing, or fold your hands over your lap if you’re sitting.If you find this hard, bring something to hold when you talk to them to keep your hands occupied. This could be anything from a textbook, bag, or even a pair of sneakers if you’re on your way to the gym.If you do bring a prop to hold, just bring one. Juggling a pile of random stuff might make you seem like a disorganized mess., Resist the urge to fold in on yourself and hold yourself too tightly. Instead, show your confidence by setting your feet slightly apart from each other. Aim your toes directly at your crush. Show them that your attention is focused squarely on them. Avoid creating the impression that you’re ready to bolt in some other direction.Do the same if you’re seated facing each other. If you’re seated side by side instead, angle your feet slightly toward them. Cross an ankle over one knee when you’re sitting if that feels more comfortable.  Keep your back straight, your shoulders down, and your arms relaxed. Stick your chest out a little. Avoid hunching over or tensing your shoulders all the way up to your ears. Whether you’re sitting, standing still, or walking, stay relaxed, move slowly, and keep your back tall and proud.The key is to come off as relaxed, so if you have bad posture in general, start working on improving it when you’re alone. If you aren’t used to good posture, you may come across as stiff and cranky if you force it. Another exception would be if your crush is much shorter than you are. In this case, feel free to hunch forward to bring your heads closer together. This way you won’t come across as staring down your nose at them.  

focus on your body language, not your body.  be still.  pay attention to your hands and arms.  keep your feet and legs in mind as well.  maintain good posture. 

 Though guineas should really get vegetables every day, your guinea will likely see them as treats. They love digging into fresh vegetables., Romaine lettuce and spinach are a great base for your guinea's treat. Your guinea pig should have a cup of vegetables and fruit a day, and greens should make up most of that cup. In fact, most days, it can just be greens., You can add pieces of zucchini, sweet potato, parsley, and carrots as toppings. However, don't make them the bulk of their diet, and change up what you feed your guinea pig from day to day. Try to only feed other vegetables a couple of times a week. Any vegetable if feed to excess (every day) can potentially cause problems. For example carrots are high in oxalate, which if fed daily can predispose the GP to developing oxalate bladder stones. A good rule of thumb is to never feed the same food two days running, which prevents mineral build-up.You can also feed your guinea pig asparagus, basil, carrots with tops or without, celery, chicory, cilantro, eggplant, cucumber, dill, parsley, parsnips, radishes, rocket, bell peppers, turnips, tomatoes, and watercress.Remove seeds when possible. Skip rhubarb, potatoes, and tomato leaves completely, as they contain substances called alkaloids which are toxic to guinea pigs.Feed a limited number of vegetables in the cabbage family, such as cabbage, broccoli, Brussels sprouts, bok choy, and cauliflower, as it can cause your guinea pig to bloat. Only offer these once in awhile in small amounts., While guinea pigs can eat fruit, they should only eat in small doses because of the high sugar content. You can feed your guinea pig a wide variety of fruits, but try to remove the seeds when possible.You can feed your guinea pigs apples and pears in small slices (with peels), berries such as blueberries and blackberries, citrus fruits such as oranges and grapefruit, melons such as cantaloupe and watermelon, kiwi, mango, peaches, nectarines, and plums. Banana is also fine in limited amounts.You can also give them dried fruits such as apricots and dates, but only give them in small pieces as they are high in sugar., You can give them a quarter of an orange, for instance, or add bell peppers or asparagus, though leafy greens also provide vitamin C., Rub the fruits and vegetables under running water to remove bacteria, pesticides, and other harmful substances from the surface. To be safe, wash home-grown vegetables, as well, since car exhaust and other particles in the air can gather on vegetation.Don't dry the food off. Leaving the water on it gives your guinea pig more fresh water. Greens don't need to be chopped. You can leave leaves whole, but pull them off the stalks. If you feed the stocks, you need to treat them as you do other vegetables by chopping them.  It's usually best to remove seeds from fruits and vegetables, as they aren't always good for your guinea pig. That includes tomatoes, cucumbers, bell peppers, and apples., Chop the treats into chunks to make them easier for guinea pigs to eat. This step is especially important for stringy vegetables such as celery; its stringiness can cause the guinea pig to choke if it's not small enough. Therefore, make sure you slice up celery small. For other vegetables, human-sized bites are fine, even slices of cucumber.For extra fun, you can present it as a salad in a bowl.  Uneaten food quickly spoils. Make sure to take it out of the cage after an hour so that your guinea pig won't get sick., Your guinea pig needs hay for digestion. However, to make it a bit more fun, you can stuff it in a cardboard toilet paper tube. Your guinea pig will have fun pulling out of the tube., You can also add a small scoop of rolled oats to their regular pellets. The oats make the food more interesting, and your guinea pigs will see it as a treat. 

feed your guinea pig vegetables as treats.  make greens the bulk of your guinea's diet.  add in other vegetables.  limit fruit to a few times a week.  satisfy your guinea's need for vitamin c. guinea pigs cannot produce vitamin c on their own, so you need to provide it in their diet.  rinse all food thoroughly.  remove seeds.  chop vegetables and fruit into bite-sized pieces.  remove any uneaten food.  make hay more interesting.  add oats to pellets. 

 You'll need 2 carrots, 3 cucumbers, 1 wedge of apple (minus seeds), and 1 cup of water. You can leave the seeds in the cucumber., Make sure you thoroughly wash the vegetation to remove any pesticides. Cut it into large chunks., Stick the chunks in a blender. Blend the mixture until it is smooth., Pour the mixture into an ice tray. Make sure you cover it with plastic wrap before you freeze it. Once the treats are frozen, you can pop them out and put them in a plastic bag to freeze again., The main purpose of freezing the treats is to preserve them. However, your guinea pig shouldn't eat the treat too cold, as it can hurt it's teeth. It may also get an upset stomach. Let it thaw out at room temperature in a bowl until it isn't very cold. 

gather your ingredients.  wash and slice the vegetables and fruit.  blend the vegetables and fruit together.  freeze the treats.  let the treat thaw in a bowl. 

 You'll need 1 cup of oat flour, 1 cup of guinea pig pellets, 2/3 a cup of vegetable broth or water, 6 tablespoons of olive oil or vegetable oil, and 2 tablespoons of honey. Because these treats contain honey and oil, you should only give them occasionally.You can add other ingredients to this recipe, such as grated fresh vegetables. Carrots and parsley are good options or even spinach., Turn the oven on 350 degrees Fahrenheit. You want it to be ready once you're done mixing., Stir until the mixture starts to form a dough. It needs to be solid enough to roll out., Once a dough has formed, roll out into a flat sheet. You can either use a knife to cut small squares, or you can use cookie cutters to cut small shapes. Just remember you want these treats to be fairly small., Line a sheet pan with parchment paper. Lay the treats out, spaced slightly apart.  Put the treats in the oven. Leave them in there for 20 minutes, until the are solid. Turn off the oven, leaving the treats inside until the oven cools down., The best way to keep these treats is to freeze them. However, remember to let the treat come to room temperature before feeding it to your guinea pig. 

gather your ingredients.  preheat the oven.  mix the ingredients together.  roll out the dough.  put the treats on a baking sheet.  bake the treats.  freeze the treats. 

 As mentioned earlier, you shouldn't feed your guinea pig rhubarb, potatoes, and tomato leaves.You should also skip hot peppers, mushrooms, onions, garlic, bok choy, and pickled vegetables. The salt content in pickled vegetables is very high.Also avoid iceberg lettuce, as it can upset their stomachs., These food are too high in fat to make a good guinea pig treat. More importantly, avocado can be toxic to many pets, causing health problems or even death., Guinea pigs do not eat meat. They are herbivores. Therefore, do not offer them meat, as their bodies are not made to process it.Similarly, do not give them any dairy products, as they are derived from animals., While guinea pigs may eat these and enjoy them, small sharp objects like this have the potential to cause cuts or choking hazards.A few small seeds mashed into a treat might be okay, but when in doubt, don't risk it. Always avoid seeds with the husk still attached, such as sunflower seeds.  If you aren't sure whether a particular treat is good for your guinea pig or not, ask your vet. She can help you decide whether it is safe or not to feed it to your guinea pig.  

skip certain vegetables.  don't offer them avocado or coconut.  avoid meats.  don't feed them nuts and seeds.  always check with your vet if you're not sure. 

 Although timothy hay, other hays, grasses and alfalfa are the foundation of a guinea pig’s diet, they are low in Vitamin C. Supplementation of some kind is necessary.   Provide unlimited access to hay for your guinea pig no matter what supplements you decide to use.You may add lucerne hay to a pregnant guinea pig’s diet to provide increased protein and calcium. ; , While it will last up to three months in normal conditions, it may degrade faster in hot or humid weather. Follow the feeding instructions provide with the food. In general, guinea pigs will eat about 1/8 cup of pellets per day, supplemented by hay and vegetables. , Dark, leafy greens such as kale, parsley, cabbage, spinach, chicory, lambsquarter, and dandelion greens provide a good source of Vitamin C. If you feed dandelion greens or lambsquarter, be careful not to harvest ones from lawns that have been treated with pesticides, fertilizers, or herbicides.Leafy greens should be the main vegetable supplement for your guinea pig. Provide about one cup per day. ,   Vegetables and fruits can be offered a few times a week. Since fruits are high in sugar, these should be given more sparingly. , Common fruits and vegetables that are poisonous or dangerous for your guinea pig include: cereals, grains, nuts, corn, beans, onions, potatoes, beets, rhubarb, and pickled foods. Keep a watch on how much spinach you give it - while it's healthy and safe in and of itself, if your guinea pig consumes a lot of calcium, it can lead to stones forming. If your guinea pig seems unwell after eating a treat, discontinue feeding that treat.  

don’t rely on hay and grass alone.  choose a guinea pig food pellet that includes vitamin c. premium foods designed for guinea pigs will include vitamin c, which is added during the manufacturing process.don’t store the food pellets for more than a month.vitamin c degrades over time.  add leafy greens to your guinea pig’s diet.  feed fruits and other vegetables to your guinea pig for a treat.peppers, guava, broccoli, cauliflower, strawberry, peas, tomatoes, and kiwi are good sources of vitamin c for guinea pigs.  never give your guinea pig poisonous foods. 

 These are supplements designed to appeal to your guinea pig by resembling a treat.Be sure not to use supplements after their expiration date, since they are unlikely to have sufficient active Vitamin C by that point.  Guinea pigs are much smaller than human children and only need about 20-25mg/day of Vitamin C. Although Vitamin C does not stay in the body, it’s not good for your guinea pig to ingest too much of the sugar or other additives that may be included in products designed for children.   You might add the supplement to a leafy green or other treat to encourage your guinea pig to take it. You can also administer liquids by a dropper or syringe, but try something else if your guinea pig resists this method.Don’t use a multivitamin designed for adults. It is likely to contain other vitamins and minerals that your guinea pig doesn’t need and that may cause harm in large quantities., In addition, Vitamin C breaks down quickly when exposed to light and water. After eight hours, the available Vitamin C in a water bottle may be no more than 20% of what was originally added.  

feed specially designed vitamin c tablets directly to your guinea pig.  offer vitamin c tablets or liquids designed for children.be sure not to give too much.  don’t rely on adding vitamin c to drinking water.supplements may alter the taste of the water and discourage your guinea pig from drinking enough, leading to dehydration as well as vitamin c deficiency. 

, If you believe that your guinea pig isn’t getting enough Vitamin C, or if your guinea pig is showing symptoms of a vitamin deficiency, make an appointment with your vet. She will be able to assess your guinea pig.   Always consult a vet if you think your guinea pig is pregnant. Guinea pigs often have difficult births, so medical supervision of the pregnancy is vital., When your guinea pig isn’t feeling well, even from Vitamin C deficiency, it may be reluctant to eat supplements or Vitamin C-rich treats.In this case, ensure that it’s getting enough Vitamin C by administering liquid Vitamin C in the mouth using a syringe or dropper.   You will need to administer an increased dose of Vitamin C for 1-2 weeks if your guinea pig is recovering from a deficiency. Your vet will be able to specify a dose. 

recognize a guinea pig suffering from insufficient vitamin c. an insufficiency can produce symptoms within two weeks.common symptoms include: , poor appetite and weight loss  bleeding gums and pain the teeth  stiff joints  nasal discharge  rough texture to the hair  difficulty avoiding infections or healing from wounds  ,  consult your vet.  use a dropper or syringe to get vitamin c into a sick guinea pig. 

 Guinea pigs love hay! They need it for digestive and dental health. Guinea pigs should have unlimited access to hay, which often means refilling a good-sized dish 3 to 5 times daily.   Timothy hay is the best hay for all guinea pigs in general. They will happily eat it and play with it, and it's healthy for pigs of all ages. Alfalfa hay contains a lot of calcium, so is inappropriate for older pigs except as an occasional treat. Even if your guinea pig loves alfalfa hay, use it sparingly. It should not be a part of their everyday diet. Think of it as a dessert, or a treat.  Alfalfa hay should be used for pregnant or nursing sows, and young guinea pigs under 4months of age.   Other types of hay include meadow hay, bluegrass hay, brome grass hay, oat hay, and orchard grass. These can be used occasionally to vary your guinea pigs diet. Look for hay that is green and soft, as yellow and hard hay means it's actually straw. Hay can be purchased from pet stores, but often it has sat too long, which isn't very healthy for guinea pigs. You can often order hay directly from a local farm, or through your exotics veterinarian, which is often cheaper and better hay.; , Veggies that are good for guinea pigs include celery, carrots, off-the-vine tomatoes, cucumber, corn, kale, a bit of raw broccoli, small amounts of spinach and pod-peas.   Other vegetables such as beetroot, parsley or small quantities of pepper and forages such as clover or dandelion leaves (wash them first), should be given on occasion.Do not give your guinea pigs spoiled or wilted vegetables. Remember, don't feed them any vegetables in poor enough shape that you wouldn't eat them.  Be aware pellets are high energy, and eating too many can lead to obesity and dental problems. Feed only an 1/8 to 1/4 cup per day to supplement the other parts of its diet.   Look for pellets that are supplemented with vitamin C. This is an important nutrient that guinea pigs need in their diet. Avoid providing muesli feed as this can lead to selective feeding. Only use pellets designed for guinea pigs. Pellets for rabbits or other rodents aren't suitable for guinea pigs as they contain different quantities of essential vitamins and nutrients.  

feed your guinea pig hay.  feed your guinea pig about a cup of fresh vegetables daily.the key is to provide it with a lot of variety, so that it gets a balanced diet.  feed your guinea pig pellets. 

 Guinea pigs are one of the very few mammals (along with humans) who can't make their own vitamin C, so they need to get it from their food. They need 10 - 30 MG of Vitamin C daily.Vegetables that are high in vitamin-C, and that are good for your guinea pig, include dark, leafy greens, bell peppers, broccoli, and cauliflower.   Guinea Pigs are highly prone to getting scurvy, which is a disease caused by low levels of Vitamin C. You can supplement your guinea pig's vitamin-c intake Putting vitamin-c into your guinea pig's water is not recommended. Adding vitamin C to the water can cause a guinea pig to stop drinking water if they don't like the taste. In addition, it's hard to control how much vitamin C your guinea pig is getting, as they may drink a little or a lot of water.  This includes large amounts of fruits with high sugar contents (they should only be given in moderation) and any starchy vegetables, such as potatoes.Vegetables to avoid feeding your guinea pigs include iceberg lettuce, rocket salads, red leaves, cauliflower, beet greens, potatoes, and radishes. Feed fruit in small quantities. Not only does fruit have a high sugar content, but it may also have a low calcium to phosphorus ratio, which could lead to bladder problems and possible diarrhea.This is true in fruits such as raisins. Avoid giving your guinea pig citrus fruits altogether.Guinea pigs are herbivores. This means that they should not be fed any meat or dairy products., These are a waste of money and are not good for your pet. Your guinea pig would like a treat of a piece of apple or rolled oats much more than a commercial treat filled with sugar and the natural treat is much better for them., These kind of additions to your pet's diet are not necessary if you take the time to feed your guinea pig well. If you do need to feed your guinea pig supplements, consider giving it vet-approved supplements that are high in fiber.  Guinea pigs chew instinctively and will eat as much as you feed them throughout the day. Watch how much you give them and stick to a balanced diet. Explain this gently to small kids who own guinea pigs so that they do not overfeed their pets.  Guinea pigs will chew on anything they can get their teeth on, including their food dishes. Opt for a heavy ceramic dish that can't be easily be overturned and won't be easily destroyed., Uneaten food should be removed promptly, within one day. Guinea pigs can be picky eaters, so keeping food in their cage longer will probably not make it any more appealing to them. If they have avoided it for a whole day, they are probably never going to eat it and it will just simply become a mess in their cage.  This means that the amount of food you feed your guinea pig may need to change over time to keep them in good health.  Don't allow the water bottle to become empty. If a guinea pig doesn't have access to water it can become very ill.   The best water bottles are designed for guinea pigs or rabbits and have a metal ball in the spout. If your guinea pigs lives in a pen outside, make sure that the water doesn't freeze during the winter. Clean the water bottle nozzle frequently with a Q-tip to keep it free of obstructions and food residue. Clean the water bottle itself by placing uncooked rice and a little water in the bottle, and then shaking it vigorously. The rice will dislodge any greenish (algae) build-up.  If you have a lawn that you know does not have chemicals on it and is not used by by other pets for urinating and defecating, you can let your guinea pig graze on it. Get a fully enclosed outdoor run and let your guinea pig roam around in it during warm weather. Just make sure there is no breeze and the temperatures are between 60 and 75 degrees Fahrenheit (15-24 degrees Celsius).   Only allow them outdoors in a run when supervised. While some guinea pigs do live in pens outdoors, they should not be left in an open-air pen without supervision. This could leave them exposed to predators or allow them to escape. Make sure they have a dark place for them to hide in from the sun, or if something scares them. Move the run around from day-to-day. Guinea pigs will keep your lawn nice and short, and they fertilize it too.  

make sure your guinea pig is getting enough vitamin-c.  avoid giving guinea pigs foods that are bad for them.  avoid commercial guinea pig treats.  feed a balanced diet, instead of supplementing with multivitamins or salt wheels.  control the amount of food you give your guinea pig.  serve food in ceramic dishes.  keep food fresh.  adjust food quantities if the guinea pig becomes underweight or overweight.the amount of food a guinea pig will need depends on its age, its lifestyle, and its general health.  provide fresh water at all times.place a water bottle in your guinea pig's cage, so that it can access clean water at any time.  let your guinea pig graze occasionally. 

 Before you do anything, you should talk to your vet about the individual needs of your guinea pig. This way, you’ll have all of the information you need to make sure your guinea pig will stay happy and healthy before you embark on the journey of making your own guinea pig food. Consider:   Your guinea pig might have specific nutritional needs due to pre-existing conditions. Your vet might be able to provide you with a detailed list of vegetables and/or pellets to include in your mix. Your guinea pig might have specific nutritional needs due to age, size, or breed.; , Your guinea pig should have a number of vegetables in his or her food. This is important because different foods provide different vitamins and nutrition. The more diverse your food offering, the better your guinea pig’s nutrition will be. In addition, the more diverse the food, the happier your guinea pig may be with his or her meal. Think about:   Kale and other leafy greens like spinach, chard, or parsley. Leafy greens should make up the majority of your vegetable mix. Peas. Carrots. Use carrots and other high-sugar foods in limited amounts. Cucumbers. Celery. Corn. Sweet peppers. Avoid spicy peppers., There is no rule about how much guinea pig food you should prepare at one time. However, depending on the age and weight of your friend, as well as how many guinea pigs you have, you should probably adjust the amount you prepare accordingly.   Prepare your vegetables making sure you will have one cup of fresh vegetables per guinea pig per day. Make sure that that the majority of your mix is made up of leafy greens. In order to keep your food fresh, only make what your friend will consume in a week. After preparing, you can store the food in your refrigerator for the duration of the week. But remember to consider freshness as the week progresses. Some vegetables will store better than others, and some might be fresher than others. If your food starts to turn, toss it and prepare some more. If you have several guinea pigs, make sure you make enough for all of them at one time. If you’re using vegetables that tend to turn quick, consider preparing your food twice a week instead of once a week.  After you’ve gathered your vegetables, prepare them for your little friend. Make sure to wash the vegetables and then cut them into small pieces for your guinea pig to eat. Cutting them will make it a lot easier for your friend to eat them and will also prevent spoilage as you’ll be able to put the exact amount that your pig will eat.   Wash vegetables thoroughly and make sure any chemicals, soap, and dirt is washed off. Slice your vegetables into very small bite-sized pieces. The size will vary depending on the vegetable. If possible, slice carrots and cucumbers into 1/8th of an inch pieces or even smaller. Leafy greens should be chopped finely, too. Look at your vegetables to make sure there aren’t pieces that are too big. Make sure to take out any pieces your friend will have a hard time moving or eating., Now that you’ve cut your vegetables, you need to mix them together. Mixing thoroughly is important because you want to make sure that your little friend’s food formula is diverse and varied. If you give your guinea pig food that is mostly one vegetable or another, he or she won’t get proper vitamins and nutrition.   Dump your vegetable pieces into a tupperware. Put the lid on the tupperware. Shake the tupperware vigorously until the vegetables are well mixed.  After you’ve mixed your vegetables, you need to add guinea pig pellets to your food mix. Pellets are extremely important because they are formulated to maintain guinea pig health and provide vitamins that guinea pigs need and may not be present in their normal vegetable-based diet.   Make sure to get pellets formulated with vitamin C. Try to find pellets that are dye free. Add in 1/8th of a cup of pellets per day per adult guinea pig to your vegetable mix. Younger guinea pigs or pregnant guinea pigs may require more – consult your vet. Use alfalfa pellets for young, growing and pregnant guinea pigs under 6 months. Use a timothy hay-based based pellet for adults over 6 months. This pellet will be formulated with Vitamin C. Mix the pellets in just like you mixed the vegetables., After you've mixed your guinea pig food, it will be time to feed your friend. Feeding your friend is fairly easy, but you want to follow a few guidelines when doing so.   Provide your friend with 1 1/8 cup of the vegetable/pellet mix in a food bowl at the same time every day. The best time might be the morning. Most guinea pigs will eat their food throughout the day and night. However, if you have a little friend who tends to gorge, make sure to divide feedings up throughout the day. Make sure to monitor the food over the course of the day. Remove any spoiled or uneaten food at the end of the day or the following morning.  In addition to food, guinea pigs need plenty of fresh water to keep them healthy and active. Because of this, you need to closely monitor your friend’s water supply so that he or she always has water.   Buy a water bottle with a metal spout so that your friend can drink water without making much of a mess. Guinea pigs drink between 100 to 200 ml of water per kilogram of bodyweight per day. If your friend drinks more or less water than he or she should, contact your vet., You need to provide your guinea pig with an unlimited supply of hay in addition to your formulated food. This is because guinea pig digestive systems need a lot of fiber to make sure they are healthy and regular. In addition, by providing your guinea pig with a lot of hay, you will give him or her something to chew on which will promote good dental health.   Try to buy second-cut hay. This hay is tenderer than first batch hay. Make sure to clean out your friend’s hay and replace it with fresh hay every week or two. Always make sure there is enough hay for your friend to eat and chew on. Make sure the hay you purchase is intended for consumption and is not treated with any chemicals., There are a number of foods you will want to avoid when formulating your guinea pig food or feeding him or her treats. Some foods are extremely dangerous to guinea pigs and are poisonous and toxic. If you feed them to your friend, he or she could die or at the very least become seriously ill. Make sure to avoid:   Iceberg lettuce or cabbage. Iceberg lettuce and cabbage have minimal nutritional value and can give your friend diarrhea. Potato peelings. Potato peelings can be toxic if they’ve begun to turn green. Rhubarb. Rhubarb leaves are poisonous. Meat and dairy. Guinea pigs’ digestive tracts do not process meat or dairy very well. Any food not intended or designed for guinea pigs. 

consult your vet.  buy diverse vegetables.  decide how much you want to prepare.  cut your vegetables.  mix your vegetables.  add guinea pig pellets.  serve dinner.  keep your friend hydrated.  provide hay.  avoid certain foods. 

 Fruit is a great source of vitamins for your guinea pig. However, while your guinea pig might enjoy fruit, you should only use it as a snack or a treat. As a result, you don’t need to buy nearly as much fruit as vegetables. And for many people, fruit you have around the house already may be used. When shopping for fresh fruit, consider:   Apples. Blueberries Oranges. Pears. Peaches.; , Unlike fruit, you can feed your guinea pig large amounts of vegetables every week. When buying vegetables, consider:   Carrots. Green peppers. Radish tops. Cucumbers. Brussel sprouts., Pelleted foods are a mix of hay, vitamins, and other food sources that serve as a staple in your guinea pig’s diet. They are much healthier for your guinea pigs than other types of food because they are not dyed with artificial colors and flavors.   Focus only on corn-free and seed-free pellets. Pellets enriched with vitamins are okay., While your guinea pig will be getting some hay in his or her pellets, fresh hay is an important element of a guinea pig’s diet and overall health. This is because guinea pigs need hay in order to keep their teeth from overgrowing. In addition, hay keeps their digestive system clean.   Be aware that a lot of hay sold at large chain stores is not high quality hay. Try to buy fresh hay at pet stores or at farm supply stores. Timothy hay is perfect for adult guinea pigs, Baby and pregnant guinea pigs will need alfalfa hay, which has a higher vitamin and mineral content in it., At the start of every day, you should put out fresh vegetables for your guinea pig. And since vegetables are an important part of your guinea pig’s diet, you need to make sure that he or she has plenty of vegetables throughout the day.   Feed your guinea pig about one cup of vegetables for every two pounds he or she weighs. Break your vegetable servings up into at least two. This way, your guinea pig will have fresh and unwilted vegetables throughout the day. Whenever you provide new vegetables, remove any old, uneaten, or spoiled vegetables from the previous serving., While fruit is important and can provide your guinea pig with badly needed vitamins, you need to limit his or her consumption of it. Fruit should be served to your guinea pig as a treat, not as a main course.   Limit fruit treats to once or twice a week. Try to only feed your guinea pig one or two tablespoons of fruit for every two pounds that your guinea pig weighs. Only provide fresh and washed fruit to your guinea pig., Providing fresh hay throughout the day and week is extremely important for your guinea pig’s health. Since hay can accumulate bacteria guinea pig waste, you’ll want to remove old hay periodically and replace it with fresh hay.   Don’t be afraid of giving your guinea pig too much hay. More is always better than less. Make sure your hay has not been sitting around the house too long., At around the same time you serve your guinea pig vegetables, you should also serve fresh pellets. This is important as pellets are the foundation of your guinea pig’s diet.   Provide 1/4th to 1/8th cup of pellets per day. Amount fed will vary based on size and age of the guinea pig. Feel free to divide pellets up into 2 or 3 servings if your guinea pig tends to overeat or eat it all at once. Serve the pellets in a ceramic bowl., You also need to make sure that your guinea pig has plenty of fresh water. Fresh water is essential to your guinea pig’s diet and will help with digestion of hay, pellets, and the other food you provide. As a result, monitor water closely.   Consider using a plastic drip bottle. Provide a water bowl, too. Check your guinea pig’s water at least once a day. Change and clean your guinea pig’s water bowel and drip bottle a couple times a week.  Guinea pigs of different ages have different dietary needs. As a result, when thinking about and formulating a well-balanced diet for your guinea pig, you need to think about their age.   If you adopted your guinea pig as a baby, then you should have an accurate idea of his or her age. If you don’t know your guinea pig’s age, consult a veterinarian or someone with specialized knowledge. When establishing your guinea pig’s age, you don’t need to be exact. Just be able to classify your guinea pig in one of several stages of life, including: baby, youth, adult, or senior., Depending on sex, your guinea pig’s dietary needs will vary. Sex is also important when determining your guinea pig’s age. While for the most part, male and female guinea pigs require the same nutrition, there are a couple things you should consider.   If your guinea pig is pregnant, you’ll need to alter her food mix. If you are trying to breed your guinea pig, you should probably alter the breeding pig’s diets to increase their vitamin intake., Your guinea pig might have special, individual, needs that will impact his or her dietary needs. As a result, you need to consider any special or unique factors that could influence your guinea pig’s health or diet.   Does your guinea pig have any chronic medical problems? Does your guinea pig have any disorders or other unique factors that might impact his or her dietary needs. 

buy fresh fruit.  get some fresh vegetables for your guinea pig.  buy pelleted food.  purchase a bag of hay to feed your guinea pig.  put out fresh vegetables.  provide fruit as a treat.  provide plenty of fresh hay.  serve the pellets.  refill your guinea pig’s water bowl.  establish your guinea pig’s age.  consider your guinea pig’s sex.  think about any special needs your guinea pig may have. 

 Make sure the pellets you select have nutritional value. Use alfalfa based pellets for guinea pigs under 6 months old and timothy based pellets for older guinea pigs. Use a plain pellets without any added seeds or colored bits. Make sure that the pellets is fortified with stabilized vitamin C. Choose pellets that are plain and have no added seeds, dried treats, or anything extra. If you do so, your guinea pig won't eat the pellets and just eat the treats.; , Hay is extremely important. Your guinea pig should have constant access to it. Use Timothy hay or a very good quality meadow hay.  One adult guinea pig should have 1 cup of veg per day. Like humans guinea pigs do not make their own vitamin c and rely on their diet.  Oranges can cause sores in the mouth so should be limited to one slice per week.  Seems obvious but important.  In order to give a good diet you need to know foods that are dangerous the following website has a good list: http://www.cool-small-pets.com/poisonous-foods-for-guinea-pigs.html  , If you have a chemical free grass with nothing dangerous and cats/dogs don't use as the bathroom your guinea pig will love to graze there. Make sure the grazing area doesn't contain many bugs that will hurt your guinea pig's digestive system.  You can easily bake treats for your guinea pigs every now and again. Just Google "Homemade guinea pig treat recipes"  , Exercise is important so your guinea pig does not become overweight. You can fence your guinea pig in your backyard and let him roam around. Just make sure there is no pesticide or chemical spray.  Don`t overfeed your guinea pig as tempting as it is.  

select a good pellet.  add hay.  give him vegetables.  fruit should be a treat every now and again.  unlimited fresh water.  know which foods that are dangerous.  grazing.  alternatively, have homemade treats.  exercise.  limit foods. 

 Tie the pony or horse to a post, rail, or crossties before beginning your stirrup adjustments. Never leave your horse or pony untied while moving the stirrups up or down.   Alternatively, can have someone else hold the horse in place while you adjust the stirrups.; , Before measuring for your stirrup length, you need to be sure that the horse's saddle is on correctly. If it is not, the measurements you do will not be correct. Look both parallel to the horse and perpendicular, making sure that the saddle is square and that the stirrups are both the same length.   If the saddle is not square, adjust the saddle on top of the horse before you start adjusting the stirrups.  Find a starting position for the stirrup in which it is about as long as your arm. This will allow you to hold it out and do more exact measuring. Pull the stirrup iron straight out until it sits just under your armpit, and the leather runs the full length of your arm. If the end of the stirrup iron doesn't reach your armpit when your fingers reach the saddle, then the stirrup is too short. If it droops between your armpit and your fingers, then it is too long.While measuring, stand perpendicular to the horse and the stirrups. If you have just begun riding, have shorter rather than longer stirrups so that you will have more control.  Once you know the correct length, you will need to adjust the length by putting the stirrup buckle into the correct hole on the stirrup leather. Get hold of the buckle at the top of the stirrup leather and adjust the buckle until the stirrup is the correct length.Most buckles are tucked up close to the saddle but can be pulled down lower during adjustment. This will make adjustment easier.  Loosen the stirrup on the other side so that it is about as long as your arm. Pull the stirrup iron straight out towards your armpit. The length of the stirrup from the connection on the saddle to the bottom of the stirrup iron should be the length of your arm from the armpit to the fingertips.Once both are adjusted, look at them both from the front of the horse. They should be the same length.  The length of stirrups you want may also differ slightly depending on what type of riding you are going to do. For example, If you are jumping or roping, you need a short stirrup length to sit higher in the saddle.If you are doing dressage, cutting, or saddle seat riding, your stirrup length should be slightly longer because the rider is sitting back in the saddle and using a lot of leg to control the horse.  In order to really accurately measure your stirrup length you may want to have a helper. Having someone else to help you will allow you to get in the saddle and assess where the right length should be.This person can also help hold the horse still while you are making adjustments and they can help you get up into the saddle if you need help. If you are a beginner, have a teacher or a more experienced rider help you choose the right saddle and stirrup length. They should belong to the same discipline of riding as you do.  Once you get up into the saddle, make sure your ears, shoulders, hips, and heels are all in straight alignment. Making sure that you are in alignment will help to assure that you get the right stirrup measurement.Put your feet into the stirrups while you are assessing your alignment. This help you get a general feeling for whether they the right length or not.  Take your feet out of the stirrups. Have your friend make sure that the bottom of the stirrup is level with your ankle bone when your feet are out of the stirrups.This may be hard to see because of riding boots, so the friend may need to feel with their fingers to know where your ankle bone lies. If you are doing a type of riding that requires shorter or longer stirrups, take that into consideration here. For example, if you want shorter stirrups because you are going to do some jumping, make sure that the stirrups hit your leg above the ankle bone. If you want longer stirrups for dressage or cutting, the stirrup should line up below the ankle bone.  With your feet in the stirrups once again, you should assess whether the ball of your foot is resting on the iron. If it is, your heels should be pointing directly downward and your toes pointing forward.Once again, your helper may be in the best position to judge whether this is the case. If you don't have a helper, you can stand up in the stirrups and judge the amount of space you have between the saddle and your seat. There should be a space about the size of a fist, but this is a relatively inexact measurement.  Take a ride around your corral or ring and ask your friend to check your alignment. Have them look at the angle of your leg when they are perpendicular to you. Also, the angle of the upper leg should equal the angle of the horse's shoulder.There should be an equal angle between the thigh and the knee and the knee and the lower leg. If not, the stirrup is usually too long, creating a straighter angle in the lower leg.  

secure your horse or pony.  check that the saddle is on correctly.  measure the stirrup against your arm.  adjust the buckle on the stirrup leather.  repeat the process on the other side.  keep the type of riding you will be doing in mind.  ask someone to help you.  align yourself in the saddle.  assess the stirrup length when your feet are out of the stirrups.  assess your position when your feet are in the stirrups.  check the stirrup length while you are riding. 

 To make a conditioning saddle soap that will restore moisture to leather tack, you will need:  3 1/2 cups of water        1/4 cup of neatsfoot oil       3/4 cup of grated Ivory soap       1/2 cup of grated beeswax or paraffin; , Add the 3 1/2 cups of water to a pot and bring to the boil over a high heat. Once the water is boiling, reduce the heat to medium.  Add the grated ivory soap to the water and stir until melted. Then add the grated beeswax or paraffin oil and stir until melted.  Take the pot off the heat and add the neatsfoot oil. Stir the contents of the pot continually until the soap mix cools and thickens.  Pour the thickened saddle soap mix into a jar or sealable container for storage. Wait until the saddle soap has set before using.  For instructions on how to clean leather tack and boots using saddle soap, see this article.  

gather your ingredients.  boil the water.  add the ivory soap and beeswax/paraffin.  remove from the heat and add oil.  pour into a jar or container.  use the saddle soap. 

 To make a very simple and traditional saddle soap that will effectively clean leather, you will only need two ingredients: a block of glycerin and some cream or milk. You will also need an airtight container to store your finished saddle soap.  Break the block of glycerin into chunks and place in a microwaveable bowl. Heat the glycerin on medium power for 30 seconds, then remove and stir. Keep microwaving for 30 second intervals until the glycerin has melted.  Add the cream or milk to the melted glycerin and stir to combine. You will need approximately 1/4 cup of milk or cream for every 2 cups of melted glycerin., Pour the glycerin and milk/cream mixture into the container and leave to cool and set before using. The glycerin will prevent the dairy from going rancid.  

gather your ingredients.  melt the glycerin.  add the milk or cream.  pour into the airtight container. 

 To make a pleasantly scented saddle soap that will clean and condition your leather tack or boots, you will need:  Bath-sized bar of glycerin soap       1/4 cup of Lexol leather cleaner (not conditioner)       Couple of drops of lavender, tea-tree or eucalyptus essential oil.  Break the bar of glycerin into chunks and place in a microwaveable bowl. Heat on medium power for 30 seconds, then remove and stir. Keep microwaving for 30 second intervals, until the glycerin has completely melted.  Add the 1/4 cup of Lexol leather cleaner to the glycerin and stir well to combine.  Add three or four drops of your chosen essential oil to the soap mixture and stir to combine.   Lavender, eucalyptus and tea tree oil are popular option, but you could also use lemongrass, bergamot, clary sage or any other pleasantly fragranced essential oil.  Pour the scented saddle soap mix into a jar or sealable container for storage. Wait until the soap has cooled and set before using.  

gather your ingredients.  melt the glycerin.  add the lexol soap.  add the essential oil.  pour into a jar or airtight container. 

 When you’re looking at new saddles, one of the things you’ll need to pay attention to is the bars. The bars are the weight-distributing foundation for the saddle; the part of the saddle that rests on the horse and holds you up. There are two ‘bars’ that distribute weight evenly on either side of the spine. If your saddle is well-fitting, the horse’s back will be in contact with the entire length of the bars.; , On a saddle, the cantle is the rear section that acts as the back of a seat; it slopes upwards a bit like a chair. The bars are connected to the cantle at the bottom, holding the entire saddle together. The cantle is a term that references both an English and a western saddle.  On a western saddle, the fork is the section in the front that holds the bars together. It is located underneath the horn, and has the appearance of an upside down ‘U’ shape. There are two primary types of forks - a slick fork and a swell fork. A slick fork is the most popular, and is recognized by sides that angle straight up to the horn. A swell fork is recognized by thicker, curved edges that rise to the horn., On an English saddle, the pommel is the front section of the saddle that holds the bars together. English saddles don’t have horns like western saddles do; they just have a rounded section at the front - the pommel. Think of it as a smaller, rounder version of the cantle.  Another very important aspect of fitting your saddle to your horse is making sure the gullet fits properly. The gullet refers to the empty space between the bars of the saddle. When the saddle is placed on a horse’s back, you can examine the fit by looking at the gullet from the front and back.  The saddle tree refers to the bars, cantle, fork/pommel, and the gullet. These are the areas that must be examined when sizing a saddle. So when checking your horse for fit, look at the parts of the saddle tree.  The rocker refers to the angular curve of the bars from the front of the saddle to the back. Imagine it as similar to the shape/angle of the base of a rocking chair. Depending on the shape of the topline of your horse, you will have to try saddles with different rocker angles.  A second important angular measurement of the saddle tree is the twist. This refers to the angle the bars bend outwards; typically they are closer in the middle and further apart at the front and back, like ‘) (‘. Some saddles have wider twists than others, which may affect the measurement for the horse and rider.  The flare of the saddle is the amount the bars of the saddle flare out at the front. This is how much the bars curve upwards at the front and back of the saddle, by the cantle and pommel/fork., This term is the easiest to recognize; the seat of the saddle is the part that you sit in. The seat has two primary things that should be noted - the length and slope. The length of the seat is how much space it takes up from the front to the back; a well fitting saddle will allow you to sit forward without being pressed against the cantle, and will give about four inches between your position and the front of the fork/pommel. The slope is the angle from the front of the seat to the back, and comes in three options: high, medium, and low. Each slope is found in seats for different types of riding. 

learn what the bars are.  locate the cantle.  find the fork of the saddle.  locate the pommel.  find the gullet.  understand the term ‘saddle tree’.  examine the rocker of a saddle.  look at the twist of the saddle.  examine the flare of the saddle.  check out the seat of the saddle. 

 The withers of the horse is the high point above the shoulder blades along the back. There three general types of withers, which determine the length and rocker angle of the saddle.   Defined withers are recognizable by a definite high point, and then a gentle slope back to the croup. Most ‘regular’ or ‘medium’ saddles will fit this type of horse. Rounded withers occur when, just as it sounds, the withers are gently sloped and the horse has a more flat back. The withers are typically a bit more flat as well, requiring a wider saddle tree.  The topline of the horse is the shape/curve of the back from the withers to the croup. The topline has four primary build types: level, straight, swayback, and downhill. Each build will require a different saddle build, or the use of special saddle pads.   A level topline can be recognized when a horse has withers and croup that are about the same height, and lacks a large dip between the two. Most regular saddles will fit this topline build. A straight back is most common in mules, but it sometimes seen in horses. Straight backs occur when the withers and croup are fairly low, and don’t have much of a dip between the two. From the side, their entire back will be almost level. This requires a special ‘straight’ saddle built with bars that lack much of a rocker angle. Swayback horses have incredibly prominent, narrow withers and a prominent croup. This typically occurs in horses that are poorly conditioned or that are very old, and makes it so that the saddle cannot sit flat against the back; it balances between the withers and croup. Special pads can be added to fix this problem. A downhill topline occurs when the croup of the horse is slightly higher than the withers, causing the saddle to tip forward. You can get a saddle adjusted with more flocking near the front to balance it out, or you can use special pads under the pommel/fork to force the saddle upright.  A ‘regular’ saddle is built to fit a horse with an average length back. A special saddle is not needed for a horse with a very long back in most cases, but if your horse has a short back, the skirt of the saddle (the leather flaps on either side) might dig into them, causing pain and irritation. If your horse is very small, you may need to get a special ‘small’ saddle to fit their back., If you’re buying a saddle for a very young or unconditioned horse, realize that you will likely have to buy a new one in a year or two to fit their growing body. On the other hand, if your horse is very old or overweight, you might need to get another saddle after a year or two to compensate for a lot of weight loss.  

examine your horse’s withers.  look at the horse’s topline.  look at the length of your horse’s back.  consider the horse’s age. 

 Western and English saddles are measured a bit differently, so before you make any measurements it is important to know what type of saddle you are looking for. Additionally, you want to examine the quality and style of the saddle differently depending on the type of work you plan on doing in it.  Just as most saddles are built for the ‘average’ horse, they are also built to fit the ‘average’ rider. If you are very tall, petite, overweight, or any number of things that affect the overall size/shape of your body, you may need to get a special saddle. Just remember that when you sit in a saddle, the following should occur:   There should be a four inch space from your body to the front of the swell/pommel. You should never be sitting so that you are resting against the cantle or the swell/pommel. Your stirrups should fit comfortably without forcing too much bend in the knee.  Sit in a regular chair with your back against the chair back and your feet on the floor. Use a soft measuring tape and measure the distance from your kneecap to the crease in your hip. This can be used in a size converter to determine the size of your saddle.  Use your measurement to determine the seat size (and therefore the saddle size) of an English saddle. The measurement/size approximately equates as:   A leg/seat measurement of 16.5-inches or less equals a 15-inch saddle. A leg/seat measurement of 16.5–18.5 inches (41.9–47.0 cm) equals a 16-inch saddle. A leg/seat measurement of 18.5–20 inches (47.0–50.8 cm) equals a 16.5-inch saddle. A leg/seat measurement of 20–21.5 inches (50.8–54.6 cm) equals a 17-inch saddle. A leg/seat measurement of 21.5–23 inches (54.6–58.4 cm) equals a 17.5-inch saddle. A leg/seat measurement larger than 23 inches (58.4 cm) will fit an 18-inch or 19-inch saddle., The measurement of seat is a bit different for western saddles than it is for English saddles. The easiest conversion is to subtract two inches from the size of your English saddle, and you’ll be left with the size of your western saddle. Use the following chart to determine your Western saddle size based on your leg/seat measurement:   A leg/seat measurement of 16.5-inches or less equals a 13-inch saddle. A leg/seat measurement of 16.5–18.5 inches (41.9–47.0 cm) equals a 14-inch saddle. A leg/seat measurement of 18.5–20 inches (47.0–50.8 cm) equals a 15-inch saddle. A leg/seat measurement of 20–21.5 inches (50.8–54.6 cm) equals a 15.5-inch saddle. A leg/seat measurement of 21.5–23 inches (54.6–58.4 cm) equals a 16-inch saddle. A leg/seat measurement larger than 23 inches (58.4 cm) will fit an 17-inch or 18-inch saddle., When you’ve gotten your measurement, you can compare that to the seat size of a saddle to determine if it is in your size range. To measure the seat of an English saddle, measure from one of the ‘nails’ to the left or right of the pommel, straight back to the center of the cantle. This will give you the size of the saddle (for example, 16-inches).  Similar to sizing your seat, the measurement of a western saddle seat is different from an English saddle seat. Using a tape measure or a ruler, measure straight from the base of the pommel to the stitching in the seat. Go to the base of the pommel and measure in a horizontal line straight back.   Be careful not to touch the saddle pommel when you measure the seat, as the angle of it will give you too large of a measurement. Go to just the base of the pommel along the stitching.  Although your leg/seat measurement and saddle size can be a good indication of a well-fitting saddle, the only way to tell if a saddle truly fits is to sit in it. Try out many different saddles in several different styles to find the best fit and comfort level according to your personal preference. Be sure to adjust the stirrups to their proper length every time you try on a saddle.It is better to go with a saddle that is a bit too large than one that is a bit too small. It will be less painful for the horse, and easier for you to ride. Bring a trained friend or two along to make sure you are sitting properly in the saddle.  

determine the type of saddle you want.  consider your body type.  take your seat measurement.  determine your size in an english saddle.  determine your size in a western saddle.  measure the seat of an english saddle.  measure the seat of a western saddle.  try on many different saddles. 

 Remember when you checked your horse’s withers and topline? This is when that comes in handy. Place the saddle on your horse without a saddle pad/blanket. If it fits, the bars should be in contact with the horse down the entire length of their back.   If the bars touch only the base of the horse’s back but not the top, then the saddle is too narrow. If the bars touch only the top of the horse’s back but not the bottom, then the saddle is too wide.  The slope of the bar is the angle of the rocker against the angle of the horse’s back. A well-fitting saddle will have bars that mimic the angle of the topline. Therefore, the bars will be in contact along the entire strip of the horse’s back.   If the bars touch only the withers and the croup, then ‘bridging’ will occur and cause sores on the horse. This happens if the bars are too long, or if their isn’t a large enough slope to match the sway of the horse’s back. If the bars contact the center of the horse’s back only, then rocking will occur. This happens if the bars are too short or if the slope of the bars is too great to mimic the horse’s back.  The angle at which the bars turn upwards/outwards at the front at back of the saddle is the bar flare. If there is little to no bar flare evident, then the saddle may be too small for your horse. Make sure that your saddle has evident bar flare to prevent it from digging into your horse’s back while riding, causing sores or chafing.  Place the saddle on your horse without a blanket or saddle pad. Look at gullet from the croup of the horse; you should be able to see all the way through to the withers. If you cannot, then the saddle is too small. Then, go to the gullet by the withers and place as many fingers as you can vertically in the empty space. A well-fitting saddle will allow for 2-2.5 fingers to stack in the gullet; more than that means your saddle is too large, while less means that the saddle is too small. 

check the bar width.  check the bar slope.  check the bar flare.  check the gullet. 

 Before you begin oiling your saddle, be sure to warm your oil. The oil needs to be warm (at most 100 degrees Fahrenheit or 38 degrees Celsius), but not hot. Hot oil can cook your leather and ruin it. In order to guarantee that it’s the right temperature, try soaking it in lukewarm water for about 20 minutes., Once you have properly cleaned your saddle, gently apply a light coat of oil to the grain (smooth or outward facing) side of the saddle. You can use a brush or a rag to very lightly apply the oil. Do not let the oil pool or build up on the leather. This will oversaturate it and ruin the leather. Avoid using any heavy oils, like olive or neatsfoot oil. Follow the manufacturer’s recommended oil or conditioner.Some saddles require few oilings, and a few never need to be oiled. Be sure to follow the manufacturer’s guidelines before you condition your saddle., Use a rag or tack sponge to apply oil to the saddle. Be sure to use a circular motion to get an even application. This will help you avoid spotting. You can also use your hand to apply the oil if you find some hard to reach places.Avoid applying oil to the flesh side or any rawhide parts of the saddle. This will cause them to loosen and stretch out. Instead of rubbing it with oil, soak your bridle in a shallow pan full of oil., Once you have covered the grain in oil, let it sit for a day or two. This will allow the oil to soak into the leather. Keep the saddle in a dry and climate controlled location. Avoid placing it in direct sunlight.If you are oiling the saddle for the first time, you may want to let it sit for longer., After the saddle has sat for a couple days, take a rag and wipe off any excess oil. You should also use a rag to buff the saddle as you wipe off the excess, rubbing in a circular motion. This will help prevent any spotting or discoloration in the leather.Avoid using the saddle again until it is completely dry.  If you are oiling your saddle for the first time, you may need to condition it at least three times over the course of a couple of weeks. You may want to pay particular attention to the fenders and the seat, which will need a little help loosening up.Be sure to follow the manufacturer’s guidelines when oiling your saddle. Over conditioning the saddle can make it too loose and ruin it. Because they are used regularly, you may want to apply more oil to the fenders. The seat may need some extra oil to make it form to your bottom.  After the saddle is properly oiled, you may want to rub in a little conditioner. This will help treat the leather and prevent it from drying out. Simply apply a small amount of conditioner to a rag and gently rub it into the leather. Be sure to use a commercial leather conditioner that is appropriate for your saddle. Your local western ware store should have saddle conditioner.Conditioner is particularly important if you live in an arid climate where your saddle can get dried out. Be sure to follow the saddle manufacturer’s guidelines before applying any conditioner to your saddle.  

warm the oil.  apply the oil.  rub in the oil.  let the saddle sit.  wipe off excess oil.  repeat the process.  apply a conditioner. 

 In order to give your saddle a proper cleaning, you will want to set it on something that will allow you to freely move around it. Ideally, this would be a saddle stand. A stand will give you a sturdy base to work from and help you reach difficult to clean areas. It will also ensure that the saddle maintains its natural position and does not pool water or soap while you clean it.Avoid laying it on a table or on the ground. This will bunch up the saddle and make it difficult to clean properly. It will also get dirty on the ground, and defeat the purpose of the entire process. Do not clean your saddle while it is on your horse. This may irritate your horse.  Before you begin cleaning your saddle, you will want to remove any attachments. These include the stirrups, breast collar, and cinches. You will want to be sure to remove any rawhide attachments, which can soak up excess water and get ruined.If you are conditioning any attachments, do not let them soak in oil while you clean and condition the saddle. This will ruin them. Lightly rub them with oil when you oil the saddle. , Use a dry cloth or brush to wipe off any dust or clumps of dirt. This step is particularly important because you will use very little water when you wash the saddle and removing any dirt beforehand will require less scrubbing. Excess scrubbing and water exposure will damage your leather., Mix your preferred saddle soap with as little water as possible. The water should be lukewarm (around 100 degrees Fahrenheit or 38 degrees Celsius) and mixed with the soap to create a thick foamy lather. Use a double-sided kitchen sponge or loofah glove to gently scrub both sides of the saddle. Be sure to thoroughly scrub the sections that come into contact with the horse - the backside of the fenders, stirrup leathers, and cinch straps.Check your manufacturer’s recommendations on saddle soaps or pastes.  Use a clean rag or sponge and a fresh bucket of warm water to rinse off the saddle. Gently wipe off the soapy residue, making sure to rinse your rag regularly. You will want to be sure to remove all of the soap from the saddle but not use too much soap when doing it.Avoid spraying down your saddle. This will soak it with water and possibly ruin the leather.  Once you have removed all soap residues, let the saddle dry in the air. You may also want to use a towel to remove any excess water. Be sure to store the saddle in a dry place. However, do not leave it in the sun or under direct heat. You want it to be dry but still cool to the touch. Your saddle should be completely dry before oiling. Oiling moist leather may oversaturate the leather and cause it to stretch.  

place the saddle on a stand.  remove all attachments.  wipe off dust and dirt.  wash the saddle.  rinse the leather.  dry the saddle. 

 Ideally, you will want to wipe down your saddle with a damp cloth after each ride. This will remove any dirt, sweat and other materials that can make your saddle dirty. Cleaning your saddle after each ride will limit how often you have to give your saddle a thorough scrubbing.Wiping your saddle after each ride will also help you spot any problems with wear and tear, like loose stitching.  Properly cleaning and conditioning your saddle will help extend its life. If you occasionally ride, you may not need to condition and oil your saddle for around six months. If you live in an extremely dry or humid location, you may need to condition more frequently.Some saddles do not need to be conditioned at all.Be sure to follow your manufacturer’s guidelines for conditioning and oiling your saddle.  When not in use, the ideal place to keep a saddle is in a climate controlled area. This will help keep the saddle from getting too wet or dry. If a climate controlled location is not available, keep the saddle in a cool and dry location.If you are storing a saddle for an extended period of time, make sure that it is cleaned and oiled beforehand. Do not stack saddles on top of each other. Never place a saddle in direct sunlight or expose it to heat. Never store a saddle in a plastic bag or any airtight container. This will prevent the leather from breathing and ruin it. If your saddle came with a cover, place it over the saddle when it’s not being ridden to prevent dust accumulation and animal damage.  If any part of your saddle has cracked, do not try to oil or condition it. The cracked part is ruined and cannot be salvaged. Riding with cracked leather could result in an accident. Have a professional replace any worn or cracked pieces of your saddle.Check your saddle every time you ride. Pay close attention to the rigging, fenders, stirrup leathers, and latigo tie straps.  

wipe down your saddle often.  condition and oil your saddle regularly.  store saddles properly.  replace any cracked leather. 

 If you go into a store that sells tack and horse supplies, you can ask an employee and they should help you find the right size. Make sure you have precise measurements of your horse's head before going in. Choose the halter that matches your pony's size. There are halters made specifically for horses, which are larger and ones made for ponies, which are smaller.; , Do not stand directly in front of the pony. This is their blind spot, where they are unable to see you and you may scare them. Most halters are designed to be put on from the left side of the horse. Hold the halter in your left hand and stand on their left side.  This will let the pony know you do not plan to hurt him and that the halter isn't bad.  Place the lead rope around the neck behind the ears. This will keep the pony from turning around or backing up to avoid halter. Do not tie or buckle the lead rope around the pony's neck. This could cause injury to you or the pony if the pony tried to get away.  The crown piece, or the strap that would go behind your horse's ears, should be unbuckled. If you are planning to lead the horse right away, you can have the lead rope already clipped to the halter. Just make sure the lead rope doesn't get in the way.  Hold the part of the halter that goes by their ears in your other hand.  Settle the nose band on your pony's nose. It should not hang down too low and should rest a little lower than midway up the pony's muzzle and rest on the bridge of the nose.  Do not pull the ears or bend them too much. Buckle the strap by the horse's ears. Make sure that the buckle on the halter is always facing into the pony's jaw so when you take the halter off you are snapping it open from the inside of the halter next to the pony's head. Praise your pony for being cooperative. , Never wrap the lead rope around your hand, the excess length coil and hold in outside hand while inside hand is holding under halter ring on chin.  

check that the halter (head collar) size fits the size of your pony's head.  stand to the left side of your pony.  allow the pony to sniff your hands as well as the halter.  put a lead rope over the the pony's neck so that should he start to wander off before the halter is on, you can hold him back.  start with the halter ready to be put on the horse.  hold the nose band in one hand.  put the pony's muzzle through the loop meant for the nose, making sure not to let the halter get twisted.  put the top of the halter carefully over the pony's ears.  to lead the pony, clip a lead rope to one of the rings on the halter.  ,  to tie a pony, use a slip knot or a quick release knot. 

 Putting a saddle pad on the horses back prevents the leather from rubbing the horse. Make sure the front is near the end of the withers.  Make sure that your horse is secure in cross-ties or being held by a helper throughout the process. Place the saddle directly on their back , making sure that it does not block the front shoulder or extends beyond the last rib in their ribcage.  The gullet is the hollow space that runs down the top of the horse’s spine. If you stand behind your horse, you should be able to look down the gullet and see all the way through to the horse's mane. On the front side of the saddle, you should be able to stack 2-3 fingers vertically inside the gullet.   If you can only fit one finger or less in the gullet, then the saddle tree is too narrow. If you can fit significantly more than three fingers in the gullet, then the saddle tree is probably too wide.  An average horse has a topline that peaks slightly at the withers and croup, with a low dip between the two. The two primary problems appear if a horse is swayback (has a significant dip between the withers and croup) or is straight-backed (has little to no dip between the withers and croup). The saddle should match the angle of the topline.   Bridging will occur if the saddle rests on the croup and the withers without touching the space between the two. Check this on your horse, as if it occurs it will cause sores on the places the saddle comes into contact. Your horse will require a saddle with a larger bend in the saddle tree. If your horse has a straight back (this is most common in mules), then the saddle will rock back and forth on their back. You can rectify this by purchasing a special mule saddle that has a particularly straight saddle tree.  The bars (two parallel bars that run the length of the saddle, giving it support) flare out slightly at the front of the saddle. The most common problem that arises with ill-fitting bars is that there is not enough flare, which constricts shoulder movement and can cause sores. Check to make sure that the saddle flares out from the horse a bit in the front, to allow better freedom of movement., If you’re ever not sure if the saddle you’re trying out doesn’t fit your horse, look to the horse for cues. Their body language will show you if a saddle is uncomfortable or painful, or if a saddle fits well and is tailored to their shape.  Sit relaxed in the seat of the saddle, and check the amount of space there is from the front of your seat to the swell/fork of the saddle (the part the horn is attached to). In a well-fitting saddle, you should have about 4 inches (10.16 cm) between the front of your body and the fork of the saddle.  The cantle is the raised part, similar to the back of a chair, that is placed behind your seat on the saddle. If your saddle fits you well, you should be resting just below the rise of the cantle. If the saddle is too large on you, there will be more than 2 fingers’ width of space between your rear and the cantle. If the saddle is too small for you, you will be resting on the cantle itself.  When sizing a western saddle, you should be able to stand up in the stirrups and have 2 inches (5.08 cm) to 4 inches (10.16 cm) between your bottom and the seat of the saddle. Stirrups can be adjusted, but you don't want extra leather hanging loose. 

place the saddle pad on the horses back.  place the saddle on your horse’s back.  check the gullet clearance.  check the horse’s topline.  check the bar flare.  pay attention to your horse throughout the fitting process.  check the space from your seat to the swell.  check your seat and the cantle.  place your feet in the stirrups. 

 Conversing is a very effective way to get to know somebody and to see if he or she shares the same interests as you do. Starting a conversation or just a quick chat will also help you know whether he or she is into you or not. Keep it interesting!   Talk to him/her on a regular basis making small talk, but occasionally talk about more serious things or engage in a lengthy conversation. If the conversation naturally deepens and you start to share secrets or dreams, you will bond. Listen a lot, and respond compassionately. Don't make the conversation all about you.Maybe you should go for broke. Consider it, anyway, when the time is right. Tell your crush how you really feel. Lay all your cards on the table at once. Just make sure you two are alone and that you say it as casually as possible.Try to be in the same groups if you go to the same school. Always smile at the crush but not too eagerly. Do it just enough to get him or her to smile back and walk over to you. Ask for his or her Snapchat, Instagram, or Facebook because it's less obvious than asking for a phone number, but you'll have the details.; , Try to send signals verbally and through body language. These signals of interest will let the crush know (consciously or subconsciously) that you are crushing on him or her, and he or she might just catch feelings for you.Give small hints with your body language. This may happen on its own. Watch for signs that your crush is doing this too. Open up to your crush, and don't be afraid to show the person your vulnerable side. You need to let the crush know (wordlessly) that he or she is special. Laugh a lot. Get a little flirty. Say the person's name. People love hearing their name being said. Compliment the crush. Touch your crush in a flirtatious way. Not in a creepy way. Touch the crush's arm. It will show that you like the crush, but it will not make the crush think you want to date them if they do not want to. Just lightly touch his or her shoulder, or give him or her a high-five, or even a hug goodbye. Bite your lip, coyly smile when they tease you, run your fingers through your hair (always works), and blink more than usual., These things just happen. Getting someone to notice you is hard, as is keeping their attention. If you want someone to notice you, make eye contact, but not for too long. It's sort of like playing with a small pet and dangling a string in their faces. Pulling the string back and forth keeps their attention.   This doesn’t mean you stare at the crush constantly. That can give anyone a big creep factor. To make eye contact with a crush, you should glance at him or her, smile, and then put your head down or look away shyly. This will give the crush a hint that you like him or her without freaking them out.Eye contact also conveys confidence, which is appealing to most people because it’s a way of building intimacy. People who are in love have more eye contact, studies show.  

strike up a conversation.  send your crush flirtatious signals, and see if he or she responds.  make eye contact. 

 It is very common for two friends/best friends to fall in love or fancy each other after being friends for quite a long time. Knowing what your crush's hobbies, interests and turn-offs are will boost your chances of becoming his/her partner.  Try talking to them as a friend first. If you approach the person as a crush, they will only see you as someone who likes them. This could potentially be problematic if they don't like you because they will be less likely to want to get to know you. Become friends first, and then later try to pursue them. Make sure they feel comfortable around you, through communication. Get to know him or her and let them know you (what you like, what you don't like....etc.) This determines whether you are compatible or not.  Hang out with the crush. Not one-on-one yet, but maybe ask your crush and one or two other friends to go to the park or come over to play video games or something. This way, you can see and interact with each other in a more natural environment.   Do activities together. The more you interact, the more they'll think of you. It's a no-brainer! Eventually, you could ask the crush if he or she wanted to do something casual with you one-on-one. Maybe it’s a sport or a movie. Figure out what interests the crush and ease into the suggestion.  Apart from having an unhappy or forced relationship, pushing things too fast could also ruin the bond you’ve already created, which could lead to losing him/her as a friend as well. Be patient!   Clinging is one of the things people dislike most in a relationship. Give your crush his or her space, and let any relationship unfold at a natural pace. Do not stalk the person. Not only is this inappropriate, but it can be illegal – and it doesn’t work. Do not flirt uncontrollably with the crush. Do not make sure you hear everything about this person, either. Don’t try to be around the crush constantly. If they ever did like you, this will put them off. Hang out together, have fun and talk. If it's meant to be, it'll happen. If not, there are plenty of other fish in the sea. Don't try to make your crush love you. Love is not a game.  They say the best relationships consist of the best of friends! Get to know your crush, and they'll get to know you. More importantly, let the crush know they can trust you and turn to you.   Help the person out whenever your crush needs help or support and be there for the crush at the right time. Be attentive to their wants and needs. If your crush forgets lunch one day and you can afford to get them a snack or share your lunch, they'll greatly appreciate your kindness and compassion. Make them a priority, and be there when they really need it. Be the kind of person they can rely on because you do what you say you will do. Be affirmative. Make your crush feel good about himself or herself.  Get interested in things he/she is interested in. Say, for instance, your crush loves everything about sports. Watch some more sports games so if they start talking about sports with your friends, you'll actually know what they're talking about.If your crush loves older music, ask what their favorite song is. Then, listen to the music, and see if you can find similar songs they might also like. All you can do is be yourself around your crush, and see how the cards play out. Remember to pay attention to your crush's likes and dislikes and to be aware of their feelings and their interests, but don’t adopt interests that truly bore you.  

create a friendship, and be around the crush more.  spend more time with the person.  don’t push it too far too fast.  be a person they can depend on.  learn more about their interests. 

 Be honest with yourself and think: How neat and self-caring are you? Do you take care of your body? Don't be egotistical and self-centered, but do try your best to look good.   Have a sense of fashion. You don’t have to be a top-notch fashionista, but keeping your look up-to-date and funky will most definitely help catch your crush's eye. Looking fresh never hurt anybody. Maybe pick one day a week to dress up a little bit, but make it normal and not too forced Look decent and approachable. If you wear dirty, sloppy clothing, your crush may not want to talk to you. If you are going to buy some new items for your wardrobe, make sure they are your style! Figure out what matches your personality and accents your best points. Make sure that you smell good and are clean. You might want to try wearing a light perfume. Have a distinct scent. Wear perfume/cologne, put on deodorant, brush your teeth and chew gum.  People want to be with people who seem happy and fun, not grouchy and negative. Your attitude can go a long way.   The person you have your eye on is more likely to be kind if you have open posture, smile, and welcome them warmly, either by waving or smiling mischievously. Act happy to see someone, but not so happy they think that you're stalking them. Animals do this to human beings all the time. They act happy to see you, and people become happy to see them. People even look forward to seeing them. It really works. Try to be nice to everyone and don't say bad things about other people. What goes around, comes around. They will notice how you treat other people. Ego and arrogance is never appealing. Be associated with positive things., Don’t change who you are or make excuses. Game playing and people who shape-shift to become someone they aren’t will turn people off. People like a bit of mystery, and they are drawn to confident people.   Have a life outside of them. The more you do, the more interesting you become. The more interesting you become, the more intrigued your crush will become about you. Whether it’s your body shape or your witty comebacks, you have a strong suit. Figure it out, and once you do, work on bringing it out. If you have to change yourself to get your crush to like you, they're probably not worth it. Most crushes don't last more than four months, and someone better might come along.  

look your best but, most importantly, be your natural self.  smile a lot, and keep a positive attitude.  be confident in yourself. 

 If you don't want to dirty things, then set them on a clean surface. Make sure the room is completely empty.; ,,, Take cardboard boxes out. If there is any mold or fungus on them, replace them with new ones.  This can include grooming kits, non-leather stirrups, metal spurs, small pieces of synthetic tack, etc. , You may need to wipe some clean with a wet cloth. Take a stick, in a circular motions and go around the top of the tack room to remove and cob or spider webs.  This will remove the dirt off the floor and it will make it look much better.If there is too much dirt, use an outdoor vacuum if possible. , Wipe down the toilet and sink, them spray them with an all-purpose cleaner. Clean the inside of the toilet as well with Clorox and a toilet scrubber.  If the toilet seat is cracked, replace it. Make sure the saddle racks are screwed in correctly and not broken. Replace broken windows as this presents a hazard. Re-label any racks or shelves if the old tags are not clear.  Make sure they are dry. Try to have a box, bag or bucket to store all small items, with the exception of girths, reins and stirrup leathers, which are best hung up. Make sure that bottles are upright.  Put the most commonly used items, like grooming kits, within easy reach, and the less frequently used items, like clippers, out of the way.  Ideally, they should be in a row along the wall. If you teach riding lessons and have lots of saddles, consider using racks the go on the wall. The bridles should correspond to the location of the saddle.  Bring in the tack and rugs. Order tack by the horse it’s used on rather than type and keep the grooming kit near too. 

take everything from the tack room and set in it the shade somewhere outside.  hang rugs, saddle cloths and boots out to air in a breeze if possible.  ,  take everything out of storage boxes making sure any dust, dirt and hair also comes out.  ,  take plastic storage containers and hose them with mild soap and water, them let them dry in the sun facing on a side.  put any suitable small items in the water to soak.  shake/wipe the excess water off and dry them with a towel or cloth.  ,  dust any shelves, saddle racks, bridle hooks, cabinets, tables, surfaces, etc.  sweep the whole tack room.  if the floor is really dirty, use a floor cleaner to get the remaining gunk off.  ,  now to clean the bathroom (if the tack room has one).  replace or fix anything that is broken.  re-pack the storage boxes.  bring the storage boxes back in and put them away.  put up the saddles on the racks.  wipe the tack with a damp cloth and cover the saddle with a breathable cover or clean saddlecloth.  wash any dirty rugs and saddle cloths.  

 Maybe you could ask your teacher to put it on their desk before class. Alternatively, to decrease the chance of humiliating them, slide it in their locker. These are just ideas, and if they don't help you at all, use your imagination.; , Write out a first draft. Sound cute though.  Make sure it sounds like you, and not like the blonde popular who's so good at everything. Just like you.  Typing it up on a computer is too old fashioned and it doesn't add as much feeling. Use some letter cutouts from magazines or just hand-write it. , Make mental notes about anything that needs to be used for a next note so you can keep writing them. Later, give them some personal info (like e-mail, IM, etc, as long as they don't have your name in them) so you'll know more about them. Eventually, you can see if it's worth the risk of revealing yourself.  

find a way to send it to your crush.  figure out what to say.  edit the note a few times.  once you think that the note is perfect, you are ready to write.  once you're done with everything, put step 1 into action!  ,  make sure to observe his/her reactions towards the note. 

 Not just any other friend, become someone that they couldn't live without, someone who listens to all their problems and always helps out when times get hard. You need to establish a connection like no other, something that neither of you could live without. Becoming fast friends is all about giving her a sense of trust. If she trusts you, she'll be more likely to give you chance when it comes to love.   Open up. Tell her about yourself: your dreams, wishes, and sorrows. It's possible for love to grow where there previously wasn't any, but she has to think of you as a person with real goals, successes, and problems instead of just a friend. The more she's able to see parts of you that others don't see, the better off you'll be. Make the person feel special. Let her know that she is someone's friend - your friend - and that you value her in a unique way. Compliment her for her company and for being there when you needed her, times when you felt sad and all alone. Show appreciation for the comfort the person offers you and for making you smile. Always dream with her, build with her, and always cheer her on and encourage her.; , Before you two get too close and pass the "I love you as a friend" line or become too much of a brotherly figure, you need to give her hints that you might like her more than as a friend. Simple harmless flirts, comments, something that would make her tell you that you're sweet, but also make her think a moment longer about the comment and wonder if there is another deeper meaning to it all.   This is very tough to do with words, because you don't want to make her think you're friends just in order to get in a relationship. In the beginning, stick to flirting with your body. Don't pass up that chance to sit shoulder-to-shoulder with her. Look her in the eye, and smile a lot. If you're really comfortable with her, try tickling her (on her sides or under her arms) or giving her a piggyback ride. Gradually move on to flirting with words. Tell her how much you admire her. Tell her how special she is to you. Tell her she makes your day easier to get through. But remember, a little hinting goes a long, long way! If you're gushing to her every twenty minutes, she could begin to feel uncomfortable as friends and start to distance herself from you.  Be someone whom they can always turn to for reliable advice. If you're there when times get rough, and help her through them, she'll look at you like a problem-solver and trust you more. You'll also be someone she feels safe and secure around.  When you notice hints coming from her end, you know you're getting somewhere. But if your hints haven't really gotten through to her, try a bit harder. Being more obvious can be helpful because some girls are used to being flirted with a lot.   Get her one-on-one. This one's important. If you never see her when it's just the two of you, work toward that goal. The trick is to make it not look like a date when you ask her, but feel like a date when she gets there. Tell her you're in Starbucks studying and you want an awesome girl to distract you from your work instead of "Hey, do you wanna get coffee later on, just you and me?" Make her a mix-tape of your favorite music. The music you listen to shows her a whole other side of you; it helps her to understand you better. It also sends her a subtle message that you enjoy sharing personal things with her. Be sure to include music that you think she might like. You could be setting yourself up for a fall if she only listens to Beethoven and you give her Metallica. After you give her your mix, ask her to make one for you.  Backing off is important because it lets her know what she's missing when she doesn't see you. It should force her to think about all the ways you make her life fuller, richer, more enjoyable. She'll be eager to see you in no time.   When you're sure that you are getting somewhere, back off a little. If you see her everyday, avoid her for two days or so, no contact! She will end up missing you and really understanding how deeply she feels for you. But make sure you have a valid reason for being away when she asks. You don't want to be caught in a lie, or look like you're avoiding her on purpose. If you think it might work, try hanging out with another girl for a day, just to pique her interest. Girls are attracted to men who get along with lots of attentive women. The goal here isn't to make her super jealous. The goal is to make her think that girls like being around you, and that you have lots of different options when it comes to women.  Don't worry about what friends say she feels about you, because, as we all know, information can get distorted. It's like a game of telephone. She tells something to her other friend, who tells it to a completely different friend, who gossips to her acquaintance, and pretty soon the message has changed completely from what it originally was. Tune out any noise that isn't coming directly from her.   Be persistent and continue to do fun things with her. Studies show that doing something exciting, daring, or adventurous together helps release a chemical (called norepinephrine) in her body and yours that is associated with romantic feelings. So don't listen to what her friends or your friends say, and bring her to Six Flags, that haunted house, or an exciting game — anything that might cause her to jump, scream, or wriggle with excitement.  Remember, only do this if you're okay with the possibility of losing a friend; it can get very awkward and uncomfortable if she knows that you want a relationship and she doesn't feel the same way about you. Because what you're doing is risking a friendship to get a relationship. Some girls will be mad at you for doing this. You might not be friends after you tell her.  If you are sure, you need to tell her. Be honest with her and explain your feelings. You can say something like: "I've really valued our friendship these past couple months, and have grown to see how special of a person you are, and how alive you make me feel inside. I value our friendship over everything, but I really like you. I can't hide my feelings for you anymore. Would you go on a date with me?" Give her an out. Let her know that it's okay if she doesn't feel the same way, and that you can take it. You want her honest opinion, not her sugarcoated idea of what you want her to say. If you give her an out by saying "I know you may not feel the same way about me, and I respect that," it could go a long way to saving the friendship if she doesn't want to pursue a relationship. And if she does want a relationship, it will reinforce to her how sweet and respectful you are when it comes to her. Don't get too emotional. Whatever you do, don't break down. Emotions are powerful things, and she might think that you're using your emotions to manipulate her, causing her to distance herself from the situation. If you get emotional, she'll tend to pity you and revert back to the friend-zone that you want to try to get away from. Stay stoic, even if you're boiling up inside. Smile at her, regardless of what she says, and be as happy as possible.  

attempt to become their best friend.  hint.  be a shoulder to lean on.  keep trying.  back off.  only listen to feedback from her.  if you're sure you want to take the relationship further, tell her. 

 Avoid one-on-one encounters with your crush until you've practiced getting your nerves under control. Hanging around in a group setting will take a lot of pressure off of you and make you feel a lot less self-conscious. Even if they don't know about your crush, your friends being there will lend the moral support you'll need to relax.; , You don't have to go overboard. But if you overheard that your crush may be heading to the same party as you? Wear your best jeans rather than the comfortable pair with one hole too many. The worst case scenario means you just spent the night looking marvelous for everyone else.  Eye contact can be difficult when you're nervous. Constantly staring at your shoes when your crush is around is decidedly uncool. A pair of sunglasses will make things easier by letting you appear to look directly at your crush without actually having to make eye contact.   Don't wear shades at night or indoors. Above all, you want to look natural in front of your crush. People don't normally wear sunglasses away from the sun. Your shades may look out of place and draw unwanted attention. If you can look your crush in the eye, skip the shades. Maintaining eye contact makes you look more confident. It can also subtly single to your crush that you're interested without saying a word., Controlled breathing works two-fold: It keeps you mentally relaxed and prevents you from getting winded. When people are nervous, the jitters can often show up in their voice and they may find themselves gasping for air while standing still.   If you feel yourself starting to blush, breathe deeply through your nose. Deep breathing will calm you and reduce flushing in your face., Talk about topics you're knowledgeable about and ask your crush about what interests him or her. Try to make sure everyone involved in a conversation gets a roughly equal amount of time to speak. Ask your crush questions about his or her goals and aspirations. Try to stick to positive topics, and answer questions about yourself freely. You don't need to be guarded to look good in front of your crush.Use these conversations as an opportunity to learn more about your crush so that you can make an educated decision about a possible future relationship. You may find out that the two of you are incompatible. Or, you may find out that your crush already has a significant other or is not attracted to people of your gender. If that's the case, you will need to let your crush go.  When we want someone to like us, it can be tempting to put on a persona you think your crush wants in a significant other. While pretending to share interests and viewpoints may win your crush over in the short-term, you won't be able to build a real relationship from white lies. It's better to be honest and stay yourself. Instead of pretending to know everything about his or her favorite hobby, share something about your own.  People are attracted to confidence, not narcissism. If you're trying to build yourself up in front of a person you like it can be easy to go overboard. Bragging about your accomplishments will simply make you look insecure. Don't be shy to mention your talents but only if it's something that organically comes up in conversation. If it's not something you can picture yourself saying to a group of friends without cringing, don't say it.  An example of what to avoid while still looking your best: If you were accepted to a prestigious university and you've heard your crush is attracted to intelligence, you may feel tempted to tell him or her. Mentioning your acceptance when it is irrelevant to the conversation is definitely showing off. Depending on how exclusive the school may be, you even simply bringing up the topic of college plans may come off as bragging. Wait until the subject is brought up organically in conversation to tell your crush about this achievement. He or she will probably be impressed with both your intelligence and humility.  Under normal circumstances, you may be able to do a backflip with ease. Around your crush, you may be nervous enough to flub your moves. Wait until you're relaxed before showing your crush a neat trick that has the potential to embarrass.  Discussing other people's negative traits will actually make your crush perceive those same bad traits in you. Instead, talk positively of other people to make the reverse come true.This is especially important if you and your crush don't know each other very well. While gossiping you may let a careless judgmental word slip that seriously offends your crush. Also, even if you barely ever indulge in damaging gossip, a crush who hasn't been around you long won't know that. Make your crush's first impressions of you positive ones. 

make sure you have a friend or two close by.  try dressing up a bit if you think you may run into your crush.  wear sunglasses if you have trouble making eye contact.  keep your breathing even and steady.  be a good conversationalist.  keep yourself from pretending to be someone you're not.  try not to be a showoff.  be sure to avoid literally showing off.  avoid gossip and negative talk in general. 

 Before you consider purchasing a saddle, you need to make a firm decision on the specific type of riding you hope to do. There are two general categories of riding: english and western. English saddles come in traditional english, hunter, dressage, and jumper varieties. Western saddle options include traditional western, endurance, barrel racing, and roping styles.; , The chair-like area of the saddle that you sit in is known as the ‘seat’. Seats come in a variety of sizes for the multiple body-types riders have. To measure your seat, sit in a chair with your back against the chair back and your feet on the floor. Use a soft measuring tape and measure the distance from your kneecap to the crease in your hip.   Your seat length should vary somewhere between 13-19-inches for an adult. You can visit an online seat converter and enter in your physical attributes (weight, height, etc.) to get an immediate measurement instead of measuring yourself.  Use your seat measurement to determine the seat size (and therefore the saddle size) of an English saddle. The measurement/size approximately equates as:   A leg/seat measurement of 16.5-inches or less equals a 15-inch saddle. A leg/seat measurement of 16.5–18.5 inches (41.9–47.0 cm) equals a 16-inch saddle. A leg/seat measurement of 18.5–20 inches (47.0–50.8 cm) equals a 16.5-inch saddle. A leg/seat measurement of 20–21.5 inches (50.8–54.6 cm) equals a 17-inch saddle. A leg/seat measurement of 21.5–23 inches (54.6–58.4 cm) equals a 17.5-inch saddle. A leg/seat measurement larger than 23 inches (58.4 cm) will fit an 18-inch or 19-inch saddle., The measurement of seat is a bit different for western saddles than it is for English saddles. The easiest conversion is to subtract two inches from the size of your English saddle, and you’ll be left with the size of your western saddle. Use the following chart to determine your Western saddle size based on your leg/seat measurement:   A leg/seat measurement of 16.5-inches or less equals a 13-inch saddle. A leg/seat measurement of 16.5–18.5 inches (41.9–47.0 cm) equals a 14-inch saddle. A leg/seat measurement of 18.5–20 inches (47.0–50.8 cm) equals a 15-inch saddle. A leg/seat measurement of 20–21.5 inches (50.8–54.6 cm) equals a 15.5-inch saddle. A leg/seat measurement of 21.5–23 inches (54.6–58.4 cm) equals a 16-inch saddle. A leg/seat measurement larger than 23 inches (58.4 cm) will fit an 17-inch or 18-inch saddle., To tell if your english saddle fits you, put it on a saw-horse or your horse and sit in it as you would for riding. You should be able to fit four fingers on the cantle behind your seat. If you can’t fit at least four fingers, the saddle is too small. If you can fit a whole hand or more flat against the cantle, the saddle is too big.  Test the fit of a western saddle by sitting on it as you would for riding on either a saw-horse or your horse. A well-fitting saddle will allow three to four fingers to fit between the fork/swell and your thigh. If you can fit more than four fingers, the saddle is too large. If you can’t fit at least three fingers, the saddle is too small., Before you settle on a saddle, be sure that it offers the correct stirrup length for your body type. Although different styles require different stirrup lengths (jumpers use short stirrups, for example), you can get a ballpark idea of your stirrup length by standing to the side of the saddle, and pulling the stirrup up to your armpit. When the stirrup fits in the hollow of your armpit, it is close to the length you will require when riding.  Place the prospective saddle on your horse’s back without a saddle pad or blanket. Move it so that it is in the accurate position: the front of the saddle should rest on the withers without blocking the shoulder and the back should go no further than the last rib bone. Move the saddle back and forth a few times to find the ‘sweet spot’.  The gullet is the long empty space that runs length-wise along the spine of the horse. A proper fitting saddle will allow you to see all the way through the gullet when viewed from the back. You should be able to fit 2-3 fingers stacked on top of the withers inside the gullet, just below the fork/swell (western) or the pommel (english).  If you can’t fit at least 2 fingers in the gullet from the front, the saddle tree is too small for your horse and will pinch their spine. If you can fit more than three fingers in the gullet from the front, then the saddle tree is too large and will cause rocking and saddle sores on your horse.  The bars are the part of the saddle that form the gullet and hold the saddle on the horse’s back. The bars run along the length of the spine, and should be in contact with the entirety of the horse’s back if the saddle fits. If the bars are too straight, they will only meet with the withers and the croup of the horse’s back, causing briding. If the bars are too curved, they will touch only the center of the horse’s back and cause the saddle to rock in between the withers and the croup.  The bars flare outwards at the front and back of the saddle to prevent chafing and rubbing while riding. If the saddle fits, the front of the saddle tree should flare out slightly. If the saddle is too small, there won’t be any bar flare evident and it will be very uncomfortable to your horse.  Some horses are very wide across their backs, while others are very narrow. To tell if the saddle fits your horse’s back size, see where the bars sit. If they rest very high up, almost on top of the spine, then the saddle is too narrow. If the bars slide down very far past the spine, then the saddle is too wide.  The bar width is closely related to the gullet clearance; a too-narrow bar width will cause a larger gullet space while a too-wide bar width will cause little to no gullet clearance., When you get the girth tightened on your horse, you should be able to fit four fingers side-by-side between the front of the girth and your horse’s shoulders. An ill-fitting saddle may cause the girth to fall forwards or slide backwards.  Throughout the saddle testing/fitting process, keep an eye on your horse. If the saddle isn’t the right size or uncomfortable, your horse will show it in their body language.  

decide on the type of saddle you want.  take your seat measurement.  determine your size in an english saddle.  determine your size in a western saddle.  check an english saddle for proper fit.  check a western saddle for proper fit.  check the stirrup length.  position the saddle.  check the gullet.  check the bar slope.  check the bar flare.  check the bar width.  test the girth.  pay attention to your horse’s response. 

 When your crush is around, chat with their potential rivals, including their friends. Keep the conversation casual so that the person you’re flirting with doesn’t actually ask you out.Say something like, “How was your weekend?” or “I have so much homework to do this weekend, but I can’t miss my friend’s party.” Make sure that you don’t throw yourself at others.If you get asked out by your crush’s friend, then you may become off-limits to your crush because of friend loyalty.; , It doesn’t matter if you think something is funny, laughing is a key part of flirting. It also shows your crush that you have a good sense of humor and are fun to be around., Your crush will pick up on flirty body language, even if it’s directed at other people. While you don’t want to go overboard, doing a little bit of flirting with body language will be enough to make your crush green with envy. It will work best if you aim your flirty vibes at a group rather than a specific individual because that way no one will think you’re coming onto them.Smile or pucker your lips. Get closer to the other person. Playfully touch their arm. Keep your arms down to your side or gesturing; don’t cross them or fidget.  Twirling your hair or sweeping it over your shoulder is a timeless flirting technique. As a bonus, playing with your hair will stir the scent of your shampoo and your pheromones.   Wrap pieces of hair around your finger. If your hair is up, take it down and shake it out. You can always put it back up again if you need it out of your face.  

talk to other potential dates.  laugh and giggle at the other person’s jokes.  use body language.  play with your hair. 

 If you want to make someone jealous, you need to know why you rock as a person. We all have great qualities, so think about what makes you special.People will treat you how you allow them to, so set high standards for yourself. Remind yourself that you have as much value as anyone else and deserve to be treated well.Make a list of your best traits, your hobbies and interests, and the positive things you’ve done over the past few years, such as volunteering or helping out your grandparents. Don’t make excuses for someone who doesn’t treat you well; instead, ignore that person and focus on your friends.Remind yourself that all people are different, but they are also still valuable. This means that not everyone will like you, but that shouldn’t take away from how you feel about yourself., When you know that you’re going to be around your crush, choose clothes that make you feel your best and reflect your identity. In addition to looking your best, you’ll convey more confidence because when you feel you look good you project those positive thoughts to the world.Show of your best features. Pick an outfit that expresses something about you. For example, you could wear something studded to show that you’re edgy, or something flowy to show your girly side.  Show that you’re comfortable with yourself by keeping your arms loose at your side., When you first meet up with people, meet each of their eyes and give a casual greeting such as, “Hey, guys!.” Maintain eye contact as you talk to people, including your crush.Practice making eye contact with your friends. If you just can’t make eye contact with their eyes, try to look at their noses.  No matter where you are, pretend like you’re hosting a party and need to see and speak to everyone. Not only will you look confident, but your crush will have to notice you since you’ll be fluttering around like a social butterfly.   Say “hi” to everyone. Speak to everyone before the end of the event. Set time limits for how long you will spend in one spot or talking to the same people. For example, after 15 minutes you could make an excuse to walk away. Say, “I’ll catch you guys in a minute. I’ve got to refill my drink.”  

know your worth.  wear your favorite outfit.  keep yourself open.  make eye contact.  own the room. 

 Even if you aren’t busy, make it seem like you are. You want your crush to think that everyone is wanting a piece of your time because they will be jealous that you aren’t spending that time with them.If you don’t talk directly to your crush, announce your plans to the group. Say, “I’m happy I got to come out with you guys today because the rest of my weekend is packed. I’ve got a party tomorrow night, and then I’m going to the beach on Sunday.”  , You can’t show them attention when you’re with others or focused on doing something awesome. While you may be tempted to text a pic or comment to show how cool and busy you are, it’s better to wait until you’ve gotten home to share.If you get a text from your crush while you’re out, wait to answer it, even if they ask what you’re doing. If you keep them wondering, they’re more likely to get jealous of those who are getting your attention.  When you’re with your friends, you accomplish two goals for making your crush jealous: you’re spending time with people who aren’t your crush, and you show how much fun you are to be around. When your crush realizes that you aren’t waiting around for them to like you, they’re more likely to want you more., New activities will help you spend more time with other people, will give you more plans, and will show that you have lots of options for how you spend your time. Plus, you’ll be so busy that you won’t have as much time to think about your crush.Join a club. Try out for a team. Try community theater. Volunteer at a local animal shelter.  Use your social media accounts like Snapchat, Instagram, and Facebook to show off your amazing life. You can accomplish this by only posting your finest moments. If you’re feeling down, call a friend instead of posting about it. When your crush checks out your stories, you want your life to look fabulous.Even if you’re spending time alone, make it look like you’re really busy doing amazing stuff. Post pics with friends and family. Choose moments when you’re out doing something rather than posting selfies.  

tell them you have plans.  don’t text them when you’re out.  go out with your friends.  participate in new activities.  post on social media. 

 Keep him guessing by only providing a few details about yourself at a time instead of telling him your life story. When he asks questions, only provide half answers so that he has to keep the conversation going to find out what he wants to know. By providing a little mystery, you make yourself appealing to just about anyone.For example, hint at your favorite hobby by saying, “The last time I ate tacos was at the cast party for Romeo and Juliet.” When your crush asks if you were in the play, you could half answer and say, “Being part of the show was amazing. I hope I get to do My Fair Lady someday.” This will keep them wondering if you were the star of the show and will make you seem more exciting.  Don’t show how eager you are to spend time with him, even if you’re not busy. Make a show of running through your list of plans before committing to spending time with him, especially if he’s inviting you to a group event.Try mixing up the days on purpose. For example, if your crush mentions a party that your group will go to on Friday night, say, “Oh, Saturday I already have tickets to a concert!” Then when they correct you, say, “That’s awesome! I can probably make Friday happen. Thanks for reminding me.” Suggest alternate plans. For example, if your crush asks you to get frozen yogurt on Tuesday, ask them if you can do it on Thursday instead because of a conflict. This will keep them guessing about what you’re doing.  One of the hallmarks of the mysterious cool girl is the fact that she sees herself somewhere special in the future, whether it’s art school or running for president. Figure out what yours could be. Would you love to have your own makeup company or to move to the big city to work as a pastry chef? Think about how you can make your daydreams come true.Don’t explain your big plans to your crush. Instead, casually refer to it while you’re within earshot of your crush. You could say, “I’m so tired of taking classes that I don’t need. That’s why I’m going to art school in a few years,” or “You better enjoy my macarons for free while you can because pretty soon they’ll be lining up in the streets of New Orleans for a taste of them.”  , Mixed signals are a classic tool for making someone jealous because they keep the person guessing. While it’s a little mean, sending mixed signals will allow you to get someone’s attention while still avoiding embarrassment because whether or not you’re into them will be unclear.Turn the conversation to serious topics after a flirty exchange. After you talk to them for a bit at a social event, focus all of your attention on someone else for awhile. After texting them a lot, take a break. Wait a day or two before answering their last text. This can backfire! It can make you look mean or thoughtless or just like you don't like them. Use this tactic with caution.  When both of you are going to be at the same event, don’t rush to talk to your crush. Instead, say “hi” to other people first, and try to strike up a conversation with someone., Think about which social justice or societal issue is the most important to you, and write down a few comments about these issues that you could share with your trust. Show them that you are a thoughtful, intelligent person.You could also look at blogs and memes that deal with philosophical issues to help you figure out your own deep thoughts.  

limit how much information you provide.  hesitate before agreeing to plans.  mention your big plans.  send mixed signals.  talk to others before you talk to your crush.  share a deep thought. 

 You could also use a scrapbook or just staple some sheets together. Choose a binder that is in your or his/her favourite colour or has a picture of a band you both like. You might even be able to buy one just the same as the one they use at school!; , This is much more fun to do if you are doing it about a person you're crazy about. Not sure if it's a crush, lust, friendship or even something more? Check out How To Tell if It's an Acquaintance, Friend, Crush, or Love.  You might like to brainstorm ideas and compose paragraphs on their best qualities in your best handwriting to give the binder a personal touch. Back up what you consider their best qualities with examples, such as I realised how smart he was when we did a project on the Renaissance in class and he had loads of information, which he shared, such as... or I realised how kind she is when she helped me after I lost my schoolbag.... Write down the full story. These will give you some great memories re-reading the binder and makes your argument more persuasive and credible.  Take photos or get them offline. Take photographs of places you've been together or of mutual friends.  Note any funny or touching moments you've had together.  (Mandy Brown, Ryan Green, Mandy Green Ryan Brown)  ,, Did you go on a school tour? Add a brochure from wherever you went and write about anything that happened. Did you go to the cinema with friends? Stick in your ticket, an advertisement or review of the film you saw, the popcorn carton you ate from or pictures from the internet of people at the cinema.  You might like to think of where you would like the relationship to be in six months, a year, five years and ten years. Perhaps you'll be googling a picture of a beautiful bride and groom and adding your own heads! Write what careers you expect to attract you and your crush and what you would like for them. Whilst it is best not to take planning a future together too seriously just yet it is a nice idea to seriously think about what your hopes and dreams for yourself and for them are. It will make interesting reading in a few years and will focus you on achieving in the here and now.  There is only so much you could know about them as a crush. It's up to you to develop the relationship so soon you're filling those pages with memories of dates, fun times and maybe even your first kiss... What if they say no? It'll hurt a little but you'll get over it and you won't be wasting your time crushing on someone whose not interested while the right person for you is walking around out there, searching for you! You might like to read How to Ask Out Your Crush. Best of luck!  , 

get a binder!,  have a crush!,  write all about what you think of them (cute, adorable, hot, loving, sensitive, etc).  get photos.  write all your connections with them.  write your name and their last name together.  write their name and hearts all around it.  ,  add in mementos from time you've spent together.  what does the future hold?,  see all those empty pages?,  love them!  

 When you are first getting to know someone, you may not know what kinds of things that make them laugh. If you don't know her that well, try to talk to her more so you get an idea of her interests. You can also pay attention to the clothes she wears and items she carries, looking for any reference to shows she may like, topics she may be passionate about, or genres of literature, music, movie, or TV shows she may enjoy. These elements will give you a larger idea of the type of humor she enjoys.Spending more time around her and her friends is a great way to get to know your crush better. When she laughs at a joke, take note of what kind of joke it is and try to bring that kind of humor when you talk to her.; , You don't know how good a joke or antic is unless you try it out on other people. Your family may have heard the jokes you tell a million times, so try your humor out of your friends or at a party to see how it is received by others. If they find some things funnier than other, focus on the more successful elements of your humor and try to adapt others to make them funnier.  If you aren't prone to clever jokes, don't worry. There are many different kinds of jokes out there in books, blogs, and videos, so pick some and memorize them. This way, next time you are around your crush, you can tell a great joke and no one will ever know it wasn't yours.   Make sure you search for jokes that fit you. You don't want to give your crush the wrong idea about the kind of person you are by telling jokes that don't have a bit of your personality in them., No matter what type of humor you decide you want to use on your crush, practice it. Comedic timing is important to any joke or antic, impressions can always use work, and sarcasm isn't easy to pull off. Try elements out of your family or practice in front of a mirror until you get it perfect. You don't want to tell the joke "What happens to a frog's car when it breaks down? It gets toad away." and get the punchline wrong. You won't be able to impress your crush if you are stumbling over your words.Practice will make you more confident when you are using your humor on your crush. She will see how sure you are of yourself and will appreciate your personality and strength of character., When you are out with your crush, pick the right moment to tell a joke. Whether it is one you got from someone else or one you made up yourself, making a girl laugh is a great way to attract her attention and make you seem sexier in her eyes. It can also be a great way to break the ice. Laughing will make you both feel more comfortable, easing the tension that often comes with new relationships.For example, use jokes that play on words. Tell jokes like "What did the duck say when he bought lipstick? Put it on my bill." These kinds of jokes are humorous and are funny to everyone.A well placed knock-knock joke is always a winning idea, and you can make it flirtatious as well. Try something like "'Knock-knock!' 'Who's there?' 'You're.' You're who?' 'You're so cute when you smile.'" It pays her a compliment and will most likely get her to smile.Keep your jokes tasteful. You don't want to make the wrong impression by insulting your crush so early in your relationship. Keep them on topics that are appropriate for all types of people. Save the more specialized jokes for when you know her better.  Make funny comments about the things around you. Maybe you notice a large push/pull sign on a door and think it's overstated. Make a joke about it, such as "Could that sign be any bigger? I think we get the point.", then exaggerate your movements as you push the door open. Or maybe pretend the sign is wrong by pretending to pull and acting like it isn't working. It will let her know you are attentive to your surroundings and show her that you can come up with humor on the spot.You can also incorporate sarcasm into these types of situations. If you see someone with a large truck, say something like "I think that guy should buy a bigger truck. I hear the prices of Mac trucks are down this year." Dry wit is usually appreciated and will make her laugh. Just make sure you don't only talk in sarcastic remarks. She might think you are a negative person and not want to be around you., Find small things about her that you can pick on. Make a joke about how large her handbag is or the size of her sunglasses, anything that is small and unimportant. For example, ask her "Plan on robbing a bank later? I think you can use your purse as the getaway car." Remember to keep your tone light and keep a smile on your face. You don't want her to think you are actually making fun of her.Don't take it too far and hurt her feelings. Stay away from topics like her weight, what she looks like, or other things that might be a sore subject. You don't want to make her think you're mean or cause major offense so early in your courtship. Try making fun of yourself as well. This lets her know that you have a sense of humor about yourself and you don't take yourself too seriously. Say something like "I'm a great driver. Today, I even got a note complimenting my skills that said 'Parking Fine'." Just remember not to take it too far and become too self-deprecating., You can liven up any moment with a bit of physical humor. Pretend to run into a door, falling down and acting hurt. You can also do a silly dance, pretend like you are going to jump on her back for a piggyback ride, or play wrestle with her. It's a more active way to make her giggle and can have the benefit of amusing those around you as well.   You can also tickle her or pretend to mess up her hair. This allows you to touch her in a playful way that is different than holding her hand or putting your arm around her., Nothing is better than a great impression to get someone to laugh. Pick a celebrity that you know she likes or someone you both know, like a mutual friend or a professor. This way, she won't miss out on the joke and can be laughing along with you.   Make sure you test out your impressions on others before you try to impress your crush. You don't want her to be laughing at you because your impression is so bad instead of with you because it's great. 

learn about your crush.  tell your jokes to others.  learn other people's jokes.  practice.  tell jokes.  use observational humor.  tease her.  perform physical comedy.  do impressions. 

 If you want to show that you are interested in someone, you need to show that person that you are interested in the things he or she says. Even minor details, like the name of a pet or a childhood phobia, should be recalled and dropped into conversation from time to time.   If you have a hard time dropping details like this into conversation naturally, remember habits and demonstrate your recollection by appealing to these habits. For instance, if your crush orders the same drink without fail, order it for him or her before your crush shows up.You should also remember the obvious things: birthdays, things you spoke about in your last conversation, and so on.; , When you are with the apple of your eye, focus solely on that person and that person alone. Do not text other people or look around for other friends. Make sure that your full attention is on your crush.  Find excuses to meet your crush's friends or close relatives. These are the people he or she loves. If you want to be among their ranks, you will need to demonstrate an interest in them, first.   Another important way to work your way into that person's life is to open up as many channels of communication as possible. Get a phone number and call or text occasionally. You should never become a pest about it, but the occasional “good morning,” “good night,” or “what are you up to?” text will let that special someone know that he or she is on your mind. Likewise, you should also casually invite this person into your own life. Introduce him or her to your friends. If your family is doing something fun that your crush might enjoy, consider extending an invitation.  You can be as kind as possible to this person, but it still won't be enough to convey your interest if you are naturally the same way to everyone else. You do not need to be nasty to other people, but you should definitely treat this person with more care and attention than you give to others. More importantly, make it obvious to him or her that this is the case.   For instance, if you notice that your crush's plate or glass is empty, offer to fill it. Go out of your way to perform other random acts of kindness for the person you favor. Give your crush a greeting card or a favorite candy bar if you know that he or she is having a rough day.  No matter how busy you are, if you want to let your crush know that you are interested, you need to make it a point to hang out from time to time.   Similarly, you should purposefully seek them out when you are at a group event, like a party. Make sure to convey your desire to spend time with this person even when in the midst of a crowd of others. Text or email back as soon as you get this person's messages, even if you do not do that with other people.  If you stumble across something that makes you think of the other person, send an email or text to tell them about it. By showing that you think of your crush even when he or she is not around, you are demonstrating just how often that person is on your mind.   Similarly, if you go a few days without seeing this person, send a quick “I miss you” message. Wait for days or events when you might usually see them, though—like a party they were invited to and couldn't attend.  Locking eyes for three seconds can speak volumes, especially if you conclude by slowly dragging your eyes away.   Eye contact has even greater impact if you get caught staring at person you are interested in. Make sure that when you get caught, however, you quickly look away. In doing so, you let him or her know that you were just caught in the act and not merely staring into space. One thing to avoid doing, of course, is staring the other person down. Eye contact conveys a certain level of intimacy and flirtatiousness when done right. When overdone, though, you can quickly intimidate someone and ruin your chances for good.  When you greet the object of your affection, smile. Smile while talking to him or her. Smile when you part ways. There is something warm and friendly about a smile, and wielding one whenever your crush is around will help convey just how happy you are about the interaction you have.   Another great thing about a smile is that it really demonstrates the excitement you feel whenever you find yourself around this person. A smile that flashes your pearly whites and makes your eyes sparkle will leave very little room for doubt in the other person's mind.  You do not need to dress up every time you see him or her, but as a general rule, put in a minimum amount of effort to look good. Showing that you care about how you look in front of this person will hint at the fact that you have a reason to care about such things.   On a similar note, if your crush specifically said that a particular piece of jewelry or garment looked nice on you, wear it frequently. In doing so, you can show that you really value how that person views you.  Find excuses to make brief, subtle touches. A casual touch on the arm or knee while you talk can work wonders. Even these seemingly innocent forms of touch convey a sense of intimacy, and by initiating them, you are telling the other person that you want to be close.   Every time you touch this person, you should use a very gentle, light touch. A hearty pat on the back can be a friendly sign, but it does not do much to convey romantic interest. If possible, move in for a hug when you greet or say goodbye, as well. This form of physical contact is often reserved for people who are close, so it could help bridge the gap between you both. If you do hug when you say goodbye, make sure that your hug lingers. Do not let go immediately; instead, let your hands linger before hesitantly sliding them away. This move will show that you are reluctant to say your farewells., More precisely, touch areas of the body that seem innocent while also hinting at intimacy. Touch your face or hair, or slowly stroke your own arm a bit. Use your tongue to moisten your lips every now and then. By touching yourself in ways like these, you can hint to the other person that you really wish they were touching you, instead.   You need to make sure that you do not seem too suggestive or creepy when you do this, though. Act like your self-touching is subconscious and casual, rather than making it obvious that it is entirely for his or her benefit. One of the worst things you can do is to have your hands all over yourself while staring the other person down with a hungry look in your eyes.  Another great way to demonstrate how interested in you are in someone is to demonstrate an active interest in learning more about that person. Ask anything you can think of as long as you avoid questions that might make him or her uncomfortable.   Ask your crush how his or her day was. Ask about family, friends, dreams, interests—there are a wide range of topics when you really stop to think about it. If a certain topic makes him or her obviously uncomfortable, drop it. It may have been an innocent question at first, and most people will forgive you for accidentally stumbling onto one of their landmines. If you persistently drag that topic up afterward, though, you can make yourself into a nuisance and a bully quickly.  This can be a bit tricky since there is a fine line between teasing gently and teasing mercilessly, but if you pull it off, it can have a lot of impact. Playfully tease your crush about unimportant things, like being late or having bed hair. Never tease about points of insecurity, though.  You may not want to tell this person how you feel in direct terms, but you should drop some pretty obvious hints from time to time to let him or her know that you really do like being around them.   Tell him or her flat out that you enjoyed the time you spent together. Try something simple like, "I had a great time talking with you tonight. We should do it again soon." This might seem fairly blunt, but unless you spit it out, the other party might find ways of doubting your reactions. Leave no room for such doubts.Master the art of casual compliments. Let the object of your affections know how stunning they look today or sigh in amazement when they solve a difficult problem. Show how much they impress you.  This can be difficult, of course, since inside jokes are usually things that happen naturally. Once you have something that counts, though, bring it up frequently. Doing so shows just how much you value that bit of connection between the two of you.  There is something intrinsically appealing about hearing your own name being called, and the other person is likely to appreciate it if you make an effort to say his or her name several times during your conversations.   You should also consider coming up with a nickname. Nicknames express a special sort of connection between two people, especially if you use a nickname that no one else uses with that person. Once you settle on a nickname, make sure to actually use it.  Make a habit of turning to this person for advice or helpful opinions whenever you have a choice to make. By asking for advice, you can demonstrate that you are interested in what this person thinks.   Ask for advice on everything from movie recommendations to solving disputes you have at work or with other friends. You should balance both serious and lighthearted matters.  

remember things.  focus.  work your way into the other person's life.  give special treatment.  make time for this person.  contact him or her "just because.",  make eye contact.it might sound trite to say that eyes are windows to the soul, but in a lot of ways, that seems to be true.  smile.  look your best.  touch your crush.  touch yourself.  ask questions.  tease.  drop hints.  get an inside joke.  say the other person's name.  ask for his or her opinion. 

 Locking eyes can cause crazy sparks. Don't try to stare deep into his soul (that could come off as creepy), but if you can catch his eye from across the room or hold his gaze while talking, you can have a major affect on him.Eye contact causes arousal and can lead to feelings of attraction.Try catching his gaze and smiling as you look away. Then glance back at him again.; , Touching increases attraction and can elevate a person's heart rate, similar to what they experience when falling in love.Finding subtle ways to make physical contact will help you stay on his mind.   Sit next to him so that your shoulders or legs barely touch."Accidentally" graze his arm while reaching for something or brush fingers when you hand him something.Touch his arm to get his attention or emphasize a point, or when he's said something funny.  Don't use his name to start every other sentence, but drop it into conversation every once in a while. It will grab his attention, foster a sense of intimacy, and reminds him that you're thinking only about him.If he says something that makes you laugh or blush, try saying his name quietly as you laugh. Nicknames can be fun, too. If you give him a nickname that only you use, your little inside joke will set your relationship apart.  Don't pour your perfume all over yourself--if it's too strong, it's going to be a turn-off and may even cause headaches or allergic reactions. Apply just a little so he will be able to smell it when you're close to him. His mind will create an association between you and your fragrance.   Consider a fragrance he might encounter when he's not with you. Try rose or lavender, or even something fun like pumpkin pie or coconut. Then, when he walks by a rose bush, he'll instantly think of you. 

make eye contact.  touch him unexpectedly (but appropriately).  say his name.  wear a subtle, signature fragrance. 

 Don't wait around hoping to hear from him. Your life without him should be full and interesting. The biggest mistake you can make is to wait for a guy to make your life fun and exciting. That gives you way too much time to obsess about your crush and, frankly, makes you pretty boring. Get busy pursuing your own thing and it's likely he'll be wondering if he can tag along.   Showing that you are an interesting, independent person all on your own. He'll be flattered that you're spending time with him not because you need him to make your life exciting, but because you choose to be with him.  Don't set yourself up for failure by pretending to be something you're not just to get a guy to like you. If he doesn't see through your act immediately, it will only be a matter of time before he finds out. Being comfortable with yourself projects confidence, which is irresistible.If you hate football but your crush is obsessed with it, don't pretend to be a fan. If you just don't know much about the sport, ask him to share his knowledge. If you're into it, then you've got another thing in common. If you're not, that's okay. Just be honest! If your crush always dates girly girls but you're more of a tomboy, don't reinvent yourself just so he'll notice you. If you can catch his interest because you're interesting and funny, you'll know he's into you for your personality, and not just because you fit his "type."  , Obsessing over whether or not he thinks about you as much as you think about him is draining, can hurt your self-esteem, and can cause you to feel insecure.Crushes are supposed to be fun! Focus on living that full, interesting life, and you won't worry so much about what's going to happen next.   Don't let obsessing stop you from doing the things you love and turn you into someone else. Keep doing the things that make you you.  

live your own life.  be yourself.  don't overthink it. 

 Most people really like to talk about themselves. It feels good when someone is genuinely interested in your opinion and experiences and wants you to share those things.Ask about his hobbies or his favorite bands and movies. People tend to have a very positive opinion about people who ask them questions about themselves.   Make sure you weigh in, too. The conversation shouldn't be all about him. Share your own thoughts and opinions (and don't feel you always have to agree with him).  You may think that flirting up a storm with other guys will show him that you're desirable and have other options, but playing hard to get rarely works.Research shows that we are more attracted to people who are selective. So if you're in a group and none of the other guys seem to hold your attention, but you have a big smile just for your crush, you're going to catch his interest.This doesn't mean you have to be rude, mean, or ignore other guys. But if you were thinking about flirting with someone just to make your crush jealous, you might want to think again.  If he knows everything about you right off the bat, he'll lose the fun and anticipation of slowly getting to know what makes you tick. So hold back a little bit. Don't call, message, or text him constantly. Give him the time and room to think and wonder about you. Let him be curious about you and what you're doing.   Don't ignore him or be rude, but don't always be available.  

ask him questions about himself and listen to what he says.  don't play hard to get.  maintain a sense of mystery. 

 Don't be loud or annoying, you want a good impression on the guy/girl. Don't look like an attention seeker (at/on anywhere e.g Facebook, in person etc). If he/she asks you a question answer it and be polite. Ask open questions such as 'How was your day?' 'What are you doing tonight' and 'What are you up to?'. Also, make compliments. Say things like 'I really like your hair', 'Hey, nice jacket' and 'You're really good at ______, I wish I could be as good as you'. Get close to them.; , You don't want to go over the top on your outfit, accessories/jewelry if wanted. If you're a boy, keep your hair neat, tidy and smelling nice. There's nothing worse than having a guy who doesn't wash or comb his hair. And if you're a girl, have it down if just washed or put it in a ponytail/plait if greasy and you absolutely don't have any time to wash it.  Say 'Hi' when you're with them smile and make a conversation, if you're out walking don't look at other guys/girls flirtatiously as you go past, you don't want him/her to think you're not interested in him/her. Make sure you keep a good conversation and don't say any 'conversation killers' when you're just getting in to it. But when it's starting to fade off, don't start it up again, this may get annoying. Unless he/she doesn't mind.  Ask them about themselves. Find out what their favourite type of music, food/drink, programme, movie/film.. etc. He/she might even tell you about some little individual funny thing about her/him.  

be cool.  dress casually, wear a simple t-shirt and pants/trousers.  be polite.  smile at him/her when he/she sees you, don't laugh at everything he/she says because they may get annoyed. 

 Lined notebook will work best since you will not have sloped sentences and the layout will be neat. Make sure it is NEW. You do NOT want to use that wad of paper in the bottom of your bookbag that you didn't write on but you think they won't notice the wrinkles. You want a nice, clean, brand new sheet of paper.; , You don't have to write it in calligraphy, but you don't want your pen drying out halfway either. Use either black or blue, avoid bright colors such as green, pink, or purple, as these are very juvenile and aren't formal.  If you write small, practice writing bigger. If your letters take up two lines, shrink them a bit. They should fit comfortable on a lined sheet of paper, not overlapping or crowding the page.  You can go two ways: Poem, or an actual note.  you want to make sure 1) It is not too mushy. The last thing you need is for the person to gag while reading about how you have a shrine to them. But don't go embarrassingly obvious with the "Roses are red" routine. Make it your own. Comment on how pretty she is. The main things girls love to be complimented on are, eyes, smile, personality (how funny, nice, sweet, or kind she is), and hair.  Start it with JUST her name, not "Dear So-in-So". Then write about 1) How you've noticed her (insert Main Things Girls Love to be Complimented On here). 2) How you think about her. Mostly when like "all the time" or if you want to be more creative, go with something like "every moment of the day". 3) Leave a "Tracer". (see next step)  , It should be a short phrase, no longer than fifteen-twenty words and should be very easy to remember. You may use this as a P.S. side note or as your last sentence in each note. Just BE SURE you have consistency so she will know the note is from you every time.  Make sure you write "Your Secret Admirer" in a much neater, more elegant script than the rest of the note. After the first note is received, you may choose to sign it as S.A., but to spell it out is more formal and mature.  There are a number of ways to do this:  , She will get it the moment she opens her locker and the surprise will be exciting.  Be careful with this one. Your cover will be instantly blown with one glance.  This is only applicable if you are buddies with her brother and you have access to her room. The same rule applies though; if you were the only person visiting, your cover will be blown.  If she talks about it, she got the note. If you glance in her locker and it is gone, she got it. You always want to ASSUME she got it as long as you put it in a secure place that where she would find it.  Your follow up notes should be different, but just as sweet. Comment on recent changes to show you care, but make sure you use your Tracer. Your notes should be anywhere from a week to two and a half weeks apart. You want her to anticipate the notes, but not forget all about them.  After you have written at least ten or fifteen notes. Use your Tracer as a way to reveal yourself. Maybe say it during a small conversation with her or in another conversation but loud enough she can hear. Use the surprise and shock in her eyes to let HER strike up the million dollar question: Are YOU my Secret Admirer?  

use neat paper.  use a fairly new, standard pen.  be aware of how you write.  keep your note/letter short, sweet and to the point.  if you choose a poem.  if you choose just a standard note form, do it like a letter (but leave out the date).  a tracer is a certain key phrase that is unique to that note (or in other cases, all of your notes).  sign off.  send it.  -the easiest way to deliver the note, especially if you are in school, is to slide it in a locker vent.  slip it in her books/backpack.  hide it in her room.  listen.  prepare the next ones.  meet. 

 This aspect is essential. Smell good; effective hygiene is also a must. Would you like to date someone with smelly armpits?; , Show good fashion sense, yet stand out from the crowd. For example, your school uniform - wear a jacket or something that makes you stand out or even something like a badge to represent the music you listen to.   Be sure to wear something you feel is comfortable. If you know your crush's favorite smell or color, be sure to wear that.  Rely on the talents and attributes that you have naturally. If you're a funny person, use that to your advantage. If you're a big sports fan and you know that your crush is as well, all the better. Share those common interests and use them to your advantage.   Don't trick your crush into thinking you're something else when you're not. If you do, it will all change and he or she will see your true colors in time and may regret being with you.  You need to know this person not only well enough so that he/she knows you exist but so that you're both comfortable in each other's presence and can talk without feeling shy or embarrassed. Don't rush this part of things––it's better to take your time to cultivate the friendship than to rush and find that your crush isn't all you had hoped.   Carry conversations with your crush every now and then. Build these up to daily chats, hellos and acknowledgments as much as possible. You can have chats in person or even just on Facebook or other social media site. Although your crush might like you too, don't make it look like you are easygoing by replying immediately on online chats––play a little hard to get! If your crush doesn't reply straight away then he or she might be talking to someone else who is more important at this point in time; don't push it.  Sharing common ground allows your crush to see that you're open to their ideas.   Be sure not to insult their interests unless it's in a teasing way (don't be harsh!).  For example, talk to them more, mess around with them, ask them vaguely about your crush, etc. You can try to find out what stuff your crush likes by way of music, games, TV, sports, school activities, and so on.  Be funny and happy. Seem like a fun person to have around a lot.  Say little things such as: "I like your new hairstyle", "I like your smile".  They might be able to help you spend time around him or her. They may even end up being the source of letting your crush know about your interest but at the very least, let them be supportive and help you to find ways to spend more time with your crush.   If you have been talking to your crush on Facebook/Twitter/in person, just make sure that you don't tell your friends personal things that your crush talks to you about as he or she might not trust you and won't tell you stuff you want to know if this is found out. Your crush may tell you things he or she is too embarrassed or shy to say to anyone else, so guard that secrecy well.  Things might get a bit messy between you and the other person if this is the case or you may just embarrass yourself big time.   Equally, check that your crush hasn't just had a break up as he or she might just want you to feel good by saying anything or might be stringing you along as a form of rebound revenge.  When you feel comfortable, remember to smile. Gauge how the little flirting actions are going down. If they're being well received, you're onto something. If not, slow down for a bit.  Sometimes it's better to just let your crush know you like them by telling them how you feel. Just ask them out! The worst they can most likely do is say no.   If you're feeling shy or afraid, remind yourself that if you don't ask, you could be crushing on each other for the rest of your lives and it'll never get sorted out.  If he or she feels the same way, you're off onto a new romantic adventure together!   Deal with rejection as best you can. Don't get crushed by a crush. Sometimes it just isn't meant to be. But stay positive and remember that there are plenty of fish in the sea and this match simply wasn't meant to be.  Spend time together, keep it cool and fun and realize that there is still a long way to go before you both really know where this is all headed. Most of all, aim to be good friends.  

look approachable.  dress well.  be yourself.  get to know your crush.  get to know the interests of your crush.  get friendly with your crush's friends or mates.  hang around your crush more.  give your crush compliments now and again.  tell your friends that you like your crush.  check that your crush isn't already dating or has the hots for someone else.  casually flirt with your crush.  pluck up the courage to tell your crush you like them.  ask your crush how he or she feels about you.  begin dating. 

 The worst thing is undoing all the straps and buckles only to find that you have run out of leather ointment or saddle soap and having to wait until you get some more. The best products are beeswax products, they help to keep the moisture in while making the leather clean and waterproof. There are many other good cleaning products available for use, such as Neats Foot Oil, Theather Dressing, Saddle Soap etc. There are also products made by saddle and bridle companies to be used with their gear, such as Wintec's Saddle Cleaner. As this is a synthetic saddle, the cleaner should be a non-water mix, and be a wipe on wipe off product. You also need to make sure you have some equipment to help you while cleaning. These include:   A Hoof Pick -Often bridles have buckles and holes that require some tempting. You can use a hoof pick as it is easy to hold and isn't going to mark your leather. Tooth Picks -Use these to get dirt and muck out of holes as well as pushing cleaning products through holes on throat latch and nose band, as they may become clogged with wax. Towels or Cloths -It's best to have a separate towel for the first cleaning, to remove dirt and grass build-up, a second one for the oiling, a third for wiping the oil and wax off, and a fourth for polishing and shining the leather. You don't need to have 4 but it is recommended you have more than one or two. Newspaper -If you're inside newspaper is essential so you don't get oil and wax on the kitchen table, or on the floor, as they can become slippery and may stain the furniture. It is best to clean outside as the smells may cause asthma and breathing difficulties. A Bucket and Warm Water - To clean and rinse bits and chains.; , For the purpose of this article, a bridle will be used.  Once undone, you can't go back. A good idea is to draw a picture of what it looks like, or even better, take some photos, so it's easier to remember where each piece should go. You can also use another bridle as an example. Remember though, straps and buckles leave an indent, so this is a good way to put the bridle back to the right size. , Don't add any detergent, as they contain products that are not good for horses. We will come back to the bit after the oiling is finished. This time is available for soaking. , If the bridle has stains or marks, keep these in mind and you can fix these later. You can also use some saddle soap to clean the leather.  It is beneficial to use the oil generously so it will soak in. You can oil each piece and let sit while you begin on other pieces. Then when you get back to the first piece, it will have soaked in enough. Make sure you apply liberal amounts of oil and wax to any parts that are prone to wearing such as loops, buckles and holes.  Make sure you get inside any holes and loops.  The friction will help make it shiny.  And place all pieces in a logical order in preparation for putting it back together.  Toothpaste is non-corrosive and doesn't harm your horse, while giving a nice shine to your bit. You don't want to remove the taste, however, as after years of riding, a bit will feel natural in a horse's mouth due to the taste and smoothness. Clean the bit all over, making sure you scrub around grooves and joints.  You can also rub it down to hurry up the process.  Assistance may be required if you get stuck, so refer back to pictures and diagrams. If back together and it doesn't look right, undo and try again. When it's on the horse you will be able to get a better picture. Don't forget the bit, too.  To fix these, get a permanent marker the same colour as your leather. If you have a tan or brown bridle, you can get coloured beeswax which is used for cleaning sandshoes. Use the permanent marker by dabbing with the point until the mark is black. Because the leather is oiled, the mark will be less noticeable. Use a small amount of oil in your fingertips to rub over the marks, (when dried of course), to keep the colour from rubbing off.  

make sure you have the right equipment and cleaning products.  select the piece of gear that requires cleaning.  look at your bridle before undoing any buckles.  undo reins and bit from the bridle.  ,  soak the bit in a bucket of warm water.  undo all buckles and put the pieces in a formation so it resembles a bridle and where each piece should go.  ,  start by using the first cloth to rub down the leather, making sure you remove any built up grass and dirt.  oil the bridle so it is shiny.  rub the leather down so you remove most of the oil and wax.  using the final cloth, polish the leather, using short quick movements.  using the tooth picks, poke every hole to remove wax and oil.  ensure you have an old toothbrush (not your younger sister's), and toothpaste.  rinse the bit and let dry.  put all the leather pieces back together.  find any problems such as cuts and stains. 

 Before you begin the process of haltering your horse, you'll need to prepare the halter. If your horse is acting up, it can be hard to prepare the halter in the moment.   Unbuckle or unsnap the crown piece. This is the strap of the halter that goes behind the horse's ears. It should have a buckle or snap somewhere on it. Have your halter clipped to your lead line ahead of time. You want to be able to halter your horse and immediately lead him where he needs to go. You clip the lead line onto a ring at the bottom of the noseband. The noseband is the portion of a halter that slips around a horse's nose.; , Call your horse as you approach him. This helps alert your horse to your presence. This way, he's less likely to get spooked by your approach. Call out his name or call out something like, "I'm coming in!" to let him know you're entering his pasture or stall., Make sure you have your halter in your left hand as you approach. You will be haltering the horse from the left side. You want to make sure your horse knows what's happening. If you try to deceive the horse by hiding the halter, he'll learn to be distrustful of your intent. This can lead to a bad relationship between you and the horse., When haltering a horse, you should always approach from the left side. Halters are designed to be buckled on the left. You should approach your horse so you're standing near his head on the left side of his body., You do not want to put the halter on instantly. This can startle your horse. When you are a foot or so away from your horse's head, allow him to sniff your hand. This way, your horse will also familiarize himself with your scent. He'll be able to differentiate your smell from the smell of potential predators in other situations down the road.A nervous horse may benefit from having treats as a reward for staying calm.  A halter needs to be slipped over your horse's head in a specific manner. Once you've reached the horse, position the halter in the same direction as the horse's head. The noseband of the halter should be facing the same direction as the horse is facing., Once your halter is in the right position, loop the lead rope towards the bottom of the horse's neck. This will provide you some control if your horse gets impatient during the haltering process and tries to run away., From here, gently guide the halter over the horse's nose. Slip the horse's nose through the nose band. Then, slip your right hand under the horse's throat. Use your right hand to place the crown piece behind his ears, gently bending his ears back as needed. Adjust the halter as necessary to make sure it's straight and not cutting into the horse's ears., Once the halter is on, buckle up or snap up the crown piece. Hold the halter in place with your left hand. Use your right hand to buckle the end of the crown piece into the buckle on the left side of your horse's head.Check to make sure the halter is not too tight. It should be tight enough that the horse cannot slip out of it. However, it should also be loose enough that the straps are not digging into the horse's skin. If it's too tight or too loose, you may need to use a different sized halter next time., Your horse may be nervous about being haltered. Reassure your horse as you go. Talk to him in a soothing voice and pet him if he seems agitated or upset.  You want to make sure you have the right sized halter. An ill-fitting halter can cause your horse pain. If the halter is cutting into the horse's skin or fur, you could resize the crown piece by adjusting the buckles. However, some halters may simply be too small for your horse. Go to a local tack shop and get a bigger halter if moving to the next notch on the buckle does not help.You can measure a horse's head to find the right size halter. Use a measuring tape and place it midway between your horse's cheekbones and nostrils. Stretch the tape to the same point on the other side of your horse's head. Write down this measurement. This is the size noseband you need. If your horse reacts poorly to a measuring tape, wrap string around his nose and then measure the string's length afterwards.Place the end of the measuring tape directly under a horse's cheekbone. Stretch the tape to the cheekbone on the other side of his face. This measurement indicates how big of a crown piece you'll need. Then, place the tape several inches behind the horse's eye and stretch it near the top of his throat. Then, move the tape underneath this throat to the top of his throat on the other side of his face. This measurement shows you how big the halter's throatlatch should be. As with the noseband, you can use string if your horse dislikes the feel of a measuring tape.If you have a horse with special needs size-wise, you may need a particular type of halter. Draft horses need halters specifically made for larger breeds. If your horse has a narrow head, you may have to do some trial and error. Try halters from a variety of manufacturer's until you find a halter that fits., There are some basic safety guidelines you should practice when haltering your horse. You want to make sure your horse is safe during the haltering process.   Never let a horse run loose with his halter still in place. Halters can catch on tree branches and fences, causing injury. Leather halters can easily become damp and gather mildew. This can cause them to slip off your horse easily. Clean them regularly and store them in a clean, dry place when not in use. Never tie or wrap a lead line around a horse's head. If a horse gets startled or upset, this could cause injury.  It can be difficult to halter break an adult horse. Therefore, if possible, start halter breaking the horse as soon as he is born.   Foals should be handled by adults right away. You want horses used to a human touch as young as possible. Try placing a halter on a foal within his first few days of life.Place the haler on and off your foal each day as he grows up. He will begin to accept the halter as a normal part of life. Later, he will easily go along with being haltered as an adult., If you have an adult horse who is not halter-broken, you'll have to start slow. To begin, handle your horse's head, ears, and neck. Each day, interact with the horse. Pet his neck, ears, and head.Reward the horse for allowing you to touch him. Offer treats, like carrots or apples, if he remains calm when you're petting him.Talk gently to your horse as you go. Provide soothing words to prevent the horse from getting nervous or upset.  Once the horse is comfortable with your touch, introduce him to the halter. For a few days, simply hold the halter as you pet him. Allow him to sniff the halter and get used to its presence and scent. Then, try gently slipping the halter over his nose and ears.It may take multiple tries. If a horse gets antsy with the halter over his nose, take the halter off. You can try again the next day.It may be a few days before you get the halter on the horse and buckled properly. This is normal. It's important to have patience and let the horse work at a pace that does not frighten him. If your horse develops an aversion to the halter, halter breaking will be even more difficult., Once the horse is used to the halter, you'll need to practice leading. Attach a lead rope to the halter and begin your practice sessions.   During the first few sessions, stand to the right of the horse. Pull on the lead rope, applying pressure, to encourage the horse to move. When your horse turns his head towards you, praise him. Reinforce the good behavior with treats. Give him a slice of apple, for example, when he turns his head.You can teach your horse to step forwards by pulling on the halter until he moves. Stop applying pressure once your horse takes a step forward. Then, pull back on the halter. When your horse steps backwards, stop applying pressure. Consider rewarding your horse with food for good behavior.Work your way up. As your horse gets used to moving forward and backward, try to get him to walk with you. Do a little bit each day. For example, start with five steps. In a few days, increase this to ten steps. Keep going until your horse is comfortable walking with you when wearing the halter., You want halter breaking to be a pleasant experience. Any negative associations with the halter can set you back greatly when it comes to halter breaking. Avoid punishing your horse during the process.   Do not yell at your horse, whip him, or behave in an aggressive manner. The halter is new and unfamiliar and your horse may be scared. Have patience. If your horse acts up, take a break and try again.Each lesson should end on a successful note. Even if all you manage to do is get the halter over the horse's nose, this is still a victory. If you sense your horse getting tense or uncomfortable, stop. 

prepare your halter.  call the horse.  approach with the halter in your left hand.  walk slowly to the horse's left side.  allow your horse to sniff your hand.  position the halter in the same direction as the horse's head.  loop the lead line over the horse's head.  guide the halter over the nose and ears.  buckle the halter.  reassure your horse as needed.  make sure the halter fits properly.  practice basic safety guidelines.  start young, if possible.  handle your horse's head, ears, and neck.  introduce your horse to the halter.  practice leading.  avoid punishing your horse. 

 Use their name in the note so they can be sure that the note is for them. If you don’t include their name, they might think the note was intended for someone else. In the end, your note won’t have its intended effect.  Start off by writing it like a letter, for instance “Dear Sally”. Write them a message and include their name in the message.; , Start a note off by letting them know how much you admire them. In addition, you could comment about one their great qualities – qualities that make you want to be around them. Consider:   Letting them know how smart you think they are. Telling them how you think they are handsome or beautiful. Stating how you think they are funny and witty., If you’re artistically inclined, you could write a short and sweet poem or draw a picture for your crush. Ultimately, a poem or a picture could send a sweet message and let them know that they are in your thoughts.  Draw a picture of them. Write a poem about the things you like about them.  Don’t tell them that you are head-over-heels for them and would do anything to be with them. Instead, let them know that you are a sure and confident person and would really like to get to know them better.  Write something like, “Out of all of the people I know, you seem like someone I really should spend more time with.”, The worst thing you can do is to leave your crush a note that leaves them with the impression that you are obsessed with them or are stalking them. If you do this, you’ll likely alienate the person, insult them, or scare them.  Avoid stating how much you love them. Don’t say that you think about them constantly. Never write inappropriate sexual things. This will likely be seen as harassment and could get you into trouble., Tape or simply leave the note on their desk or locker. You should be able to easily place a note on their desk when you’re coming into a classroom or leaving one. You can also tape the note onto or slide it into their locker as you’re walking by it.If you're not a student, you should avoid leaving romantic notes on a colleague's desk. In addition, consider avoiding flirtations during office hours -- this could be taken as sexual harassment.  If your crush looks forward to your notes, one of the best things for you to do would be to leave notes randomly in places you know they’ll be. This way, they’ll be surprised whenever they see the note.  If you know your crush sits at a certain place at lunch, think about leaving the note there. Leave it on their car windshield.  Never trespass or open your crush’s locker, car, bookbag, purse, or anything else private to leave your note. By violating your crush’s personal space, you’ll send the message that you don’t respect them or are way too aggressive. In the end, you may wind up alienating them rather than winning their affection.  Avoid leaving a note in their mailbox, on their front door, or at their home. They may think you are stalking them. Don't follow your crush from work or school to give them a note.  Ultimately, while you may leave some “secret admirer” notes, you don’t want to go too long leaving notes without letting them know who you are. Whether it be in your first note, second note, or a few notes later, you need to give them an idea of who you are. You can do this in several ways:   Simply write your name at the bottom of the note. Give them some sort of clue about who you are. Approach them later and tell them you’re their special note writer., The best way to take your relationship to the next level is to start to hand them notes directly. This is especially true if you know they're receptive to your flirtations. In the end, they might hand you a note back., After you've left a few notes, you should ask them if they’d like to do something with you. Ultimately, going on a date – or just hanging out – is the next logical step in your evolving relationship. Suggest:   Going to the movies. Taking a walk after school. Getting a bite to eat together.  If you get the sense that the person doesn’t really welcome your notes, you should stop immediately. You might be able to sense this from how they look when they get a note, from the comments they make about it to other people, or you can ask a friend to inquire about it. Ultimately, if they aren’t interested in the notes, you should stop immediately.  

use their name.  include a compliment.  craft a poem or draw a picture.  be confident.  don’t be too forward.  leave it on their desk or locker, if you're a student.  leave the note at a place you know they’ll wind up.  don’t violate their personal space.  let them know who you are, if they don't already.  pass them a note.  ask them if they want to do something.  stop leaving notes if you think the person doesn’t like you. 

 Body language can often give a guy's true feelings away -- no matter how hard he tries to hide them. Though body language tricks don't always tell you exactly how a guy feels, they can definitely predict whether or not he views you in a romantic light. Here are some signs that may mean he's really into you:   He turns his hips toward you even if he's facing the other direction. He will look up at you, smile, and look back down. If he catches you looking at him, he'll smile. He never puts his hands in his pockets or crosses his arms while talking to you. He may lean toward you when he speaks. He may turn his feet toward you. If he turns them away from you when you're sitting down next to each other, then he may not be interested. He may accidentally brush up against you when you're talking, or touch you lightly with his hands.; , If he takes a longer route to class just to walk past you, or if he offers to walk you to a class that's nowhere near his next one, he probably likes you. He may even make excuses for why he's suddenly near you, like asking to borrow a book you know he owns. This will be his way of letting you know he wants to spend more time around you.   See if he offers you a ride home though he lives on the other side of town. See if he waits around, seemingly for no reason, until you show up.  The bigger the difference, the bigger your advantage. For example, he might burp or swear in front of his friends, but try really hard not to do those things around you. If he's trying to be on his best behavior, he might like you. If he thinks of you as "one of the guys," then he may not try to act super refined around you.   If he treats you just like a pal, cursing, belching, and telling you about the people he has crushes on, then you may have entered the "Friend Zone."  , If you're hanging out with your friends and the guy comes along, pay attention to how he treats them. If he's into you, then he'll want to make a strong impression on your friends so that they'll tell you how awesome he is. Guys know that girls like to talk, and if he likes you, he'll be smart enough not to give your friends the cold shoulder. The next time he goes up to you and your friends, see if he becomes extra courteous to them and goes out of his way to be nice to them.   The same goes for your family members. If he sees you around your mom or siblings and tries extra hard to be nice, he may be doing it because he likes you.  If he's into you, then he'll want to show you off. If he's secretive about going off to meet his friends, then it may be because he likes just having guy time -- or because he likes guy time because it lets him hit on the ladies. But if he does want to introduce you to his friends, it's a great sign. It means that he wants to show you off -- and that he doesn't think you'll get in the way of any potential womanizing.   There is one exception to this rule, however: he may not want you to meet his friends because he’s too embarrassed of them!  , If he's into you, then he'll go out of his way to do nice things for you. He may pick up lunch for you when you're having a busy day, he may get the homework assignments for you if you're sick from school, or he may give you a ride when you need one. Think about it: is he just a really nice guy, or is his behavior toward you suggesting something more? If he's always doing nice things for you and doesn't seem to be picking up lunch for anyone else, then chances are it's because he's really into you.   He may even text you asking if he can help you with something small just as an excuse to talk to you. If he tries to spend as much time around you as possible, even if it’s through helping you out, then he’s definitely into you.  The next time you hang out with the guy and a bunch of your friends, see if he naturally ends up gravitating toward you. If it feels like he's always by your side in these group scenarios, then it's probably because he's into you. Otherwise, why else would he talk to you instead of his buddies or the other girls around?   It may not happen immediately, but if you find that you two always end up having long conversations at the end of the night or sitting down next to each other when the whole gang goes out to happy hour, then this may be a sign that he's really into you.  This can be a big indication of how he really feels about you. If he's really just a big flirt, then he'll be treating every girl the way he treats you. If he teases, flirts, plays around with, compliments, and gives a ton of attention to every girl that comes his way along with you, then yeah, he may not be singling you out. But if you're the only girl he's flirty with -- or the only girl he's more reserved with -- then it may be a sign that he's into you. He may actually like you and can therefore feel too shy to really flirt with you instead of other girls he doesn't really care for.   This can be confusing, but it makes a lot of sense. The main thing is to figure out if he treats you differently from the other girls.  When you're out of sight, are you also out of mind? If you and the guy don't see each other for a while and he doesn’t check in at all, then you may not be on his mind. But if you find him texting you, calling you, or just popping in to say hi when you haven’t hung out in a while, then he may be really into you. The same goes for social media – if he comments on your Facebook posts or favorites your Tweets a lot, then this may be his way of letting you know he cares.   If you’re online, see if he tries to chat you on gchat or Facebook to catch up. This can be another sign that he wants something more from your relationship.  Another way to see if he’s really into you is to see if you’ve already been going on dates without knowing it. If a lot of your hang outs are already intimate and date like, then this may mean that he’s really into you. Here are some things to look out for:   Do you go on coffee or lunch dates? If he meets up with you during the day, not after he’s had a few drinks with his buddies, then he may see you as relationship material. Do you hang out solo a lot? Do you go to the movies? Go for walks? Just watch TV together? Then guess what – you may already be going on dates without knowing it. Does he plan hanging out with you days in advance? If so, then he’s really serious about making sure he spends time with you.  If he’s really into you, then he may try to show off around you and to let you know how awesome, capable, and brave he is. This may be somewhat outdated and does not apply to all guys, but it may be the case that he’ll try to steal the show if you’re around just to make sure he catches your eye. When he’s doing these things, see if he’s looking over to see if you’re watching. Here are some things he may do in front of you:   Casually start showing off a talent, like dribbling a basketball or a soccer ball. Conveniently pick up a guitar and start strumming. Jump off tall structures into water to show you how brave he is. Challenge his friends to friendly fights or contests.  Of course, you may be the next Sarah Silverman, but if he laughs around you all the time, it can also just mean that he’s laughing because he’s into you and is naturally a little nervous around you. If he laughs more than normal at your jokes, or even laughs a little bit at regular comments that aren’t even all that funny, then this may be a sure-fire sign that he likes you.   The next time you’re together, pay attention to how much he laughs. Try to notice him with others – does he always laugh so much, or does his laughter seem to be more intense around you?  , This is a no-brainer. If he’s really into you, then he may be more nervous than normal because he’ll be afraid of messing up. He may laugh more, sure, but he may also stutter, forget what he was going to say, ask you the same question twice within ten minutes, repeat himself, trip over himself for no reason, or just generally act nervous and adorable because he really cares what you think of him.   The next time you’re around him, pay attention. Does he fidget? Does it take him a while to ask a question? Does he make self-deprecating comments? If so, then it may be because he likes you and doesn’t quite know how to act.  This is another big one. If you have a class together or if you happen to be in the same place, see if you can catch him looking at you. This is another sure-fire way to see if he has feelings for you. The only problem is, if you try to catch him staring at you all the time, then he may think that you have a crush on him…which you do! But if you can be discreet about it, try to see if he’s looking at you the next time you’re near each other.   If he catches you catching him staring and blushes and looks down at the floor, then this is an extra sign that he’s into you.  If he’s into you, then it’s only natural that he cares more about what he looks like when he’s around you. You may catch him doing some of the following things when you’re together:   Running his hands through his hair Trying to straighten his clothes or remove any stains on them Discreetly checking himself out in reflections  , If a guy calls you by your nickname, comes up with a new nickname for you, or refers to you by a pet name, this is a big sign. Anything he says that makes you feel special and that shows he's taken a unique interest in you can tell you that he's really into you.   Also watch for him saying your name more often than he absolutely needs to. See if he talks slowly and more softly when he addresses you. This means that he's letting his guard down because he likes you. See if he makes eye contact when he talks to you. Though he may look away occasionally, eye contact shows that he's paying attention to you.  When you know he's in the same room with other people, pretend you don't notice he's there. See how long it takes him to spot you and how long it takes him to come over and say hi. Less than a few minutes means he's probably interested. However, if it takes him a bit longer to say hi to you, it may just be because he's really shy.   You can also try to see how he reacts when you enter the room. Does his entire face light up, or does he barely change his expression?  , Anytime you hear him say anything negative about a guy, it means that he sees this guy as a threat — especially if it's another guy you know well. He clearly wants you to only pay attention to him, not anyone else. If you mention a guy friend to him and he immediately acts suspicious, it may be because he thinks you may have romantic feelings for the other guy.   If he knows you're going on dates and often says things like, "That guy isn't good enough for you," then he may just be saying that he thinks that he is good enough. He may also tease you about liking other guys you're just friends with. This could be another way for him to show that he's thinking of you romantically.  If he's really into you, then he'll be more likely to tease you all the time. You may think he's just being mean or making fun of you, but if you find that he's giving you special treatment and always teasing you, it may not be because he thinks of you as his kid sister. If you find that he's poking you in the ribs, giving you a silly nickname, playfully making fun of your outfits, or otherwise generally teasing you, then it probably means that he's really into you. Why else would he make the effort?   Teasing is a big part of flirting. You may not even realize that he thinks he's flirting with you when he's being playful.  This can be a big indication of whether or not he's really into you. He could be bragging about all of his womanizing in an effort to impress you, when he really just wants you to chase after him. He could also be telling you that he just can't find the right girl because he really just wants to be with you. If you find him even saying that no girl he meets is as good/interesting/cool/pretty as you, then yeah, he's basically telling you that he wants to date you.   If he constantly says things like, “I can just never find the right girl…” then this may be his way of telling you that this girl is standing right in front of him.  If the guy is really into you, then he may start opening up to you and treating you as more than just a casual friend. (Just make sure this doesn’t mean he just sees you as a best friend, though.) If he wants to take things to the next level, then he may begin to tell you things that he wouldn’t tell just anyone. Here are some things he may talk about with you if he’s interested in you:   His childhood His hopes for the future His relationships with his family or friends Some of his secretly dorky hobbies Anything that comes after, “I’ve never told anyone this before…”  , At the end of the day, the best way to really know if he’s into you is just to ask him. Don’t ask his friends, don’t ask your friends to ask him for you, don’t ask him in a note or a text, but be brave and venture out and ask him yourself. If he’s too shy to do anything, then your potential future relationship is in your hands. It’s not as scary as it sounds.  It doesn’t have to be the most perfect, magical place, but pick a place where you can have some privacy without either of your friends around and a time when he’s not likely to be stressed or to rush off somewhere. If you want to up the romance factor, you can ask him in the evenings or at a place that is special to you both.  Make some small talk but then ask him how he feels about you. You can tell him that you’ve developed feelings for him and just really want to know where his head is. Make eye contact, but don’t put the pressure on. Try to keep it cool and ask him how he feels without putting the pressure on.  If it turns out he likes you, then you can privately celebrate. You can both decide where to go from here. And if not, it’s not the end of the world, and you don’t have to torture yourself by wondering what he’s really thinking anymore. Be proud of yourself for being brave enough to ask him and move forward.  

watch his body language.  notice when he goes out of his way for you.  notice if he treats you differently from his friends.  see if he's nice to your friends.  see if he wants you to meet his friends.  see if he's always doing you favors.  see if he always ends up by your side in group settings.  see how he acts around other girls.  see what he does when you're apart.  notice the types of things you do together.  see if he tries to impress you.  see if he laughs extra hard around you.  see if he acts nervous around you.  see if you catch him looking at you.  see if he starts preening around you.  pay attention to how he talks to you.  see how long it takes him to talk to you.  see if he puts down other guys in front of you.  see if he's always teasing you.  see what he says to you about other girls.  see if he really opens up to you.  make sure you ask him yourself.  find the best place and time to ask him.  just come right out and say it.  react appropriately. 

 Whenever your crush is around, look at your BFF and see if she is comfortable with your crush being there or if she is looking all plastic and hurt deep inside. Most girls are good actresses so you really have to take a closer look. Can she look straight in the eye at your crush? Can she still talk about normal things like your other friends do? Does she stay with you there when your other friends leave or does she make the first exit?; , Talk about things that he's gone through like competitions he's joined or whatever. See if she knows those stuff and if the way she says it is a bit possessive. If she speaks too brightly then that would be a very bad sign. If she doesn't speak at all or looks like she's not interested in the topic, that might mean something as well. Each person is different and reacts differently so you have to know for yourself what each action means for your BFF.  If you're in High School then you might as well talk about prom sometime (just make sure the timing is perfect and not like your topic just came out of the blue. That would be suspicious.) Ask each of your friends who would they like to go to prom with and NEVER ask your BFF last (that would make things more obvious and suspicious). Maybe you could ask her first since she's your best friend. If she says she's not interested in any of the guys or if she decides to go with the last guy you could ever think of, then that means she is interested in someone.  When you girls are alone doing a project or an assignment, you ask her who she's interested in. If she says there's none then probably she doesn't like to hurt your feelings because she likes your crush. It's impossible not to be interested in someone especially in High School.  Talk about the things you like nowadays (books, musics...etc.,) If she is saying that she likes what your crush likes then that is a very bad sign. It clearly shows that she's desperate to be noticed by your crush and not you. If she compliments about your crush a lot and you don't want your crush to like your friend, then just keep cool. Don't say bad things about your friend to your crush or else he'll think that you're a basic loser.  If she or he is posting something on Instagram, Tumblr, Twitter, Google+, Pinterest or Facebook about your crush, or has uploaded/tagged/liked, etc., a picture of your crush, then it's quite possible that your best friend likes your crush. This can be one of the things that go to make up the whole picture.  If your crush is online on Skype or social media apps, see whether it's possible for you to tell that they're both online at the same time, while your best friend is ignoring your repeated pings to talk. This will tell you that your best friend isn't busy but might well be talking to your crush.  Simply say "Hey, do you like X?" If your best friend blushes, finds it hard to make eye contact with you, says something like "Phfff no!" or changes the subject, this might be the clincher.   If you ask your best friend via social media, it will be harder to know whether your friend is covering up or not. But she/he will still say no.  When it becomes clear to you, tell your best friend that you've noticed that he or she has feelings for your crush.   If your best friend isn't already aware that this person is also your crush, try to clarify that you also like this person and that you think you two need to work out together what happens next. If your best friend does already know, this is a bit tougher because it's something that has happened despite knowing your own interests. In this case, tread carefully but you'll still need to sort out what happens next. See How to deal with your best friend dating your crush for more help.  

observe her.  talk about your crush.  talk about prom plans.  ask her who she's interested in.  talk with your friends.  read your best friend's social networking posts.  check whether your best friend is talking to your crush online.  try asking outright.  be kind. 

 If you think you've been getting positive vibes and attention from the person you're interested in, it may well be the case. Assume the best but stay on your best behavior as well.   While you may have been getting good vibes, sometimes you may be mixing up the signals and making the wrong assumption. As such, you'll need to know more than just "feeling it".; , In particular, watch the body language of the other person to see whether or not they're flirting. For more details, read How to read women's body language for flirting or How to read men's body language for flirting.   Watch for the person making excuses to be near you and spend time with you. Notice the person brushing up against you a lot, or trying to touch you often, all without making it obvious. Catch their eyes. Do they look away quickly in embarrassment? Or hold your eye contact defiantly with a "come hither" look? Either way may be a sign of interest. Does the person smile at you more than usual? This may be a sign. If the person is normally chatty, have they suddenly gone silent around you? Or, has a normally quiet person suddenly become chatty? Behaving in the opposite way from their normal behavior can be a sign of trying to impress you. There is a human reflex reaction when a person sees the object of their affection. The eyes open wide, eyebrows rise, nostrils flare, mouth rounds into an "O", It lasts about a second. This kind of face is considered more attractive. So if somebody sees you and briefly makes this face, they find you attractive on some level.  This is a way of potentially giving them the space to become more flirtatious or open about their interest in you. Once they feel certain about your signals, they may relax and open up more.   If you're wrong about it, laugh it off or apologize for being presumptuous, whatever seems most appropriate at the time.  See whether he/she still glances at you at your new position. If yes, the interest is there.  Walk past the person. Close, but not very. See if this induces some visible effects. If yes, you can be sure the person is interested.  This is especially useful if you already know each other well. (Sometimes he/she may answer no, to throw you off course).  By this stage you can be sure they like you!  

think positive.  look for signs of interest from the other person.  respond with similar signals to show your interest.  change your position if there is definite interest.  make a final confirmation.  pluck up the courage and ask him/her.  be happy if he/she tells you that they like you or asks you out. 

  Inspect both the saddle and the bridle.  There are times after the bridle has been cleaned when the reins are not reattached properly, or the headstall is not fastened together completely, or any number of mishaps that can occur affecting the proper function of the equipment.; , Make sure it's not too high, so the horse has a smile on its face, nor too low, where it is lying on the horse's tongue, almost falling out of its mouth. The corner of the horse's lips should have two wrinkles for the bit to be fitted correctly.  You should be able to fit two fingers in between the horse's nose and the noseband for it to be correct. If the horse is using a figure-eight, make sure the bottom X of the noseband is not too far down the nose, restricting the horse's breathing.   Also, be sure the buckle is not fastened right on the horse's lips. If it is, readjust the figure-eight so the buckle falls above or below the soft part of the horse's lips, but not too far up so that it restricts breathing.  The throat latch is there to keep the bridle from falling off the horse's head if the headstall should slip off from behind the ears, for some reason. If it's too loose, the headstall won't stay on, if it's too tight, it will restrict the horse's breathing when the horse flexes its neck.  The buckle at the very end of the reins should also be fastened and tucked into its keeper.  Check to see that the saddle pads are positioned straight and flat against the horse's back under the saddle. If not, loosen the girth and straighten them out. When you re-tighten the girth, make sure it is not twisted on the off side and that the buckles come all the up onto the saddle pads and under the saddle.   If the buckles are left pressing into the horse's skin with no protection underneath, a sore could develop due to the chafing of the buckles pressing against the horse's body. Not to mention the constant chafing will be painful to the horse.  If the horse is wearing leg wraps, check to be sure they are wrapped evenly and flat. Make sure they are secured with strong velcro that is not worn-out. If you think the velcro is overly-used, put a piece of tape around it to better secure the bandage.  If the horse is wearing a martingale, it should be loose enough so that it does not restrict the movement of the horse's shoulders.  That's it for the inspection. Always make these checks before every time you ride, thereby ensuring your safety and the safety of the horse.  

check your tack every single time before you mount any horse.  go to the horse's head and check to be sure the bit is sitting in the horse's mouth properly.  check the noseband so it's not too tight nor too loose.  check the throat latch to be sure it is not too loose or too tight.  check the reins next to be sure they are fastened properly onto the bit and that the ends are tucked into their keepers as well.  move onto the saddle next.  review any leg wraps.  check the martingale.  get ready to ride! 

 Make sure you know how much money you can comfortably spend on the saddle. While some saddles are quite expensive, others can be found in a more reasonable price range. Affordable, quality saddles can be purchased for $500 to $1000. Higher end saddles are in the $1000 to $2000 range and up.   Whatever your budget, talk to your saddle shop openly, and ask them to help you find a quality saddle that you can afford. Say something like, “I want to find a saddle for trail riding that is less $1000. Can you recommend something of good quality in that price range?” If you cannot afford to pay large amounts of money for a saddle, consider purchasing a used product. Used saddles are often available from riding stables, tack stores, and even from fellow riders. Before purchasing a used saddle, make sure it fits your horse well. An ill-fitting saddle can lead to injury for the horse or rider. Keep in mind that many saddles do not come with cinches, stirrups, and girths, so these will be an additional expense.; , A good salesman can convince you you’re getting the deal of a lifetime regardless of how much you’re paying. That’s why it’s important to do your research before hand. A simple way to find current pricing is to do an online search for the type of saddle you wish to purchase. You can also visit several different saddle retailers and compare prices. Talk to other horse owners or riders about where they buy quality saddles at the best prices., There are several indicators that you’re dealing with a trustworthy retailer. First, the shop should allow you a trial period with your saddle to ensure it fits both you and your horse. A reputable saddle shop will also have a reasonable return or exchange policy, if your saddle does not work out.   Do not purchase saddles from a retailer who refuses to allow you to try out the saddle, or who is unwilling or unable to provide details about the saddle’s materials and design., English and Western are the two basic kinds of saddle, but there are actually countless variations of the two. English saddles are smaller, lighter, and allow you to be closer to the horse. Western saddles are larger, and they require padding between the horse and saddle. The most noticeable difference between the two is the horn on the Western saddle.   English saddles are available in a variety of styles for different uses. For instance, deeper seated saddles are used for dressage, stylized horse riding competition. Western saddles come in many styles, and they are often decorated with artistic flourishes in the leather., Your riding style will play a crucial part in determining what type of saddle is best. Individuals who wish to participate in dressage, polo, or even horse racing will require an English saddle. In contrast, those who wish to ride on trails or work on ranches or farms may prefer a Western saddle.   If you plan to use the saddle for a variety of activities, it’s usually best to select a saddle for the activity you will engage in most often. If more than one rider will be using the saddle, make sure each rider has input on the purchase and is able to try the saddle., Saddles are made from wood or metal that has been carefully shaped and is then covered with leather or a synthetic material. When purchasing a saddle, make sure to ask about the materials and how they impact the lifespan of the saddle. Purchasing a saddle made from synthetic materials is a viable way to save money.   Be aware that saddles made from synthetic materials typically do not last as long as those made from leather., On both English and western saddles, you’ll need to make sure there is enough space between the arched front portion of the saddle, pommel, and the withers. With someone in the saddle, place three fingers vertically between the saddle and withers. If you can do this comfortably, the saddle fits well. If it’s a tight squeeze or your fingers don’t fit at all, the saddle is too tight.   For the English saddle, have a helper move the horse’s foreleg while your fingers remain between the withers and pommel to ensure the saddle isn’t impeding shoulder movement., This is the underlying support that determines the basic shape of the saddle. If you have a very large or very small horse, you may struggle to find a saddletree that fits just right, but checking for it is simple. With a rider in the saddle, place three fingers horizontally between the horses’ shoulder and the saddle on both sides. Just like with the pommel, this is a quick and easy way to gauge whether or not the saddle size and shape fits your horse., Stand at the back of your horse, and look at the saddle without a rider seated. With the horse’s head down, you should be able to see light. If you can’t see light, the saddle is too tight. This light check lets you know your horse’s saddle is snug but not tight., It’s important to make sure you fit in your saddle. The shape and length of the saddle should accommodate you comfortably. Otherwise, you may not want to ride as often. In English saddles you should have four inches of saddle in front and behind your body. Western saddles have four inches in front with your backside rested against the cantle, raised back portion at the back of saddle. You shouldn’t feel pressed against the cantle to achieve the four inches of space in the front of the saddle.Ensure western saddles fit with your saddle pad by trying it on your horse. Western saddles need to have about an inch of padding between saddle and horse. In many cases, you may need to purchase an extended cinch to accommodate the added padding., Saddles are often selected with a particular horse in mind. If your horse is relatively small or young, you will want to look for a lighter, smaller saddle. By contrast, larger horses can handle heavier saddles with greater ease. If you plan to use your saddle on a number of horses, you can choose a saddle to accommodate your largest horse and use additional padding when necessary., For the first few rides after purchasing a new saddle, you’ll need to closely watch the way your horse behaves. If you notice a change in their posture, behavior, or ability to run or jump, your saddle may not be a good fit for the horse. For this very reason, most reputable saddle retailers have a return policy that allows for a trial period. 

set your budget.  research fair prices.  purchase from a reputable retailer.  read up on saddle types.  determine what the saddle’s main use will be.  choose leather or synthetic.  maintain adequate space between pommel.  measure saddletree size and shape on western saddles.  check for tightness on english saddle.  gauge appropriate saddle size.  buy a saddle that fits your horse's build.  observe your horse’s response to the saddle. 

 Fasten it around the horse's neck if you prefer or loop the bridle reins around the neck to keep them off the ground.  The throatlatch, noseband, and flash should be unfastened with the straps hanging neatly to the outside of the cheekpieces and bit.  Before you start fastening the buckles, view the horse from the front and make sure the bridle pieces and bit lay straight and even on both sides of the face:   The browband should be between the base of the horse's ears and the top of the horns (the bony protrusion above each eye). It should be level and large enough not to pull the cheekpieces too close to the eye. The buckles of the cheekpiece and strap to the noseband should be very close to each other for a good fit and neat look. The throatlatch should fit basically like a necklace (four fingers' width). The cavesson (noseband) should fit like a bracelet (two fingers' width). The flash should fit like more like ring and needs to be BELOW the bit. This way the flash won't interfere with the bit's movement or pinch the corners of the mouth when you pick up on the reins.  You should be able to fit four fingers under it; it should fit like a necklace with ample room for your horse to breathe when the neck is flexed.  This should fit like a bracelet; you should be able to fit two fingers under it but can be adjusted to your horse's preference. Make sure the cheekpiece (that attaches to the bit) moves freely and that the noseband is under it.  The buckle should lay on a fleshy, non-bony area of the horse's nose. It should be somewhat between the bridge of the nose and the line of the lips. Adjust the tightness of the flash to your horse's comfort level, start loose at first and tighten only enough to prevent gaping of the mouth but not so much that your horse feels trapped, the jaws must move to maintain softness and relaxation while maintaining connection through the reins to the riders hands.(see image).  Everything should be symmetrical and fitted.  Hang the crown and the loop of the reins together on a hook. The reins should hang with the right side of the leather facing up. Now circle each strap (cavesson, throatlatch, flash) around the bridle and secure. Do not buckle the straps – just push the strap's end through the leather keepers. This will help the bridle keep the correct shape, and also ensure that you don't lose any straps off the headstall.  

take the halter off the horse.  hold up the bridle and align everything to avoid tangles.  put the headstall on the horse gently, bit first, remembering to push the ears forward one at a time, not reaching through and pulling them forward uncomfortably.  fasten the throatlatch.  fasten the noseband (or cavesson) approx one inch below the cheek bone, about half-way between the corner of his eye and top of his nostril.  fasten the flash and situate the buckle.  examine the bridle from the front and both sides.  store the bridle. 

 Cross ties, but you may use something else if your horse is used to it. If you tie your horse with the lead rope, it's always a good idea to do a quick-release (or "slip") knot!; , This can be a full groom - both brush the horse and pick out the feet with a hoof pick. As you groom, check the horse for lumps, bumps, swelling, and heat that could mean your horse is unsound. See Related wikiHows below.  This will make it easier for when you put the bridle on. If doing the saddle first, leave it on his face so he can't run away., (If you are not going to ride straight away leave the nose band off until you are ready to ride. Place the front on the horse's withers, a bit higher than normal. Slide it down a bit so the hair will not be pushed down in an unnatural position.  It should sit in the middle of the saddle pad. Again, make sure it doesn't interfere with the horse's shoulder. If it is sitting correctly, most of the time there will be a thin strip on the saddle pad that the saddle sits straight above, and should be coming out from directly underneath the pommel. Remember, if your horse has a martingale attach it before you start when you are putting on the saddle.Take note to also lift the top of the blanket (pad) into place, where the pommel on the saddle is. It's easiest to lift both blanket AND saddle up, so they can come down gently from a few centimetres above the withers.  Some horses will bloat - if he is known to do this, tighten it gradually on both sides when he exhales so he can't do this and tighten it again prior to mounting. Ideally, you should have the girth about 3/4 as tight as you prefer it. If your saddle is unattached attach it with keepers. If using breast strap, or rear cinch, now is the time to position them. Move your horse at least three steps, forward or back. Tighten the cinch or girth again and do so gradually.  You may have to put on boots or polos but it depends on your horse's needs. Make sure the strap of the boots go from the inside of the horse's leg, wrapping around the front so the end if the strap is facing backwards on the outside of the leg  , Put the reins over the horse's head. This is so they don't get tangled in all the other straps on the bridle and so that you will always have control over the horse.  This way, only the bit is being given and does not get tangled. Offer the bit into the horses mouth. Put a finger on each side of the bit and gently push against the horse's mouth. If the horse does not take in the bit, it is a good idea to put your thumb in the very corner of the horse's mouth where there is no teeth, and push on the horse's tongue. This will make your horse open his mouth.  Some put in the farthest ear first, so the ear nearest will easily slide under.  When you buckle it, you should be able to put four fingers or a fist in between the throat and the throat latch.  You should be able to fit one or two fingers under it.  You should buckle it so it is snug but not hurting the horse.  Have fun!  

tie your horse.  groom the horse.  if you want to do the bridle first, tie your pony's head-collar so that it is around his neck.  put on the saddle pad/blanket/cloth.  place the saddle gently on the horse's back.  put on his cinch or girth.  put on the horse's boots.  unbuckle the cross ties.  hold the crown, noseband, and throat latch in your right thumb, under and over the horse's head.  put the crown/headpiece of the bridle over the horse's ears.  buckle the throat latch.  buckle the nose band.  if you have a flash, buckle it.  mount your horse and you are ready to ride! 

 If this is the first time you're using this bit on this particular horse you should be sure that you're using a proper sized bridle. If it's the wrong size it will make the horse uncomfortable.Bridles comes in three sizes: pony, cob or Arabian, and full. Measure your horse’s head from the center of his poll to the corner of his mouth, and compare this measurement to the crown and cheek piece of the bridle. If the bit is too small it can pinch the horse’s mouth. If the bit is too large it will slide around in the horse’s mouth. Also an over-sized ported or jointed bit can cause pain or damage to the roof of the horse's mouth.; , (Let the noseband hang.) This gives you something to keep the horse in check, but won't get in the way of the bridle. Do not have the horse tied when you do this., Pick it up from its crownpiece (top part) in your left hand, letting the rest of it hang. Move any small straps to the outside of the cheekpieces, so they won't get tangled. , Now hold it in your right hand.  Hold the bridle so that the two sides are a good distance apart, with the crown up and the throatlatch straps hanging free and not tangled in any other straps. Make sure you take up all the reins so that you don’t create loops for your horse to step in and keep all the straps off the ground.  Once he does, hold the bit in the palm of your left hand, with your right forearm paralleling the horse's top of his neck (your hand should be right near his ears). Gently press the bit next to the horse's teeth, and insert your thumb back into the horse's mouth to make it open if you must.  If your horse won't lower his head or accept the bit, offer them a treat while offering the bit. Hold the bridle in your right arm with the crown of it near the horse's ears, and rest its bit and a treat (a bit of apple or sugar cube) in your palm. Slip the bit into your horse’s mouth with the treat. Hold the bit low where you’ve been holding the treats. Gently set it against your horse’s teeth as close to where her top teeth meet her lower teeth as possible. Hold your sugar cube against the bit. Make sure that you’re holding the crown up and ready to slip on before you put the bit in their mouth. Make sure you have the bit in before you put the bridle’s crown over their ears.  You want to maintain gentle pressure on the bit so the horse doesn't let it out of his mouth. Avoid crushing the horse's ears. It you have to slip one ear under the crown and then the other, do so gently.   Give your horse a treat to reward them for being good. This is optional, and probably not needed for a calm, experienced horse.  The brow band should always rest against your horse's forehead smoothly. It should be set 1-2" below the base of the horse's ears. Check from the front to make sure it's straight and isn't pinching the horse's ears.   While you're adjusting the brow band, adjust the headstall and cheek pieces to make sure everything is straight. Double check by looking at the bridle head-on.  The throatlatch isn't there to hold the bridle in place, and should be buckled with enough slack for 4 fingers to slide between it and the horse's neck. The throatlatch operates as an extra precaution to prevent the bridle from falling off. This means that the throatlatch needs to be loose enough to maintain slack, even if the horse drops his head.   Make sure you can fit 4 fingers between the throatlatch and the horse, even when their head is bent downwards. To remember about how loose the throatlatch should be, imagine it as a necklace.  The brow band should be smooth and in the correct position (so it won't be pinching your horse's ears or head). Check that the bit sits evenly in your horse's mouth. There should be two wrinkles on either corner of your horse's mouth. Too few wrinkles and you need to shorten the cheek straps.   Make sure it sits evenly on your horse’s head. If you do have to adjust the cheek strap check that the rest of the headstall is still even.  Unsnap the halter from the remaining cross-tie. Untie the lead rope from your horse's neck and unbuckle and remove the halter.   This is when you should check the length of your reins. The need to be long enough that you can take up contact with your horse's mouth.  Lead them on their left, at their cheek. Hold the reins in your right hand about six inches below the bit.   Keep the bight in your left hand.  

check that you have the correct bridle size.  halter your horse so the main part is around the horse's neck.  pick up and position your bridle.  drape the reins over your horse's neck.  ,  switch hands holding the bridle.  have the horse drop his head for the bit.  slip the crown of the bridle over the horse’s ears.  adjust the brow band.  buckle the throatlatch.  check the fit of the bridle.  remove the halter once you’re satisfied with the bridle’s positioning.  hold your horse by sliding the reins from their neck and gathering them in your hand. 

 Does he stare at you a lot, or look at you when talking to friends? Text you a lot? If so, he might like you, keep reading if you're still not positive.; , Make sure you keep him interested. If you think acting ignorant will make him run to you, you're wrong.  Texting is a way you can release your feelings without the awkwardness of talking one-on-one. If your conversation suddenly stops with a, "Yeah:" wait a little bit to see if he tries to continue the conversation. If he does, he might be interested.  However, make sure that he will not feel uncomfortable because of your overly big interest in his friends instead of him.  Get to know him. So that way you connect, which will make him like you more.  If so, this could be because he likes hanging out with you.  Hugging is a big sign that he may have some interest in you, or he is just a friendly guy. It really depends on the hug. If it's a sweet hug from behind while you are your locker, resting his head on your shoulder, it means he wants a proper hug, but doesn't want to ask you. If it's a hug where he lifts you, and spins you around, he is definitely into you. He just wants to gain your trust first, and get to know you more. Even if he just pokes, tickles, taps, or bump in to you that can show you that he is definitely trying to flirt... this may sound weird, but sometimes when a boys likes a girl he will be mean to her, so maybe he playfully trips you or pushes/shoves you, that's a sign as well! For example, if you and your crush are playing soccer together, he might brush up against your arm, thus using his body language to hint his attraction to you.  When he smiles at you when you do something cute, or something clumsy, he will look at you and laugh softly. If you say something funny, or you're in class and you say "I don't get it." and that pulls on his heartstrings, he will laugh softly and poke your nose softly, as if saying I like your nose. Go cross-eyed (as if your trying to look at your nose) immediately after he pokes your nose. It will make him laugh, and think you are so much cuter.  

look at the obvious.  talk to him.  text him.  become friends with his friends, guys like having a girlfriend that's comfortable being with him and his friends.  become friends with him, but don't become too close or it could ruin your chance with him.  does he want you to help him with projects or always pick you as his partner in school?,  does he always give you hugs?,  does he always smile when he looks at you, or shows interest? 

 Often the reason a horse objects to the bit is rooted in misunderstanding. They aren't usually trying to be naughty, but something about the bit is making them uncomfortable.   The bit might have the wrong taste. Horses tend to prefer copper bits to other kinds of bits because of the taste. Unfortunately copper bits tend to degrade more quickly than other kinds so you should make sure to watch out for pits and sharp edges. The bit might be too cold. You wouldn't want someone to shove a bit of cold metal in your mouth. Neither does your horse. Try warming up the bit between your hands before you put it in their mouth.  Sometimes your horse won't open their mouth, because the bit is too cold, or has the wrong taste, but often a little training can make it so they will do as you has. Just make sure that you reinforce the behavior you want to see from them.   Teach your horse to be comfortable with the cue. Pick a cue to use to get your horse to open their mouth. Give your horse the cue by touching them. Say "yes" to them so that they associate that touch with good behavior. Give your horse a treat as you take your fingers away. Show your horse that they get a treat. Have your horse tied or secured. Approach the horse's head from the left side, and walk so that your horse can see you. Stay on an angle facing the same direction as your horse. Have a treat in your left hand. Give your horse the cue and say "Open," while gently pressing two fingers again their lower lip. Say "yes" and take your fingers away, giving your horse the treat. Repeat these steps about four or five times, or until it seems like your horse has gotten the picture. Now do as you did above, only this time maintain slight but consistent pressure, and place your fingers just under his upper lip. When your horse opens their mouth say "Yes" and give them the treat. Practice this until they get it. Have your horse let you put a bit in their mouth. Show your horse the bit (unattached to the bridle to begin with). Let your horse sniff it and lip it. Then do as you did above, giving your horse the cue. Place the bit in your horse's mouth when they open up. Remove the bit and give them a treat.  One of the keys to properly bridling your horse is to maintain calmness, both in yourself and in your horse. A nervous horse might try to bite, toss their heads, strike out with their hooves, or try to escape. If your horse is overly nervous, don't bridle them until they have calmed down.   Avoid flicking her with the reins, especially around her eyes and ears, because this can cause a horse to become nervous or anxious.  

deal with a horse that objects to the bit.  train your horse to open their mouth for the bit.  keep your horse from getting nervous. 

 Your horse should be haltered and tied before attempting to put the bridle on. Keep them tied fairly short on the lead. If the lead is too loose, they may have room to avoid you. However, you don't want to tie the horse so that it can't move at all. For many horses, this will increase their hatred of the bridling process. You want the lead just loose enough that they can't lift their head out of your reach.; , If your horse keeps throwing its head, you can keep it still by resting your hand on its head. Hold the bridle in your left hand, and reach over the horse's head with your right so that your hand is sticking between its ears. If the horse tries to move its head, gently press down on the top of their mane to encourage them to bend their head towards you., Hand the top of the bridle to your right hand, and take the bit in your left hand, resting it against your flat fingers. Use your right hand only to hold the bridle's weight. Gently press the bit against their lips., If the horse doesn't take the bit, then you can encourage them to open their mouth. Keep the bit resting against your flat fingers on your left hand, and slip your thumb into the upper corner of their mouth. Rub the gums until they open their mouth. Gently slip the bit in their mouth. Keep gentle pressure against the teeth, but be sure not to knock the bit against their teeth. This is painful to the horse, and it will make it more difficult for you to bridle them.You may want to practice putting your thumb in without the bit first. Make sure that you are reaching in the side of the mouth where there are no teeth.This will prevent biting and injury.  

halter and tie your horse.  reach over the horse’s head.  pull the bridle up.  rub their gums. 

 Horses generally love the taste of peppermint.You can put some peppermint oil on the bit to encourage them to take it. The oil will last for a long time, so you may not have to reapply it for a few months.  Bits that are too hot or cold can be painful or uncomfortable for your horse. You should store your bridle by hanging it up away from direct sunlight and inclement weather, such as rain or snow.If it's summer, keep the bit from sitting in the direct sun, where it can overheat and burn your horse. If it's winter, warm the bit up by rubbing it between your hands before asking the horse to take it.  Hold a treat on the bit and let your horse see it. While he slips the treat into his mouth, quickly but gently slip the bit into his mouth and buckle the bridle. Fruit and vegetable treats should be cut up before being offered to your horse while more syrupy treats can be smeared over the bit.Some treats that horses enjoy include:   Peppermint candyMolasses Unsweetened apple sauceCarrotsSugar cubes GrapesHoney  , While bridling your horse, speak to them in a soothing, gentle tone. If you do this often enough, your horse will come to associate your voice with a safe and serene environment. If your horse has a bad day or a cranky attitude, you can use this voice to return them to a calm state.What you say isn’t as important as how you say it. You might say to horse, “It’s all right. I’m just putting the bridle on.” You might even narrate what you are doing, such as “I’m just going to reach over. Here, now take the bit.” You can even just use soothing sounds as, “shh…shh…”  

rub your bit in peppermint oil.  make sure the bit is the right temperature.  give your horse a treat.  speak to your horse in a calming tone. 

 Certain medical problems can make even the most gentle horse upset and difficult to manage. Many horses avoid the bit because their teeth and mouth hurt. Often, fixing their issues solves the problem overnight.   If your horse throws their head when you touch their ears, you may want to have them checked for ear mites.Keep an eye out for tooth or mouth abscesses. If your horse has never had their teeth "floated"(filed smooth), it may be the problem., A horse communicates through certain elements of body language. By learning how to interpret their body language, you might be able to figure what it is that is bothering your horse. It may take a few weeks to understand your horse’s unique body language, but in general, horses tend to demonstrate the same physical cues.If the ears are pointed backwards, it may mean that they are distracted by other sounds. If the ears are excessively twitching or swiveling, they may be either anxious or distracted. Your horse's head should be lowered if they are relaxed. If the horse holds their head high but still, they may be distracted by something. If their head is low but they are shaking it from side to side, they are demonstrating aggression. A horse that is leaning back and splaying its forelegs may be scared or spooked. If your horse paws the ground, they may be bored. If they forcefully stomp, they may be becoming annoyed.  Ill-fitting or worn equipment can be uncomfortable for your horse, and it may explain why your horse is so reluctant to be bridled. In addition to the bridle, you should check your saddle to make sure that there are no protruding parts that might make your horse grumpy.Check the bit to make sure that there are no cracks or sharp edges. These might hurt your horse.If your horse does not like to have their ears touched, you can use a bridle with bit clips. This will make it easier for you to put the bridle over their head without touching their ears., Some horses don’t like particular types of bits. They may dislike the taste or be uncomfortable with the size. If your horse is reluctant to take the bit, you might want to consider switching to different material or thickness. Test out different bits to see which one is best for your horse.   Some horses prefer the taste of copper bits over that of stainless steel or nickel.Some horses may do well with plastic bit.Bits that are too small may be pinching the horse's mouth while bits that are too big may hang out of their mouth.Rubber bits with large diameters may work well with younger, more inexperienced horses. 

call a veterinarian.  study their body language.  check your equipment.  switch your bits. 

 Engage in a simple exchange of pleasantries. A simple “hello” or “hi” will do as a greeting. A “How are you?” or “What’s up” is even better. The bottom line in this step is to break the ice and get the conversation rolling. How she greets you will be the beginning of telling you if she’s interested or not.   If you quickly run out of things to say and the conversation becomes stale, consider telling a funny story or developing a funny routine. Consider telling a quick self-deprecating joke to show you don't take yourself very seriously.Laughter is a great way to break the ice. Keep it simple, but make her laugh and appeal to her sense of humor. Be sure not to turn the conversation into a stand-up routine and give her a chance to respond.; , After you’ve started a conversation, don’t hesitate to jump into asking questions. Find out more about the girl and move on from there! The depth at which she responds will show you in how she feels about you. If she responds more, she's very into the current conversation, and who knows, very into the person she's talking to (you!).   Ask her what her hobbies are, what sort of music she likes and what movies she is into. Does she enjoy reading? You may find out that she does and use it as a jumping off point to move into more intimate territory. How much she tells you may give keen insight into how she feels about you. It’s important to keep the questions casual. If you ask questions that are a little too personal, it may make her feel creeped out or uncomfortable around you. This is the last thing you want when trying to figure out if she’s into you. There are plenty of questions to ask without stepping over the line., Don’t be afraid to flirt. It’s one of the easiest ways to let someone know you’re enjoying your time together and get a similar response. Be sure to smile, initiate casual contact like a touch on the arm, and maintain eye contact. All of these go a long way in letting someone know you like them. Who knows – she may return the flirtation and give you the answers you’re seeking.   Eye contact is the most important forms of communication. It communicates respect, understanding, appreciation and most importantly, interest! Eye contact can also make the difference between seeming aloof and blossoming a friendship or more., After you’ve reached a level of conversation and become comfortable with one another, ask deeper questions. Find out what her passions are. If she’s willing to share them with you, there’s probably a level of interest. After all, she’s opening up about topics that make her who she is. In other words, this is privileged information – the conversation has moved on from casual to real and memorable for both parties involved.   Ask questions about her friends, her fears, her loves and her quirks. If you’re feeling extra bold, ask about her past – just be sure to steer clear of conversations about past relationships. You don’t want to know how she feels about an ex, you want to know how she feels about you. How much she shares will tell you how interested she is in sharing with you. The more she shares, the more interested she is. You may also ask about her hobbies and some other good questions, which would make her feel that you are interested in her as much as she is into you.  

start a normal conversation.  begin asking casual questions.  flirt.  ask more intimate questions. 

 Pay attention to how the girl you’re interested in is physically acting. If she's open and receptive - and her body is going along with such a way of acting - chances are she's totally into you, or at least interested. The same can be said for a lack of body language.   Is she facing you during conversation? Does she nervously laugh at your jokes? Does she look you in the eye when talking? If she is during all of the above, she’s definitely opening up to you and fully engaged in your conversation. While this may not immediately mean she's into you, she's definitely interested in the conversation as well as who she's talking to.. Folded arms, crossed legs, and fidgety hands are a sure sign of negative body language. If she’s behaving in anxious ways, her mind is on something else. This does not mean, however, that she’s completely disinterested. You can always use this as an opportunity to ask more questions. Who knows, she may find your inquisitiveness comforting. , Eye contact is one of the most important forms of communication. It reveals respect, attention, understanding and interest. If she keeps your gaze and does not avert her attention, she’s probably interested. It also means she’s doing everything she can in order to learn more about you. , Note small quirks during interactions with the girl you like. If you tell a joke, pay attention to the manner in which she laughs and responds. If you ask a certain question, see if she hesitates or chooses to dive right in. These small "tells" often reveal a lot about a person’s interest level and overall personality.   Don't make mountains out of molehills. In other words, don’t look too far into a small quirk and misinterpret it. After all, people behave in a variety of ways for a variety of reasons. People often perceive people in a fast but flawed way before getting to know one another. Don't make the mistake of misjudging the girl you feel may be interested in you. 

see if she’s presenting herself as open.  make note of her eye contact.  pay attention to small quirks. 

 In the modern age, we have the latest technology right at our fingertips – use it! Send the girl you’re interested in a text message. How she responds will often show you how interested she is in you.Take note and learn how far interest into you really goes!   If she's short with you, that may be a sign she's busy or simply doesn't have the time to talk via text. Use this as an opportunity to set up a time to talk face to face. If she mirrors your texting style, she's definitely interested. Note how often she uses words from your vocabulary. If she does, she admires them and is very interested in the person using them. If she asks you questions, she's also definitely interested. After all, she's taking time to get to know you and gather information about you. Be as open and honest as possible to give her a good idea of who you are and what you're like. Bear in mind technology does not always move as fast as we would like it to. If she doesn’t immediately respond, she may be in a “dead zone” without reception and has yet to get your message. She may also be in a situation like work or school where texting is not an option. Focus on the response rather than the time it takes to get one.  The amount of social media available, it’s difficult to not find avenues to get in touch with people. See if the girl you’re interested in has a social media account on Facebook, Twitter, Instagram or Tumblr and get in touch that way.   The barriers social media offer can sometimes make people feel comfortable enough to talk to one another, even if they’ve just met each other. If you’re too shy for conversation – or feel she might be – social media can offer interaction without having to come face to face. Maybe the girl you’re interested in needs that buffer to feel completely comfortable and show her interest.  If you and the girl you’re interested in share friends or coworkers, asking them about her may be a good route to take, albeit somewhat indirect. There’s an off chance she’s mentioned you to one of them or is more willing to discuss the issue with one of them instead of directly with you.  

flirt via texting.  message on social media.  ask mutual friends. 

 While you've probably done a good job in asking her about her interests and learned a lot about her, don't shy away from sharing information about yourself. The more she learns about you, the more she's going to find she has in common with you. People tend to gravitate toward people they relate to and share interests with.   Share your own favorite hobbies, music and movies, but also share the more in-depth subject matter as well. If you're passionate about a particular topic, talk about it! Chances are you're going to be very charismatic and truthful in what you say. After all, you're passionate about it!  , A great way to garner and maintain interest is to have more one-on-one situations. Develop as many chances as possible to get the girl alone to learn all you can about one another. Human beings are pretty complex creatures, a simple interaction and conversation isn't going to be enough. Have as many as you possibly can.   Where the date is isn't as important as what you're doing during the date. Make sure it's somewhere you both will be able to enjoy yourself and have plenty of opportunities to interact with one another. A concert may sound like a great date idea, but the focus will be on the music and band rather than each other.  Never try to be anything more than you already are. While there may be certain parts of yourself that you don't like, that doesn't mean you should pretend to be something completely different. Be yourself - you have plenty to offer anyone and everyone who comes in contact with you, whether you realize it or not. Just because you're interested in this girl doesn't mean you should change.  

share more about yourself.  ask her out on a date.  be yourself. 

 Bridles vary in price range based on the quality of the material. The cheapest bridles tend to be made of synthetic leather, while better bridles will be made from a higher quality Sedgewick or UK leather. Consider the function of your horse when deciding how much to spend on materials. You may want to splurge and get the best leather for your top show horse.; , A bit is the piece of the bridle that is placed in the horse’s mouth that allows the rider to communicate with the horse. The practice of using a bitless bridle, however, is becoming more and more popular. Many believe that bits cause the horse physical discomfort and impact their physical and psychological health. If your horse is in less physical pain, it will be more willing to listen to you and engage in training. Building a positive relationship and getting your horse to trust you will better allow you to train and control your horse without having to use a device that could cause the horse pain such as a bit., This means the thickness of the material. Your decision will be based on personal preference, and your horse's conformation. A fine head will look better in fine material, while a more workman like head will look better in a thicker material. 

decide on the type of material you want.  choose between a bitless bridle and one with a bit.  decide on the weight of the material. 

 Staring at him/her won't do anything. They or someone else could catch you in the act. If possible, stop your habit of staring at them. Or, just make sure no one (including them!) is watching, and just quickly side-glance at them.; , They'll think you're creepy.  Especially someone with a reputation for being a gossip/big mouth and untrustworthy. If you don't feel one hundred percent sure someone won't use it against you, don't tell. You never know when you will fight with someone. They might use blackmail. You don't want it.  This might be a good way to tell someone you've got a crush on someone, without letting anyone know. (Except if someone reads it.) If you are embarrassed about your crush, this can be a good way of looking at it objectively.  Don't confirm your crush to anyone else. They will go back and tell your crush.  Be polite, but not overly attentive. If you tag along with them too much, they'll be annoyed or someone else will find out that you like him/her! But then again, you don't want to be too shy around them, either. They might consider you weird or be suspicious.  If your special someone ends up liking you, you want this person to fall for who you really are, not someone you pretended to be.  

do not stare.  do not giggle hysterically when your crush looks over at you.  avoid telling anyone that you have a crush on this person.  keep a diary.  if others say that your crush likes you, just smile and say "that's nice".  treat your crush exactly the same way as you treat all your acquaintances.  be real and show your authentic self. 

 The crownpiece is the strap that goes behind the horse’s ears. Using a soft fabric measuring tape, start at one corner of the mouth and measure up the cheeks, over the ears, and down to the other side of the mouth. , Using the same measuring tape, start at the back edge of the horse’s ear. Measure around the horse’s forehead, and then to the back edge of the other ear., The throatlatch runs from the back of the horse’s ear, under the throat, and back up to the other ear. Using your measuring tape, figure out how long your horse’s throatlatch needs to be., Start about one inch down from the cheekbone, or two finger widths. From there, measure the circumference of the horse’s nose. 

measure the crown piece and cheek piece.  measure for the length of the browband.  measure the throatlatch.  measure the noseband. 

 It’s a good idea to put on the bridle before purchasing it to make sure it fits. Make sure your bridle is loose before attempting to put it on your horse. If it’s too tight, it will hurt the horse and you may meet more resistance.   Hold onto the halter or the horse’s mane to keep it restrained while putting on the bridle.Put the reins over the horse’s head. This will allow you to restrain the horse without using the halter.Position the crownpiece between the horse’s ears. Put your right arm around the horse’s neck and between the ears, holding the bridle by the crownpiece in your right hand. Then hold the bridle so that the bit is positioned over the mouth., With your right hand on the crownpiece, grab the bit with your left hand and move it towards the horse’s mouth. If your horse is well-trained, you should be able to just touch the horse’s lips to indicate that the mouth needs to open.If your horse doesn’t open his or her mouth, try putting your thumb and little finger behind the horse’s incisors to coax the mouth open without getting bitten. Once the horse’s mouth is open, put in the bit.  Once the bridle is on, you’ll have to adjust the throatlatch, noseband, and cheekpieces.For the noseband, make sure there is about two or three fingers’ width of slack. If the noseband is too tight the horse won’t be able to open its mouth. If the throatlatch is too tight the horse won’t be able to breath. You should be able to fit three fingers between the horse’s throat and the strap. The cheekpieces should be tight enough so that the bit is held firmly in place.  

put on the bridle to test for fit.  insert the bit.  adjust the bridle. 

 If a boy has a crush on you, then he’ll go out of his way to try to impress you. He’ll want you to think that he’s brave, exciting, cool, or even wacky. The next time you’re around the boy who might have a crush on you, see if he starts trying to say or do something that is calculated to impress you. If he tries to show off when he’s playing sports, brags about his awesome weekend plans, tries to do something crazy like jump in a pool with his clothes on, or engages in other behavior that seems calculated to impress you, then he may have a crush on you.   Watch him closely when he does something “impressive.” If he keeps looking over at you to make sure you’re paying attention or to see what you think, then there’s a good chance he has a crush on you. Though it can be hard to know what he does when you’re not around, try to get a sense of whether he starts showing off more when you’re there. For example, if he starts telling a ridiculous joke or showing off his ability to juggle oranges just moments after you walk in the door, this behavior may be for your benefit.; , This is another dead giveaway that the boy has a crush on you. If he’s jealous of the guys you hang out with, then it can only be for one reason: because he likes you and feels threatened by them. Guys have different ways of showing that they’re jealous of other guys. He may just make fun of the guys to you, be rude or aggressive to the guys, or just roll his eyes and turn away from the other guys in your orbit. If he’s jealous of the guys you’re around, it’s because he wishes he had more quality time with you instead.   He won’t admit that he’s jealous, of course. But if you find him constantly talking about what a loser your friend Jake is or asking you why you’re even friends with a weirdo like Steve, then this is his way of saying he wished you were spending time with him instead. If he puts down your guy friends to their faces, then he’s definitely jealous of them. Though this behavior can be a problem if he’s being really rude, if he’s just not being super nice for a while, it may just mean that he has a crush on you.  If the boy has a crush on you, then he’ll want to spend as much time with you as possible. He may suggest that you hang out after school to study together, or he may invite you to the mall to watch a movie with a big group of friends. He may go to a party just because he knows you’ll be there. He may ask what you’re up to and may conveniently say that he was thinking of doing the same thing. If it seems like he’s been around more often and that he’s been doing a lot of the same things as you, then it may be because he has a crush on you.   Think about it. If you barely saw him a month ago and suddenly he always seems to be around, then it may be because he has a crush on you. He may be too shy to hang out with you by himself, but if he and a pack of friends are always around, it may still mean that he likes you.  It may not always be easy to tell when a boy is flirting with you. A lot of it depends on his age – if he’s in middle school, his own way of flirting with you may even be to tease you or to poke fun at you. Every age and stage of life has a slightly different definition of flirting, but the main thing is, if he singles you out, spends more time around you than others, is playful about something you say, do, or wear, and generally singles you out, even if you feel like it’s in a teasing way, then it means he’s flirting with you.   If he’s playful and makes fun of you for always wearing purple or keeps making jokey comments about your earrings, then he’s flirting. If he gently pushes you or elbows you, this is his way of flirting with you and trying to get closer to you. If he teases you so much that he has even come up with a special nickname for you, then he’s definitely flirting.  One key indicator of whether a boy has a crush on you or not is how he treats other girls. If he treats other girls exactly the same way as he treats you, then he may not have a crush on you. But if he’s pretty flirtatious with you and ignores or doesn’t care much for other girls, then he may have a crush on you. Another option is that he’ll pay attention to other girls and will kind of ignore you — as confusing as it is, this may also mean that he likes you and just feels shy toward you.   The next time you’re around him and other girls, notice what he does with them. Does he playfully tease them, ask them lots of questions or even jokingly put his arm around them? If he does the same with you, then he may just be a flirtatious person. However, if he treats them differently from you, then you may be the real apple of his eye. He may even be more polite and gentlemanly around you than other girls. Does he hold open doors or pull out chairs for you more than he does for other girls? If so, then he may have a crush on you.  Another sign that he has a crush on you is that the boy will find ways to do small favors for you. Maybe he’ll throw out your trash for you in class. Maybe he’ll help you carry your books. Maybe he’ll check what time a movie is playing for you. Even the little things count. Think about it. Do you feel like he’s going out of his way to be helpful to you? If he does this for you but not for other girls, then it may mean that he’s doing favors for you because he has a crush on you.   Of course, he may just be a friendly guy who does favors for everyone. But the chances of that are less likely than the chances of him having a crush on you. The fact that he does favors for you means that he’s being thoughtful about what you need. This is a sign that he has a crush on you!  , Nowadays, one of the easiest ways to tell if a boy likes you is to see what he does when it comes to his phone. He may be too shy to truly communicate with you in person and may feel more comfortable getting to know you over the phone. Here are some signs that he may have a crush on you:   Did he ask for you your phone number? Don't despair if he doesn't—he may see giving you his as a more subtle way to show he's interested. If he gives you his, text him immediately with your name so that he has your number. After giving your number, give him a smile and say something along the lines of “Give me a call sometime, we can hang out!" Pay attention to how often he calls or texts you. If he texts you a lot, that's definitely a sign that he's interested. If he never texts you, he may be shy. Don't be afraid to make the first move here—it's possible that he's just waiting for your text! If you text him on multiple occasions and he doesn't respond, though, it's probably a sign that he's not into you.  If the boy asks you if you like anyone or if you have a crush on anyone, then this is a dead giveaway that he has a crush on you. He may be asking because he’s jealous or nervous that you like other guys, or because he’s secretly hoping that you’ll say that you like him. This may not be the most subtle way for him to go about it, but most boys don’t know better. If he’s always teasing you or bothering you about whether or not you like someone, then it may be because he has a crush on you.   However, there is one exception to this rule. He may be asking you if you like someone because one of his friends likes you and he’s really asking for him. See if he has a friend who is always eyeing you and who you may think could have a crush on you instead.  If the boy is always telling you that none of the girls he knows are good enough for him, or that none of them are as smart, pretty, or interesting as you, then this may be his way of telling you that you’re the right girl for him. If he’s gone on dates with girls and tells you that he didn’t really like them, or if he’s always just telling you about how other girls never measure up, then this may be his way of telling you that you’re really the one for him.   Just make sure this doesn’t mean he has you in the Friend Zone. If he’s asking you for advice on his dating life, then it may be because he just looks at you as a friend. But if he just “complains” to you about how he can’t find the right girl, then he may be telling you that he has a crush on you.  Another sign that the boy has a crush on you is that he always finds a way to give you a compliment. He may not say something as obvious as, “You look so beautiful today,” But he may tell you that your dress is a pretty color, that he likes your new earrings, or that he thinks your new shoes are awesome. Just the fact that he notices how you look, what you do, or what you’re wearing shows that he pays attention to you and that he probably has a crush on you.   He may also compliment things like how awesome you are at sports, how smart you are in class, or how much he loves your jokes. Though some guys are more shy about complimenting character traits or talents instead of just sticking to the more obvious things, this can also be a way for him to show that he has a crush on you.  Another sign that he has a crush on you is that he’s always asking what you’re up to over the weekend. He may really be asking because he wants to make sure that you’re not going on a date because he’s feeling jealous. He could also be asking as a way of asking you to hang out with him, or because he’s hoping that you’ll ask him to hang out with you. If he wants to know what you’re doing away from school, then it’s probably because he wants to be a part of it.   He may just say something simple like, “Are you doing anything fun this weekend?” If you say you’re not, then he may use this as a good time to ask you to hang out. If he does that, then there’s a good chance he has a crush on you. Watch his face when he asks you what you’re up to over the weekend. If you say you’re hanging out with girlfriends, then you should see if there’s a noticeable relief on his face because you’re not hanging out with any boys.  If a boy has a crush on you, then he may open up to you about some of the stuff he’s been thinking and feeling. He could tell you about his favorite pet, his siblings, his friendships, or even his dreams for the future. If you find him telling you some things that seem personal, and if he even says something like, “I don’t tell many people this” or “Not a lot of people know that about me,” then it’s a sign that he thinks you’re special. If he has a crush on you, then he may open up to you more than he would to most people.   If he doesn’t really open up to you, it doesn’t mean that he doesn’t like you. It just means that he’s a bit more shy.  If the boy has a crush on you, then he may be more nervous around you than he would be around other girls. This may lead him to laugh a lot more around you than he normally would. He may laugh really hard at something you say that’s barely funny, or he may even laugh slightly at something you said that wasn’t meant to be funny at all. The next time you’re together, pay attention to how much he laughs around you and see if he laughs more than normal. If so, then it may be because he has a crush on you.   Study him when he’s around other people. Is he just the type of guy who is always laughing, or does he laugh more around you? If his laughter is reserved for you, then it may be because he has a crush on you. You can also see if he always goes out of his way to make you laugh. If he seems to crack more jokes around you than anyone else, or if he just seems to try harder, then it may be because he has a crush on you.  It’s only natural that if a boy likes you, he’ll go out of his way to touch you more. If you’re sitting next to each other and your knees or legs are touching, or if he keeps “accidentally” touching your feet with his, then it may be because he likes you. If you’re in a group setting and he tends to playfully push or shove you a lot, to poke you, or just to touch you in some other silly way, then this may also be a sign that he has a crush on you.   Take a look at what he does the next time you’re together. Does he end up subtly touching you or brushing up against you a few times? If so, then he may have a crush on you. Of course, if he’s really shy, then he may not try to touch you and may even be a little bit intimidated when he’s near you.  This can be another sign that the boy has a crush on you. If you look over at him during math class and catch him looking at you, or if you see him looking at you all the way across the cafeteria, then it may mean that he has a crush on you. If he blushes and looks away, or just seems embarrassed that you’ve “caught” him staring at you, then it’s even more likely that he has a crush on you.   The downside is that if you’re always trying to catch him staring at you, he’ll start to think that you’re the one who has a crush on him. But that’s true, isn’t it?  , The next time you talk to the guy, see if he turns his chest, shoulders, and feet toward you, and if he generally points his body in your direction. If he has a crush on you, then he’ll want to be closer to you and to be absorbed in what you’re saying. He may even lean toward you to get closer during conversation. If he’s turned away from you, has his arms crossed, or is angling his shoulders in the opposite direction, then he may not have a crush on you after all. Though body language isn’t everything, it really can help you get a sense of whether a boy has a crush on you or not.   Of course, it can also help to observe the boy with other people. See if his body language is more open toward you than it is with others. If he just always crosses his arms over his chest when he talks to people, then it won’t mean anything bad if he does it around you.  Fidgeting is a prime sign of nervousness. If the guy tends to play with the drawstring of his hoodie, pick at his nails, brush away an imaginary spot on his shirt, or kick at nothing when he’s around you, then it may be because he likes you and feels nervous. The next time you talk, see if he moves his arms and other body parts around more than usual. If so, then this may mean that he has a crush around you because he’s nervous about how he should act when you’re together.   He may also play with his phone or just look at it just for something to do. This may not mean that he’s bored and wants to talk to someone else, but that he’s just nervous about talking to you.  If you see the guy fixing his hair, looking in a mirror or reflective surface, brushing a spot off his shoes, or adjusting his shirt or pants a bit when he’s around you, then it may be because he has a crush on you and is nervous about looking his best. The next time you talk, see if he acts a bit self-conscious about his appearance. If he does, then it may be because he likes you and wants to look his best.   Think about it: you tend to spend more time looking in the mirror before you see your crush, don’t you? Guys feel the same way. If the boy likes you, then he may be wondering about how he looks right in the middle of talking to you.  This is one of the biggest giveaways that the guy likes you. If you walk into a room, whether it’s a classroom or a birthday party, and his face lights up, his eyes get bigger, and a smile spreads across his face, then this may mean that he has a crush on you. He may not come over to you immediately, and he may act more coy about how he feels, but this first reaction shows that he really may have a crush on you after all.   His face may light up and he may turn away or try to play it cool instead of coming up to you immediately. But if you see the initial look in his eyes, you’ll know his true feelings.  If a boy really has a crush on you, then he’ll be likely to give you all of his attention. He’ll turn his body toward you, make eye contact, and won’t look around for his other friends or text them during your conversation (unless he uses his phone as a crutch because he’s nervous). If his friends walk by and he doesn’t even see them, or if he doesn’t keep looking around the room, then it’s because he has a crush on you and is completely absorbed by you.   The next time you talk, see if he gives you all of his attention. If he looks at you closely, responds to what you say, and seems really engaged, then he may have a crush on you. However, he may also be so nervous that he may zone out because he’s so busy worrying about what to say next!  

see if he tries to impress you.  see if he’s jealous of the guys you hang out with.  see if he’s always looking for excuses to hang out with you.  see if he flirts with you.  see if he treats you differently from other girls.  see if he does favors for you.  observe his phone etiquette.  see if he asks you if you like anyone.  see if he talks about how he can’t find the right girl.  see if he’s always finding subtle ways to compliment you.  see if he tries to find out about your plans.  see if he opens up to you.  see if he laughs more around you.  see if he’s always looking for excuses to touch you.  see if you can catch him staring at you.  see if he turns his body toward you when you talk.  see if he fidgets around you.  see if he preens around you.  see if his face lights up when you walk into a room.  see if he gives you his full attention when you talk. 

 Before you go to bed, spend time thinking about your crush. You can daydream about the kind of scenario you'd like to dream about, such as a romantic walk on the beach or a fun date with dinner and a movie. Just keep them firmly planted in you head, conjuring up the clearest mental picture you can imagine of them.This will help them be more present in your head and seem more realistic, which can influence the way they appear in your dream.; , When you are getting ready for bed, say your crush's name out loud. Even make it into a statement, such as: "I will dream about ____." You can even be more specific, using phrases such as: "I want to dream about going on a date with ____." or "I will dream about walking on the beach with ____." The firmer you are with your intentions, the more likely you are to dream about your crush., Now that you've thought about them for a little while and laid out what you want to happen in the dream, you can solidify the entire routine by looking at a picture of your crush. This will give you an even more exact picture of them in your head as you fall asleep. It will also give you something to keep your mind focused on while you are falling asleep., With their picture fresh in your mind and dream intentions laid out, make sure you think about them while you are falling asleep. You want their face and their name to be the last thing you think about before you fall asleep. This concentrates them in your subconscious mind and will help encourage your dreaming mind to recall their face and the scenario you laid out before you fell asleep.   When you are first trying to control your dreams, you need to make sure that your crush is the main focus of your thoughts before bed. The daydreaming, the pictures, and the verbalized intentions lead up to your thoughts as you fall asleep. If you have already cleared your mind of any problems or issues you've dealt with throughout the day, then your mind will be more focused on your crush. This will fill your conscious and unconscious mind with him and help in your quest to dream of your crush., While the steps seem easy, the task of dream control isn't. You may not be able to get this right on the first or second try. It may take a while for you to be able to fully control what you dream about. Just keep following the steps before bed. It should eventually lead you to your ideal dream about your crush.If you see that you are having a hard time, try keeping a journal of the dreams you do have. By writing down what you are already dreaming, it may clear your subconscious mind of those dreams and help make room for the dream you are trying to have. 

think about them.  say their name aloud.  look at a picture.  fall asleep.  practice. 

 The first step to having a lucid dream, which is a dream where you are aware you are dreaming and can control the events within, is to remember the dreams you typically have. Over the course of a few weeks, lay in bed every morning and replay your dreams. Then write down what you dreamed of the night before as soon as you get out of bed. This will help you recognize typical patterns in your dreams.You can also make note of reoccurring themes or objects in your dreams. These can act as focal points in your dreams to help you become aware that you are dreaming.You should keep a notepad or journal right by your bed for the easiest access. This way, you won't have to go looking for somewhere to write your dreams down and get distracted and forget portions of your dreams., One of the best ways to become aware in dreams is to become hyperaware of the conscious world. Ask yourself throughout the day if you are awake or dreaming. Notice how all your senses respond to various things around you. Find elements in your everyday life that are detailed and in clear focus that you can use as comparisons for your dream landscape.   Try looking at the details on the back of your hand. These details will be fuzzier in dreams, which can help you realize the distinction between dreams and reality., Before bed, make sure you are in a comfortable environment where you won't be disturbed. Lay down with you eyes closed and relax your body, letting all the ambient sounds and smells fade away. Think about the fact that you are awake and attempting to fall asleep. This will help you hold on to your conscious mind, even when you lapse into sleep and start dreaming.You may not lucid dream right away. You just need to keep looking for your dream signs and logging your dreams. Eventually, you should be able to recognize your dreams and become lucid while in them. You may be pulled out of your first couple of lucid dreams as soon as you become aware. If this is the case, try looking at your hands in your dreams or spinning around in a circle. These things can help focus your senses and help you stay lucid in your dreams longer.  Once you've achieved lucid dreaming, you can manipulate the dream and bring your crush into the dream with you. While in your dream, visualize your crush right behind you or just around the corner. Once you've got a clear picture, turn around or go look around the bend to find them. You can also conjure a door and expect them to be behind the door. They should eventually be there when you open it.   If you do get them to show up and they don't look quite right, you can manipulate the figure to change in your dream. Tell them that they need to look better, saying something like: "I am going to turn around and when I look back, you are going to be the best version of ____ that I can imagine." Try each method and see which one works best for you. It may take some time, so just keep practicing. 

keep a dream journal.  notice the world around you.  fall asleep.  conjure your crush. 

 If you’re not used to taking care of yourself, it’s a good reason to start improving something about yourself. First of all, try not to look messy or sloppy; it’s a huge turn-off for any guy, unless he doesn't mind it. Abandon that old, dusty pair of jeans and huge T-shirt for something more flattering. Wear something that makes you feel confident.    Have a sense of style. Okay, you may not be the kind of girl who pampers herself all day long, but don't be afraid to take fashion risks. Do you like bright colors? Show him just how fabulous you are. Express your individuality with earrings, scarves, or whatever makes you feel pretty. Don't worry about fitting in; you're a trend setter! Don't go overboard with sexy clothing. Show him you are beautiful without having to give away all the goods. Sexy is good. Trashy is risky.; , Everyone likes the girl who acts like a tom boy, but don't let the boys forget that you are also a lovely woman. Say kind things to him, laugh at his jokes, make him feel like he's awesome. It'll get him asking for your number for sure.   Don't try to impress him by cussing like a sailor. Remember, act like a lady. Speak to him in gentle tones. Remind him of how feminine you can be.  Compliment guys. An honest compliment can go a long way. If you like somebody, compliment them on the particularities you like about them. Don't compliment them too much or gush. Act romantic and sensitive. Let guys know you need to get affection. Sometimes, if you don't tell them directly, they may even forget you have feelings too. Speak your mind!   , Even if guys often don’t understand friendships between girls they will respect you if you show them you have friends of your own. Don't be afraid to show your social independence.  Girls' little secrets are fascinating for guys. Don't give away too much information, you want to keep that boy wanting more!  , Mean girls may be popular, but they often end up alone. Believe it or not, guys find cat fights quite scary and they'll back off when they see how mean you can be at times. There's nothing wrong with being nice. Surely you can stand up for yourself without being mean, right?  

look pretty.  be sweet to boys.  hang out with the girls from time to time.  be mysterious.  don't be mean. 

 Before you can think of getting others to fall for your charms, first you must look to yourself. Contrary to what you might believe, there's much, much more to looks than appearance. Nice clothes and style are a start, but nothing can replace a good attitude and self-respect. Girls can pick up when a guy doesn't believe in himself, and there's nothing as attractive as a girl who knows she's worth it. Regardless of your gender or the person you're trying to impress, confidence is an essential starting point.   For many people, learning to find confidence in themselves may be the hardest part of this entire process. If you're having trouble feeling secure in your chances of success, try writing down a list of things you like about yourself, and a list of personal qualities (e.g.: a great sense of humour, beautiful smile etc.) your crush would like you for. Don't worry if you're shy-- you can still show plenty of confidence if you're on the introverted side. Guys can feel really flattered if you feel slightly nervous around them. .If you're a shy guy, you might find girls are attracted to you for your mystery. Your best bet is to take comfort in what comes most naturally to you; , Do some research into different styles. Try to recognize which styles appeal most to you, and which you think might look best on you. If you're having trouble, ask one of your friends for advice-- they're there for a reason, and chances are they'll have plenty of warm suggestions to help you spruce up your style!   Don't try to overdo it with your appearance. Find a look that's fashionable but ultimately casual. You don't want to end up scaring your crush away!  , Nothing refreshes attention like a fresh new hairdo! This way, even if you've known him for a while, he will have to reconsider his impression of you. Who knows-- you may have found your new favourite look!  , Chances are you may be feeling stressed, excited, uncertain, or a mixture of all three due to your crush. Although it's natural to feel some embarrassment about having a crush, you may find it helps alleviate the strain to open up about it with a few close friends. Especially if they know your crush, they may be able to lend specifically-tailored advice to your situation. If anything, putting your feelings into words for the first time may help you make better sense of what you stand.   If you decide to tell friends about your crush, whether for advice or simply to vent, make sure not to word the situation in bleak, fatalistic terms. Although you may feel pessimistic, it's much better to talk about it constructively. Not only will this positively correlate with the helpfulness of the advice your friends give you; thinking positively will also give you more confidence with your crush. Make sure you're confiding in someone you can trust. If you have any doubt they might spread word of your feelings around (or even tell your crush prematurely!) it may be do more harm than good. If you have any doubts, it's best to keep any talk limited to your most-trusted friends.  This could mean anything-- do you go to the same school? Are you neighbours? In virtually every circumstance, there are plenty of opportunities to get on that person's radar. A great start is to put yourself in his general area. Find out what events he'll be attending, or where he eats lunch. The more you're around him, the more opportunities you'll have to interact with one another., The universal gesture of kindness, there is nothing so simple and profoundly effective in winning your crush as a smile. Whenever you see him, make sure to flash him a smile! While it might be hard if you're shy, you should find it gets easier very quickly. The reaction will almost certainly be positive.   If, for whatever reason, he doesn't smile back, don't worry about it! There could be a number of reasons he didn't reciprocate the gesture. You may have caught him off guard; it's also possible that he's simply shy. Interpreting his actions as a sign he's uninterested in you should only be a last resort.  It sounds simple, but you might be surprised how many people tend to overlook this easy, though crucial step. Once you're in his vicinity, there should be plenty of opportunities to say hello. Don't feel self-conscious in doing this; very seldom does anyone respond negatively to a simple act of attention and positive feeling.  There are a virtually infinite number of ways you can do this. Look to your surroundings and circumstances for something general to talk about. For example:   If you've got a class together: "Hey, would I be able to share notes with you? I want to see if I missed anything." If you're at a library/theatre: "Any books or movies you could recommend me?" If you're at a sport's game: "Hey! Which team are you part of/rooting for?" At a party: "Hey! How did you hear about this party?"  , A crucial, common mistake to make is to be too modest about your feelings.. If you don't show signs of attraction, he might not get the impression you are interested in him. Although you want to make sure not to get direct with it quite yet, there are plenty of things you can do to show interest. If you are relaxed enough, chances are you're exhibiting some of these traits already.   If you're a girl: Twirling your hair while talking to him. If you're a guy: Keeping a strong posture around her. Maintaining eye contact and smiling at him. Keeping your feet pointing in his direction. Making light bodily contact, like touching his arm or shoulder.  Soon enough, you'll need to get your relation at a more substantive point where you can move past icebreakers and learn about him in greater depth. While the traditional thing to do in the past was for one party to ask the other on a date, there are countless options for you to pursue in this respect:   Although it sounds impersonal, talking online is a great, non-committal way to get to know someone pretty effectively. Things some people might have trouble discussing in person are much more easily divulged online. If you go to school together, you might ask: "Want to eat lunch together sometime?" Again, this is a casual, easygoing way to get to know someone a lot better. While you may feel obliged to wait for your crush to ask you out on a date, hinging upon social norms is a waste of time. If you're confident enough in your feelings, asking him to go out with you some night is a great way to demonstrate your confidence and make progress with impressing your crush.  Although the media would suggest that guys will be interested if you play hard to get, this is commonly interpreted as being standoffish. The best way to impress a guy is to be nice to him. Treat him at first as you would a friend. While you're still becoming comfortable with him, there's no need to put added pressure on your interactions.   This step is no less important if you're a guy. The phrase "Nice guys finish last" is very misleading; girls are going to want to be around someone who makes them feel good about themselves! Giving your crush compliments, like "I love your hair!" or "How did you get such good fashion sense?", will go a long way towards making him feel great in your company. , Don't be afraid to ask questions, no matter how direct it might seem. There's a good chance he'll feel flattered by the interest you're investing in them. Asking questions is a great way to spark a wider range of conversations. They don't have to be anything super-important to start; you're mostly looking to become comfortable, and possibly springboard into deeper subjects. If you're looking for examples, here are a few to get you started:   "What's your family like? Any pets?" "What do you/would you like to do for a living?" If you attend the same school: "What are your favourite classes?" Make sure to do some of the talking as well! No doubt there are plenty of things he would love to know about you. This way, it will feel more like a conversation, and less like an interrogation!  , What are you interested in? Crochet knitting? Horror films? Avant-garde jazz fusion? Chances are, you already share some of your unique interests with your crush without knowing it. Finding out a bit more about what he likes can offer a perfect opportunity to bond.   Your circumstances of meeting can help inform your initial investigations into his interests. If you met at a rock concert, for example, there's a hefty probability you share musical interests. The same goes for an arts fair, a movie theatre, or a sports event. If you don't have any apparent interests in common, you can try opening yourself to things he's interested in. Ask him why he's into certain things, and see if you can see the appeal in it. If nothing else, the fact that you're making the initiative will demonstrate to him that you care.  While every strong romantic connection initially has a basis in friendship, at some point you should begin to emphasize that your feelings are more than that. You'll know you've spent enough time getting to know each other when this step feels more natural than contrived. Try saying things like:   "You know, I think you're actually pretty cute." "It's really attractive that you're so passionate about your interests." Or even a simple "I really enjoy spending time with you."  , Now that you've fostered a strong foundation for your interactions, don't be afraid to become increasingly forward with your attraction towards your crush.   Hugging, compliments and smiling are all valid forms of flirting. Use the 'push-pull' mechanic.Whether you're a guy or a girl, this simple trick might work to get your crush interested in you: give him a compliment and boost his ego. Upon doing that, back away and give him the cold shoulder. If done correctly, this will make him seek your approval and affection. Give it a try, and see how it goes. Don't feel too discouraged if he doesn't reciprocate these advances at first. It's quite possible he's been taken off guard by how upfront you are, and it may take him some time to adjust.  Let your crush know how you really feel about him. This is the moment of truth. However, after the time you two have spent getting to know one another and flirting, you might find this stage happens much more smoothly than you would have ever anticipated at the start. If the chemistry between you two is right, don't be surprised if your crush develops into a life-changing relationship!   The easiest way to go about this is to tell him directly. Don't mince words: "I have feelings for you," or "I like you in a way that's more than just friends." If you're feeling particularly bold, planting a kiss on his cheek can leave a big impression. If, for whatever reason, your crush rejects you, don't sweat it! There could be a million possible reasons why someone might not be interested in pursuing a relationship, and most of them have nothing to do with you. If things go sour for whatever reason, remember not to let it keep you from loving yourself and being open to whatever comes next in life.  

be confident.  dress to impress.there is no one way to dress well-- part of this step is being able to figure out what your style is.  try a new hairstyle.  confide in your friends.  seek out opportunities to be around him.  smile!,  introduce yourself by saying "hi".  break the ice with him.  make your attraction apparent to your crush.  set up an opportunity for deeper interaction.  be kind and friendly.  get to know your crush through inquisitive conversation.  find your common interests.  make your attraction more apparent.  win your crush over with flirting.  confess your feelings. 

 It most often happens when a guy tries to act up for a new girl he will look like a pretentious oaf. Being yourself is a much better method. Not only that, but the girls that do like you will be ones you will get on with a whole lot more, why? Because they share your real interests, not fake ones you made up to impress people. And besides, a lot of girls go for dorky guys, its very sweet.  Not only that being good at sports can impress a girl, but it also tones up your muscles, therefore improving your body appearance, and making you look more manly.  Everybody likes funny guys; a good sense of humor is very appreciated by most people. Even if you can't tell a joke to save your life, girls will appreciate you for trying.  This is perhaps the most difficult thing for guys to do; some would rather bite their tongue to avoid saying something related to their feelings, than to actually say it. A girl is very pleased to find out that guys do have feelings. Showing that you can be hurt, that you care, is not an act of weakness; on the contrary, it means that you had the strength to overcome your fear of vulnerability.   On the other hand, don't go about feeling sorry for yourself. Be a man when you need to; being afraid of everything and everyone won't get you too far. When you've got problems, face them and try to solve them, instead of denying their existence.  Everyone is equal, and this isn't the 50's. Chivalry is not the same as patronizing someone.  Show her you are capable of intelligent conversation. Burping contests and potty humor are fun, but consider your audience. Some girls feel that stuff is immature.  

be yourself.  be sporty.  be funny and make jokes.  show your sensitive side.  don't act superior to girls.  be mature. 

 Acting cold and distant may seem cool, but it's a turn-off to other people. If you don't act open and available enough, not even girls/guys that do like you will have the courage to talk to you.  The first step in getting a boyfriend/girlfriend is expressing interest in that person. Don't be afraid that you will be turned down; comfort yourself thinking that you've at least tried. In time, becoming better at flirting will improve your chances of getting someone to like you.  When you like somebody, hint it to them or tell them directly. The more love you give, the more you receive. Touch them softly, play with their hair- these are little gestures that express affection and make you feel closer to others. Help them out when they need help and be understanding when they talk about their problems. To sum it up, show them that you care about them.  Confidence is the key; it's what makes the difference between the "hot" and the "not". A person can seem absolutely awesome even when they're not like that in reality, due to their confidence. Confidence is the way to make people acknowledge what a wonderful person you are. If you don't see your own qualities, how would you expect others to see them? Find something that you like about yourself and point them out to boys/girls. Enhance your best features; not only in your look, but also in your personality.  It doesn't necessarily mean that you have to be popular in order to be liked by the opposite gender (although it would help), but having a bad reputation decreases your chances to get a significant other. If you have a reputation as promiscuous/a player, weirdo, nerd, gossiper, mean girl/guy etc., people would be less likely to talk to you because of the prejudices they have about you.  It often happens that the person you like doesn't make the first move; you have two options: either to wait until the other one initiates a flirt (which may never happen), or to do something yourself. This doesn't apply only to boys, although the tradition is that the boy should make the first move; but there's nothing wrong if a girl does, either. On the contrary, it's even recommended; the guy will admire your courage.  If you fixate on how scared you are, you'll psyche yourself out. Everything you do, do it with confidence. When talking to somebody you like, stay cool and try not to blush or act nervous. There's nothing to be afraid of; they're probably just as nervous as you are.  It's unfair, but the first impression you leave to someone will most likely persist in their memory for a long time and be the heaviest factor in influencing that person's opinion on you, even if it's a wrong impression.  This applies to girls and boys; not only girls are the ones who are supposed to look good for the opposite sex.   Having a high standard of personal hygiene is the very least you can do to improve your appearance. Don't smell; take showers and use deodorant and maybe fragrance, if you want to. Have nice, clean hair and clean teeth; make sure your mouth doesn't smell, either. Clean and cut your nails, don't let them grow too long- especially if you're a boy. Wear clean, ironed clothes.  Be well-dressed. The clothes must not necessarily be very expensive, but they always must be clean, fit for your size and appropriate for your body type. Very important: dress tastefully. Okay, maybe you're not an expert at choosing the right clothes for you and combining them, but at least ask for advice from somebody who is one. It's crucial not to look like your blind grandmother picks your clothes.  Smiling makes you look cuter, more charming and more lovable. A genuine smile can lighten up someone's day. It's the best way to express interest in somebody, in a way in which you have no chances of making a fool of yourself.  Being annoying may seem fun to you, but it's certainly not fun for those you annoy. A little teasing or playing every now and then is acceptable, even welcome in some cases, but being annoying on a regular basis is the perfect way to repel boys/girls.  Being mean with other people for no reason or treating them like dirt will make you hit the "Most Hated" list. Nobody likes unfriendly, obnoxious people.  Really, there will be many people who will like you for you, not just your looks. Plus, if you're being crushed on because you're on the football/cheerleading team, but no one knows your passion for singing/karate, what's the point?  

look approachable.  flirt.  express affection.  be confident.  have a good reputation.  make the first move.  don't get nervous!,  make a good first impression.  take care of your looks.  smile.  don't be annoying.  be friendly.  and, of course, be yourself. 

 If you are not about to ride, you may put the saddle on another surface of the same height. Face the saddle, with the stirrups hanging down.; , If the buckle isn't already in this position, grasp the part of the stirrup leather closest to the saddle. Pull downward until you hear the buckle click against the stirrup bar.   If your fingertips reach the buckle when your left arm is fully outstretched, the stirrup leather should be close to your ideal length. If not, use the buckle to lengthen or shorten the leather.  Place your right hand on the stirrup iron. Place your left hand on the buckle, reaching along the stirrup leather and under the saddle's "skirt."   Switch the "left" and "right" if you are left-handed.  Pull the stirrup toward your left arm until it touches against you. The exact position depends on what type of riding you'll be doing:   If you will be jumping, the stirrup should reach your left armpit. For dressage, the stirrup should touch your first ribs. For ordinary riding, the stirrup should be somewhere between these positions, or touch our left arm just in front of your armpit.  If the stirrup does not reach you or feels slacked when brought to this position, adjust the stirrup leather to a different hole. Repeat these steps until the stirrup is in the correct position.   Count the number of holes you moved, so you can do the same with the stirrup on the opposite side. (If the holes are numbered, just make a mental note of the number.)  , Move to the opposite side of the horse and adjust the stirrups using the same process. This ensures that your stirrups are roughly the same length before you mount.  Sit in the saddle with your legs hanging down comfortably, outside the stirrups. For ordinary riding, the bottom of the stirrup iron should hit the middle of your ankle bone.   Ride with slightly shorter stirrups when jumping, to help take your weight out of the saddle when in jumping position. Ride with slightly longer stirrups for schooling or dressage, in order to have closer lower leg contact with your horse.  If the iron is not in the correct place, lift the 'skirt' covering the buckle. Pull the stirrup leather up a few inches (several centimeters) through the stirrup bar. Buckle again into a higher or lower hole on the stirrup leather as needed, then pull the part of the leather closest to the saddle down again. You should hear the buckle click up against the stirrup bar.   Keep your feet out of the stirrup irons during this adjustment.  Make sure the leather lies smooth, not twisted, between your leg and the saddle flap. Turn your toes into the stirrup iron, then forward. (Alternatively, grasp the iron with your hand and turn it outwards, just enough to slip your foot in.) The bend of your knee should be comfortable against the knee roll. Your heels should naturally sink slightly below the level of your toes when the ball your foot is resting on the stirrup iron.   When rotating the stirrup by hand, move the left stirrup anticlockwise and the right stirrup clockwise.  If you're not sure, ask your horse to stand at a square halt on a flat surface, without resting a hind hoof. Ask someone to stand in front of your horse and check whether the stirrups look the same length or need further adjustment. It's important to have them as even as possible so that your position in the saddle is centered and your weight is evenly distributed. Uneven stirrups can cause the horse discomfort and muscle damage.  

put the saddle on the horse.  pull the buckle up against the stirrup bar.  take hold of the stirrup buckle and iron.  pull the stirrup to your left arm.  adjust the stirrup if necessary.  repeat for the other stirrup.  check the stirrup length after mounting.  adjust the stirrup leather if necessary.  put your feet in the stirrup irons.  check that your stirrups feel even on both sides. 

 Make sure you at least have some form of relationship, if it's friends to best friends. Friends is an excellent way to get to know someone without it being awkward.; , Bump them gently in the hall, maybe "accidentally" slide your hand over theirs, etc.  Even if they are corny, people like it when someone enjoys their jokes. However, be careful about laughing too much! It will make you appear false and it will get annoying. A small chuckle or giggle will do.  If they ever need help with homework, schoolwork, or other problems, offer to help. Don't just sit around. Helping someone out forms a mental bond that is often mistaken as love. This is obviously a bit manipulative for you to know this while the other person doesn't, but it does work very well. Still, if you'd prefer not using manipulation to meet your goals, you could always drop this fact with the "Hey, did you know..." method. Not only would it hint towards your interest in an innocent, non-creepy way, but it would also form an opinion of you as a knowledgeable person.  Ask them if they play any sports. If so, what sports? Do they have any hobbies? What music do they like?  , Ask them when and where their next game is. Try planning a group party, with some of your friends and some of their friends. Anything that will get you talking outside the school, go for it.  When you do this, wait a little bit before emailing or calling them. When you do call or email, make it quick and not too awkward.  Pay attention to what this person says. People love when someone listens.  If they get a haircut, say it's wonderful. If they got a new shirt, say it looks nice. Everyone loves compliments.  But don't overdo it. Don't dress in fancy clothing or play romantic music. For better results, ask if they want to stay for dinner.  Is that true? Tell me the truth, I won't be upset,". This is sometimes good, sometimes bad. , That way, it'll feel less awkward to you, and they'll know how you feel.  You'll find out more about them, and vice versa. 

talk with them.  touch them, but not in an inappropriate way.  laugh at almost all their jokes.  help them.  get involved.  start seeing them outside of school.  ask for their number or email address.  don't ever tune them out.  compliment them.  have them over to your house for a study date.  pull them aside and say "i heard a rumor spreading that you like me.  consider just passing a note to them saying that you like them.  ,  if you don't know them well and you are shy, have a friend tell them you like them.  hang around them, with your friends, or alone.  have a friend eavesdrop a bit on them when you leave the room, to see if the say anything about you when you're out of range.  

 To make you look attractive, try new clothes that make you look cute or adorable. Overall, wear clothes that make you feel pretty and comfortable. This helps more than you think. Wear bright cute clothes if your crush is athletic or something related to that, if your crush is goth, you probably should wear darker clothes.; , Find out what he likes; maybe you both are interested in the same things. However, don't join all the same activities as him. That would make a guy feel like you're stalking him.  How will he ever seem to be interested in you if he never sees you around? Strike up a conversation or invite him to join in an activity your participating in, or join the one he's doing.  Look decent and feel comfortable in what you wear. Don't change your style to catch his attention. If you try step one, and it just doesn't feel right, then don't do it. After all, if it is just a crush, then it doesn't really matter, because chances are, you will eventually find another one.  If someone asks how you feel about your crush say, "He/she's cool, I guess," not ,"OMG he/she's the hottest person around!"  , If you do, it's going to get around, and soon everyone will know. When everyone is pressuring your crush it will make him feel uncomfortable, and his answer will probably be no.  

try different clothes.  get to know your crush.  don't be afraid to approach your crush.  don't half dress or go all paris hilton.  don't make it obvious that you like your crush.  try not to tell anyone about your crush. 

 The first thing you've got to do is make yourself the kind of person that people notice and want to be around! This is the best way to get and keep your crush's attention. Get up off the couch and start doing things with your life! This will give you something to be proud about, something to talk about, and show others the full, complex person that you are. If he/she says that you're ugly, ask him/her the truth somewhere private.   You can volunteer, pick up a new hobby, join a club, get a job, or any number of other activities. Everyone loves it when one of their friends has the same interests as them. Just make sure to only join activities you want to join, and don't be forced to do something you don't want to.  No one wants to deal with someone who's always complaining or who constantly says bad things about other people. Instead of only seeing the bad things in life, bring out the good in everything and everyone around you. Find the positive spin or lessons to be learned from bad situations. Your crush will notice and feel much better about your positive personality.  No one wants to date someone who might say bad things about them or be mean to them. Show your crush  that's not you by being nice, not only to them but to everyone around you. Help people, always have a kind word for someone who needs one, compliment people, and find other ways to be nice too. If they look bad, or you don't like their shoes, Just tell them politely or just don't look at their clothes. For example, smile and be friendly! And just be yourself around them!  , Take care of your body. This shows that you care about and value yourself, showing others that you are worth caring about and valuing. Wear clean clothes with no holes or stains, wash your hair and body regularly, take good care of your skin and exercise as much as you can. Your crush won't want to be around you if you don't look or smell nice.  You want your crush to like you for who you are, so always be yourself. Don't change yourself or try to be someone you're not. People can usually tell and you'll only make yourself frustrated and sad. Don't let a crush change who you are! Do the things that you enjoy and if anyone doesn't like it, then they aren't worth your time.Who knows maybe he/she likes it when you act like yourself!  , Everyone likes someone who's confident. This is a very attractive quality for boys and girls! Of course, you don't have to actually be confident. Most people aren't, even if they seem like they are. Treat yourself well, don't constantly apologize to everyone, and get out there and do the things that make you you.  Some great clothes will certainly capture attention. Wear clothes that fit the current fashions but also are flattering to your coloring and the shape of your body. You don't have to break the bank, either. Try resale or thrift shops in trendy areas or nearby colleges or universities for stylish clothes on the cheap side.  Don't be clingy or desperate. This will make your crush think you have issues they really don't want to deal with. Instead, put on an air of cool. If they don't seem like they want to talk to you, go talk to someone else. Throw parties and don't invite them until the last minute. Show them that you have your own life and that your world doesn't revolve around cataloging every time they so much as sneeze.  You don't want to intimidate your crush. Maybe they already like you but they're worried you'll blow them off or bite their head off if they try to talk to you or ask you out! Be friendly, don't over-react to things, and definitely don't act like a jerk if someone else that you don't like asks you out on a date.  Let them see you talking to and hanging out with other members of the gender you prefer to date. They need to see that you have other options and that you know you have other options. This will make you more desirable.  Of course, the best way to get their attention is to talk to them! They might not even know you exist if you're too shy, so get out there and have a conversation with them. Ask them about what they're doing this weekend, or how their day went. Ask them about things you're doing in school or their opinion on the latest football match. Anything that gets the two of you talking is great.  No one is going to fall head over heels for someone they don't know and that they know doesn't know them! Get to know your crush, beyond the absolute basics (birthday, favorite color, etc) and learn what really makes them tick. Of course, the best way to do that is to communicate with them.; , Find things you have in common. This will give you something to talk about but it will also give you something to bond over. You'll be friends before you know it and a friendship is much easier to build on. You can compare interests, learn their interests just by paying attention, or you can explore the things they like. Who knows, maybe you'll find that you really like their taste!  , The qualities of a good friend are also the qualities of a good boyfriend or girlfriend, so start by being a good friend so that your crush can see what they have to look forward to. They say that the person you date should be your best friend, so it's probably a good idea to set the bar high, right?   You can be supportive when they're feeling down, help them whenever you can, be fun and help them relax, make them laugh (especially when they're having a bad day), and generally be a good friend.  There needs to be trust, in order for real romantic feelings to develop (and stick around). Never reveal a secret they tell you, don't generally go around telling people their business, and be someone that they can come to with their problems without having to worry about being laughed at or judged.  Give them the space to go out and do the things that they want to do. One fear that a lot of people have about dating is that the demand on their time and affection will mean that they won't be able to hang out with their friends or on their own as much, and that they won't get the time to do the things that they want to do. Give your crush some space and alone time and they'll see that you value their happiness above your own.  Well, they need to know that you like them, don't they? Flirt with them and show them that you are definitely interested. This will tell them that they can return your feelings without having to worry as much about rejection. But don't flirt too much. Maybe tell them to give them a reason to think about you, but not to early or they will just back away.  If things don't work out, don't get discouraged. This doesn't mean you can't be friends. Later on, that person may feel they, too, like you and finally hit things off. Now, if things are going downhill once your relationship starts, talk to your crush about it. If you think you need a break, tell them. If they find out that you are being a little shaky, but you aren't being honest about it, the relationship will come to a stop. Breakups are the worst, so don't let that happen to you!  

be noticeable.  be positive.  be nice.  be clean.  be yourself.  be confident.  wear nice clothes.  act like you don't care.  be easy-going and approachable.  let your crush see you with other guys/girls.  talk to him or her!,  get to know him or her more.  find common interests.  be a good friend.  create trust.  give him or her space.  flirt!,  afterwards. 

 It's the most simple reflex in the human body. When you take a deep breath, your body automatically relaxes. Being relaxed is a good way to show your crush that you're a calm and relaxed person. Everyone likes to hang around with someone who's cool as a cucumber. In through your nose, out through your mouth.; , Unless the occasion is somber, put a smile on your face, like you're enjoying what's going on around you and are engaged in the conversation. If you're alone, a content look will suffice. This also makes you look relaxed.  If your crush says something humorous, laugh. Don't laugh at every word that comes out of his/her mouth, just when he/she cracks a joke or double entendre.  This is a given. No one wants to be around someone who smells. Take a bath or shower everyday, and wear deodorant. If you're a girl, wearing a little makeup is good, but not a necessity.  "In order to have a friend, be a friend." This almost always is the case. You want to befriend your crush, but at the same time try to avoid "the friend-trap". This is where you get so close in a friendship, risking it for a relationship wouldn't be advisable. Be close and hang out, but not too often, unless you know he/she likes you too.  Not to your friends, not on your Facebook or Myspace. To the girl/guy you like. It may be awkward. But that's part of the magic!  

take a deep breath.  put a smile on your face.  laugh.  be hygienic.  be friendly and warm.  when you're ready.... let the secret out! 

 If the boy or girl you have a crush on hasn't noticed you, you might be tempted to just tell them how you feel. If your crush hasn't taken notice of you yet though, this can be creepy. It can also lead them to take you for granted.Don't stalk your crush. You will seem creepy! To get your crush to notice you, you'll definitely need to be around them sometimes. But, if it seems like you're following them all the time, this can also seem creepy. Make sure when you are around your crush, you are busy with something. You want to look like you have a life of your own, not like you're just hanging around waiting for attention.; , When your crush is around, try to behave like the life of the party. Laugh, talk to others, and be noisy (but not irritating). You want to look like a happy person with an active social life.   Be approachable when your crush is around. A lot of people get tense trying to look calm and cool around their crush. Instead of looking calm, they end up looking closed-off. Try to avoid this and look like you're friendly and open to talking.  Look for an opportunity to show off something you're good at in front of crush. Do you play an instrument well? Look for an opportunity to show off your talent when your crush is around! Are you good at baseball? If you notice your crush is around, ask your friends to play catch.   It's good to look successful, but you don't want to look full of your self. You definitely don't want to look mean. So, show off what you're good at without putting other people down.  Sneak some peeks at your crush, but don't stare. You want to let your crush see you've noticed them, but don't just keep gazing at them to get their attention.   You want to just glance at your crush, every once in a while, for less than a second.  When you know your crush will be around, try to look your best. Wear nice clothes, and keep your hair and nails neat and clean.   You want to smell nice, too. Keep your body clean. You might want to wear a little perfume or cologne so you have a distinctive smell. Don't overdo it though. Scientific studies show subtle smells are more attractive. In fact, many people find too much perfume very unpleasant.  Once you've caught your crush's eye, say hello. Introduce yourself and find something to talk about. 

don't come on too strong but try to get his or her attention.  be outgoing.  show off.  use your eyes.  look (and smell) your best.  start a conversation. 

 Find out what your crush likes to do. Ask them some question about their favorite activities. Find out what kinds of music, books, or movies your crush enjoys. This can be great material for a conversation. Everyone likes talking about their own interests.   If you know any of your crush's friends, you can also ask them some questions about your crush's interests. Sometimes, having the news that you are asking questions about your crush get back to them can have an added bonus. It can signal that you like them without coming out and saying it., Hopefully, you and your crush like some of the same things. Once you've found out what he or she likes, this should give you some ideas about things to talk about when you are together. It can also give you some ideas for things you might be able to do together.   Don't pretend to like things you don't like to impress your crush. This isn't being true to yourself. Also, your crush will find out eventually that you don't actually like or know much about it. This can be embarrassing. For example, if you and your crush have the same favorite band, that can be great material for a conversation.But, if you hate a band and your crush asks you about them, just politely say that you don't like them much. Then bring up something you do like. That way, you don't seem negative, but you aren't pretending to be someone you aren't.  Once you've had a chance to chat with your crush a little, look for some opportunities to spend time together.   Use your common interests as a way to do this. If you like to draw and your crush is in the art club, you can join too. If you both like baseball, see if your crush wants to go to a game. At first, its probably a good idea to try to spend time with your crush in a situation where other people are around. But once you've had a chance to get to know each other, try asking your crush to do something where it will just be the two of you., Most people enjoy being around people who are positive. So, when you're spending time with your crush, try to be positive and happy. After all, hopefully being around this person makes you feel good.   Don't put yourself down. Nobody likes a bragger, but at the same time, you shouldn't belittle yourself. If you want your crush to like you, you should show that you like yourself. If your crush gives you a compliment, say "thanks!" Don't complain too much. Everyone has a hard day now and then and needs to blow off a little steam. Mainly though, try to keep your conversations with your crush lighthearted and fun.  

learn about your crush.  find a common interest.  spend time together.  be positive. 

 Once you start spending time with your crush, you can start sending signals that you like him. This is another place you can let your eyes do the talking.   At this point, you should start making eye contact with your crush for a couple of seconds, gazing, and then looking away. See if they do it back. Don't keep eye contact for too long. It can be creepy.  After you make eye contact with your crush, smile to yourself. Don't make it a giant grin; you don't want to seem too excited. But, a little smile let's your crush know you're happy they're paying attention to you.  However you decide to flirt with your crush, it's important to be yourself. Don't pretend to be someone else to please your crush. They'll never truly like you if they don't know the real you.   Also, don't try too hard on the flirting. Don't over think it. Giving your crush tons of compliments, laughing at every joke he or she makes, or constantly trying to bat your eyelashes or strike handsome poses will not seem genuine. No matter how stressful this is, try to to just be calm and be your real self.  After you've gotten to know your crush, if he or she seems to react well to your flirting, try touching him or her in playful way. For example:   When your crush makes a joke, laugh, and lightly touch his or her arm or hand. Another thing is to lightly punch him on the arm. If you are walking past your crush in a hallway or somewhere like that, try lightly brushing your shoulder against theirs. Make it look accidental. Lightly wiggle your fingers on your crush's hand or arm. Stand close to your crush. But, don't make him or her feel uncomfortable. If they move away, respect their space. Hold your crush's hand to lead him or her to places. When you're next to your crush, rub your fingers on his or her wrist to tickle it. Give your crush a hug when saying hello or goodbye. If you think your crush is starting to like you back, kiss their cheek to see their reaction. However, if your crush hasn't shown signs of interest in you, do not try this. If they have shown signs of interest, take the risk and try it when you two are alone.  

make eye contact.  smile.  be yourself.  make contact. 

 You have a crush, which is normal and healthy, and you’ve decided you want to hide your feelings for now. Understandable! To hide your feelings, you need to stay calm around your crush. To beat your anxiety, you first need to accept that being around them might make you nervous.Being nervous is a completely normal emotional reaction. Don’t fight or ignore the feeling.You don’t need to feel angry at yourself or embarrassed about your nervousness. Accepting it can help you control it.; , Being around your crush can be really nerve-wracking. You might find yourself breathing very fast or holding your breath when they’re around. This is a normal reaction, but it can make you feel even more anxious. Keeping your breath slow and regular is an easy way to calm yourself down.   Try a simple deep breathing exercise. Inhale while counting to five, then exhale while counting to five.Breathe in slowly through your nose, letting your stomach expand. Then breathe out through your mouth while you contract your stomach muscles., Maybe you’re shy or just not ready yet. Maybe your crush already has a significant other. Whatever that reason is, don’t allow it to affect you negatively. Instead of worrying about things you can’t control, focus on things that make you happy.Whenever your crush enters your thoughts, try humming your favorite song or thinking back on a happy memory. Call a friend or watch a funny video. It doesn’t matter what you choose to focus on, as long as it brings you joy. Some examples are your pet, the scent of a flower, the memory of your last birthday party, and other happy memories.  For instance, you might think, “He’s much more popular than me. He would never like me back.” Try to immediately counter this with something positive. You could think, “But I’m popular, too. I have lots of friends and other people have had crushes on me.”   Maybe you’re having thoughts like, “I can’t believe I have a crush on my best friend’s boyfriend. They’re going to figure it out and I’ll lose both of them.” Change that to, “Okay, so I think he’s cute. Big deal! I’m not the first girl in the world to have this feeling. Crushes are normal and this will pass.” Maybe you’re surprised by who you have a crush on. Maybe you thought you liked guys, but now you have a crush on a girl, or vice versa. This is not a bad thing! You have no reason to feel shame or think about yourself negatively.  

accept your feelings.  breathe.  focus on the positive.if you’re hiding your feelings from your crush, you have a reason for doing so.  avoid negative self-talk.when you have a negative thought, try to immediately replace it with a positive one. 

 The eyes can communicate a lot of things without you having to say a word. Sometimes that’s good a thing! If you want to hide your feelings from a crush, however, eye contact probably isn’t going to help. Try to avoid excessive eye contact with that person, since it might give your feelings away.   You don’t have to avert your eyes from someone’s gaze all of the time. Doing that may end up communicating something negative, like you’re embarrassed or not confident in yourself. Excessive eye contact is what you want to avoid. For instance, if you catch yourself staring, focus on something else.  If you find yourself spending too much time scrolling through your crush’s online profiles, consider unfollowing them Twitter, Instagram, and Tumblr – at least temporarily. Use Facebook’s privacy settings to block their updates from showing up in your feed. Otherwise, you may end up “liking” too many of their posts and pictures, or leaving comments that will make your feelings for them obvious.   Doing this will also help you stop obsessing over your crush and prevent you from seeing things you don’t want to see, like pictures of your crush with their significant other., You probably know exactly where your crush tends to hang out. Always being around at those places might make your feelings very obvious to your crush. Whenever possible, limit how much time you spend in those places. You may want to avoid them entirely, at least until the crush passes.   You shouldn’t feel like a place is off-limits to you forever because of crush, but if you truly want to hide your feelings from them, avoid their favorite hang-outs for a while.  You might find yourself inventing reasons for the two of you to touch. Don’t worry, this is a normal thing to do! However, touch is a very communicative thing. Unnecessary physical contact might make your feelings for your crush very obvious. Try to give them plenty of personal space.   If you are always standing a little too close to them, your crush will start to pick up on that. They might even get uncomfortable. Putting physical space between the two of you will help you keep your feelings private.  

avoid too much eye contact.  unfollow their social media accounts.  limit your interactions.  avoid unnecessary physical contact.it can be tempting to “accidentally” brush up against your crush. 

 Whenever you have to talk to your crush, keep your voice controlled and your tone normal. Being nervous causes a lot of people to speed up their speech, so focus on talking slowly and evenly. Keep your voice light and speak to them directly.   If you need to, practice speaking calmly before you have to be around your crush. Work on a calm tone of voice.  Being anxious when you're talking to someone can sometimes make you feel like your mind has gone blank. Awkward silence might set in, which will definitely make your crush wonder what's going on. When you know you'll have to talk to your crush, prepare a few topics ahead of time. Have a few questions ready to ask your crush as well in case the conversation gets stalled.   You could talk about things like shared classes, a new movie, music, extracurricular activities, or an upcoming school event. Prepare questions like, "So have you started your paper for history class yet?" and "Did you write down the homework from 3rd period?"  , Smiling is an easy way to make you appear calmer and more confident to other people. If your crush is a friend that you have to be around fairly often, strive to act as normal as possible when you're together. Stick to your usual topics of conversation and your typical activities.   Try to avoid nervous twitching and fiddling with things unnecessarily. Stand up straight and keep your body language positive.  

speak in a calm voice.  have a few topics in mind to talk about.  smile and act natural. 

 If your crush is around and you start feeling overwhelmed, force yourself to pay attention to something else. Get out your class notes and study for an upcoming exam. Read a book. Talk to a friend. If you’re in class, focus on your teacher’s lecture. If you’re not in class, call/text a friend or play a game.   Even if you end up staring blankly at a page and not reading a word, it will still help you keep your feelings private and under control.  If you find another outlet for your emotions, it can help you cope with them better. Lots of people find that journaling helps them sort out their feelings.   You could also try a creative activity, like painting or writing a song.Physical activities can also help you deal with emotions. Go for a run or try a new sport.  Trying something new will help you focus on something else. Try to immerse yourself in things that will get you out of the house and around other people.   When you find yourself thinking about your crush, actively engage your mind with something else.  

distract yourself.  find a different way to express your emotions.repressing feelings for a crush can be really hard.  try a new hobby.when you’re busy learning something new and interesting, your crush might not seem like such a big deal anymore. 

   If they are not single, and are currently in a relationship, it's almost always not the best idea to pursue this person, unless you are certain they are unhappy in their relationship. Otherwise, it's best to just either move on, or wait it out until they split up.; , If you have spoken before, move on to the next step.   It's important that the person you are crushing on is introduced to you, before you start to get any idea of a romantic connection.    A strong relationship has to be built on a foundation of trust, knowledge and affection you have built for them over the time you have got to know them. Far too many teenagers nowadays jump into relationships that last a week because they barely know their boyfriend/girlfriend. If you want this to work, it's worth spending a little bit of time getting to know this person.    When you are around this person, give them all of your attention, don't text but say you are listening, don't file your nails but say you find them interesting, it will send mixed messages and any romantic relationship may not be possible if they think you aren't interested in what they have to say.    Say hi in the corridors, smile at them from across the classroom, make them feel like you think they are important. Everyone likes to feel like someone wants to communicate with them.    When you are engaging in conversation, lean in, and touch their arm. Just that little signal may leave them wondering what you feel. Another important thing is when you are talking to them, and the conversation is just getting good, it may be a good time to stop talking. Many people make a habit of continuing talking to someone until the conversation gets boring. Wouldn't you rather the last thing your crush remembers of your talk is something fun and cool, instead of an awkward silence? Leave him/her wanting more.    It's always good to get to know your crushes friends, guys/girls find it a huge relief when their crush gets along with their friends. Don't make too good friends though, you don't want your crush to think you like his/her friends, he/she will totally go off of you.    If you know he loves something, read up on it or surf the internet to get a better knowledge of it, then bring it up in conversation, people love when others make an effort for them.    This is the biggest turn on there is. Everyone likes to be around someone who is natural and down to earth. Nobody likes a fake, uptight person.  

first find out if the person you like is single or not.  if they have never spoken to you before, it's best to introduce yourself first!,  get to know the person just a little better before you get too worked up about them - you never know, you might dislike them once you know them better!,  show an interest in this person.  talk to him/her regularly.  flirt with them but leave a sense of mystery!,  get to know his friends - (but not too well!),  make an effort to talk about things he likes, and loves.  lastly, be yourself! 

 Smile often, especially if you have a bright smile or you've been told you have a great smile. When your crush says something funny, laugh, of course. Just don't make it forced. Introducing humor of your owninto a conversation is a great way to keep it positive and memorable, and helps keep those smiles flowing naturally.; , Before you even speak to your crush, you can give off positive vibes by having good posture. Also remember to maintain eye contact during the conversation, stay relaxed, and use hand gestures confidently.  If you're too quiet, your crush might not have a reason to be attracted to you or worse, might not even notice you. This can be difficult if you are an introvert, or if you are naturally a shy person. With that, keep in mind that overcoming shyness doesn’t necessarily mean talking a lot. It means speaking well and thoughtfully, and initiating conversation. It’s more about how you speak than how much you speak. There are a variety of good topics and ways to engage your crush in conversation.   Find topics to agree on or laugh about. This is a good principle of conversing with anyone: find at least one area of common ground or interest in your conversation. You might even try not to end a conversation until you’ve found at least one source of agreement. Stay current. Mention recent movies, books, TV shows, articles, or other entertainment topics she might be familiar with. The more mainstream, the more likely she is to know your reference. This is particularly helpful when you have a lull in conversation. Stay positive. Think of things that pretty much everyone likes: hobbies, pets, vacations, weekends, dessert, etc. Not every one of these topics will apply, but one or two probably will, and the more general you are, the more likely you are to hit on commonality. Then take the conversation more specific from there. Avoid negative or sensitive topics. Save your discussions of politics, religion, class, or race for another time. Obviously, you don’t want to mention a topic that could lead to disagreement or even an argument. So, it’s wise to avoid these subjects. If one comes up and you can see it heading in a bad direction, try diverting the topic with a laugh and something disarming like, “Yikes. I usually steer clear of that subject at a party. That was a close one.”  , Of course, before you land your crush you need to get to know her, and striking up a genuine friendship is an excellent way. A friendship will give you insight into her interests, making it easier to find and share common interests and activities. Friendships also build trust,which is helpful when you get to the point of asking your crush out on a date. After all, no one wants to date someone she’s suspicious or distrustful of.   Consider becoming Facebook friends if your crush is digitally inclined, and occasionally liking a post or two. This keeps you on their radar, and it gives you a glimpse into your crush’s interests as well. Don’t ditch your current friends.You don’t want to be too socially available or not available enough. That means you still want to maintain your current friendships as they’ve always been. Maintaining friendships will keep you grounded regardless of what ultimately happens with your crush. On the flipside, you don’t want to overdo it by being too socially aggressive with your crush. Avoid stalking your crush on social media or obsessing over him/her. Think of the association with your crush as an early-stage friendship.  One of the best ways to show interest is to ask specific questions about herself. You could ask about where she’s from, family, work, hobbies, travels, or favorite things to do. Keep questions specific and lively, but not too personal or private.  At some point, you’re going to have to begin casual flirting. If your crush does it first, great! Reciprocate. If not, you’ll have to initiate. Physically, a light arm or shoulder touch during conversation often works. Verbally, you can take your compliments up a level. For example, instead of saying she “looks good,” say she’s “beautiful.” And remember to smile and stay confident.  Focus on yourself and your own success.Scoring a big win at work or joining a gym or sports team can give you the sort of confidence boost that crushes find very attractive. They’ll be able to sense the success, but you can also talk about it. Light bragging is okay, as long as it doesn’t sound arrogant, self-possessed, or obnoxious.  Landing love won’t happen overnight. It’s a process that includes baby steps and small victories along the way: returned smiles, returned texts, great conversations, and more. The flipside of this is you don’t want to rush.You could turn your love interest off by moving too fast, or give her the wrong impression about your intentions. So be patient, and try to have fun with it.  Remember the basics: hair, clothes, hygiene, and makeup, if you like. Wear deodorant and light cologne or perfume. You don’t want to overdo it or look like you’re trying too hard, but you do want to look attractive. So, clean up well, find something nice to wear, and play to your strengths—be they hair, eyes, height, etc.  Remember, this is what you’ve been building toward: a date with your crush. Stay calm and make the date casual. Chances are, if you’ve struck up a friendship—or even just a good conversation or two—you’ll have some idea already of what she likes to do and hence, what might be a good first date.   Ask directly and specifically. You could say, “Want to grab a drink one night after work?” or “Free to do coffee one day next week? I can do Tuesday or Thursday.” Once she says yes, agree on a time and remember to get her phone number or email address, if you don’t have it already, in case anything comes up the day of the date. You can offer yours as well.  Texting is a safe way of following up. If you’ve already had a phone call, then call and speak, instead, or leave a voicemail. You’ll usually want to follow up the next day, but you could follow up the same day with something along the lines of, “Did you make it home OK?” or “I had a fun time tonight. Talk again soon. Goodnight!”  , By repeating the previous two steps, dating and following up on dates, you begin to establish a relationship. This is what getting your crush is all about. Ask if she prefers texting or calling, and if she’s open to calling, call. It’s a sign of a closer relationship. In the early days of a relationship, try to remain on her radar by speaking about every other day and moving toward daily. In person, your goal should be to do something together about once per week.  Having a sit-down or a big official talk about relationship status, or Facebook relationship status, is scary and can backfire. Worry about relationship status details if and when they come up. Instead, remind your crush of your interest as if you’re an official couple. “I had a great time” or “You’re so much fun to hang out with” are meaningful statements that show interest, not obsession.    Give compliments. Be real, and make your compliments about the things that you genuinely like about the person. Also, since we are talking about a crush, the compliments can be suggestively romantic but not overtly romantic or sexual. For example, you might not want to compliment their physical characteristics directly, but you could say something like, “You look great in that dress.” Contact your crush for no big reason. You might text or call for no reason other than just thinking about the other person. You can check in just to say hi, or to say that you saw something cool that reminded you of the other person. Keep it light and thoughtful, and your crush is prone to be flattered.  Give thoughtful gifts. Everyone loves gifts. Just beware of coming on too strong with a big expensive gift. Also beware of gifts that are too intimate or suggestive. Instead, give thoughtful gifts based on her interests or your shared history. Examples could be flowers, a small work of art, or a favorite food your partner mentioned. You might also think of a gift based on interest areas, such as sports, cooking, gardening, books, films, or music.  

smile.  maintain good body language.  don't be shy.  befriend your crush.  ask your crush questions.  flirt.  impress.  stay patient.  look your finest.  ask out your crush.  follow up after the date.  continue to engage.  remind your crush of your interest. 

 Dressing nice with your hair styled is a great way to get noticed in a crowd. Looking your best also provides level of confidence that helps you get noticed. When you know you will see your crush, pick a special outfit and take the extra time to style your hair., The more often you are around someone, the more likely they are to like you. This is a psychological effect called the proximity effect. Find ways to frequently be in the same place as your crush:Casually show up to your crush’s workplace if it is somewhere the general public goes. Attend sporting events or club meetings that your crush is a part of. Hang out with mutual friends and attend social gatherings where you'll see the person you like.  Eye contact is a quick and easy way to flirt and communicate with your crush. Casually glance at your crush for a few seconds to pique the person's interest.When the person you like catches you glancing, lock eyes for a moment and then look away to smile to yourself. Wait a few minutes and then repeat the glances towards the person. If you notice your crush looking at you while you are looking away, turn and lock eyes for a few seconds and smile.  Find out what interests and hobbies the person you like is into. Make a point to start learning about or getting interested in a few of your crush’s favorite past times. Shared interests give you a common topic of conversation and the ability to bond over something.Ask for tips or advice on beginning a new hobby. Talk about current scores or events related to favorite teams.  Positive body language conveys a message of openness, friendliness, and approachability. Try these ways to show positive body language the next time you’re talking to your crush.Stand with your body at an angle rather than head on. Leave your arms down or with one hand on your hip. Avoid crossing your arms because it sends a message of being closed off. Use your hand to play with your hair or run your fingers through your hair. Touch your crush's arm or shoulder gently while you're talking. Brush up against the person you like and then lock eyes as you politely apologize.  Sometimes when people get nervous, they start talking faster. Fast talking can make others feel uneasy and get a negative vibe from you, so be sure to talk slowly and calmly.  Flirting is the universal sign that someone is attracted to you. Use different flirting techniques when you are around your crush to show you have an attraction and want to build some chemistry together.Compliment your crush when you're talking. Smile genuinely and laugh at the jokes your crush tells. Get the person to talk about life by asking questions, and then validate the person by saying things like “That’s awesome” and “Wow, that sounds hard, but I bet you’re great at it”. Talk about topics that are attractive or interesting to the person you like.  Show your crush that you care by buying a gift. Choose an inexpensive item like candy or an item that reminds you of a joke you share with your crush.  Take on extra responsibility to do things for your crush. Go out of your way to make life easier by offering to help with homework, work assignments, or things around the house.  Take your crush somewhere to show how much fun the two of you can have. Dinner, an active date, and a quiet wrap to the evening ensure that you’ll have a great date night.  

look your best.  be around your crush.  flirt with eye contact.  build common interests with your crush.  display positive body language when you’re around your crush.  slow down your speech when talking to your crush.  flirt with the person you like.  buy a gift.  offer to do things for the person you like.  ask for a date. 

 You already know their orientation doesn't match, but spend a few minutes to really think about what this means. No matter how much you may want to, don't push this information to the back of your mind. It hurts, but it's a pain you'll have to tackle no matter what.; , There are two possibilities here: the feelings will move on quicker, easier, and with less pain if you allow yourself to just be friends with them, or hanging out with them right now could just deepen the feelings. If hanging out with them only serves as a painful reminder that things can't work out between the two of you, then it's best to reduce that stress by taking a break.   If you're feeling brave, tell them about your crush, and explain that you need some time away to get over it. Otherwise, make gentle excuses: you're too busy, you have a huge project this month, you've been needed to help out at home more, et cetera. Affirm that you still like them and want to hang out once things cool down, so that they know it's not personal.  You may feel like your current crush is the be-all-end-all right now, but they aren't. There are thousands of people nearby who can like you back. It can be very difficult to find someone else who compares in your eyes, but it is a good thing to do, and a healthy possible part of moving on.   If you aren't straight, try looking for people of compatible orientations at pride events, LGBT+ clubs, dating websites, or gay bars (if you're of drinking age).  You have feelings for this person, and that's okay. Just put them into a different direction than romance.  If this person has qualities that you like in a friend, and you believe you can feel happy and comfortable around them, then the friendship is probably worth preserving. Otherwise, it's okay to let go of the relationship and move on.   If you have a huge crush on this person, hanging out with them but not dating them may feel like torture. Don't put yourself through agony just to keep clinging to an impossible relationship. You deserve better. Don't say "Let's be friends" if you aren't actually satisfied with being friends. Remember that you don't have to decide right away. During your time away, you can work through your feelings, and then figure it out.  Use this time to step back and re-evaluate ways you can improve your own life, instead of devoting all that mental capital to your crush. You'll find a few distracting tasks to take care of, and you'll be bettering your own situation at the same time.   Give yourself a mini-makeover (even if you're a guy!) Get organized. If it's been awhile since you've cleaned out your closet/car/garage/basement, get on it! Sorting through old junk can be a meditative process, and you'll probably feel relaxed and accomplished when you're done. Work out. Exercise clears the mind — when you're so focused on pushing your body, you can't afford to worry about much else besides breathing and moving.  Rejection is rough, and sometimes it's easy to forget that you aren't less of a person for it. Take care of your mental health so that you can feel good about yourself and move on.   Write two lists: one list of things you're grateful for, and one list of things you're good at (work, hobbies, social skills, etc.). Tape these lists to your wall where you can see them every day. Practice positive self-talk. It sounds silly, but it really works. Look at yourself in the mirror a few times a day, and say whatever it is that you need to hear. It might be "You'll find someone better" or "No one is worth all this moping" or even just "I am awesome." Repeat it until you believe it. Work on your hobbies and skills. Sing a song, build a birdhouse, beat the tenth level, draw a picture, or whatever you love. Then look at your work and recognize how cool it is. Volunteer. Clean up neighborhoods, teach underprivileged children, work at a soup kitchen, or help out online at websites like wikiHow. Doing good work will help you feel proud of yourself.  

acknowledge it.  consider taking some time away from them.  start looking around for new crushes.  try to just be friends.  if being just friends seems like it isn't working, or isn't something that could work, ask yourself if you want to be friends.  take care of yourself.  nurture your self-esteem. 

 If your crush doesn't know you exist, try introducing yourself. If you're in a class together, you can use that as an excuse to start talking to your crush.For instance, say you have history together. You could say, "Hi, I'm Janie. We're in history together. What did you think of that boring lesson Mrs. Johnson gave the other day?" or "Hi, I'm John. I sit across from you in math. I was wondering if I could borrow your notes for the last class."; , See if you can get the person to spend time with you. If you're able to hang out more, you may be able to make friends with the person.Start with hanging out at school first. Maybe you can eat lunch together or spend some time together in the library.  One way to get to know a person is to let them talk about themselves. Question them about their lives, such as asking them about their favorite color, their family, or their favorite books and movies.It's important to listen to the answers, too. That is, pay attention to what's being said. One way you can show you're listening is by making comments on what the person is saying or asking related questions., One way to build a friendship is to laugh and have fun together. Share a book of your favorite jokes with the person or giggle together over a silly picture. Having fun together can bring you closer., Lend the person your book when she asks. Bring an extra cookie to school for him when you make some for yourself. Offer to take down notes if she's going to be gone for the day. Little kindnesses like these go a long way towards building friendship., Compliments let the other person know that you've noticed his or her best qualities. Plus, a compliment will make the person feel good, and he or she will associate those good feelings with you.Don't just limit yourself to compliments about the person's appearance. For instance, maybe you've noticed how smart she is or that he's a sharp dresser. Just make sure your compliment is sincere and tailored to the person you're addressing. For instance, you could say, "You always seem to have the right answer in math class. You are so smart!"  , You can use an upcoming event as an excuse. Maybe someone's having a party or your school is throwing a big dance. Consider asking your crush if you can go together.You could say, "Hey, did you see that dance the school's having? It may be dumb, but I kind of want to go. Do you want to go with me?"  , If you're too embarrassed to ask the person outright, try implying that you want to hang out. For instance, you could say that you really want to go see a new movie, which kind of encourages the other person to say he or she would like to see it, too. Then you can suggest you see it together., Tell the person that you like him or her. While it can be difficult to do, it's the best way to gauge the person's feelings. In fact, it's the easiest way to move the relationship forward.For instance, you could say, "We've been hanging out for awhile, and I really enjoy being with you. I think I'm starting to like you as more than a friend. What are your thoughts on that?" Be ready for rejection. That is, your friend may say that she doesn't see you that way. She has a right to her feelings. Oftentimes, you can continue on with your friendship. Other times, it may become too awkward. Still, it's important to ask if you want the person to be your boyfriend or girlfriend., Everyone gets a little embarrassed when it comes to love and crushes. It's okay to feel a bit shy when you're asking someone to hang out with you or be your boyfriend or girlfriend., If you're already together as a couple, kissing may seem like the next natural step. However, everyone moves at different speeds. While you may be ready for it, your boyfriend or girlfriend may not be ready. Talk to him or her about how she feels about kissing.As an example, you could say, "I like it when we hold hands. How do you feel about kissing me?"  , Simply asking is the quickest way to move forward, plus it means you have consent. Consent is just a fancy way of saying the person gives you permission to kiss him or her. Basically, you're just asking the person if you can kiss him or her, or if you're trying to be kissed, you're giving the person permission to kiss you.For instance, you can say, "Can we kiss?" or "Would you like to kiss me?" You could also say, "I'd like for you to kiss me, if you'd like to." Consent is especially important as you start wanting to get closer to another person. Every person has a right to say what happens to his or her own body. In other words, if you just up and kiss someone, you haven't given him a chance to say how much he wants to kiss you, and that "yes" is essential. Maybe he isn't quite ready for kissing, so for now, he may say "no.", Once you both have agreed to kissing, have fun. Just be sure to talk again if you want to move on to something heavier. 

say hello.  try to hang out with the person.  get them talking about themselves.  make him or her laugh.  be nice to him or her.  offer the person a compliment.  ask if you can talk or hang out outside of school.  imply you'd like to hang out.  express your feelings.  know it's okay to be embarrassed.  talk about it with the person.  ask if you can start kissing.  kiss away. 

 Act the same way you do when your around your friends, don't act differently around them than the way you act around your crush. If you do, he or she will think you're being a fake.; , Realize that you cannot make a person like you. You can be persuasive and encourage a person by being charming, friendly and happy in their presence but you cannot force their interest to focus solely on you. As such, it's important to be realistic and accept that he or she may want to be "just friends" or won't even want that. However, that doesn't mean that you don't try. It means that you learn to read the signs and respect the decision they make, as hard as it may be if it doesn't go in your favor.  Dress nicely and neatly. Show your flair by wearing things that represent your style.   Stay comfortable. There is no point looking good if you're suffering. Jeans that are so skinny you can barely walk will elicit giggles in sports class, not awe-inspiring looks.  Do you both like the same things? Perhaps you play the same sport or do the same activity during lunch hour or after school? Make the most of things you both connect on.  Has your crush been having some troubles in a subject you're just ace at? Hop in and offer some advice, and some tutoring help. What a great way to get closer!  , Show him or her your generous side by offering things when in need, such as a forgotten pencil or lunch, or a listen to your newly downloaded hit song.  Talk about stuff that he or she wants to talk about. Talk about stuff that you would like to talk about. Ask your crush some fun questions, such as "when is your birthday?", "What is your favorite color?". Little by little you'll get to know her or him.  There is no need to be rude or to show bad manners.  Act the same but with a little bit of flirting and feeling this time. When he or she makes a joke, laugh genuinely. When you see her or him in the hallway, make eye contact and perhaps offer a wink. When you both are staring at each other, don't worry if either of you blushes a little––that just shows you that you're both attracted to each other.  Don't offer too many compliments, just enough to make it clear that you don't mind noticing the good things about her or him.  Whenever you are sitting by him or her, angle your toes where he or she is sitting, then bump against your crush gently. Gently brush away a hair from his or her shoulder or even face. Gently hold her or his arm briefly. Be a little touchy-feely without overdoing it.  Invite her or him to your house for a party or ask him or her to dance with you at a class party. Keep your friends around and your crush's friends around at first, to keep it light.  When you have the impression that he or she is interested in you, ask him or her for a date. That is, if he or she hasn't already asked you.  

be yourself.  be realistic.  look good.  spend some time around your crush.  help your crush.  loan things or share things with your crush.  make conversation.  be nice and be kind at all times.  flirt a little.  compliment your crush.  break the touch barrier.  invite your crush somewhere in a group.  work up the courage to ask your crush out. 

 Before you sit down to have a conversation with your friend about your relationship and where it’s going, understand the risks involved in asking to change your friendship into a romantic relationship. Your friend could feel the same, but they might not. You need to prepare for your friend not to feel the way you do.When assessing the risks you should also decide how you will react to your friend’s potential response. If they do not return your feelings, are you willing to stay friends? Would you rather end the friendship? Make sure you’re prepared for whatever reaction you get.; , Once you feel fully prepared for whatever response you might get, ask your friend if you can have a serious conversation.   You can say something like “I’d really like to talk to you about something important regarding our friendship. Is there a time and a day that’s good for you?” You can also give them a heads up on what's coming by saying something like "I'd like to discuss my feelings about you and our relationship. When would you be willing to have this conversation?"  , This is a sensitive conversation you’ll be having, so you’ll want to choose somewhere that you and your friend will have some privacy. If you are already friends, you might be comfortable having this conversation in one of your homes.   Don’t pick a romantic spot in the hopes that it will sway your friend’s response. If the conversation doesn’t go the way you want it to, being in a romantic restaurant can make things awkward. You could also choose a quiet corner of a coffee shop or a nice spot in a public park. Depending on how the conversation goes, it might be best to have this conversation somewhere that you can both easily leave.  When talking to your friend about your feelings, be honest and up front about how you feel and what you want for your relationship.   You can say something like “I know we’ve been friends for a long time, but I’ve been feeling like maybe there’s something more between us. I am starting to care about you as more than a friend and I was wondering if you’ve felt that way, too.” Emphasize that you don’t want to jeopardize your friendship but that your feelings are such that you felt the need to talk to them., When you’re admitting feelings to someone else – especially someone that you’ve only had a platonic relationship with – it’s easy to feel very vulnerable and as if you deserve a certain response. Keep in mind that your friend might not respond the way you want them to, and that you have to respect them enough to accept their response, whatever it is.   If their response is that they don't return your feelings you can say something like "I hear what you're saying and I respect your response. Let's talk about where we want our relationship to go from here." This way your friend knows that you're not going to continue to pursue them romantically but that you want to maintain your friendship. If your friend returns your feelings and is also willing to pursue a romantic relationship you can say something like "I'm really glad you feel the same! Where do we go from here?" This sets up an opportunity for you both to discuss how quickly - or slowly - you want to take your new relationship. If your friend asks for time to think about it, say something like "I understand that this is a lot to think about and I am totally willing to give you some space to consider everything." Then ask if you can make a plan to meet in a week (or longer, or shorter - you can read how your friend is feeling better than anyone) to discuss things again.  

understand the risks.  ask for a conversation.  pick a neutral location.  be honest.  accept their response. 

 If you have feelings for a friend, you can start changing the relationship by taking the lead in changing your behavior. So don’t just wait around, expecting them to make the first move. Initiate a conversation or ask your friend on a date. If you want to transform your friendship into something more, you’ll have to take the lead on changing that relationship., In a healthy friendship, people demonstrate that they care about one another in a lot of different ways, but if you’re trying to move past friendship, you’ll have to demonstrate the fact that you’re feeling new feelings.   You can demonstrate your feelings by writing a note or a card, or buying your friend an unexpected gift with a note that says “this reminded me of you.” You can also just ask your friend what you can do to make them feel loved or appreciated. This indicates that you’re looking for ways to take the relationship to the next level without having to have a direct conversation., One of the easiest ways to change your behavior and demonstrate to your friend that you’d like something more is to flirt. Compliment their clothes, or their hair, or the way they do something – sing, speak, play an instrument. Tell them they look handsome or pretty. They should get the message pretty quickly that you’re interested in being more than friends.You can say something like "I really love the way that shirt looks on you - it brings out the color of your beautiful eyes." You can also say something like "I could listen to you play guitar all day long. It melts my heart."  , If you want to change your behavior and change your relationship, you can’t rely on the same things you’ve always done together. Suggest a new restaurant – maybe something with candlelight! – or pick a new spot for drinks.You can invite them to drinks by saying "There's a new bar downtown - it seems like a sort of romantic place. I know it's not what we usually do, but I thought we could change things up a bit." You can also invite them to do something you don't normally do, like going for a walk, by saying "I was wondering you wanted to go for a walk with me. It'll give us a chance to just talk and be alone."  

take the lead.  demonstrate your feelings.  flirt.  do something new together. 

 Most friends touch in some way, but if you’re interested in more, you can start by slowly increasing – or changing – the type of physical contact you have. You’re probably the best judge of what type of contact your friend will be comfortable with, and you’ll also know what level of physical contact already exists between you.   Try placing your head on their shoulder while you sit next to them. If they don’t move away, or if they put an arm around you, this is probably a pretty good sign that they’re interested in more than friendship, too.If your friend tenses up or otherwise signals that they are not comfortable with increased contact, draw back immediately. Aside from possibly ruining your friendship, unwanted physical contact is inappropriate.  If things seem to be progressing well, there will probably come a point when you want to turn your friendship into a more physically intimate relationship. You should take transitioning from a friendship to a physically intimate relationship slowly.   Talk often about the level of intimacy you are both comfortable with and do so before you transition to a different level of intimacy. For example, you can say something like "I've been feeling like I'd like to kiss you - is that okay?" Respect their response. It's also perfectly acceptable for you to be the one to slow things down, even if you initiated the change in relationship.  You should demonstrate your feelings, but you also don’t want to smother your friend with your attempts to take your relationship to the next level. Strike a balance between being available and keeping your distance.Being available and willing to do anything and everything your friend asks might make your friend like you, but it won’t necessarily increase their desire for you. Surprising your friend occasionally with thoughtful gestures but also occasionally limiting the amount of time you spend with them sets up the perfect balance of satisfaction and tension. In other words, it’s okay to play a little hard to get., A healthy romantic relationship takes time to develop, even if it doesn’t start platonically. When you’re trying to turn friendship into romance, it can really take time for that transformation to be complete. Be patient. 

initiate physical contact cautiously.  take physical intimacy slow.  don’t overdo it.  be patient. 

 The next time the person your crush likes walks into the room, watch his eyes without being too obvious. Does he look at her like he’s in a trance, with his pupils getting big, like he’s getting excited for a big date? Does he look at her, look away, and try to slyly catch another glimpse of her again? If this is the case, then chances are that he may really like the other girl.   When you’re in a group setting, try to see how many times he looks at her compared to how many times he looks at other girls without staring at him too much. Watch his eyes when he’s talking to his potential crush. Does he stare into her eyes and look down and look back at her, or do his eyes keep darting around the room, like he’s looking for something better to do? If he’s giving her all of his focus, then it’s more likely he likes her.; , Think about it. If the person you think your crush may like is around, whether it’s at a party or at the mall, is he much more likely to hang out, too? Does he tend to stay in if the person you think he likes is busy or out of town? If so, then it may be because your crush only want to be around if the person he likes is there, too.   You can even test this out by asking your crush if he’s going to so-and-so’s party. If he seems hesitant but then you casually mention that his potential crush will be there and he lights up, then this may mean that he likes her.  If you’re in a group situation involving both your crush and the person he may like and they always just kind of end up next to each other, then your crush may really like that person. See if he sidles up to her, walks by her side, or just always finds a way to strategically make it over to where she is. If this is the case, then he’s probably gravitating toward her because he likes her.   Of course, don’t forget the possibility that these two may just be really good friends. To know the difference, look at their body language when they’re together. Do they seem excited and nervous and concerned about how they look? If so, then they may like each other. But if they’re totally relaxed and seem not too self-conscious, then they may just be friends. Make sure that it’s your crush seeking out the person you think he likes and not the other way around.  If your crush likes his potential crush, then you’ll see him trying to improve his appearance in her presence. He’ll be puffing up his chest, running his hands through his hair, adjusting his collar, smoothing out his shirts, and taking extra care with the way he looks. If he even looks in a mirror or a window to gauge his appearance before talking to his potential crush, then it’s likely that he likes her.   He may also try to straighten his coat or inspect his clothes for stains. All of this means that he’s a bit nervous and wants to make the best possible impression.  Watch your crush when he talks to his potential crush to see if he’s always looking for ways to get closer to her, whether it’s to take a step toward her, sit so close across from her that their knees are touching, or to pull a thread off of her shoulder. If he even gently shoves her or pushes her, then this may be his way of flirting because he really likes her.   Watch his body language. Does he turn his chest and shoulders in her direction, or away from her? If he turns his body toward her, then he may have a crush. See if he’s always trying to make physical contact, whether it’s to touch her earring or bracelet or to tap her shoulder.  If your crush really likes his potential crush, then he’ll be looking for opportunities to look good in front of her. If you find him trying to show off whenever she’s around, then this may mean that he really does have romantic feelings for her. This could mean telling loud, bombastic stories, pulling stunts like cannon-balling into a swimming pool, wearing his best clothes, or showing off his dance moves, juggling skills, ability to speak perfect French, or just going out of his way to stand out for her.   When his potential crush leaves, see if he takes his personality down a notch. If he suddenly tries less hard when she’s gone, it’s a sign that he really does like her. Pay attention to how much he cares for his appearance when she’s there and when she’s not. If it always looks like he put twice as much time into his hair when she comes around, then that’s telling you something.  If your crush mentions the person you think he might like about ten times in the course of a five-minute conversation, then it’s likely that he has a crush on her. If he keeps mentioning things she said, finding tenuous ways to connect her to almost every topic, or even keeps talking about a conversation he had with her, then yeah, there’s a good chance he’s crushing on her.   Think about it: you’re probably looking for every excuse to talk about your crush too, aren’t you? It’s likely he would do the same. See if he keeps mentioning what his potential crush thinks about certain topics. If he keeps saying, “Sarah thinks that…” or “Sarah says…” every other sentence, then he may value her opinion so much because he has a big crush on her.  Of course, it’s also possible that your crush won’t mention his potential crush or bring her up very much at all. He may be so smitten that he can barely bring himself to say her name. However, you should look at his face or see what he says if someone else does bring up his potential crush; if he starts stammering a lot, looks nervous, turns beet red, or avoids the topic, then he may have a crush on her too.   You can always test this out by mentioning his potential crush’s name in passing and seeing how he reacts. Just make sure you’re not being too obvious about it, though.  Observe your crush when his potential crush comes up. If he suddenly gets all flustered, starts tripping over his words, or even forgets what he was going to say as soon as his potential crush starts talking to him, then this may be a sign that he really likes her. See if he doesn’t sound like himself, tries extra hard to be impressive, or just generally seems overwhelmed by her presence; if he does, then this is a sign that he may in fact have a crush.   Of course, he may be able to talk to his crush without freaking out. But if he seems too cool or completely comfortable, then they may just be friends after all.  If your crush laughs at everything his potential crush says, even if it really isn’t all that funny, then this may be because he just likes her so much that he’s inclined to think everything she says is funny. Laughter is also a way to release some nervous energy, so if he’s always laughing in her presence, it may also be because he likes her so much that it makes him nervous.   Notice how much your crush laughs when he talks to other people. Unless his potential crush is truly hilarious, if you notice that he isn’t nearly as responsive with others, then it really may be because he has a crush.  Another thing you may find is that your potential crush is extra guarded around the person that he likes. He may seem more reserved, more quiet, or less likely to tell his usual corny jokes when he’s around the person he likes. This may be because he’s really concerned about making a great impression and that he’s less likely to fully be himself. If he seems to think before he speaks a bit more around his potential crush and to be more careful when he does talk, then this may be a sign that he really likes her.   He may even try to act more tough or more capable when he’s around her. While he may complain to you about his fight with his brother or his poor test grades, he may try to seem more perfect around the person he likes. Of course, if your crush really likes his potential crush and actually gets to know her pretty well, then he may even begin opening up to her even more than he would to anyone else. But when they first talk to each other, it’s more likely that he’ll be more guarded than he would be around people he doesn’t like romantically.  It can be hard to pinpoint exactly what “chemistry” means, but it basically means a palpable feeling of energy and sexual tension that’s in the air when your crush is talking to the other person he likes. If they seem nervous, excited, giggly, or just not quite themselves when they talk to each other, then you may be seeing some chemistry in action.   See if your crush stumbles, acts more silly, or just seems much more excited to talk to his potential crush than he is to talk to anyone else. Sometimes it can be hard to pick up on the fact that the “chemistry” you’re seeing is only coming from one side of the equation. Make sure that it’s not just the person your crush may potentially likes who is showing the signals.  Check out your crush’s Facebook page, Twitter account, or other social media sites to see how often he interacts with his potential crush. If you find that he’s commenting on or liking her pictures a lot, posting links on her wall to impress her, or interacting mostly with her while ignoring all of his other friends, then there’s a chance that he really does have a crush on her. Of course, he may be more subtle and may not interact with the girl he likes very much online, but you do have a chance of finding evidence that he likes his potential crush on social media.   See if he likes or comments on her photos right after she posts them. This can be a sign that he’s spending a lot of time on her profile.  Another way to find out whether your crush likes someone else is to ask his friends what they think. Though this can be pretty risky because it’s likely that your question will get right back to your crush, if you really want to know but don’t want to ask him, then this can be one approach to take. His friends may know the truth and there’s a small chance they can even tell you what’s really going on, so if you feel like you’re out of options, this can be something to try.   Just know that, as soon as you ask his friends who he likes, they’ll think that you have a crush on him—and they’d be right.  Your friends may see something that you don’t quite see because they have an outsider’s perspective on the situation. They may be able to tell you that it’s obvious that your crush does like the other girl, or they may tell you that it’s clear that those two are only friends and that you’re being paranoid. Tell your friends to be honest with you and make it clear that they won’t be hurting your feelings by revealing the truth.   If your friends don’t know that you like your crush, try to be casual about it when you ask them. Though chances are that they do know already—just make sure that they don’t spill the beans.  If you’re really feeling bold and even know or are friends with the person whom you think your crush likes, then you can consider asking her what the situation is. You can try to be sneaky about it or even be honest and ask her if there’s something going on between her and your crush; if there is, then you don’t want to interfere with it. She may tell you the truth, or she may say nothing’s going on when it is; try to read her expressions and body language to get the real picture.   If you don’t really know or trust this person, however, you may not want to ask her yourself. See if you can find someone who knows her better to do some digging for you.  If you really want to get some answers, then talk to your crush yourself. You don’t have to reveal that you like him and all you have to do is casually ask whether or not he has a crush on so and so. If he says no and sounds like he means it, then you can try to pursue him. If he says no but seems super defensive or weirded out, then there’s a chance he’s not telling the truth. If he reveals that he does have a crush on someone else, try not to look so upset and get ready to move on.   If you find out that your crush really does like someone else, don’t be so hard on yourself. It has nothing to do with you; people can’t help who they like. You’ll be able to find someone who appreciates how amazing you are before you know it.  

see where your crush’s eyes go when the person he may like walks into the room.  see if your crush is more likely to be somewhere if the other person is there.  see if your crush just naturally gravitates toward the person he may like.  see if your crush preens around the person he may like.  see if he tries to break the touch barrier with the person he may like.  see if your crush tries to impress the person he may like.  see if your crush talks about the person he may like—a lot.  see if your crush starts to blush or looks embarrassed when the other person comes up.  see if your crush gets nervous and starts stammering when the person he may like talks to him.  see if your crush laughs extra hard at everything the person he may like says.  see if your crush sounds more guarded around the person he may like.  see if you can spot the chemistry when your crush talks to the person he may like.  do some social media sleuthing.  ask his friends.  ask your friends.  ask the person you think your crush likes what’s going on.  ask your crush. 

 If you are already somewhat comfortable talking to your crush, it will be easiest just to ask them where they live. Keep it light, and ask them in a way that isn’t too obvious.Try framing the question around yourself. Say something like, “Oh, I live on First Street! What area of the city do you live in?” If you know they grew up in your city, you can ask, “What area of town did you grow up in?” Then follow up with, “Do you still live in the same place?” Fit it into conversation. Before you ask your crush where they live, start a fun conversation.Use it to flirt and ask them other questions, too, like what kind of food and music they like. This will make asking for where they live just another fun question. It might help to talk to your crush over online chat or through text message. If you do this, you’ll be less nervous about starting a conversation.Plus, if they tell you their address, you’ll have it in writing with no risk of forgetting.; , If any of your friends know your crush, first see if they know where your crush lives.   See if you know anyone that’s attended a birthday party at your crush’s house or studied with them. If none of your friends have been to your crush’s house, see if they have any friends that know your crush. If they do, they can ask their friends for you. That way, your crush won’t know that you’re trying to find out where they live.  If none of your friends really know your crush, you might consider asking some of your crush’s friends.   First, pick one of their friends who seems like a nice and trustworthy person. It helps if this is at least an acquaintance of yours. Don’t pick their best friend, as this person is most likely to tell your crush that you asked where they lived. Send them a quick text or message. Say something like, “Hey! I really like Jessica, but I’m too nervous to tell her yet. I was just wanted to ask you where they lived! Thanks!” If you can, include your reason for wanting to know. For example, “I’d really like to be able to mail her a card!” Ask the person not to tell your crush that you asked.  

ask them casually.  ask friends.  ask your crush’s friends. 

 It is one of the biggest mistakes you could make and there is nothing more sickening than to see a girl trying to act tough in front of a guy when they're failing dismally. Plus, most guys don't go for that; they usually get the wrong impression, because if they like you back and you play hard to get, they may think you don't like them.; , Start a conversation with a friend about something you know the crush is interested in (if they're around) and speak louder than normal if necessary (not too loud). If he/she joins in, that's great! Listen to what he/she says and keep talking normally. If he/she doesn't, casually turn around and ask him/her, "Hey, don't you like , too?"  , Treat him/her like a person, not just a crush. Treat him/her like one of your friends! If he/she needs a pen, offer to let him/her borrow one of yours. If he/she's looking tired or sick or sad, ask if he/she is okay or what's wrong. She'll/He'll appreciate your kindness.  Laugh if you hear something funny, but laugh like a normal person. If you hear something stupid, but sort of funny, smile, but sort of roll your eyes as if to say 'How stupid.' Don't act ditzy or as if you can't do anything. Be strong. Be smart. And never, ever act dumb.  Do you have a band you like a lot (make sure it's not a boy band!)? Then mention the name of the group around your crush, talking about a great song they have or something. If she/he looks interested, ask if she/he wants to borrow the CD. Things like that. Be sure to look out for things that he/she likes; you might have something you both love that you can talk about.  Don't go out of your way to look hot or sexy or stunningly beautiful just for him, but wear clothes that you like and that look good on you. Wash your hair. Take care of your skin. Exercise. Brush your teeth. Don't wear anything too revealing, as he might get the wrong idea. When you get a haircut, ask the hairdresser to recommend a style that she thinks will work well for you. He might notice and say so!  , Try as hard as you can to be yourself. Don't talk sweety-sweet or tough or anything. Don't talk too much; two sentences at a time unless you're telling a story or something that he looks very interested in hearing. Try to make him laugh, but don't go overboard with jokes. Let him talk. Listen to what he has to say and ask him about it later. Laugh at his jokes even if they're not funny if you do a bad fake laugh smile. Do not talk with your mouth full.  Then after he replies you can give your opinion and you could get into a good conversation. If you're afraid of talking to her/him just do it most likely he/she will like it, if he/she is in a conversation just join in.  If he makes a move that shows SOMETHING, he likes you.  Don't pretend he/she is an alien you can't talk to. They're a person just like everyone else. They will think you are friends and gradually like you more (If they don't already like you!)  

don't play hard to get!,  if you want to start a conversation with your crush, but you're scared of approaching him/her, you don't have to!,  be nice to your crush.  try to be a mature person.  if you don't have anything in common, find something!,  look nice.  conversation is incredibly important.  if you're in class talk to him about the lesson or something he would be interested in.  if he/she is interested in you, you might notice them looking at you a lot, or staring.  treat him/her like you would treat a friend. 

 This is perfect if you’re having a birthday soon. Throw a party, and tell everyone that you want their addresses so that you can send fun paper invitations with all the party details.   Send a group message to all your party invites asking for their addresses.It will take the pressure off of asking your crush specifically. Even if you don’t have your crush’s phone number, you can easily add them to a Facebook group message. Let everyone know they can send you their address in a personal message to keep it private. If your crush doesn’t give you their address, this could be a sign that they’re not interested. Get a friend to ask. If you’re really nervous about asking for addresses, have a friend handle your party invites for you as your present. That way, they can get your crush’s address, and it won’t be awkward for you.  If your crush doesn’t drive their own car, whether they take the city bus, a school bus, or a train home from school could tell you what area they live in.   Ask a friend if they’ve noticed how your crush leaves school. If you can, indirectly ask your crush how they get home. Say something like, “Oh, do you take the bus?” If they don’t, they’ll probably tell you how they do get home. Maybe follow up by asking how long it takes them to get home. If they take a city bus or train, you can look up the line to see what direction it goes.  If you’re both over 16, ask to see their driver’s license in a funny way. This works well if you’ve both just gotten your licenses.   First, show them how embarrassing you think your picture is and tell them the story of your driver’s test. Bonus, this gives them a chance to tell you how cute they think you are. Then, ask to see your crush’s license. As you tease them for their picture, take a glance at their address. Make a mental note to look it up later, or pretend you are texting and make a quick note in your phone.  If you both have mutual friends or participate in the same extracurricular activities, see if they want to ride with you to a practice or group hangout.   If they say yes, they’ll have to give you their address so that you’ll know where to pick them up. Take two friends. If you’re not comfortable asking your crush if they want to carpool alone with you, frame your invite like this: “Hey Jessica! My friends Steve, Ally, and I are carpooling to the event together tomorrow! We have one extra seat. Want to come with?” This works best with an event or practice that you already know your crush is planning to attend.  

use an invitation to get their address.  find out their mode of transportation.  sneak a peak at their driver’s license.  offer to pick them up. 

 Various social media applications allow you to tag your location, so there’s a chance your crush might have tagged their home.   Look at Instagram maps.Instagram allows you to tag your location, so go to their profile and check their maps for the places they’ve taken the most pictures. Start with the selfies, as these are likely to have been taken at their home. Check out their pictures. If you live in a smaller town, see if you notice any familiar landmarks. If your crush has a picture with their house in the background, look closely to see if you recognize it. See where they’ve checked in. Look at their Facebook to see if they use apps like Foursquare.This probably won’t lead you to their address. However, by seeing the places they frequent, you might get an idea of the area of your city that they live in.  School or church directories often list the contact information of their members. These may be digital or physical directories. Look for them by their last name.  This will make it easier to find out where your crush lives. Use online and physical phone books.If you don’t know the full names of your crush’s parents, look on Facebook. Chances are that you kind find them by looking for people with the same last name as your crush in their friends list.  

look at their locations.  check a directory.  look up your crush’s parents. 

 Most horse showing competitions forbid the use of certain bits. Even if you do not attend events, obeying one of these lists is not a bad idea. These bits are generally forbidden due to the pain they cause the horse.; , A simple snaffle bit is a mild, popular option, that only applies the amount of pressure you pull.Always begin with a snaffle, and try the stronger bits only if the horse is difficult to control.  You can purchase measuring tools for this purpose, or you can place a wooden dowel in his mouth where the bit should sit. Find a dowel that sticks out about half an inch (1.25 cm) on either side; this dowel is the appropriate width for your bit. For most horses, start with a 4–5 inch (10–13cm) bit and switch as necessary.   Usually, a smaller horse has a smaller mouth and will need a smaller bit, and the reverse for larger horses. Their are exceptions, however, as some breeds have unusually large or small heads. If you have access to a previous bit, allow it to hang straight and measure the mouthpiece. Do not include the rings in the measurement.  The outside of the snaffle consists of a ring on either side of the mouth. Common options include D-rings, O-rings, and loose rings which are free to rotate in place. The best way to choose these is to try out several, to feel the difference in control and see how your horse reacts. Make your decision based on your and your horse's personal preference.   If you can't try out the bit before buying, go with the popular D-ring. This tends to be less harsh than other bits.  Snaffle bits come with a variety of mouthpieces as well. A basic, jointed mouthpiece is a good option for most riders, but there are other options. Here are a few factors to keep in mind:   Rubber or plastic-coated mouthpieces are more mild than a bare metal bar. Twisted wire mouthpieces are the most severe, and should only be used by experienced trainers.Thinner mouthpieces are generally more likely to cut the horse's mouth or cause pain.  Confirm that the mouthpiece is comfortable with the following tests:   Make sure the rings or metal connections at the corners of the mouth do not pinch the horse's lip tissue. If you're not sure, put the side of your finger next to that ring/bar juncture. Spin the ring and see if it pinches your own finger (which is harder to pinch than soft tissue). The link in the middle of a "broken mouth snaffle" can pinch as well. If you have this type of bit, test this on the side of your finger as well. Check whether the center of the bit hits the rugae (ridges) of the horse's palate, or the roof of the mouth. This is often what's happening if the horse is restless or tosses its head a lot. In this case, switch to a French link mouthpiece, which lays flatter on the tongue and allows a larger range of motion. 

check the requirements for horse shows.  start with a snaffle.  measure the horse's mouth.  choose the ring shape.  choose a mouthpiece.  check the mouthpiece comfort. 

 If you are serious about wanting to get to know this person, social media can help you out a bit. It's okay to check them out online-- but choose one social media platform to reach out to them on. Add the person you like on Facebook or Snapchat or follow them on Instagram!  Once they have added you back or accepted your request, say hi! Commenting is important because they probably get friend or follow requests from many people, and you'll be able to distinguish yourself from them this way. Bring attention to yourself in a low-key way by commenting on a (recent) picture something like, "I like this" or "This looks cool!" A compliment is usually good, but don't think too hard. If it's Snap Chat, send them a picture & say "hi" or ask them what's up! People appreciate other people who are interested in their lives, so make sure you genuinely care about this person's life.       ; , If you see the person you like every day or at least once a week, try to nod at them in the hallways or say "Good morning" at work, or wherever you see them. Start with these and slowly motivate yourself to talk to them more and more.   For example, if you are in a certain class together, ask them what the homework is. If it's Monday, ask them how their weekend was. Make sure you say it loud enough for them to hear and start by saying their name. This person might not recognize your voice or might think you're talking to someone else, so say their name before you start your conversation. Start by asking one question, then try asking two next time, then three, etc. Let the conversation flow naturally, and if it stops, be the one to end it. You could say, "Okay, thanks! I'll see you around" or "It was nice talking to you" or whatever you see fit for your situation. If you're still really scared to talk to them at this point, don't freak out! Take your time and slowly, at your own pace, become more comfortable talking to them. Smiling helps, too.  If you talk to them often online and have the occasional real life chat, chances are you will get to know them a lot better. If they tell you the date of their birthday, send them a little happy birthday message or even tell them in real life! If there is a gift you want to give them but you're too shy to do it face to face, leave it on their desk or in their locker--or wherever else they'll find it--in a secret admirer way.   Also, if they have an interest, try to remember and show your support for it. For example, if they have a sport they like or a team they follow, check the team's game schedule and ask the person what they thought of their team's last game. Knowing that someone else pays attention to their likes and dislikes really strengthens the bond between people naturally. If there is an artist they like, you can ask them what their favorite songs are! This person will appreciate how much you care about them as a person.  The goal for this phase is to become more comfortable around this person you so greatly admire. Part of that requires you to stretch a bit and tell them a bit about yourself casually in conversation. You don't have to tell them your deepest, darkest secrets, but answer questions honestly. If they like a certain type of music that you aren't familiar with, be honest and let them know you haven't heard of that band or artist. If there is a movie you absolutely find hilarious, tell them! Little spontaneous conversations about likes and dislikes is a really good way to know this person better and let them know who you are! Yay, you're slowly becoming more comfortable with this person!  , As you become more comfortable with this person, your friends will want to know them, too! Introduce them or hang out with mutual friends. This doesn't necessarily mean your squads have to become a mass group of BFFs (or little group of BFFs), but at least get to know his or her friends as individuals. This doesn't mean that you will--or should--know every last person that has ever talked to your crush, rather find people they are friends with that you can also relate to (click to read this really cool article on how to Make Friends when You Are Not Social). If there isn't anyone they are friends with who you connect with, that is okay, too.   Avoid "using" people to talk to this person or only interact with people to impress the person you like! Remember, you are friends with the person you like on your own terms. Don't befriend their squad just so you can get to them, rather befriend them because you actually want to be friends with them. People are individuals and all deserve legitimate friends, remember. Cut out the middleman!   , If you want to watch a movie that you know the person you like wants to watch, feel free to grab a friend or two and invite them to do the same. The bigger the group the more comfortable you may be, but try to make it still intimate. Inviting mutual friends who might be interested in the group activity is also key. Look at you, hanging out with your crush!  , You now have several mutual friends and have hung out with the person of your interest more than twice outside a professional or school setting. Now you are less shy around them and can be yourself. Time to challenge yourself again: hang out one-on-one once in a while. Find some things that the two of you have in common and do those things together. Talk to them even when the group isn't together or even when their/your other friends aren't around. This will let them know subconsciously that you value them as an individual. This can also make them think, “Do I like them? Do they like me? Or do I just like hanging out with them?” Having some insider jokes is a definite plus. Don't worry, this will not make anything too obvious; this will just get you both thinking about each other separated from the group. Once you get a feeling of where they are at and if they like you back, then proceed to the third and last phase of this plan.   Be careful to avoid ditching your old friends or making the person you like ditch theirs. Let friends know ahead of time when you are busy and make sure you still spend time with your pals whenever you can. If they are romantically involved with someone else, don't hang out one-on-one at all outside a professional setting (i.e. work, school, etc.), especially if you are the one initiating it. This might come across very wrong and actually end up being detrimental to your friendship. Remember, if someone is in a relationship, respect that. As soon as they are back on the market, you have full dibs and can hang out together without causing any trouble.  How awesome is it that you're now friends with the person you used to look at from a distance? Now it's time to step out of your comfort zone one more time and tell him/her how you feel.   You don't have to do this face to face. Give them a secret admirer-styled letter with a hint at the end that will undoubtedly point to you. You could even be forward and sign it! If you're not going to do it face to face (or during Skype, Face Time, or any other video chat), don't text them your confession or tell them via social media. This may come across either as a joke to them or make you seem impersonal. It doesn't have to be a long, eloquent letter, either. Use your own words and say what you think they should know! If you choose to tell them in real life, keep it casual! You don't need to disclose your late night internet stalking or how you think of them every night before you sleep so you can dream about them. You should, however, tell them that you think they're cool and ask if they would want to try a romantic relationship. Use your own words, of course, so that they know you're being genuine. Each friendship/relationship is different and there is no one way to tell someone you like them, but if you want to stay friends, either way, casual is the way to go. Although, if you are the type of person who is extravagant or know that this person will appreciate a big and obvious gesture, feel free not to be casual at all! Get creative and do you. No matter if you're simple or elaborate in your confession, be true to who you are and be creative! If this person is a good person, they will appreciate the time and effort you put into letting them know, whether they feel the same way or not.  If you are serious about wanting this person to like you back or at least think of you romantically, sooner or later you will need to let them know. Of course, make sure you feel ready and are at a place where you can speak comfortably with this person. Just let your potential future bae know you are interested in getting to know them romantically. This confession can be as simple or elaborate as you feel. Don't over-think this or be afraid; you did not come this far to give up now! Be honest but don't feel as if you have to spill it all. Remember that they are your friend and let some of that stress roll off your back.  Don't put any pressure on them for an immediate response. Leave it somewhat open-ended so that they also have time to get themselves together. Your friend will be glad you didn't ambush them or make them feel like they had to say yes or no.  If they say:    Yes, the feelings are mutual. You overcame your shyness and told the object of your desire how you felt. You should be proud of you for getting through that! Now is your chance to prove to them that you are the perfect boy/girlfriend for them, which will be easy since you were friends first.  No, they would rather stay friends or don't feel the same way, have no fear. You can try again later or simply move on. Someone else will come along, believe it or not, and you will find love again! Hey, at least you can cross that off your bucket list. You should still be very proud of yourself for breaking out of your shell. Make sure you don't let this stop you from trying again. If they ask you out before you do or tell you they like you first, don't hold back! Let them know that you have liked them for a while, too! This doesn't mean everything will be perfect and easy from now on, but the hardest part is over. Enjoy your relationship and remember to stay friends with them even in your newfound love.  

start on the internet.  move it to real life.  get to know them better and remember things about them.  open up a bit at a time to this person.  integrate your friend groups and get to know his or her friends.  hang out in group settings at first.  don't get lost in the group; hang out one-on-one occasionally.  keep it simple.  don't back down!,  allow them to think about it.  prepare yourself for either response. 

 Always train the horse with a mild snaffle bit before moving on to a more severe option. Stronger bits can provide more control, which may be useful for horse shows. Some excitable horses will resist stopping with a mild bit, but focus on ground work training first. Some spirited or sensitive horses will object to a harsh bit, and continue misbehaving.   Think about your typical riding activities. You'll typically want a mild bit for riding in the school, and perhaps a stronger bit for more strenuous activity. Check the bit regulations of any horse competitions you plan to enter.  Beginning riders are more likely to harm the horse with a strong bit. You should have a fair amount of riding experience before you try to use one. Even then, ask your trainer for advice on choosing a bit, and on adjusting your rein use to adapt to a new bit.  There are many variations of bits, and you may need to try several before you find one that works. Most English riders just move to a snaffle with a harsher mouthpiece or ring. Western riders may try a different style of bit altogether, such as the curb bit. These use leverage to increase the amount of pressure from your pull. The Pelham and the Slotted Kimberwick are two common options which use a curb chain to provide more control over the head.  Bitless riding is becoming more popular, although it is not yet legal in most competitions. Even if you use a harsh bit some of the time, consider training without a bit occasionally. This will improve your own balance and strength, and teach you to direct the horse with cues from the "seat." This may even solve some behavioral issues, as many horses calm down when the mouth is no longer agitated.   Bitless riding is allowed in most jumpers, polo, and endurance competitions. For other disciplines, you will need to compete with a bit — but you may still benefit from the training.  

decide whether a stronger bit is appropriate.  consider your own riding ability.  choose the bit.  train the horse without a bit. 

 Take good care of your body. This not only makes you more attractive, but helps your crush see that you think you're worth caring about. Shower, keep your hair tidy, and exercise (for good health, not weight loss).; , A great smell is really attractive. You don't need a lot of perfume or cologne, either. Just shower regularly and use deodorant. A little body spray can come in handy if you really want to smell amazing.  Stop wearing clothes that are torn, stained, out-of-date or don't fit your body or body shape. This makes people think you lack self-worth, since it shows you don't think you're worth taking care of. Wear clothes that look great on you...and don't grab the ones looking like they came off your dirty bedroom floor!  , Confidence is very sexy! Everyone likes someone who's confident! Of course, you only have to make people think you're confident. Everyone is a little self conscious. Make sure you never talk down about yourself and speak up for yourself when you have an opinion. Let yourself be in control of situations from time to time and talk to the people you want to talk to.  If you want to be noticeable to your crush, you have to make everyone else notice you too! Get out of the shadows and start by following your passions. Do the things that make you happy and do them without feeling worried about what other people think. People will admire your dedication and you'll be happier to boot!  , Learn a new skill in order to get people to see just how amazing you really are. You can teach yourself to play an instrument or take up another skill, like running track or something else. Just do something you've always wanted to do!  , Of course, getting people to notice you means that you have to actually talk to people too. Get out there and be more social. Go to events with your friends, make some new friends, and get involved in things that are going on.  The most important thing is to get up off the couch and start living your life loud and proud. If all you do is sit around, you're going to be boring to other people as well as your crush.  How is your crush supposed to notice you if you're hiding in the shadows all the time? Get out there, talk with them, hang out, and let them get to know you. This is a great step towards really getting to know each other.  Get to know them for who they really are. Spend time talking to them about the things that really matter to them, such as their dreams for the future and the beliefs about politics or religion. This shows them that you really care about them, not just who you think they are.  Find something to bond over (for example, if they are in a club, join that club). Don't fake loving it, but learn to appreciate it instead. Don't start stalking them though. That will only freak them out. You just have to be patient and let things develop naturally.  Support them in the things they like to do. For example, if they play sports, show up at a game. But you should also support them when they're having a tough time. Help them with their homework or be a good listener when they're having a problem.  When you talk with them, don't get super excited or start acting weird. Just keep calm. They're a normal person just like you. Act natural and they'll find it much easier to interact with you.  Greet them every now and then, at first warmly, then a bit more flirtatiously. Say hi in the halls or talk to them a bit.  Smile at your crush and make eye contact, but don't be creepy about it. For example, if you do not know your crush very well, get to know him/her slowly (Asking them for the time, talking about a book they are reading, etc.). If they are a friend, start flirting slightly.  When conversing with your crush, make sure that you spend at least as much time listening as you do talking.  Don't send them a bunch of notes or hang around after school and wait for them. Don't get their phone number from other people or do any kind of stalking. This will make them not want to talk with you or spend any time with you. Think about how your actions will really look to them, especially if they don't share your feelings.  Don't get other people to ask them out for you, don't be a jerk to the person that they're dating, and don't be dramatic about talking or not talking to them. This will only stress you out and make other people (including your crush) not want to deal with you.  If you want to go out with your crush, just ask them out. Cut out the worry from your life and get it over with. At least you'll know how they feel and you can move on. Besides, they'll appreciate your bravery in asking.  If you do ask them out, do it in private. This will be less stressful for you and they won't feel pressured into giving you an answer they don't really mean. They may not even have ever thought about you romantically, even if they would like to date you in the end! Give them the opportunity to decide.  When you ask them out, ask with a specific date in mind. This will keep things from getting awkward. Ask something like, "Would you like to go out to a movie with me this weekend?" or "Do you want to come with me to the arcade on Friday?".  If they don't return your feelings, don't feel like it's the end of the world. Although your crush might have seemed perfect or perfect for you, keep in mind that there are plenty of people out there. You want someone who returns your feelings - so if your crush doesn't, then they just weren't the right person for you. You will find your special someone!  

take good care of yourself.  smell amazing.  dress great!,  act confident.  follow your passions.  learn a new skill.  be social.  live your life!,  spend time with them.  get to know them.  share their passions.  support them.  stay calm.  speak up!,  be friendly.  listen to them.  don't scare them or act too weird.  avoid drama.  just ask!,  ask them in private.  have a clear plan.  don't worry about rejection. 

 If he is constantly staring at you, or in your direction, it may be because he has a crush on you. Try to pay attention to the difference between a normal stare when having a conversation versus a more intense, lustful glare. A lot of eye contact is one way he will try to gain your interest and get you to notice him.When you catch him looking at you, see if he pretends to look somewhere else. This is a good sign he has a crush. Try standing out of his sight to see if he moves in a way where he can see you again. For example, if you two are talking in a group of people, stand behind someone so he can't see you. Then, watch to see if he positions himself in a new spot that allows him to see you.; , If he tries to stand close to you at parties, or sits next to you at lunch, chances are he has a major crush on you. This is his way of getting as physically close to you as he can to express how he cares and enjoys being near you.  People express their emotions with their body language, and that includes hands. Girls are known to flip their hair or gently touch the shoulder or hand of the person they are crushing on. Guys tend to talk more with their hands when talking to girls they have a crush on because they are excited.  If he blushes around you, laughs uncontrollably for almost no reason, can't look you in the eye, or fidgets a lot, then you have your answer. These are all tell-tale signs of someone who is crushing., A common sign of attraction can be shown through imitation. When people do this, they do not even realize it. Watch for someone using common words or catch phrases you say or talking about things you are interested in to relate with you more. 

take note of heavy eye contact.  see how close he gets to you.  look at his hand gestures.  pay attention to awkward behavior.  see if he mirrors your behavior. 

 Not just first name, but full name. This will help you later. Do not just go up to him/her and randomly ask, try to get around very sneakily. You can casually ask a friend and giggle/discuss about him/her together, or you could pay attention (you can do this even when you act like you don't care) to when someone says his/her name. If you and your crush go to the same school etc.. check the roll as casually as you can.; , scouts, glance at any forms he/she hands in to see what his/her name is.  This can give a clue to the type of person he/she is. If they hang out with the 'popular' people, then you know that your crush is also the 'popular' type. (That is just an example).  Focus on your conversation but at the same time catch little snippets of what your crush and friends are talking about. For instance, if you hear your crush say that they love Facebook, and limit themselves to half an hour a day, go on whenever they say they are usually on and send them a friend request - most likely, they will accept it!Image:Find out More About Your Crush Step 4.jpg|center]], facebook, Myspace etc. perfect! Go to his/her profile, scroll down to as far as you can down their wall and see the comments they make. If its facebook you can check out their pics as well. Also check out their friends' pics because friends tend to put photos up and forget to tag them! Remember, never talk about facebook conversations to your crush that he/she participated in with their friends. This will only make you look like a stalker!  , Check out the links. This can tell quite a bit about your crush.  This will give you his/her address and phone number. Use the address and go to Google Maps. This will tell you where he/she lives. You can also compare this to where you live. If your crush lives not far, you can casually walk down their street daily and hope they notice you! If they do, just say hi. Only continue a conversation if they start it. The phone number can be useful in different situations. 

find out his/her name.  if you guys go for the same extra curricular activity e.g.  the next step is finding out the background things, such as his/her friends.  you could be close to where he/she is standing and casually talk with your friends while he/she talks to theirs.  if he/she has a social networking site e.g.  google their full name.  if you know his parent's names, go to whitepages on the internet and search.  never pretend you are someone else and start a fake conversation because you can always stuff up.  

 The easiest and most effective way is to just ask your friend's crush about their feelings. If you're having trouble working up the courage to ask such a personal question, there's a few ways to make the process easier.   Consider the time and place you're going to have the conversation. Make sure the crush is in a comfortable area, probably out of earshot from anyone who could listen in. Be gentle. Don't use confrontational lines, such as "Everyone knows you like Ryan. Just come out and say it!" Instead, you might say "You seem really happy around Ryan. Do you think you might have feelings for him?" Don't pry too much if they seem uncomfortable. If the crush seems to get embarrassed during your conversation, back off a bit. They may need time before they're willing to divulge such sensitive feelings. ; , Instead of asking the crush directly about your friend, try starting with their love life in general. Ask to see if they're dating anyone or if they're currently looking to find a love interest.  Ask your friend's crush less leading questions about your friend, and see if they naturally bring up their potential attraction. Try questions such as, "So how did you and Cayla meet?" or "How long have you known each other?"  

be up front.  ask about their love life.  ask about your friend in a platonic way. 

 You may be surprised at how often you think about that person. It may be irritating to you and difficult to distract yourself from.If your thoughts are very romantic and obsessive about that person, or if they cause you dread and anxiety inducing feelings of near panic, you may be infatuated.   For example, you might say to your friend "I can't stop thinking about this person!"; , If you have major mood swings depending on how you think the person you like feels about you, you may be infatuated. You may feel utter joy and sheer happiness, if you think the person likes you back. Or, if you don't get enough of a response from them, or you think that the person does not like you back, you can become completely dejected, sad or upset.   Also, you switch between the two emotions very quickly. At one moment you entertain the possibility of your feelings being reciprocated, but at the very next moment you hit a wall of fear when you consider something new and decide that the person could not possibly feel the same way about you.  You imagine that your life from now on will involve this person, and you find yourself redefining your life in the big picture in terms of this new person. If you believe that your bond is forever with someone you have recently started having feeling romantic feelings for, you may be infatuated. , A person who is infatuated will typically have romantic feelings for that one person. Additionally, the infatuated person will want to be the only person for the person they desire., In a report, studies showed that 87% of people who were infatuated desired their love object sexually. Having sex, however, was not the main, driving part of the people’s desire for the person they were infatuated with. Most often, the people who were infatuated wanted to share an emotional connection with that person above anything else., People who are infatuated typically only notice the good things in the person they have feelings for. They also do not seem to notice or care about the negative qualities of that person. They may be able to tell you about the bad qualities of the person they are infatuated with; however, they will not feel very convinced that those qualities are important.   This quality of infatuation can become dangerous. Because, you may notice that you are with someone who does not suit you well after the initial infatuation period is over.  

think about whether you have persistent and intrusive thoughts about one person.  discover if you have intense swings in emotion.  realize that you are fantasizing about an unrealistic future.  find out you desire one person.  consider whether you have sexual fantasies about that person.  discover whether you only see the good in that person. 

 One big indicator that someone is totally into you is by checking to see if that person has reached out to you via social media. This means someone is thinking about you when you are not together and wants to learn more about your personal life., If she sends you a text message just to see what you are doing, or texts you all day long, then she probably can't get you off of her mind. Constant communication is a clear sign that she has a crush on you., If someone has a crush on you, she may lightly make fun of you, not to hurt your feelings, but to make you smile. The is a common method of flirtation.Along with teasing, watch for funny conversations. Chances are, she will try to keep conversations light and funny to get you to laugh, if she has a crush on you.  It can be hard to tell if someone always tries to look their best, or if it is for you. If you are Facebook friends, try looking at her photos to get a sense of what her appearance is like when you two are not around each other. If it seems that she tries to look at her best only around you, then you know she is trying to impress you., If someone stops at a shop you love to buy you a special gift, or surprises you with a little treat, then it is a sign of a crush. She wants to make you happy with her small gestures of affection and show you that she cares., If someone is always willing to spend time with you and never misses a chance to see you, then you can be sure she has a crush on you. Watch to see if she attends the same parties as you or cancels on other plans to hangout with you., If someone is crushing on you, be ready for compliments about even the smallest changes you make. Someone who likes you will notice when you get a haircut or buy a new pair of shoes, and she will let you know about that new change with a compliment. 

notice if she follows you on social media.  watch for text messages that don't have any real meaning.  watch for gentle teasing.  look for a cleaned up appearance.  watch for special gifts.  see how available she is to you.  pay attention to compliments. 

 If he is talking highly of you around his friends or family, or brings your name up whenever he gets a chance, he may have a crush on you. It shows you are always on his mind, and he can't help but to talk about you. If you have the opportunity, try asking his friends questions about what he says when you are not around. Here is a way you could ask:   "Do you know if he is dating anyone? I never hear him say anything, and I am just curious."  , Your friends are great resources to turn to because they may have noticed or heard things you have not. Ask them if they have seen him give you any lustful glares, or if he talks about you when you are not around. Your friends should give you the honest truth.   "Do you know if he likes anyone? Have you heard anything about who he is into?" "Have you noticed him acting different around me? Do you think he treats me like a friend or something more?"  , One of the best ways to find out how someone is feeling is to muster up the courage and ask. It can be a difficult thing to do, for both of you, but it is the only way you will know for sure. Here are a couple ways you can ask:   "Hey, I have been wondering something lately. Do you like me more than a friend?" If you like him back, you could say, "I have been wanting to talk to you about something. I have a crush on you, and I was wondering if you feel the same way?"  

find out what that person says about you to friends.  ask your friends what they think.  be direct and ask him. 

 People give off noticeable changes in their movements when they feel attracted to someone. While everyone has their own set of bodily cues, there are some common signs to look out for when someone's crushing.   Open postures such as uncrossed legs, open arms, and palms facing up. People will often lean in much closer to a crush when speaking with them in comparison to the personal space they use with platonic friends. Sometimes people will play with their hair, jewelry, or will simply make extended eye contact and smile during their conversations with crushes. , Prolonged eye contact, even for just over a second, is a common sign of either aggression or romantic interest. Pay close attention to how long your friend's crush gazes at your buddy. If they fail to maintain consistent eye contact, then it could be a bad sign for any hopes of a relationship. On the contrary, it's an excellent signal of affection if they constantly stay locked onto each other's eyes during conversations.  See if your friend's crush interacts with your friend frequently on social media accounts such as Facebook, Twitter, and Instagram. Pay attention to the language they use with your friend, and see if they use obvious signs such as smiley face or winky face emojis.  People looking to give off signs of attraction will likely dole out many compliments to their crush.   Watch to see if your friend's crush praises them on their talents or academic accomplishments. It's important to note that being complimentary isn't always a sign of affection, so it's crucial to pay attention to the frequency of their praise and admiration. Compliments on physical features are an especially key sign of flirting. Did your friend's crush notice their new glasses, haircut, or workout routine? Flirts tend to notice these subtle changes and point them out to convey affection. Sexual innuendos laced in jokes and conversations can also be not-so-subtle signs of a flirt's desire to spice up conversations with the person of their desire.  Flirts will commonly drop hints in conversations that reflect their relationship status, such as mentioning they're recently single or how lonely they've been.  Some people may flirt very openly and little guessing is required, while others can be introverted flirts with more subtle signs of affection.   Physical flirts rely on body language cues to convey their feelings. They often use physical signs of affection before verbal cues, such as eye contact and playful touching. Traditional flirts tend to be more polite, preferring to convey affection over a longer period of time instead of using flashy and overt statements such as saying they're single or rubbing their crush's arm. These flirts also prefer professional environments like bookstores or study groups to build relationships over parties. Playful flirts use very clear signs of affection in a boisterous manner. For example, they may joke excessively in a sexual way with their crush or make bold physical complements about their crush's appearance. , Find out who your crush's friends are and ask around to see if what the status of the crush's feelings are. Chances are if the crush is significant the word has already made its way around to people.  

examine body language.  watch for eye contact.  look at their social media communication.  look for compliments.  listen for references on their availability.  understand different kinds of flirts.  talk to your crush's friends. 

 Another solution is to give your friend enough confidence ask their crush directly so you don't have to do the leg work.   Discreetly feed your friend affirmations such as, "Everyone knows how confident you are, why not put it to use and ask Nicki how she feels?" Congratulate them on little steps, such as starting small talk with their crush or asking them for help with some schoolwork. Give them support even when they falter. If they lose their nerve to talk to their crush at a party, let them know it's okay to be afraid sometimes and that there will be other opportunities to develop a relationship.  If they feel uncomfortable with their body or lifestyle, start supporting healthy habits. Go to the gym with your friend, sign up for yoga classes, or start up a diet together.  Sometimes people can gain confidence just by airing out their insecurities. Ask them why they feel uncomfortable confronting their crush, and let them know it's normal to feel anxiety about such an important question.  

give them affirmations.  help them improve.  listen to their concerns. 

 Often you will start to fall out of this stage of infatuation once you have gone through all of the possibilities of planning a life together and notice the reality of the situation. For example, you know that you want kids and the other person does not want kids. Maybe you thought that you could work through this, but as time goes on you start to see how much more important this is to you than you thought.   The things you realize about the person after the infatuation period is over are not always incompatible with who you are or your life. For example, you may realize that even though at first you didn't think that her family living in Hawaii would be a challenge, that it is a real challenge. However, the challenge is worth it to you.  Once you have enough data to know whether or not the person you are infatuated with really loves you or does not love you, you will begin to leave the infatuation stage. Over time, even the most infatuated person will start to pick up on the patterns that they are going through with love/unrequited love. This accumulated experience will help the infatuation period come to an end.  If you have spent a lot of time together, had enough talks, and done enough things together that you finally feel like you really know him/her, you will likely be coming to the end of your infatuation. Based on what you see, does this person seem like a person who would be well suited for you and who you would be good for?  , After infatuation, couples can successfully transition into long term, loving, and committed relationships. However, the opposite is also possible. It is possible that you were with someone who was not right for you in the long run, but you were unable to see that because of your feelings of infatuation.   Does this person share the same interests, goals, values and lifestyle that you do? Does this person bring out the good side in you? Or was the relationship all about the chemistry that you shared?  , Based on your knowledge, decide whether this relationship is a good choice for your life. If you decide that you want to be with this person, move forward and work to build communication, compassion and work into your relationship so that it lasts. If you decide that this relationship is not right for you, you should break up.  Infatuation lasts between 18 months and three years, typically. Infatuation does not generally last longer than that unless it is prolonged by a long-distance relationship or deep insecurity in the person who is infatuated. Off again/on again relationships can also cause the infatuation period to go on for a longer time.  

see the truth about your differences.  find information about how he/she feels about you.  discover most everything about the other person.  evaluate the way this person fits into your life.  decide whether to cut the relationship off or try to make it work.  think about how long it has been. 

 Love and infatuation are two different things. Love involves commitment and compatibility. Before you can find this kind of love, even in someone you are infatuated with, you should learn to love yourself. Loving yourself means that you do not have to look for love or affirmation in someone else to feel good about yourself. You know that you are worth loving. You are not looking for a partner to make you complete, because you are already enough.  If you do not love yourself and need to heal from something, you may want to try to sort through it on your own before you get into a serious relationship. Consider seeing a therapist who can teach you how to take steps toward healthy self love. , If you love someone, you work to support their passions and strengths. You also acknowledge and accept the weaknesses of that person. Love does not ignore the other person’s flaws, but works to help that person grow and work through their problems.   Make sure the other person complements you as well. Before you commit to a long-term relationship, find someone who challenges and brings out the best in you.  Real love looks for opportunities to do things for the person they love. The more shared positive experiences and hard work that the people in the relationship can share, the stronger the attachment, security and trust that will be built into that relationship.   Do small things for your partner. Wash your partners dishes, leave a note for your partner, or buy them their favorite candy. Do big things for and with your partner. Take off the weekend to do something special together, plan a birthday party for your partner, or take a class together. Do things that require more time, effort and love.  This means that you both are focused on making things work for your relationship. You don’t work for your own wants or needs, instead you focus on the good of your shared life. For example, instead of watching your favorite TV show alone, rent a movie and buy popcorn. Spend the evening enjoying each other and having real conversations.  

love yourself first.  complement the other person.  act out your love.  play on a team together. 

 Your brain chemistry is responsible for who and what you’re attracted to. In fact, according to experts, physical attraction works a lot like addiction: both stimulate brain chemicals like dopamine and oxytocin.Even if he’s not into you, it doesn’t mean there’s anything wrong with you: it’s all down to the chemicals.   Research suggests that our brains can tell within one second whether we’re physically attracted to someone or not.; , When people are physically attracted to someone, they often show it through body language. Most body language connected to attraction communicates two basic messages: “I’m available” and “I’m into you.”   “Available” body language cues are actions such as smiling, eye contact, and arms and legs that are relaxed and uncrossed.“Fertility” cues (the ones that signal that the person is a potential mate) for guys include actions such as standing straight, calling attention to the hands, and squaring the shoulders.If he leans in while he’s talking or listening to you, or tilts his head towards you, it’s a good bet that he’s into you.Good news: women tend to be better at reading body language than men., See how he holds himself when he’s around you. Men tend to physically take up more space when they want to display themselves as powerful and attractive, so if he’s sitting with his legs spread apart or standing with his shoulders squared, it may be a sign that he subconsciously wants to impress you.   If his legs and feet are pointed towards you, it may also be a sign that he’s interested in you., Men who are interested in a woman also tend to physically interact more with other guys. If your crush and his buddies are hanging out with you and he playfully bumps, shoves, or elbows his friends a lot (especially if they don’t do the same), he may be trying to signal that he’s the dominant guy in the pack and wants you to check him out., When people find someone attractive, their bodies undergo some automatic responses that display that attraction. Knowing what to look for can help clue you in to how he really feels about you.   Flushed cheeks suggest arousal. (This is the reason some women choose to wear blush; it mimics the natural flushing of sexual excitement.) Some people also blush when they’re feeling awkward or uncomfortable, though, so don’t rely exclusively on reddened cheeks to tell you whether he likes you.Lips also tend to get redder and more plump if someone is aroused. If he licks his lips when he’s around you, he might be subconsciously signaling you that he’s up for a kiss., Our pupils tend to dilate when we’re physically excited, so if his pupils are bigger than usual, it might be an unconscious signal that he likes you. Winking is another cue that is often associated with attraction., Smiling can mean that he enjoys being around you. However, pay attention to which muscles move when he smiles. If only the muscles around the mouth move, the smile probably isn’t genuine, and it could signal that he’s trying to hide discomfort or awkwardness.There’s a reason why Tyra Banks is always telling her protegees to “smile with your eyes.” Smiles that appear genuine will involve muscles around the eyes as well as around the mouth.  People who are really attracted to someone will try to incorporate physical contact into their interactions. If he casually brushes your arm while he’s talking to you or goes in for a hug without invitation, he may be interested in you.   Understand that some people are just naturally more into touching than others. Some touching, such as a handshake or a shoulder push, may just be “friendly” territory. Other types of touching, such as on the forearm, around the shoulder, near the waist, or on the face, are more likely to be connected to attraction. 

know how physical attraction works.  understand the messages behind body language.  check out his body positioning.  watch how he interacts with his friends.  observe his physical responses to being around you.  look at his eyes.  watch his smile.  keep an eye out for touching. 

 Does he try to find common interests with you? For example, he may ask questions about what music you like or what TV you watch, or he might make comments like “Oh, I love pineapple pizza too!” when you’re chatting. If so, he may be trying to express that he’s interested in you., Does he ask what you’re interested in? Has he asked you if you have a boyfriend? He may also ask your friends questions about you, so checking in with them may help you decide whether he’s into you.  For example, if you say something about how another guy (not him) is hot or good-looking and he speaks up, he may be showing you that he’s a little jealous.  If he offers you a ride home or brings you coffee or a snack without you asking, he may be expressing his interest in you.   Pay attention, though: if he also offers favors to everyone else, he may just be a friendly guy.  

listen to whether he looks for common ground with you.  see if he asks questions about you.  pay attention to how he responds to your cues.  notice whether he does favors for you. 

 Research shows that both men and women who are confident -- meaning they know who they are and are comfortable with themselves -- are usually considered more attractive by others.Be yourself around your crush and try to remember that if he does like you, he likes you for who you are. (Or at least he should!)  , Just like guys do, you can signal that you’re interested in your crush with your body language. Touching your face or hair, touching or drawing attention to your neck, and maintaining eye contact with him when you chat all tell him that you’re interested., If you really want to tell him you like him, it may help to practice a couple of versions of what you want to say at home. That way, you can iron out any kinks and get over your nervousness.  It’s a natural fear to worry about rejection, but if you’ve paid attention to how he behaves around you and you’re confident he likes you, it may pay off to be direct with him. Research shows that men actually prefer what scientists call “direct gambits,” which are honest, open, and state your intention directly. 

be confident.  signal your interest with body language.  practice what to say at home.  ask him out. 

 Crushes are the stuff that dreams are made of and they reveal more about you than you may think. This is the effect of early adolescence, when young girls and boys begin to grow out of childhood. For example:   When you see someone you like and your heart begins to beat faster or your palms may become sweaty, or it feels like butterflies are in your stomach, this is your body reacting to chemicals in your brain called dopamine. Also known as the "pleasure chemical." You may think about your crush constantly. When you wake up, when you eat, and when you sleep they are on your mind. It will feel like you're dreaming. Do your best to not feel embarrassed by these side effects of liking someone. These are all natural chemical reactions in the body. Release yourself from the expectation of anything happening. Just relax in the feeling of liking the person. It may seem like a difficult thing to do. But it will free you from any outcome. ; , These new feelings may seem overwhelming and having an outlet for them could help you make sense of them.   Write love notes to your crush or create a "Feelings Journal." Keep everything you write to yourself. Make a playlist of songs that remind you of your crush. Play the songs when you can't see or talk to the person. Or you can save it for the special day when you do decide to reveal your feelings. , Become a secret admirer of your crush. But don't stalk the person. For example:   Notice the little things about your crush. There are obvious things you like about your crush, like their beauty or sense of humor. But also, take the time to notice other things, people might overlook. Maybe they snort when they laugh or they have a small visible birthmark. Anything that makes them different, learn to appreciate it. Get to know your crush secretly. You can find out if they have social media accounts. What do they post about? If they post about a specific sports team or musician, do some research. Or maybe they like something you like too.  It's solely up to you if you want anyone to know about your feelings. Be as private as you like. Here's how:   Remember, no one can read your mind. Don't worry, you have the choice of spilling your secret. And if anyone asks, you can deny or brush it off. If you've written about your feelings, keep it to yourself. Make sure what you've written is in a safe place where no one can find it. Try to act normal around the person you like. Don't bring any attention to your behavior. Remind yourself, they are a regular person, even if your mind tries to tell you otherwise.  

embrace the new feelings.  express your feelings creatively.  observe and admire your crush from afar.  keep your crush a secret. 

 You do a little more than to your appearance than what you've been doing before.   Use a new perfume if you're a girl or a new cologne if you're a guy. Wear your favorite clothing item or accessory. Make sure it's something you've gotten compliments on. Start getting fitter and healthier. Exercise and eat more fruits and vegetables. , This may seem obvious but many forget this. Remember that there is no pressure. You are just being friendly. Here are a few icebreakers to use:   Smile and make eye contact. Compliment their wardrobe: "I really like your shirt." Make small talk about something relevant: "Are you going to homecoming?" or "Did our team win the game last night?"  , One of the best parts of having a crush is gossiping about it with your friends. Sharing these feelings with them can make your relationship with them better. Also, your secret might reach other people and eventually get to your crush.   Friends may try to embarrass you. Understand that this is part of the process. They will tease you even though they like someone secretly too. , This might sound far fetched but you could become your crush's BFF (best friend forever). From afar, you may still wonder what this person is like. But as friends, you get to know your crush and they also get to know you. You could start by asking questions.   "What do you like to do on weekends?" "What is your family like?" "What do you want to do when you get older?"  

take special care of your appearance.  say hello and be friendly.  tell your friends about your crush.  become friends with your crush if you're not already friends with them. 

 Another benefit of talking to your friends about your crush is that they can get information for you. Or you can find out for yourself. Does your crush look nervous around you? Does their face become flush or do they look away sometimes? Those may be good signs.   If a girl plays with her necklace, flicks her hair, or rolls up her sleeves, she might like you. If a guy breathes in and pulls his shoulders back or stands like a cowboy, with his hands on his hips and thumbs hooked through his belt loop - he might like you. , Think of creative ways to approach your crush about going on a date with you. Search on the Internet for unique ways or ask friends about how they got their boyfriends or girlfriends to go out with them. And if they say yes, plan a memorable date that's fun for both of you. A few things to remember:   Don't ramble. Keep it simple. Make it an offer worth their time. Surprise them with something out of the ordinary. Don't underestimate the power of just being confident. Make good eye contact and smile at them., Half of the fun of getting a guy or girl is the challenge before the catch. Enjoy the feeling of liking someone before getting wrapped up in what will happen next. Middle school is a special time for this special feeling.  

find out if your crush likes you too.  ask your crush on a date.  remember that sometimes having the crush is the best part. 

 This could be a library, a beach, a park, or a diner. This will remove any extra pressure and nerves that she may have.; , Compliment her on something that has caught your eye and never let her know your intentions.  Many of my friends who are jocks have tried this. For instance, a big win at a school competition might just be a good time to kiss your girlfriend with passion due to school spirit.  This works best at the end of a fun date such as seeing a movie or going swimming. You look her deep into her eyes, hold both of her hands, tell her that you are about to kiss her, and just do it.  Let's say that you and your girlfriend are studying together and all of a sudden it gets cold. You move closer to her, allow her to lean into you, make sure that she enjoys you being in her personal space, tilt her chin, and give her a long kiss.  In winter, you could buy mistletoe and hang it on a tree branch. You could then walk with your girlfriend, tell her to look up, whisper mistletoe, and kiss then hug her. Be creative.  You cannot go throughout life being fearful of rejection. Girls love confidence, chivalry, and good hygiene. Be sure that the girl at least knows you well enough to determine that you aren't only interested in making out. Nice guys finish first and even if they don't, they get let down easy.  Make sure that your lips are okay and that your breath is fresh. Dental hygiene is extremely important, and don't let her see you chewing gum right before you make the big move. Keep the kiss short, but not too short. Generally, about 10 seconds is ideal.  

take your dream girl to her comfort zone.  make an effort to be charming.  try the spontaneous approach.  try the permission approach.  try the moving in approach.  try the prop kiss.  forget about rejection.  be ready to kiss. 

 Meeting his eyes and smiling across a room won't work on a guy who feels uncomfortable with eye contact and doesn't usually notice subtle smiles.   However, he'll probably pay extra attention to your face, since he has a crush on you, and spend extra energy analyzing your expressions. This means that he'll be more likely to pick up on subtle cues, but he may misinterpret them also.; , For example, a neurotypical guy might pick up that "There's this really cute guy I like..." might mean him, but an autistic guy is less likely to realize that you aren't talking about someone else. Try to avoid signals that could be misinterpreted.   You don't have to walk up to him and flat-out announce "I like you." Instead, use the more obvious flirting tactics in your repertoire, and clearly communicate through your words and body language that you're interested. Remember, not everyone likes to be touched. It's fine to err on the side of forwardness. Many autistic people are sincere and straightforward, and they enjoy it when people are clear about what they want.  Many autistic people love to talk about their special interests, and are happy to teach you or discuss back and forth. If you let him know that you're interested, he'll stay interested.  One of the positive traits of some autistic people is a heightened sense of social responsibility, or the desire to help others and fix problems. Open up to him and allow him to help you navigate your problems. It will bring you closer together.  Expect him to get excited, and probably admit he likes you too. If he gets flustered, don't worry; he just needs time to put into words what he wants to say.   There is a slight chance that he'll panic or overreact. If so, it's probably because he doesn't know what to do (not that he doesn't like you). Give him time.  Autistic people often have trouble initiating conversations. Instead of gauging his interest by how much he initiates, consider how much he reciprocates. If he's happy when you ask him out, that means he's definitely into you.  Autistic people are an incredibly diverse group (just like non-autistic people), and popular perceptions often aren't particularly accurate. Get to know him as an individual, and don't rely on stereotypes.  Mixed signals are confusing in general, but even more so for autistic people. If you have a schedule conflict, tell him it's a schedule conflict, and ask to reschedule the date. If you're upset, tell him that you're upset, and why. This will help him respond to you better.  That is the greatest gift you can give an autistic person.  

realize that usual flirting techniques may not work.  be direct with him.  ask about his special interests.  give him opportunities to help you.  admit your crush, when the time feels right.  ask him out.  do not rely completely on autism stereotypes.  be clear about your feelings along the way.  love him for who he is, autism and all. 

 Since he may be honest and unabashed in his pursuit of you, it may be tempting to put off rejecting him to avoid breaking his heart. This can hurt him, by allowing him to be led on and look like a fool. It's best to "rip off the band-aid" and tell him right away.  Since mixed signals can confuse autistic people, directly explain that you're flattered but uninterested. While he'll feel a little sad, part of him will feel grateful that you were clear with him so he could stop wasting his time wooing someone who didn't want to be wooed.   Speak as clearly and compassionately as you can. Then tell him if you want to be friends or if you think it's better that you go your separate ways. Don't offer to be his friend out of pity. You won't be doing him or yourself a favor. Only offer to be his friend if you truly like being with him.  He will probably be okay with going back to being friends.  Seeing you might be painful to him for a while, and he may be too polite to say it. If you notice that he seems a little sadder or more distant than usual, it might be time to back off for a little while.  For example, if he likes to spend hours chatting in the evenings, it's okay to say "Hey, I really can't talk with you after 7 pm. I've got plans tonight." You don't have to mention that the plans involve movies and fuzzy pajamas.  Explain that a specific action makes you uncomfortable or is socially inappropriate. Give reasons if you can. Most likely, he will be apologetic and respectful of your feelings.   For example, "It startles me and makes me feel uncomfortable when you hug me from behind. Please stop doing that. If you want a hug, you can approach me from the front, or hug somebody else." It may feel blunt, but clarity is the best way to get through to him. That way, he won't keep doing something you don't like, and then feel embarrassed or guilty about not noticing the signals later.  Remember that autistic people, while sometimes socially clueless, are good at heart. Raising your voice or making accusations will hurt him, and you may feel like a bully afterwards.  

don't take advantage of his interest in you.  take him aside and clearly tell him how you feel.  continue hanging out as much as you'd like.  consider giving him a little space if he seems to be having a hard time.  set limits as needed.  tell him if he's doing something you don't like.  treat him with compassion. 

 If you're all-emotional and can't think straight, you won't be very likely to get any of the following steps right. In that case, check out How How to stay sane when you've got a crush.       ; , Sometimes a lot of effort. In order to accomplish whatever you want with you and that “ooh la la” someone (whether it be kissing, dating, etc.), you can't expect them to just fall for you.  It may feel awkward at first, but realize that if your crush thinks you're just trying to be friendly, he/she/they will probably want to talk to you. No matter how dumb you feel, eventually you're going to have to try starting a conversation about something you're both interested in. If it seems too hard at the moment to do this, maybe wait a while until it seems like a better time.          Don't start conversations if you don't understand the subject matter; focus only what you know about. This sounds fairly obvious, but think about it: If you don't watch football, don't bring it up! It'll make the other person feel odd if they're doing all the talking. After you can actually talk comfortably to him/her/them, they're going to get used to talking to you.  If you're talking to a guy, licking your lips supposedly reminds them of kissing. Don't do this too much or they're going to think something's wrong with you, like you are badly in need of Chapstick. Playing with your hair a little bit might be a good thing too, but go easy on this one.          If you're a straight guy talking to a girl, make eye contact. Don't stare her down, but don't feel embarrassed. Girls really like it when guys give them a little 'spark' by looking at them. For both guys and girls, smile. Sad people look like they don't want to be bothered. Smile when the person looks at you. Smile when you talk. And it doesn't have to be a huge, great grin, it just has to be 'a little something'.  If you want to hint to them you like them (after you've been chatting and all for a while...), you don't have to invite them to go somewhere with you if you're uncomfortable with that. Once you get confidence, you can hint something like, "Hey, me, so-and-so, what'shisname, what'shername, and a couple other people are going to Miniature Golf this weekend. Wanna come?" Realize that you shouldn't ask this as though you think they'll say no. Say it as if you want them to come for fun, and then that might give you a hint on how much they like you. Also, it'll make them feel pretty good that you're inviting them with a few of your other friends instead of just taking them by themselves. Perhaps after a few of this outings, it won't be so bad asking them on a real 'date'.  Take them somewhere you're sure they'd love to go. If they're into basketball, get tickets to a game of your hometown team. If they love a certain restaurant and seem to bring it up in conversation a lot, take them there.  If you're getting completely negative vibes, the person clearly isn't right for you. It's hard to be rejected but better to know so you can move on.  Just treat them like you would any of your other friends. Then, unless they start loving you, you won't have a problem.  This will help you to stay focused on why you don't want to date this person.          Drop hints that you don't like this person. If you do like someone else, make that clear.  If you happen to bump into each other or get paired in class, simply be polite and no more, do not engage in conversation and only offer grunts for answers if they ask you questions.  Don't beat about the bush. Just say that you think they're a nice person but they're not your type and you're still looking for Mr./Ms./Mx. Right. 

get the right attitude.  understand that it's going to require effort to control your feelings.  communicate with the person.  use body language, but don't overdo it.  drop hints.  be original with dates.  know that the worst that can happen is that your crush says no.  if you realize after a while that you don't really want to go out with this person, you simply want to be friends, stop the flirting.  make a list of things about this person that you don't like.  stay away from this person.  if the crush asks you out, say no. 

 Your friend asked you out on a date, but you don’t want to join him. Instead of lying and potentially getting caught in that lie, just give him a quick reason why you can’t. Choose something that doesn’t allow room for interpretation. Just a simple explanation will suffice.   For instance, when he asks if you will go to the movies with him, just say, “Sorry, I’m busy,” and leave it at that. Eventually, he will get the message.; , No one likes to be rejected. Unfortunately, the rejection can hurt even worse when it comes from a friend with whom you want to take things further. The truth is the situation is going to be awkward no matter what. You’ll just need to accept it and hope things return to normal.   Bring up the weird feelings to your friend. You could say, “I hate that things are awkward between us right now. I really don’t want you to feel weird around me and I hope we can get back to how we used to be.” Saying this lets him know you are aware of the awkwardness and that you want to retain the friendship. Now the rest is up to him., You owe it to your friend to be up front about your feelings. Simply tell him you’re not interested, but do it in a kind way, especially if you want to keep the friendship intact. He may not be able to only be friends with you, but you’ll feel better knowing that at least you tried.   You could say, “I’m flattered you feel like that, but I don’t want to risk hurting our friendship. You mean so much to me that it would break my heart if we broke up and then weren’t friends anymore. I think that’s how we need to keep it: just friends.”, Because of your relationship, you will likely see and talk to each other frequently. Therefore, it is even more important that you draw a clear line in the sand. Let your non-feelings be known so that he doesn’t continue to ask or try to pressure you into a relationship.   You can say, “Now that we’ve talked about it, I don’t want to discuss it anymore. I think it’s best if we just close this topic for good.” 

give a simple reason.  prepare yourself for awkwardness.  talk it out.  be firm. 

 Tell him it’s not something you do. Workplace relationships are always a bad idea. What may seem fun at first can turn into something terrible if you break up. Let him know that workplace relationships are not something you engage in.   Simply tell him, “Nothing personal, but I don’t date people I work with.” If he persists, tell him again that you don’t date co-workers. Then, leave it at that., Let him know that getting into a relationship outside of work could jeopardize your careers. This is particularly the case when there are rules at your job against dating co-workers. Let him know clearly that you can’t go out on a date because it could mess up a career or job that you’ve worked hard for and that you need.   You could say to him, “I appreciate your honesty, but I prefer to keep things between us professional. I don’t want to cross the line and jeopardize our work, so I’m going to have to say no.”, Avoid telling them why you are declining if it is something you don’t like about them. Instead, put all of the blame on you. This will likely make working with them and seeing them easier.   For instance, go along the lines of, “It’s not you, it’s me.” Let him know you think he’s great, but dating someone you work with just isn’t something you’re interested in., You may be wary of making trouble at your workplace, but you have a right to work in an environment where you don't feel harassed. If the guy keeps bothering you, take the issue to a supervisor.You might say, "Justin keeps pressuring me to go out with him. At first, I didn't think it was a big deal, but it's gotten to a level where I feel uncomfortable working with him. I don't know what to do. Can you help?"  

refer back to your ethics.  bring up jeopardizing your job.  take the blame.  talk to a supervisor. 

 You’ve seen him at the coffee shop or gym a few times. You’ve exchanged a smile here and there, but that’s about it. Now, he asks for your number. If you aren’t interested, you’ll need to let him know.   You can say, “I’d like to get to know you more as a person, so why don’t we become friends?” You’ll see his true colors if he gets defensive and nasty. If he’s willing to build a friendship first, you may want to see what the future holds., There’s nothing wrong with telling a person you don’t have much interaction with why you’re not interested. You likely have a valid reason. If they can’t accept it, at least you may not have to see them much again.   For example, you could say that you’re just getting out of a relationship and aren’t interested in finding a new one, if that is the case. You could also tell him you’re just not into him that way. Additionally, a “no, thank you” also works., Treat him the way that you would want to be treated if you were in his shoes. Avoid saying something like, “ew, no way” or “not a chance.” Instead, decline gracefully. Remember, it took a lot of guts for him to put himself out there. Respect that when you’re turning him down.   You could say, “Wow, I’m flattered, but I can’t.” Letting him know that you appreciate him telling you how he feels could soften the blow. 

suggest you become friends.  be honest.  stay kind. 

 This is easier said than done, but it is important to quell your anxiety in order to be able to eat. Being nervous is going to make it more difficult to eat and digest your food. It can also cause your hands to shake, leading to spills. Try to relax and appear calm and cool in front of your crush.Replace automatic negative thoughts with more rational ones. If you are feeling judged, remember that everyone eats. It is perfectly normal and necessary. Prepare for eating in front of your crush by eating socially around other people more often.; , Many people eat too fast. Slow down. Take time to really enjoy your meal and the conversation with your friends and your crush. Spend less time worrying about eating and more time focusing on what your crush has to say. It’s really their company that you are interested in more than the food.Talk more between each bite. Invite your crush into the conversation.  This moment is not the end of the world. There are plenty of things to look forward to. If this moment of eating in front of your crush is freaking you out, focus on the future instead.Strike up a conversation about a movie that just came out. If you are eating in the school cafeteria, talk about the classes you have coming up in the afternoon. Keep it positive. Try to focus on things that make you happy to quell your nerves. Talk about your hobbies. Maybe you play a sport and have a big game coming up, or you’re reading a really good book.  The fact is, eating is normal. Everyone must eat in order to survive. Anxiety over eating in social situations can be the result of feeling judged or suffering from a poor personal body image. If you suspect you may have an eating disorder, ask for help.Check with your doctor if you notice effects on your health, like fatigue, severe weigh loss, or loss of your menstrual cycle. Ask for support from your friends, family and a medical professional.  Have hope in knowing that this will get easier the more you do it. You will become more comfortable in the company of your crush after you get to know each other better. Also, the more you practice eating in front of other people, you will eventually become more comfortable doing it in front of your crush. 

relax.  focus on the conversation.  look forward to another activity after eating.  seek therapy if your anxiety is overwhelming.  keep trying. 

 Of course you want to look attractive in front of your crush. There is nothing attractive about seeing the half-chewed food you are about to swallow. Read for more tips on chewing with your mouth closed.  Practice by chewing gum and making sure you keep your mouth closed. Take smaller bites which fit better in your mouth and don’t require you to open too wide. Eat softer foods which require less bite to get them down.  Talking with your mouth full makes your words a mumbly mess while showing off your half-chewed food. No matter how great of a quick quip of a response you have to what someone just said, take the time to swallow before you speak. Don’t feel pressured to answer questions right away. Take your time to chew and swallow. This will also keep you from accidentally choking, or spitting food at your crush, either of which could be devastating!  If someone asks you a question while your mouth is full, put your finger up to signal you need a minute to swallow. Model good etiquette by not asking anyone questions when they have their mouth full. You can even stop yourself mid-question and say, “Sorry, I’ll wait until you're done eating.”  , If you do take a bite that is too big, or start to cough while you are chewing, grab your napkin and cover your mouth. This will hide any unsightly chewing and if you cough some food out, you can catch it in your napkin. 

chew with you mouth closed.  swallow before you talk.  cover your mouth with a napkin. 

 There are a number of reasons why you could have been turned down: the other person is too busy to date, you aren't their type, they have personal problems to work through, you aren't compatible, et cetera. Just like how you wouldn't want to date every single good person out there, they may reject good people.   Make a list of positive characteristics. Consider traits enhanced by autism, and traits unique to you.  It's normal to feel a mix of feelings after you lose an opportunity for a relationship. Take some extra "me" time, enjoy your special interests, and allow yourself to cry and watch cheesy TV shows.   Thoughts of self harm and/or suicide are not normal. You don't deserve to feel that way, and you can get help.  Spending lots of time around the other person isn't healthy for you, because it will reignite old hurts.  Get together with people you enjoy spending time with, do activities that you enjoy doing, and try new activities that you've always wanted to try. Whether your idea of fun is going to the beach with friends, watching movies with popcorn, or working on a novel, go for it. It's good to break the cycle of sadness and do something you can enjoy.   Look for activities that can get you out of the house. Loved ones can be a great distraction. Focus on them, how they feel, and what they've been up to. This can give you a break from your own problems. Learn a new skill, whether it's baking cookies or speaking another language.  Turn to a family member, friend, or mentor whom you trust. They can help by offering a listening ear and helping you work through your feelings.  

recognize that rejection doesn't determine your worth.  give yourself time to be sad.  take some space.  have fun.  talk to someone about your feelings. 

 When you flirt, watch them and see if they smile, look pleased, and/or flirt back. This can help you tell whether they are interested in you too. If they are uncomfortable, tone it down or stop. You may naturally have an idea of what to do, and here are some options:   Look at them from across the room, and smile. Find ways to touch them, like fixing their hair, picking lint off their shirt, or touching their arm. (Don't "trap" them, though; some people don't like touching.)  Smile. Play with your hair. Face your crush, and use open body language. Compliment them once or twice. Keep it light! Avoid smothering your crush with compliments or touching them too much. This can make them uncomfortable.  This will help you analyze if they are responding positively to flirting, and if they like you back. Someone who is interested in you might flirt back, seek you out to talk more, and show signs of embarrassment (such as blushing or looking away) while smiling.   A disinterested person might use closed-off body language, avoid your touch, show signs of embarrassment while not smiling, and look away as if planning an escape. Either you are coming off too strong and need to tone it down, or they are not interested and you should stop.  Sometimes, a person on the outside can be a more objective judge of what exactly is going on here. They can usually offer good advice about whether the other person likes you back, and what to do next.  While confessing to your crush how you feel about them may not be the best idea depending on the circumstances, if you feel like it's a good idea, then go for it. If you want the best chances of getting into a relationship, however, look at their signals and analyze them closely before telling them how you feel.  

start flirting.  watch their reactions and behavior.  ask a trusted friend for advice.  tell your crush your feelings. 

 This can help you figure out whether or not your feelings are a passing fancy or something more serious. It will also help you talk yourself through your feelings when you feel them. Is this infatuation? Lust? When you feel a warm blush start to spread across your face or a similar feeling, acknowledge the emotion, and positively talk yourself through it."I'm just nervous because I think he's cute. I've been around other cute boys and it's no big deal. I'm going to be OK." "I know that I sometimes get anxious around him. But that's alright; people sometimes get anxious around crushes. I'm going to do my best anyway."; , Fixation occurs when you have an unhealthy obsession about the person that you like and are unable to see them as an imperfect human being.When you are too fixated on a crush, it can put you in a situation in which you can be taken advantage.   Beat fixation by first recognizing and acknowledging it and then restoring perspective by listening all the positive and negative points.If you have difficulty doing this, talk with a trusted adult and ask them to help you.  Not only will writing a journal help you be physically healthier, it is also a safe place for you to vent your emotions.Writing a journal will also give you the opportunity to clarify your thoughts and come to a deeper understanding of yourself, which could lead to you feeling more grounded when you run into that special someone.  It can be easy for you to feel embarrassed around the person you like, and this is completely natural.When you feel embarrassed or self-conscious, you might be tempted to hide your feelings, or to ignore them, which can lead you to feeling even less in control around your potential romantic partner.  When you are with others or in a situation where it isn't appropriate for you to express your feelings, you might be able to restore emotional control by removing yourself from the situation briefly. Simply excuse yourself and return when you feel better. Some ways to exit a social situation gracefully:   Excuse yourself to the restroom. Tell your friends you need to step outside for some air. Explain that you are feeling restless and have decided to take a short walk.  This may seem like the last thing in the world that you want to do, but talking with the person you like about your feelings will get rid of the uncertainty that is amplifying your uneasiness.Try to use soft language, as coming on too strong might make your crush uncomfortable.   When talking with your crush, instead of saying, "I love you," it may be best to say something like: "I've been noticing lately that I really enjoy your company and I always have so much fun with you, so I was thinking if you're up for it we could go to a movie?"  , There are going to be times when you feel especially self-conscious, whether because of circumstance or personal factors, and when this happens use your internal voice to guide yourself through the situation. Remind yourself that this is only a feeling, one that you'll likely have again if you haven't already, and tell yourself in encouraging words how you will proceed. An example you might consider:   "Alright. I'm really nervous, but that's OK. I've been nervous around guys I like before. I know I can get this work done, all I have to do is focus. So I'm going to turn my attention to this for a while, and I can think about him later."  , When strong feelings threaten to overwhelm you, it is natural to respond unconsciously by taking shallow breathes. To improve your breathing, for a few breathes try to pay attention only to your inhale and exhale. This will restore your conscious attention to your body and its need for full, relaxed breathing. 

identify your feelings and their source.  root out fixation.  write a journal.  allow yourself to feel your feelings.  take a brief break to regain composure.  tell your crush.  coach yourself through difficult moments.  breathe. 

 If your good friend has a crush on you, then they may start to suddenly be curious about who you’re dating. If they never cared about who you were dating before but are suddenly showing interest in who you’re dating and asking lots of questions about it, chances are that they wish you were dating them instead.   If your friend asks how your dates went all the time when they never used to care, then they may have a crush on you. If your friend always asks, “Do you think it’s serious?” or “Do you really like them?” after you go on a date with a person, then they may just be nervous that you’re going to get attached to someone else. If your friend gently puts down any person you date or even says “They're not good enough for you,” then they might think that they're the one for you instead. Another sign that your friend is crushing on you is that while your friend used to love hearing the details of your dating life, they're now oddly quiet whenever it comes up. It may make them upset to hear all about the romantic life of their new crush.; , Your friend might have even said that they want to date you and you haven’t even noticed it. Here are some ways that they could have done it:   If your friend suddenly says things like, “I really like talking to you” and they've never mentioned it before, they may be developing a crush. If your friend has made a lot of comments about how much they want a partner, they may be directing this toward you. If your friend hypothetically asks you what you think it would be like if you dated, then—duh—they're giving you a big hint that they want to date you.  If your friend is the type to always give elaborate compliments, then fine, but if your friend rarely praises you and is suddenly telling you that you look nice, that they like your new outfit, or even says that something about your hair or eyes, then they're probably hinting that they want something more.   Pay attention. If your friend has never complimented you before and has suddenly started being very complimentary to only you, then it may mean that they want to take things to the next level. But if they're suddenly complimenting every potential romantic interest in sight, then it may not mean anything.  

see if your friend is suddenly interested in your romantic life.  see if your friend has hinted that they want to date you.  see if your friend has been complimenting you a lot more. 

 When you find your thoughts returning over and over again to that particular person, you may benefit from a period of sustained thought about that person. For a set period of time, even 10 minutes can be enough, think only about that person.Doing this can lessen the intensity of the feeling, leaving you calmer.   Try not to think about your future together or what might come; focus your thoughts only on that person and their characteristics for the entirety of the time.  Sometimes, all you need is the right distraction to get your mind off your potential lover. Past happy experiences can restore perspective by interrupting the strong feelings you have for that person.Think of past times when you've had fun, or a place where you feel safe and protected. Repeat a mantra that you find soothing. Some examples:  "Everything's going to be OK." "I am calm, cool, and collected." "With every breath, I release anxiety and become more calm." "I overcome my fear and live life courageously.", In some situations, people become so nervous around those they like that they become clumsy or inarticulate. If this happens to you, find the trigger and think about how you might combat it.   If you have difficulty talking to him, bring up a topic you're passionate or knowledgeable about. If you find that when he's around you're all thumbs, invite him for coffee or something that requires little dexterity.  Your first letter will celebrate your feelings and all the reasons why you feel the way you do. In your second letter, write all the worries, concerns, and sources of anxiety related to the person you like. Try to make a case for moving forward, after all, you are a worthy person regardless if your affections are returned., Too often, people talk themselves into a negative loop that makes feelings more overwhelming with every passing instant. If you suffer with this condition, find out any automatic negative thoughts you have and interrupt those with an opposing positive thought. For example:   "If he doesn't like me I'll be so embarrassed and then people will think I'm a loser. Wait a minute. I had friends before I started liking him, so I know I'll have friends afterwards, too. I guess it's silly to put so much self-worth on this."  , Tell the entire dramatic story playing in your head to yourself several times. Make sure you complete the story by taking it to its natural extreme. By the third or fourth time, you should be better able to recognize the absurdity of these extreme, yet natural, thoughts."If I ask him out on a date and he rejects me, everyone will talk about it forever. I'll never stop hearing, for the rest of my life, about the one time I asked this guy out. It will haunt me through college and my professional life, because everyone will already know."  NOTE: this technique is intended to reveal warped perspective to the person using it. If you find yourself truly believing these things and unable to see how your perspective is off kilter, talk to an adult or a mental health professional.  Though feelings of embarrassment or the knowledge of your own infatuation might make you hesitant, sharing your feelings with those you trust can help you come to terms with the normalcy of your situation, and leave you feeling less isolated. Family members and trusted friends can be a great source of strength through the storm of romantic feelings you might now be suffering.  

practice thought saturation.  distract yourself.  find and combat triggers.  write two letters.  condition opposite responses to negative thoughts.  exaggerate your greatest fear.  reach out to your support group. 

 These can cause you to feel a little giddy, lightheaded and possibly invincible. Or, you may have rose-colored glasses about the whole situation, thinking that this person is perfect and that nothing else matters. As such, your giddier feelings are liable to contain elements of fantasy and can be a source of causing you to feel uncomfortable around your crush because you only see their virtues and not their whole self.; , Use this knowledge to keep your head screwed on as you investigate the potential of this relationship longer term. Acknowledge that while your feelings are normal for someone falling for another person, they are somewhat inflated and liable to lead you astray. Try your best to keep them under control by reminding yourself that slow and steady wins the race and that it's important to think through your feelings before acting on them. Most of all, it's vital to get to know your crush better, warts and all.  Crushing on someone you know little about can lead to unreasonable expectations, and can cause you to fantasize that this person is someone they're actually not. By getting to know him or her, you can be assured that this person is someone you'd like to date or maybe you'll discover a good friend is the better option.  Spending time together without creating expectations can ease your discomfort. Learn what this person cares about, likes to do and considers of interest. Do these things match your own interests? While you don't need to have the exact same interests in everything, having a few common interests will be essential to being able to share experiences, stories and news with each other, and it'll enable both of you to have things to do together.   Avoid pretending that you enjoy doing or participating in something that you don't, just to please your crush. This can turn out to be a deal breaker later on when your crush discovers how you truly feel. It is far better to be honest. You can even say that you don't much like the activity or interest but you're willing to give it a go but won't keep it up if it still doesn't excite you. At least that's honest and your crush knows where they stand with you.  Remember, each person is the whole package––wonderful things, iffy things and vices––just like you. There is a Spanish saying––if you don't love a person's flaws, then it's not love at all. Think of that when you're trying to work out whether this person is right for you. This may seem hard to consider while you've got rose-colored glasses about this person but knowing, understanding and accepting a person's flaws early on can be the pathway to a long-term and harmonious relationship. It can also help to ease your discomfort, knowing that your crush isn't all perfection.  In the days when you're trying to get to know this person, easy does it. If they feel that you're always hanging around, always asking questions and always sticking your nose into their business, they may begin to feel crowded and they may feel uncomfortable themselves. It is best to pace out your hanging around together, remembering that it's always better to leave a person wanting more of you than feeling they'd rather see less.   Don't start hanging around your crush more than your real and close friends. Doing so will make it obvious you like the person more than as a friend and your own friends will feel peeved at being sidelined.  Avoid speeding things up or trying to show your deeper interest at this stage. As soon as you try to do either of those things, it's likely that you'll begin to feel uncomfortable and start to do things that can scare off your potential date or can cause you to look strange. Keep reminding yourself that at this stage, all you're doing is getting to know this person better and that there is nothing to be uncomfortable about.   Avoid listening to what others have to say. They might give indications that your crush does, does not, might or might not like you. Frankly, it's none of their business and they're not the two of you. Just smile and nod politely whenever others try to give you advice. You can take it or leave it but you don't need to act on it or agree with it. It's eventually up to you to decide whether or not you'll ask this person out.  Yet, it's done every day by thousands of people everywhere, so take heart from this and prepare yourself for the big question. Expect to feel the jitters, to be nervous and to feel some discomfort. The question asking itself is a scary process. However, your crush is a not a scary person––you've taken the time to get to know him or her better, and you're friends. From here, things are going to be sorted out between you, so have faith that you're doing the right thing.  Rehearsal is the great way to quell discomfort. At least that way, you'll have some lines already worked out and it'll feel easy than stumbling into asking out your crush. Write down your lines, then practice them beforehand. It might help to say them in front of the mirror, or it might not––try anyway, to see how you feel. While ultimately you must decide what lines to deliver to your crush, some suggestions include:   "Hey R, I was wondering how you feel about going to the X competition together this weekend. I know you love X and I do too, and I thought it'd be a great way to spend a first date together." "B, I was hoping you'd be interested in coming to X event with me tomorrow, as a date. I'm happy to drive us." A little more intimate: "Hey S, we've been spending a lot of time together lately and I've grown close to you. I would love to go on a date with you soon. How do you feel about that?"  , Your crush may not be ready to answer you immediately, or your crush may answer like lightning. Either way, be ready for the answer!   If it's yes, you're off to a new start together. Say something like "That's great", or "Cool! I'll start organizing it now." If it's no, or I need more time, be gracious. Say that you understand and that you just hoped there might be a chance but you accept their decision.  It signals that this person doesn't feel compatibility with you, and that's at least honest and fair. It also shows that you have the courage to put yourself out there and ask the questions that need asking. Sometimes the answers won't be to your liking but other times they will be. At least you've given it your best shot. Now you can think about what didn't work and try differently next time, with a new crush.  

understand that having a crush creates a whirlwind of feelings.  be aware of how the surreal feelings surrounding having a crush on someone can bring about your discomfort.  get to know the person first.  spend time together.  find out what talents and skills your crush has and what flaws and vices he or she has.  avoid shadowing or crowding your crush.  treat all of the "getting to know you" stage as a slow but even process.  realize that asking someone out takes bravery.  practice asking before you actually do it.  be respectful of your crush's space and pace.  realize that being rejected is not the end of the world. 

 If your friend is suddenly seizing every opportunity to hang out with you on your own, then it means that they want to take things to the next level. If before, you’ve mostly done the “group hang” thing, and now, they are asking you to go to the movies, to grab coffee, or even to have dinner, then that’s just one step away from asking you for a date.  If before, when you hung out in groups, you were just laughing and hanging out with all of your friends equally, and now you suddenly see that your friend is always at your side, making eye contact, or playfully touching you, then it may mean that they want to be more than just friends.   Take a look at your friend next time you’re in a group situation. See if you can catch them staring at you. If they blush when you catch them, then this makes it even more likely that they may want something more from you.  If your friend was once very open and candid about everything and is suddenly acting more modest around you, then it may mean that they are suddenly feeling more bashful in your presence because they have a big crush on you. If your friend is a guy and he stops his usual loud burping or vulgar jokes, then he may be crushing on you.   If your friend is a girl and she suddenly looks down at the floor more, or is less eager to reveal the details of her latest date, then it may be because she only wants you to be in her personal life.  

see if your friend asks you to hang out solo more.  see if your friend pays special attention to you in group situations.  see if your friend is more shy around you. 

 If your friend has always dressed and looked pretty casual around you and now they look ready to go on a date every time you’re together, then something may be up. If your friend has changed the way they look around you, then they may have just started caring more about their looks, or they may want you to notice them.   If you’ve run into your friend by accident, check out how he looks. If he always seems to be dressed up, then he may have just given himself a makeover. But if he’s always looking sharp around you but casual if you run into him, then the looks may have been just for your viewing pleasure. If your friend is a girl, see if she’s started to put on more makeup, pay more attention to her hair, or even to wear tighter or just obviously new clothes around you. See if your friend has started checking their reflection more around you. A girl could look in her mirror, while a guy could check himself out when he passed by a window.  This is another dead giveaway that your good friend wants to take things to the next level. If your friend has never previously cared if you’re dating someone but has started to act jealous or possessive, then they may have started crushing on you—hard.   If your friend starts being unfriendly to the people you’re casually dating, then they may like you. If your friend asks, “What do you see in that person?” or “Why are you wasting your time with them?” then they obviously wish you were seeing them instead. If your friend acts possessive of you in group situations and clearly tries to pull you away from people you could be romantically interested in, then they're jealous of you. If your friend keeps looking over at you as you talk to a potential romantic interest at a bar or a party, then they're clearly checking to see if you’re interested in someone else.  If you used to see your good friend once a week, and now they seem to be around almost every day, it’s a sign that they want to take things to the next level with you. If your friend takes every opportunity to hang out with you, even if it’s to go somewhere with you that has never previously appealed to them, then it may be because they have a crush on you.   If your good friend has suddenly offered to help you with your errands, homework, or anything else that feels like a chore, then they obviously just want any excuse to spend more time with you. If your friend lives on the other side of the city but randomly pops up in your neighborhood all the time, then they obviously want to get closer to you.  You can tell a lot about how your good friend feels about you based on their body language. If they were always affectionate and continue to be that way then it’s not much help, but if your good friend used to have very closed-off body language and is now very open toward you, then it’s saying something. Here are some ways to notice if your friend’s new body language indicates that they have a crush on you:   If your friend has started leaning in more when you talk or just standing closer to you in general, then they may have a crush on you. If your friend used to look around distractedly but is now always making intense eye contact, then they may want something more from you. If your friend used to cross her arms or direct their body away from you but now faces you with their body and keeps their hands at their sides or uses them to gesture, then they may have started crushing on you. If your girl friend has started to play with her hair when she talks to you, this may be because she’s a little nervous since she realized she has a crush on you. See if your good friend has started touching you casually more often. Even if they just started playfully shoving you or touching your forearm a lot more, it may mean that they want to connect more intimately.  

see if your friend has started caring more about their looks around you.  see if your friend has become jealous around you.  see if your friend just seems to be around more often.  see if your friend’s body language has changed. 

 If you want to know whether your friend likes you or not—assuming you like your friend too—then you should give that person a chance to tell you how they feel. This is easier than asking them yourself or even sharing your own feelings if you do have them. Here’s how to give your friend the opportunity to tell you:   Isolate the person. Arrange a solo hang-out session and see if anything happens. If you’re good friends, this won’t seem like a big deal. If you like the person, try to set up a pseudo-date. Invite the person to a slightly nicer dinner or a semi-romantic movie and see if they tell you anything afterwards. Have a drink or two. A drink will loosen the person’s inhibition and will make them more likely to reveal their feelings.  If you have mutual friends who have seen you together, then you can ask them if they think the person likes you. Ask the mutual friends of your gender so they’re less likely to go blabbing to your friend. See if they have any insight into your friend’s actions or if they’ve heard anything.   Ask them to be honest. If you really want to know the truth, they should tell you what they honestly think. If they don’t think your friend likes you in that way, they should say so. If you’re shy about asking them directly, then you can mention your friend and just make an offhand comment about how they've been acting different lately and see if your friends mention it on their own.  This is a more gutsy move. Asking your friend’s friends is almost the same thing as asking him if they like you themselves. If they're crushing on you, their friends will know, but it’s not likely that said friends would tell you. You can try asking a close friend of theirs that you really, really trust, but be careful. This plan may backfire.  If you’re feeling bold and want to know the answer to your question, then you should just ask your friend if they have a crush on you. If you’ve had the sense that they like you and have thought so for a long time, then it may be better to have things out in the open. Then again—if you don’t like your friend romantically, you may think about waiting for the whole thing to blow over. But if you do really want to know if they have a crush on you, don’t make it a big deal and just ask.   Don’t be nervous about asking. If you’re good friends, then you should be comfortable talking about anything. Just tell your friend that you’ve noticed that they've been acting differently. First, ask if there’s anything they want to tell you. If they don’t take the bait, then just ask them if they like you. Be casual. You don’t have to set up an elaborate rendezvous to ask. Just pick a private place and ask your friend how they feel about you while making eye contact and keeping your voice calm and steady.  

give your friend the perfect opportunity to tell you.  ask your mutual friends.  ask your friend’s friends.  ask your friend. 

 Understanding the problem is the first step in moving forward. Don’t feel bad about having a crush; crushes are something that everyone experiences at some point of view and the human brain is actually biologically programmed to fall in love.; , Getting over a relationship is hard even if that relationship never fully materialized. Give yourself some time to mope around and feel badly, then pick yourself up and move forward. Make sure you're not upset for too long.   While feeling sad, also take steps to comfort yourself. Try taking a hot shower, listening to one of your favorite playlists and speaking nicely to yourself., Knowing that this relationship will never progress is an important step in moving past it. Remind yourself again and again that what you’re doing is necessary for your own personal happiness and growth.   Remember that you will have other crushes. In many people's minds, having a crush on your teacher veers towards the inappropriate sector, no matter how you feel. There will be others who you will prefer in the future, and others who you have a real chance with. Focus ahead, without dwelling too much on this dynamic with your teacher.  The reason you are in school is to learn and get a proper education, so take the energy you would normally spend thinking about your teacher and re-focus on it and also on your work. You’ll see improvements in your academic performance and it will take your mind off your teacher.  Thoughts frequently lead to action and visualizing something makes it more likely to occur and people will see you.Thinking about your teacher increases your chances of doing something you might later regret.   Try focusing on things about your teacher that you don't like. The idea here is not to dwell on the negatives, but to remind yourself that the relationship was not as perfect as you remember it being, e.g. Age difference, appearances. , Interact with your teacher in class, but do not seek them out or try to spend time with them outside of your designated class time. It just isn't right for you, especially as they will probably quite a bit older than you. It is generally ok to date a person older than you in later life, but a young person dating an older teacher is often considered inappropriate., Making decisions in advance about how you will handle your impulses can help you to be more successful in conquering them.Think about how you’d like to act when talking to your teacher and then follow through on your plan.  If you are concerned that your crush on your teacher is impacting your day-to-day life and also preventing you from concentrating on your studies, talk to a therapist or school guidance counselor.   If you are concerned about privacy, talk to a therapist rather than a guidance counselor. Your therapist is required by a code of ethics to keep what you say confidential. Guidance counselors are not bound by the same code, and can easily report information that's revealed to them., Your friends may have similar experiences coping with crushes and might be able to offer some interesting advice or perspective. If nothing else, talking about your feelings might make you feel less alone.  If you find yourself unable to stop thinking about or interacting inappropriately with your teacher, it might be time to make a more drastic change. Talk to your guidance counselor or academic advisor about transferring out of the class.   Be honest with your counselor about the feelings you're having for your teacher. If they don't fully understand how much these feelings are distracting you from your schoolwork, they might not be willing to let you change classes. Trust that they are professionals who are trained to deal with situations like this.  Pursue new hobbies and renew old passions. Join new clubs and sports or recommit to old ones. Take the time and energy you previously spent lusting after your teacher and put it towards something productive. Also try to get out and find some new people to spend time with to get your mind off them.  Develop relationships with other people, especially people your own age. Work on strengthening current friendships and cultivating new ones. Open your mind to meeting and spending time with new people and you may find yourself falling out of love faster than you think!  , Taking a trip or changing up your surroundings is incredibly healthy. Traveling can help you expand your mind and see the world in an entirely new light. Traveling also teaches patience, flexibility and perspective; which are all important qualities that will help you get over your teacher.  The best way to get over an old relationship is to get involved in a new one. Don't rush into anything you're not comfortable with, but allow yourself to be open to the idea of dating and pursuing relationships with new people, because you have to move on.   There's no agreed upon length of time to wait after suffering a broken heart. But it is important to take some time to yourself after a breakup to rediscover who you are, what you like and what you value in yourself and in a future partner. 

admit that you have a crush on someone.  allow yourself to feel sad.  commit to moving on.  focus on your studies.  stop thinking about your teacher romantically.  limit your interactions with your teacher.  utilize if-then planning.  speak with a licensed professional.  talk with your friends.  transfer out of the class.  distract yourself with extra-curricular activities.  spend time with friends.  go somewhere new.  date someone new. 

 Don't ask their friends but go to the source. Ask the crush or the relative. Sending an email asking them is always good. If they aren't then no sweat!; , If your crush has already asked them to be their girlfriend or boyfriend, or they have gone out more than one time, then time to take action. If it's only a one off thing then wait a few weeks and see what happens before you do anything drastic.  Even if you are upset, don't get depressed. Keep in mind that even if you had gone out with your crush, it probably would have been over in a few weeks. There are always more fish in the sea; you can find other people you like.  It'll be stressful watching the pair of them together, and you have to be a strong person to do that.  It'll bring you a lot less pain, but do not completely blank them both out. Otherwise they'll wonder what they did to you.  However,don't tell a girl who will obviously go and tell your crush and mate.  You can make a deal with her that she still spends equal amount of time with you as she does with her boyfriend.  Meeting new lads will help you get over your crush, but if you seriously think it won't help, then don't try to get involved with another boy just yet.  Hang out with him and his pals with your crew, but don't start flirting with him. You don't want to risk losing your friendship with your mate if she catches you. Friends are more important than a crush.   Start looking at people at school and hang out with them. Don't worry, everyone finds someone.  

first off, make sure that your relative or friend is going out with your crush.  now that you are sure, try to find out if this is a one off fling or something a bit more long-term.  you now know that your crush is taken.  take in a deep breath and count to ten.  try as much as you can to avoid catching sight of them at any cost.  hang around with other good mates and if you really feel like it, tell another close and trusted friend about how you feel.  still be friends with your mate - it isn't her fault she fancies your crush.  get involved with other activities so you can meet new guys.  be 'just mates' with your crush. 

 If you break the "touch barrier," he'll feel more inclined to take things a step further. If he reacts negatively to you touching his hands, he might be sensitive, nervous, or just not ready. Watch and learn from his reactions.; , Make him feel comfortable and confident. Don't invade his space or his privacy. It just makes things uncomfortable and awkward.  Look at him sincerely. If he returns the gaze, he wants to kiss you, too. Look from his eyes to his lips slowly and lean in.  If he pulls back, stop.  Notice the key word here is GENTLY. No rough movements- it's awkward.  If he leans back in after you both pulled away a bit, then he wants to kiss you again. Go with it, but if he goes too far let him know. Press lightly on his chest to get him to let off, and tell him you're not comfortable.  

first make it simple by holding hands.  ask if he is nervous for any reason.  stare deeply into his eyes.  grasp his hands gently and put them around your waist.  gently pull him closer to you and put your hands around his neck.  lean in, tilt your head to the right slightly, and he will hopefully respond and tilt his head to your left then kiss for a few seconds then gently pull away. 

 This usually only happens in movies as a physical hyperbole for effect. However, do keep in mind that your excitement will build. The key is to stay calm. Take deep breaths, take a drink. If you do that, you should be fine.; , Take a look at Wiki how to kiss file for a better look.  This means, make sure they're not chapped, or dry. If they are, take your toothbrush, wet it with warm water, and gently scrub your lips. This will exfoliate them, and leave them smooth. If you don't want to do that, exfoliate with sugar. To do this, put a pinch of sugar in the hand opposite of that one you write with (if right handed, put the sugar in your left), wet your writing hand's finger tips with warm water and wet your lips, let no more than 7 - 10 dips of water mix with the sugar, dab the mix onto your index finger of your writing hand, and scrub your lips gently in a clockwise circular motion. WARNING: Do not do both methods, as it could harm your lips by giving small cuts, drying out your lips, or making then sore from rubbing too hard. After you exfoliate, use a moisturizing chap stick, such as Blistex Deep Renewal, or Burt's Beeswax lip balm. Fresh breath is always a plus!  , Make sure they're comfortable with it. If you're extremely close with them, chances are a kiss will be an okay move to make. A good way to make sure they're okay with it, without asking (if you're shy) is to try to break the touch barrier by hugging, or simply holding hands.  When they're talking to you, look them in the eyes nonchalantly, and subtly, but noticeably, look from their eyes to their lips, look back up. Give a soft smile, and hopefully, they'll get the hint. Make a French kiss too!  , When you know they're okay with it, slowly move in closer. Both partners need to move in together, because it shows that both are willing. The popular/standard is girls move in 30% of the way, guys move in 60% of the way. , Live in that moment. It's perfect after all, right?  , Who knows, you may even go back in for seconds.  

first off, know that you won't (usually) pass out or faint.  unsure of how to kiss?,  keep your lips soft and kissable.  make sure you're on good enough terms with your crush that kissing is okay with them.  after you've made sure they're comfortable with it, hint for one.  kissing is a two way street - both people need to be engaged and willing.  if you get nervous, relax, take a breath when they exhale (you'll literally take their breath away).  ,  focus on the kiss.  after the kiss, break away by just a few inches, and smile to let them know you liked it. 

 Generally, people like to kiss people who are groomed and have clean teeth.You want to look presentable!   If you are a crunchier person, don’t worry about the grooming as much. There is a nobility in cutting down on water usage and hygiene product production that some will find more attractive than clean hair.; , Experiencing something new activates adrenaline and heightens awareness, which together make meaningful memories and can help you create a stronger bond with your special someone.Try going bouldering, a form of rock climbing that doesn’t require a harness. Don’t worry—the walls are pretty short! If there’s a restaurant or bar you’ve both been wanting to try out, go together.  While some people certainly do kiss in public places, not everyone loves PDA, especially for a first kiss.Talk about pressure!   If you’re at a party, you could ask if your partner wants to go on a walk or to talk in a different room. Say something like, “It’s so noisy and crowded in here! Want to go get some fresh air?” It can be scary to ask someone out first, but if you’ve been crushing on this person and never gone on a date, it’s important that he knows you’re interested. Ask him if he wants to come over to watch a movie, just the two of you.  This will vary based on where you are and what your evening plans look like.   The most important thing is to be warm and approachable. It’s easy to be standoffish if you are nervous, but no one will try to kiss you if you are. If you want him to make the move, you have to help him feel confident that you are open to it. Make sure to smile! Just as your guy needs to feel that you’re approachable, he also needs to know that you’re enjoying yourself with him.If you invite him over to your house for dinner or a movie, make sure the space is clean and the air smells inviting. Atmosphere is everything.  If you really like someone and feel nervous when you’re with him, you might subconsciously box yourself off from him accidentally. Don’t do this! Of all flirting techniques, physical touch works best.Gently touch his arm when he says something funny. You want him to know that you are OK with physical touch.  If you are sitting down to watch a movie, make sure you sit in close proximity to him! Let him sit down first and snuggle in next to him., You can hint at him by making eye contact and occasionally looking down at his lips. He should pick up on the fact that you are imagining what it would be like to kiss him.Don’t go too overboard with this. If you’re not in conversation, don’t stare him down or he will find it creepy. If you’re sitting down watching a movie you can occasionally look over at him let him catch you looking, then turn back to the movie. He’ll know you’re thinking of him.  Women are more successful at flirting when they are bold and direct, studies show.Men tend to prefer when women are direct about their intentions.   You can say, “I’m so glad we’re finally on a date together!” People love hearing that they’re wanted. Get him to ask what you’re thinking about. If you’re feeling bold, say, “Oh, I’m just wondering what it would be like to kiss you.” , If you can find a natural way to initiate it, play fighting can lead to a kiss—think of The Lion King! It’ll increase your adrenaline, it gets you close to each other, and it shows that you feel comfortable with him. Just make sure that it is playful, not violent., If he knows that you like him enough to be nervous, it will make him feel more comfortable. No one likes to be vulnerable, and if he doesn’t know that you’re feeling nervous too, he might be too afraid to make his move.   For example, you could say, “I’ve been wanting to spend time with you for a while. I didn’t think I’d be so nervous!”  , If all else fails, you can tell him that you want him to kiss you and see what happens. Sometimes guys fail to pick up on the hints and you need to be more direct.   You could say, “I’d really like for you to kiss me right now.” If you want to be slightly less direct, you can say, “It would be OK if you kiss me right now, if you want to.” Don’t rush into this. Enjoy the beginning of the relationship, and if it’s been several weeks and you’ve dropped hint after hint, just tell him. He may be looking for your OK to go ahead, or he may want to kiss you in his own time.  

practice good hygiene.  try a new activity together.  get him alone.  create an intimate environment.  break the physical barrier.  snuggle in.  make steady eye contact.  flirt.  play fight.  tell him you’re nervous.  ask him to kiss you. 

 If you are able to see your crush one last time before leaving, it can be very helpful. It will give you closure and a final memory. If you are comfortable, you can even tell them how you feel. It can be a huge relief to get it off your chest. Unexpressed feelings can cause stress and sadness, so it might help you in the long run to tell them exactly how you feel about them.; , When you’re going through something hard, a lot of people will tell you to, “Stay strong.” While their intentions are good, it’s OK to express your emotions. Sometimes a good cry can get out some of those awful emotions that words can’t.Don’t bottle up your feelings, because they could come out when you least expect it.   Sadness isn’t pathetic or a sign of weakness. Tears just mean you really cared about someone and you’re sad to say goodbye. Don’t be ashamed.  When you’re young, often times your crushes aren’t taken seriously by others, nor are your heartbreaks. People may not understand your sadness, but that doesn’t mean you should sweep it under the rug. Be gentle with yourself, and treat yourself to the things you enjoy doing. Draw up a bubble bath, take a yoga class, or play a third round of video games. Give yourself little treats to help you in your sad time.   It’s helpful to be honest with your parents and friends about how you’re feeling, so they understand what is going on.  It’s good to let your feelings out, but it’s not good to throw yourself a never-ending pity party. Give yourself a limit of how long you’ll let yourself wallow.Maybe it’s a weekend, maybe it’s a full week. Spend that spoiling yourself, or doing the cliché things that people do to get over a break-up. Eat sweets, watch movies, sleep in, cry, listen to sad music, and do anything else that you feel like doing. When you’ve reached the time limit you set for yourself, stop. Turn off the sad music, tidy up, call some friends, and get ready to start moving on.   Wallowing will never make you feel better. It’s OK to do it for a little bit and get out those awful feelings, but it’s not a long-term solution.  When you’re down in the dumps, it can be tempting to isolate yourself and hide in your bedroom. Challenge yourself to say “yes” to every invitation that comes your way. Whether it’s shooting hoops with your dad, going to the movies with a friend, or running errands with your mom, just say yes! Leaving the house and surrounding yourself with people who love you can be incredibly helpful., Now is a great time to dive into that big project you’ve been considering starting. Rather than sitting around and thinking about your crush, do something productive and fun! Redecorate your room, start a blog, train for a race, learn how to cook a new recipe, whatever! The more energy you channel into a fun project, the less energy you’ll have to be upset over your crush., You may feel lethargic and down when you know you won’t see your crush again, but it’s important to keep doing the things that bring you joy. Don’t skip your extracurriculars or cancel plans that you typically love just because you’re sad. You may dread going somewhere or following through on your plans, but end up having a fantastic time. Give yourself the chance to forget about your crush and remember the hobbies you love doing., If you are never going to see your crush again, it’s important to close that chapter to move onto the next. You will probably not be able to move on if you sleep with his picture next to your bed, or stalk his Facebook every single day.You don’t need to burn his photograph or unfriend him, but you should tuck the photo away somewhere and try not to look at their page. The less you’re bombarded with memories of him, the sooner you can heal and move on.   Instagram, Snapchat, Twitter, and other social media platforms can be great ways to stay in contact with your crush if they live far away. However, these can also extend the amount of time that you're upset and stuck on them. Try to minimize your interactions through social media. For example, reduce your daily Snapchat messages from ten to five and then to none. It might seem unnecessary, or even harsh, but it's much easier to get over someone and close the chapter if you aren't communicating with them 24/7.  Your crush was probably awesome, but he's not the only awesome person you’ll ever meet. It can be hard to know that you’ll never see him again, but you will definitely have new crushes. You may let them pass by if you’re too busy mourning your last crush. Get excited about your future, because there will be plenty of amazing people coming in and out of your life., Once you’ve successfully coped with saying a permanent goodbye to a crush, you’re a stronger and wiser person. You’ve learned how to make it through a really tough situation, and you’ll be able to handle hard things in the future. Painful experiences are never pointless– you’re officially a tougher and smarter person after it all. 

say goodbye, if possible.  let yourself cry.  be easy on yourself.  give yourself a “wallowing” time limit.  say yes to invitations.  start a project.  enjoy hobbies.  close the chapter.  remember your options.  embrace the learning experience. 

 If your boyfriend or girlfriend wants to be around you, and is always gracefully touching your arm, hand, or is always standing really close it could mean they have a kiss on their mind. If you feel the same way, then just act similarly. They might lean in closer to you when you are sitting alone, or they might even fix your hair, this can also be a sign that they want to kiss you, just lean in a little closer.; , If your partner try to French Kiss you, and you don't want to, then just tell them. Your first young kiss shouldn't really be a French kiss anyway. When you're young it should probably be a small peck, not really anything more because it may make them feel uncomfortable, you aren't trying to make your first kiss a make out session.  If you aren't sure, ask subtly "Have you ever kissed anyone?", and if they say no, ask "Do you want to kiss anyone?" And if they respond with a yes slowly lean in for a kiss but if they look uncomfortable stop an apologize.  When your partner wants to stop slowly move away. Look into their eyes and smile when the kiss is over to let them know you enjoyed kissing them.  

look for signs.  know your limits.  make sure the person is ready.  follow their lead. 

 In a game of truth or dare, people sometimes joke about what they are daring you to do. Making sure they are serious about the dare could help you avoid embarrassment.   Replying with a brief laugh and simply saying, “Are you serious?” is enough to double check. If they say no then you can always tell them you want to take the dare anyway.; , Ask yourself if you are comfortable kissing someone or not. Remember that it’s okay to say no to a dare. If you feel uncomfortable kissing the person, then don’t do it. It’s better to say no than to do something you don’t want to do.  Since kissing involves two people, you need to make sure it’s okay with the person you were dared to kiss. They may not feel comfortable with it, even if you want to do it.   Asking permission is called “gaining consent.” In situations like this, it is the right choice. Kissing someone without asking them first can actually be considered sexual assault.By asking their permission, you make the situation safe for both of you.  Fresh breath is an important aspect of a good kiss. If you have a bad taste in your mouth, the person you kiss probably won’t like it. Think about what you ate recently and breathe into your hand to check for bad breath. Practicing healthy dental hygiene is a good long-term practice.There are many ways to freshen your breath. Brushing your teeth is the best option if you have time. If time is more limited, chew some gum, eat a mint, or swish with mouthwash. If it’s possible to plan ahead for the chance of a kissing dare, buy a disposable toothbrush to have handy.  Kissing usually causes excitement throughout your body. It increases your heart rate and makes you breathe more quickly. You want to be calm for the kiss, so take slow, deep breaths for a few seconds., This may apply more to times when the person is a stranger. Making small talk and asking how the other person feels about kissing can ease the pressure. Talking about the kiss before you do it can give you confidence.  When the excitement of the moment rushes over you, it’s easy to move your mouth forward too quickly. If you go too fast, you may actually hit your mouth against the other person’s mouth causing pain for both of you. Don’t be afraid to lean forward slowly to make sure you connect just right., If touching the hair doesn’t feel quite right, you can also place a hand on the shoulder. This type of touching is just a way to help steady yourself and the other kisser., Not tilting your head the right way is a common mistake. In general, people are more likely to lean to the right.This may not prove effective every time, but the odds are good. (Which way to lean is also a good topic for the pre-kiss talk!)  , Since this kiss is on a dare, it’s likely that you will not know the person you’re kissing very well. It is best to start out slowly and not be too aggressive. Don’t use your tongue unless you feel your partner initiate it., If the kiss is going well, it’s okay to let it last a little while. If you start to feel uncomfortable, or you can tell the other person is, go ahead and end the kiss., It seems obvious, but how the kiss ends is important. Don’t pull away too quickly. If the kiss went on for a while, pulling away and then giving a light, short kiss is a good way to end it.  Once you have successfully completed the kiss and you are looking at each other, it may feel awkward. Smiling at your partner will help put both of you at ease. Whether the kiss went well or not, ending it with a smile is better than a frown., The kiss was for a dare, so don’t take it too seriously. You may be breathing heavily, so take a deep breath like you did before the kiss. If you feel comfortable, talk to the person you kissed about the experience. Breaking the possibly awkward silence will help you move past the kiss and relax.  Since dares usually take place in front of other people, you may as well act like you did a great job! Don’t show if you are afraid. Don’t show that you didn’t know exactly what you were doing. Just act as if it went well and felt perfectly natural., You were dared to kiss someone and you did it. You can feel good about taking a new step and you can feel free to stop thinking about it.  

ask the person who dared you if they are serious about it.  decide if you want to accept the dare.  ask the person if you can kiss them.  freshen your breath.  take some deep breaths.  talk to the person you’re going to kiss.  move in for the kiss slowly.  place your hand on the back of the head and pull it forward gently.  tilt your head to the right.  be gentle.  kiss for the right amount of time.  end the kiss.  smile.  don’t overthink it.  act confidently.  let it go. 

 Having fresh, kissable breath is a major component of having a knockout first kiss. Make sure that you have brushed your teeth and used mouthwash some time before the kiss, or that you chewed minty gum or sucked on a breath mint before the kiss. You can do this an hour or so before -- you don't want your breath to be too minty or it will look like you tried a little too hard to get ready for the kiss.   If you had dinner or ate before the kiss, you should avoid ordering any foods that are heavy in garlic, onions, or any intense spices.; , It's important to share your first kiss in an intimate or romantic atmosphere. Your first kiss may be something you remember for the rest of your lives, so you should make it special. You don't have to bring out a thousand candles or serenade the person, but you should pick the ideal time and place for a kiss.   Kiss in the evening. Kissing as the sun is setting or after it has fallen is more romantic than kissing during the day. You'll also feel less shy about your first kiss if you're kissing in the dark. Kiss somewhere private. Pick a private location that is free of distractions or onlookers so you can really focus on your kiss. Pick a secluded park bench, a nice spot near a beach or a lake, or even your own balcony. Look nice. Dress up a little bit to signify that you're about to have a special moment. You don't want to have your first kiss in your gym clothes.  This is an important point. You can set the mood and prepare your breath all you want, but nothing you do will matter if your partner is not ready for the kiss. Before you share the kiss, make sure your partner has exhibited signs of liking you, whether it's through going on a date, touching you, or even telling you how he or she feels.   If your partner keeps gazing into your eyes, touching you lightly, and smiling, then you'll know that she's ready for the kiss.  Before you get ready for the kiss, you need to make sure to take it slow and to be gentle. If you're too aggressive or rough, your partner will get the wrong message, and the kiss will feel too forced. Here are some things to avoid before you go in for your first kiss:   French kissing. Don't immediately shove your tongue in your partner's mouth and leave saliva everywhere. If your partner is bold and is gently touching her tongue with yours, then you can move in for a French kiss, but don't try this in the first few seconds of your traditional kiss. Biting. Nibbling on your partner's lip or even tongue can be a kinky way to spice up your kisses. But if you do this during your first kiss, your partner will be caught off guard and may even jump back. The roaming hands. You should make physical contact with your partner, move your bodies closer, and caress your partner's head or shoulders with your hands. You should not grope your partner in any inappropriate places during your first kiss. This is doing way too much at once, and will come off as sleazy and will make your first kiss feel insincere.  Start moving closer to the person you want to kiss, whether it's by moving closer together if you're sitting down, putting your arm around the person, or brushing away the person's hair. As you start touching the person, hold his gaze to make your intentions clear.  Your first kiss will feel more natural if you're already touching the person and comfortable with it. Your hands shouldn't rove to any inappropriate places -- keep it PG. Your physical contact could even start from some light and gentle teasing. You can playfully hit or lightly push the other person, until your actions become more serious. Try making a romantic compliment before you go in for the kiss. Just say, "Your eyes drive me crazy" or "You look so beautiful tonight."  , Once you've made physical contact, maneuver yourself until your face is just inches away from your partner's face. You should maintain eye contact, and you can even smile a little to show your affection for the person.   Move closer until your hips are nearly touching, and use your hands to graze the person's cheeks, hair, or shoulders. One traditional kissing position is when the guy wraps his arms around a girl's waist while she wraps her arms over her shoulders and behind his neck -- you can think of this as the "slow dance" position.  Once you're in position, there's nothing left to do but kiss. Don't hesitate. If you've both made it this far, then it's clear that you are excited about kissing each other. Gently lean closer and lock lips. Just remember to take it slow. Have your lips touch softly as you feel the person out. Keep your lips just slightly parted, and continue kissing the person for five or ten seconds before letting go.   Keep your hands active while you kiss. Use your hands to cup the person's face, stroke his hair, or caress his neck. You don't have to overdo it with the hands. Just make sure your whole body is engaged so your kiss is even sweeter.  Slowly pull away from the person. Don't abruptly stop the kiss and pull away with your whole body, jumping miles apart from your kissing partner. Instead, maintain physical contact while pulling away and holding your partner's gaze. Keep stroking your partner lightly with your hands to let her know how great the kiss was.   Take your time to pull away from physical contact. If you're too abrupt, your partner may think you're not into it.  If you just can't break physical contact or you keep staring in your partner's eyes, then you should keep the kissing train rolling. Lightly stroke your partner's hair or cheek and move in for another kiss. You should still take it slow as you feel the other person out, but you can be a bit more bold and adventurous as your kissing progresses.   If it feels right, you can slowly move in for the French kiss. Just make sure your partner is also gently using his tongue so you don't catch him off guard.  If the first kiss wasn't as good as you expected, don't worry. First kisses are often awkward because both people are still getting to know each other, and your kissing will improve with practice. You can take a break and try another time when it feels right.   Even if it doesn't go well, you should still gently pull away from the person and move on. Don't dwell on what happened, and visualize success for your next kiss.  

freshen your breath.  set the mood.  make sure your partner is ready.  remember to avoid some kissing pitfalls.  make physical contact.  move closer until your faces are just inches apart.  kiss.  pull away.  go in for another kiss if it feels right.  don't be disappointed if it doesn't go well. 

 It may be wise to talk to your boyfriend before embarking on the realms of physical romance. He may not feel ready yet, in which case kissing is best left alone.; , Make sure you are ready for whatever happens. Know your barriers and know your comfort zone.  Find a place you're not likely to be disturbed. Intrusion on this special moment could be the stuff of serious embarrassment. Once you are both comfortable with it, you could eventually kiss in front of friends or whomever under the circumstances.  To continue from here, if you want to make it different and unique, try a different article. For a first kiss, however, it's probably best to be simple. Sometimes simple is romantic. Press softly and close your eyes. Tilt your head and pull them in.  If you're going to do more than a peck, think about kissing for about 10 seconds and then pulling apart.  Think about things you will want to change the next time and such. Have fun with it!  

talk.  consider the timing!,  keep it private!,  move in!,  kiss him.  evaluate! 

 Looking into his eyes is an intimate gesture, and communicates that you're comfortable with him.   Take advantage of small opportunities to make eye contact before you kiss him. Look at him across a crowded room, or find reasons to glance over at him if you're sitting together. Lock eyes just before he kisses you. A sustained gaze as you move closer will let him know that you're interested. (Just don't forget to close your eyes the second before you kiss him.); , Make yourself an active participant in the kiss, instead of just sitting there and passively allowing him to kiss you.   Move your lips. Avoid the dreaded dead fish pose by moving your lips gently open and closed along with the kiss. Just try to avoid smacking noises, and pay attention to your partner's cues on tempo — if he noticeably slows down or speeds up, follow along. French kiss him back. If he's started French kissing you (and you're OK with that), be an equal partner. Instead of allowing his tongue to linger in your mouth, venture your own tongue out.  Small hand motions can show him you're interested, and make the kiss more intense. Try these positions:   Tangle them in his hair Run them over his shoulders Cradle the sides of his face Rest them on his chest or waist  , Nothing will make him feel more amazing than knowing you enjoyed the kiss, so show it! Smile, breathlessly tell him "That was amazing" and look into his eyes again. He won't have any doubt that you meant it.  

look deep in his/her eyes don't just look down or away — hold his gaze!,  kiss actively.  use your hands.  smile at him when the kiss is over. 

 In elementary school, the people that are liked the most are people who are active and social. Being aggressive or causing disruptive behavior could make you unpopular.Try to keep your temper under wraps and go out of your way to talk to other kids in school.   Trying different and new experiences, keeping close friends, and staying away from negative people will increase your happiness.Go out of your way to talk to kids in school and try to make as many friends as possible. Joining a sport or club may also make you more confident and social. If you aren’t known as the “social” kid in school, try to change that. Think about the way you dress, the way you talk to people, and how you interact with adults. Try to be happier and more outgoing every day until you are a more social person.; , If you don’t know the person that you want to kiss very well, a great way to get to know them is to hang out with them during recess. If they are with a group of people, try to become friends with everyone that they hang out with. Make sure to show the person you’re interested in special attention, but don’t make it obvious to everyone around you.   Recess allows kids in elementary school to work on their social skills.A great way to become part of the group is to talk to them about something they are interested in. This can be a new video game, a funny YouTube video, or a musician that they like.Ask them something about themselves. You can say something like "Hey, I noticed that you have a Pokemon bag, I really like Pokemon. What's your favorite?" Think of something that they are interested in and start a conversation about that.  If your teacher lets you pick your own partner or group for a class project, make sure to team up with the person you’re trying to kiss. This will give you an opportunity to talk to them.   Don’t wait till everyone has picked a partner. Try to be the first one to ask them if they want to be your partner. Make eye contact with the person you want to partner with. If they look back at you, there’s a good chance they will partner with you.  Try to sit down at the same table as the person you want to kiss during lunch. This may be difficult if you’re used to sitting in the same seat everyday or your seats are assigned by the lunch aid. If you already have a table that you normally sit at, see if your friends would be willing to move their seats.   Ask the aid if you can change seats, if you have assigned seats.  If you pass them in the hallway or see them after school, make it a point to say hello to them. You don’t have to stop for a conversation, but a smile and wave will go a long way.   If you are at an event like a birthday party or school trip, make it a point to go up and talk to them. Don’t talk about kissing at first. Talk to them like they are your friend. Something as simple as "Hi, how are you today?" might open up a conversation with the person. Get in the habit of doing this daily so they know you want to be friends.  

be social, happy, and confident.  try to hang out with them during recess.  join their group for class projects.  sit with them at lunch.  go out of your way to talk to them and be nice to them. 

 There is a tendency for younger people in elementary school to socialize with people they don’t like romantically. Kissing may not be for everyone, so it’s important that you understand the person you want to kiss, and how they feel about kissing.Ask them about kissing. If they seem grossed out or embarrassed, they may not be ready for a kiss. You don’t have to give away your intentions to kiss them. Say something like “My older brother kissed his girlfriend in front of me. What do you think about kissing?” You can ask their friends how they feel about kissing.  If someone does not like you, they probably won’t want to kiss you. Think about how you talk and treat each other. If they are constantly telling you to go away, that you’re annoying, or that they don’t want to be around you, it’s a good sign they don’t like you.   If they always go out of their way to help you and always wants to talk to you, they may like you. If they tease you, don’t lose hope. Some kids in elementary school tease other kids because they like them.If they go out of their way to talk to you and be around you, it might be a sign that they actually like you, even if teasing is involved.  You can’t force or trick anyone to like you. If you feel like your crush doesn’t like you, try to find someone else. It might be hard and it may make you very sad, but you shouldn’t be ashamed. There are plenty of people that will enjoy your company.   Try to make friends with other kids in school to take your mind off the person you want to kiss. Don’t give up immediately. Don’t assume they don’t like you without trying to talk to them.  If you want to kiss a boy, there are common signs that point to if he likes your or not. If he fiddles with his shirt or socks, leans or stands with a wide stance, talks with his hands, or seems nervous, there’s a good chance he likes you.If you’re curious if a girl likes you, she will usually tilt her head towards you, point her feet in your direction, play with her hair, or will blush when she’s around you.Don’t take every action as a sign of something. Only consider this advice if this is how they always act around you.  Even if you’re scared or self conscious, act like you are confident. If you smile, stand up straight, and talk clearly, it will appear like you're confident even if you’re not.Try practicing when you’re in other situations so you can do it naturally when you’re around your crush.  

talk to them about how they feel about kissing.  think about how they treat you.  if the person doesn’t like you, move on.  look at their body language and see how they act.  act confidently when you’re around them. 

 You don’t want your kiss to be out in the open with everyone staring at you. Try to find a place where there are not a lot of people. If you kiss in school, you may get in trouble if the teachers see you doing it.Other good places to kiss are at a school dance, during a school sports event, or if you are hanging out outside of school. Just try to stay out of the open when you do it. Ask the person by saying, "Hey, do you want to go and hang out alone over there? It's a lot less quiet and we can talk."  , The eyes can show a range of emotions, and are important for romance.Pay attention to how the other person reacts when you look into their eyes. If they look uncomfortable, they may not want to kiss you.   The other person will most likely be nervous. Don’t confuse this with them not liking you. If you’re unsure, you can ask them "Do you like being alone with me? Do you like me?" or "Would you mind if I kissed you?" If they are not pulling away and look comfortable as you gaze into their eyes, you may not have to ask them permission because they may want to kiss you as well.  Before going in for the kiss, make sure that the person feels comfortable with you touching them in a romantic way.   If the person pull their hand away, you know that they feel uncomfortable. Never force physical contact with anyone. It’s inappropriate, illegal, and could get you in a lot of trouble.  Go in for the kiss and don’t think about the consequences. This will probably be very hard to do at first. However, if you never take that first step, you won’t be able to kiss anyone.   For younger kids in elementary school, make sure to kiss on the cheek so that they aren’t grossed out or startled by you. If you are kissing on the lips, make sure you brush your teeth or use a mint before doing it. 

go to a spot alone with them.  gaze into their eyes.  hold their hand or put your arm around them.  touch your lips on their lips, or on their cheek. 

 For this kind of friend, don’t bother trying to dress up the bad news. Don’t use clichés and don’t try to make them see the bright side. Just give it to them straight.   The way you deliver your message has to be tailored to the type of friend you’re dealing with. This will make the message more effective, and makes it easier for your friend to accept the truth. An example of a message tailored to this kind of friend: “I spoke to Lisa yesterday, and she told me she doesn’t like you the way you like her. Sorry.”; , These friends are usually the loudest, and you’ll often find them planning social outings; they’re the passionate and outgoing type. With them, you need to work on the content and delivery of your message. Help them see the silver lining in the situation by focusing on helping them move on.   For these friends, an example delivery would look like: “So I talked to Greg. He doesn’t see you that way but you’re worth it, and you deserve someone who’ll think so. Now let’s do something to make you feel better!”, People with this kind of personality don’t have the best reaction to bad news; they tend to get a bit stubborn and drag their heels. Bad news like this needs a bit of reinforcement to sink it for this kind of person, but you need to make sure you provide a lot of reassurance over time.   With these friends, say something like: “Mary told me she doesn’t have a crush. It’s going to hurt for a bit, but you can get through this. Keep your chin up.”, For your brainier friend who’s used to thinking everything through, be prepared for a lengthier process. After you give them the bad news, they’ll need some time to process things before they start asking questions or really needing your help. Take this time to prepare for their questions and be ready to support them.   Introducing these news to this kind of friend will sound something like: “So I spoke to Bryan, and he doesn’t have a crush on you. Take your time, think about it, I’m here if you want to talk about it.” 

be blunt with purposeful, determined friends.  focus on the positive with creative friends.  be patient with your more gentle, caring friends.  give the analysts time and space. 

 Remember that rejection is difficult. Your friend might lash out or retreat inwards and blame themselves for the situation. No matter their reaction, you need to make sure you’re respectful and treat them with dignity. Telling your friend to “man up” or to “stop being a baby” is a sure fire way of making them feel worse about the whole situation.   If your friend lashes out and starts insulting their crush, tell them that while you understand how they feel, they should avoid using insults. Remind them that it’s not helpful or kind to lob insults, even when you’re in pain., Your friend, in their pain and frustration, might react by taking it out on you. Don’t take this to heart: you’re not to blame. Rejection is hard, and your friend might be lashing out at the first target they see to vent their frustrations. While helping your friend through their feelings, you can remind them that they shouldn’t attack you.   If your friend asks why you told them, explain to that it’s for their own good; you didn’t want to see them pursue someone who’s not interested in them.  Don’t think your job is done once you’ve told your friend the truth about their crush. After delivering the hard truth, make sure you stick around to support your friend.   Help by thinking of solutions. If you can think of a better match for your friend, try to get your friend thinking about them instead. If your friend has a big project coming up soon, try to help them focus on that., It’s important to help your friend remember that they’re still someone worthy of love. The important thing is to help them save face; just because this crush doesn’t like them doesn’t mean no one else will. Use compliments! Reinforce your friend’s qualities by saying them out loud. Remind them that these things make them a great catch, and that someone will see that too.  

respect your friend’s feelings.  don’t take anything they say personally.  help your friend think of the future.  reinforce their self-worth. 

 You have nothing to prove and nothing to lose. Kissing is a two way street and the guy is probably more nervous than you are. Take deep breaths, but don't make it too obvious that you're trying to calm yourself down., Passionate kissing can be frenzied, calm and meditative, or anywhere in between. There is an unspoken process where both parties will try to match the type of passion the other is aching for.   It helps to synchronize breathing rates., A good way to begin building sexual tension is to keep him talking. Be in a location that is secluded. Having the option to sit is an extra bonus. Just keep a conversation no matter how mundane it feels. The bleaker the conversation the higher your chances are that he's thinking about kissing you.  A great way to signal that you're ready to kiss is to go back and forth from looking at his eyes and his lips. This will create tension that is necessary to have a truly passionate kiss. If he repeats and looks at your lips, he is ready for those kissing sparks to fly.  There are ways of being sly about getting close to him, but you want this move to be obvious. This is another clue for him to know that you want to start kissing.It will help if your bodies are slightly touching. Even if your body contact is ever so slight, it will feel exciting.  Try and keep the conversation going, and touch him on the thigh or his arm. Another good spot to excite and comfort him is to put your hand behind his neck. Be sure to keep your eyes fixed on his eyes, but take quick glances at his lips.  Tilt your head slightly and move close to his face and pause right before you reach his face. You shouldn't do all the work, but initiating the kiss yourself will excite him. It isn't as popular for the girl to make the first move, but there isn't a rule book to kissing!  

relax.  match the energy of the person you're with.  keep a conversation.  use your eyes.  lean close to him.  touch him.  move in for the kiss. 

 Practice with the back of your hand in the privacy of your own room or when you are alone so you don't look strange because you are essentially kissing yourself.   To do this, you should open your mouth as wide as your index finger when you have it laying sideways over your mouth. Put your lips gently over the back of your hand. You can move your lips in a circular motion, or pretend like you are lightly sucking the juice out of a fruit, like a plum.; , Practice parting your lips in a circular motion.   You can also use your tongue, like you're gently pushing into the flesh of a soft fruit.  

use the back of your hand.  stand in front of the mirror and pretend like she is front of you. 

 You do not want to open your mouth too wide or else he might feel strange. Just open it big enough to fit his lip securely between yours. Show your tongue ever so slightly. Don't fully extend your tongue at this stage.  Start gently kissing your partner on the lips, don't rush. It is good to build the pace naturally. Rushing into the kiss can decrease the potential passion., Run your fingers through his hair, his beard, or his shirt, and grab onto them. Pulling him into the heat of the moment is a good way to fire up his passion., Again kissing is a two way street. You might want to wait, if this is your first time, for him to initiate french kissing. Gently massage his tongue with yours while his tongue is inside your mouth. When you're ready you can try entering into his mouth. Then gently massage his tongue and the roof of his mouth.Don't force your tongue into his mouth too quickly. You also don't want to go too deep.  After you've been french kissing for a while, try moving your head away momentarily. Look at him and smile. Then either he'll come back in for the kiss, or you can go back for it.  This is another way to enhance the passion. Lightly bite and suckle his neck. Do not do this for too long or else he will get a hickey. If you want to show off a hickey on his neck, then go for it. Feel out the vibes from him.  While your kissing, one way to show your passion is to bite his lip. Don't bite too hard or he might bleed. Only do this if you're confident and think he might like it.  

open your mouth.  start slow.  use your fingers.  use your tongue.  ease the kissing.  kiss his neck.  bite his lip. 

 You don't want to start initiating a kiss in a location that isn't opportune. You're looking for somewhere secluded and where you can hopefully sit.  Passion can't always be planned out in a step by step process. You need to be flexible and able to easily adapt with the mood of your partner., A boy will be into it if you are spontaneous and confident. If you're going on a walk and see a picturesque trail, then grab his hand and pull him along. Exploring places with someone will increase your security and bond together.  This can be the hardest part about passion and kissing. Only go with this guy if he does something for you. Not just buying you material products, but if he excites you or makes you laugh, he may be worthy.  Periodically through your date with this guy you should give him slight physical attention. You don't need to overdo this, but every once in a while grab his arm when he says something funny. 

pick the right time.  go with the flow.  be spontaneous.  pick the right guy.  touch him. 

 It's an all-too-common tale of woe: someone confesses true love to a best friend only to discover that things aren't really "the same" after. Telling your best friend that you love her forces both of you to re-evaluate the way you look at each other. It's important to weigh the relationship you have now against the one you might have only if everything goes well. If your current relationship is really important to you, you may not want to risk it.   The fact that it's almost impossible to go back to "the way things were" after your confession doesn't necessarily mean that you'll ruin your relationship with your best friend. However, it does mean that you'll almost definitely change it. For example, if you used to see movies together in a strictly platonic way, this may become an awkward activity.; , It's very important not to fool yourself into thinking that you'll live happily ever after with her if you can just tell her how you feel. Doing this is setting yourself up for a huge disappointment if she doesn't feel the same way. You don't have to be a pessimist about your chances, but you do need to be realistic and remember that it's her choice whether things move further — not a sure thing. If you can't bear the thought of rejection, you may want to move on.   Remember that rejection doesn't always mean that you're not "good enough."There are a number of reasons why someone may not want to date. For instance, she may not want to have a serious relationship with anyone at the moment. There may even be things that you don't know about that prevent her from dating, like work and school commitments that take all of her time.  Did your feelings for your best friend arrive suddenly without warning? If so, you may want to give yourself a few weeks or months to see whether the feelings "stick." Feeling attracted to someone today doesn't necessarily mean you'll feel the same way forever. Don't risk a great friendship with a confession of love only to discover that what you really had was a short-term crush (or, as psychologists say, an "infatuation"). Below are just a few signs that these professionals use to identify infatuation:Infatuation comes on almost instantly (rather than gradually). Infatuation is powerful, but short-lived. Infatuation is mainly focused on physical attraction. Infatuation makes you see the other person as "perfect" or "flawless"  This is different than seeing someone as perfect for you --that is, someone who has flaws, but you appreciate these flaws because you are able to compensate for them.   Infatuation isn't being in love with someone else — it's being in love with the feeling of being in love.  Though it can be a little awkward to talk with other people about deeply personal feelings, it's often a good idea in situations like this. Having a crush can make it hard to judge situations realistically, so other peoples' advice can be a huge help. If it seems like most of your peers are telling you not to go after someone, you should seriously consider their advice.   A few people you may want to consider talking to include: Your other friends  Her friends (if you know them well enough) — they may even be able to tell you how she feels about you Siblings or parents that you're especially close to A counselor or teacher you trust  , When you tell your best friend you love her, you want to do as much as you can to make her calm and comfortable. Pick a time and a place where neither of you will have other big emotional stresses to worry about. It's difficult for anyone to make smart decisions about romantic issues when they're already under pressure from something else. A few examples of things that can make for a less-than-great environment to talk about your feelings with her include:   She has something important coming up that she needs to focus on (like a big exam or a role in a play). She has just gotten out of a major relationship (or is still in one — this is a definite no-go). She is going through a difficult period in her life (trouble at work or school, family issues, etc.). An example of a good time and place to bring your feelings up is when you're enjoying a comfortable, casual one-on-one hangout on the weekend.  Dropping delicate hints about your intentions is a good way to judge your chances of success without putting your friendship at too much of a risk. If she responds to your gentle flirting lukewarmly or seems to feel uncomfortable, you'll know to back off. See our article on flirting for great step-by-step instructions. A few basic tips you may want to keep in mind can be found below:Use affectionate body language. Maintain good eye contact and smile. Touch her arm or shoulder when she makes you laugh. Gently tease her for minor slip-ups. For best results, have a good sense of humor about it and make it obvious that you're kidding. Try to one or two weave compliments into the conversation. If you can do it while also gently teasing her, all the better. Keep things lighthearted and don't come on too strong. You may risk tipping your hand too early or even creeping her out.  Dating is something you do after you establish a romantic connection with someone — not before. Treating your best friend to a nice candlelit dinner may seem like a nice thing to do, but it can be confusing for her if she doesn't catch on to what you're trying to do (or awkward if she does). Save the presents and formal dinners for later. Your best bet for now is to arrange a much more casual hang-out session.   In addition, you'll be spending money (maybe even quite a bit of it) on something that may turn out poorly for you. If you save your money, you can always take someone else on a date if your best friend doesn't have romantic feelings for you.  There's almost no way to have this conversation without both of you having strong emotions, so give her the courtesy of a little privacy. You don't have to be completely isolated for this, but it should be someplace comfortable where your conversation won't be overheard and you won't be interrupted.   An example of a good place to have this conversation is a bench in a park far away from other people. You'll be comfortable, it will unlikely for other people to interfere, and, best of all, you'll have a romantic view. Whatever you do, don't make a big public spectacle. Remember that there's a significant chance she'll say "no" — in this case, attracting a crowd will be very embarrassing for both of you.  When you're with your best friend somewhere private and comfortable, you have one final chance to back out. If you're still ready to go through with things, it's time to tell her what's been on your mind. Do your best to stay relaxed while you open up to your friend. Remember — it'll all be over soon, and even if things don't go your way, you'll at least have peace of mind.   It's only natural to get some butterflies (and many girls will find a little nervousness cute), but being so nervous that you can barely get your words out will make things a lot harder. See our article on staying calm under stress for more help.  Don't waste much time beating around the bush. Be simple and direct. Tell your friend how she makes you feel. This will be different for everyone, so try to follow your heart. A few things you may want to mention are suggested below, but feel free to phrase things differently if you think it will be more genuine.   Tell her that, lately, you've been thinking of her as more than a friend and that you wanted to know how she felt. Tell her that you've been struggling your feelings for some time and that you're just relieved to finally open up about it. Tell her that, no matter how she feels, you value her and you want to have a positive relationship with her. This is crucial — you don't want her to feel like you're only interested in knowing her if she wants to be romantic with you  , This conversation is likely to be a little awkward no matter which way it goes. However, you can make things much less awkward for both of you if you give your friend a reasonable way to say "no" without embarrassing herself. This isn't as hard as it sounds — basically, just mention that it's OK if she doesn't want to get together right now. A few things you may want to mention are listed below:   Tell her that you completely understand if she can't be in a relationship right now. Tell her that you don't know whether she has anything going on in her life that might keep you two from dating. Stress that you won't be upset if she doesn't feel the same way as you.  Big, dramatic displays of emotion might seem like a good idea, but they can make this conversation a lot more stressful and tense than it needs to be. Try to talk in a calm voice and to use a friendly, lighthearted tone. You can even use a little humor to ease the tension by joking about how antsy you've been to talk about this — a well-placed laugh can make things much easier.    Note: You will probably want to avoid actually using the word "love." For many people, this word can have a huge weight that may make the prospect of being with you a little scary. Most relationship experts recommend against using "the L word" until after you're dating., The decision you're asking your friend to make is an important one. Don't force her into a position where she has to give you an answer right away or she may not be able to give the best, most honest answer possible. If she seems on the fence, tell her that it's alright if she needs some time to think. Tell her that you're willing to give her space while she's making up her mind.  Ask for your friend's input throughout the conversation — be sure to allow her to express her self and not to dominate the conversation. When she comes to a decision (whether that's right away or days later), listen to what she says. It's OK to ask questions about the way she feels, but don't question the decision itself. This is her decision to make and yours to accept (not the other way around).   If she doesn't feel the same way about you that you feel about her, don't try to change her mind. This is an easy way to come across as desperate. If you really love her, you should want her to be happy, even if you don't agree with her reasoning.  If your best friend reacts positively, congratulations! Celebrate your success by planning a date with your new sweetheart. If, on the other hand, your friend doesn't like the idea of romance, you should be prepared to "step back" from your relationship — at least for a while. There may be difficult feelings on both side even if your best friend lets you down gently and gracefully.   Luckily, as the old saying goes, "time heals all wounds." Spending a few weeks or a month away from someone who's rejected you can be a very good thing. It can allow you to heal, accept the fact that you won't be getting together, and move on to new romantic prospects. When you do meet up with your best friend again, take things slow. You may not go back to the same level of intimacy you had before right away. Be willing to gradually work your way back into a close platonic relationship. It may not be exactly the same as the relationship you used to have, but it's unlikely to be worse.  

realize that this can change your friendship permanently.  realize that rejection is a serious possibility.  realize that romantic feelings can change over time.  realize that you don't have to go it alone.  wait for an appropriate opportunity.  test the waters with subtle flirting.  don't arrange a "date" yet.  bring your friend somewhere semi-private when you want to tell her.  take a deep breath before you "dive in.",  be honest.  give her a convenient way out if she doesn't want to be with you.  try to keep the conversation low-key.  don't press your friend for a decision.  listen and accept whatever outcome you get.  be ready to give your friend a little space. 

 Gesture by looking into her eyes, looking at her lips, and then back at her eyes to show your readiness. , If she is nervous and you feel like the time is right to kiss her, catching her off-guard by kissing her might take the edge off and pleasantly surprise her — and you!  , Touch her hand gently when you're talking to her; compliment her eyes or hair; or stare longingly into her eyes. Never underestimate what a simple touch can do to set the mood for the perfect first kiss. Touching your girlfriend breaks the barrier that separates the two of you and paves the way to a more intimate connection, which is the kiss .  Fix the other person's gaze with your eyes and don't close your eyes until you've gone into the kiss. Locking onto her eyes is the best way to pull her in to grab that kiss. 

use your eyes.  sit really close to her to show affection and establish intimacy.  work up to the kiss by flirting.  maintain eye contact until you kiss. 

 A few signals that show her readiness can save you from making the wrong move:   She stares at your lips a lot. She starts talking about kissing, or kiss-related topics. Is she talking about how she has never had a great kiss? is she revealing to you that she appreciates a great kisser? If so it's time to pucker up and grace her with your kiss. She pauses, as if expecting a kiss, especially at the end of the date. Be sure that there is no other reason for her apparent pausing and expectant state. If she is not appearing uncomfortable and appears to like the intimacy with you, then it is assumed that you can go in for a kiss.  

read clear, non-verbal signs from your girl. 

 Since you've never been kissed, you may find it difficult to read your girl's non-verbal cues.  A few prompts would be:   I really want to kiss you right now... I want to show you just how much you mean to me... Can I kiss you goodnight?  

go ahead and ask.  be creative and ask in a way that puts her at ease. 

 Making sure you have a great relationship as friends before moving onto anything else should be considered as much more than simply preparing for your big seduction. If you are friends with someone already, he is going to base your seduction on what he knows of you as a person, moreso than the seduction itself. There are friendships in all varying degrees, but many things should be true for all of them.   Try to make a regular habit of talking to him. Even if it's small talk, it goes to show that you're interested in him as a person and care about the little things. Make him feel good about himself. People choose the people in their life usually depending on how they make each other feel. This is true for relationships as much as friendships.; , You only want to make your move if you think the timing is right. If your friend just heard some bad news and is looking for a shoulder to cry on, a seduction might not be a good idea. The same is true if there is a lack of chemistry between the two of you at the given time. If you think things aren't working at the moment, it's better to wait it out.   Try not to wait too long, however. In doing so, you might let someone else take your friend into a relationship, thus ruining your chances at seduction.  As a general rule, the more two people of the opposite sex spend together, the more chance there is for something to spark. Before you go in for a direct seduction, sometimes simply asking to hang out often says a lot on its own. If you don't spend time together on a regular basis, you should ask him to meet up. Even if you are just meeting as friends, it's a great way to maximize the chances of something happening.   Time in a group is okay, but there is little chance of something special coming out of that. One on one time is different however, as it means the two people are there specifically for time with each other.  A proper seduction cannot take place if you're in a crowded area. To be intimate, you need an intimate space. This could be at the end of a night at a party together, or after one of you has invited the other over. A quiet, private setting is important because you don't want any external pressures affecting the way the seduction is received. Even if someone wants to be seduced, he may feel shy about it if he thinks his friends will be there to see it happen.  Even if your friend finds you physically attractive, you will have a hard time of properly seducing him if you're bringing his mood down. Emphasize your positive side. This can be done as simply as making a conscious decision to be pleasant around the person you would like to seduce. Being cheerful leads to opportunities to flirt more openly, whether you consciously mean to or not. A proper seduction is very rarely a serious thing., It's the way that's going to break the two of you past the barrier between friends and something more. Light touching can include anything from a hug to a brief touch on the arm. These movements aren't risking a lot, and you can usually tell from the way they're reacting to it whether they'll accept bolder gestures.   You can try to keep your flirtations subtle if you want to save the chance of pulling back if you decide your affections aren't being reciprocated., While it's normal to make eye contact with a friend while you're talking, prolonged eye contact usually hints at something more. Studies have shown that holding someone's gaze for an extended amount of time can provoke intense feelings.Even if you normally spend time with this friend, make a point of keeping eye contact while you seduce him.   The reaction of eye contact can be positive or negative. A lot of it depends on whether the other person finds you physically attractive., If the friend you want to seduce is already close and comfortable enough with you, regular conversation should come naturally to the two of you. With the foundations in place, you'll want to work playful flirting into your talk. Exchanging light, teasing remarks into your conversation is a great place to start.Compliments are a more direct way of showing interest, especially if those compliments are aimed at things you're typically attracted to.   An example of a flirtatious remark: "Your hair looks great today. I think it really suits you."  , A simple but important thing to do before you make the final push is to reflect on the ways in which your friend has reacted towards your flirtations thus far. If he's smiled when you've touched him or responded to your teasing with teasing of his own, it's probable your friend is inviting you to make a move. On the contrary, if your friend is looking uncomfortable, it's probably a sign you should back off.   Everyone's psychology is different. If you are already friends with this person, you should have at least a basic idea how you think he'd react to someone he's attracted to.  All seductions involve a moment of truth. Most often, this means a kiss, although it might also mean an overtly sexual or romantic comment. If your friend has responded well to non-committal overtures, you can move in. Kissing on the lips is often seen as something that is reserved for more than just friends. Once you think the time is right, move in. Don't be too quick about it either. It may be stressful, but it's not an experience you want to rush.   All bold moves are risky by their very nature. It's a good idea to feel out your chances before making a commitment to the seduction.  Women generally tend to play a more submissive role in seductions, but women sometimes play it off as an active way to pull a man in. If you think there is mutual attraction there, he may well be waiting for the right moment to make his own move. You should let him know that it's a good idea to step in.  Consequences for a seduction could be very good, or very bad. Your friendship could give birth to a one-night stand or even a long-term relationship. On the other hand, things can get uncomfortable and awkward quickly. If this is the case, the best way to repair a friendship (provided you want to repair it) is by talking openly about what happened.Explain what you felt and why you wanted to do what you did.   It's usually best not to pry into questions like why he rejected you. Focusing on the rejection itself can lead to bitterness on both ends. If all is indeed lost, you have to accept your losses. Not everything is going to work out the way you want it to; the same is especially true in pursuing relationships., If the seduction has failed for whatever reason, there's going to be a spot of awkwardness. It is best to turn this into an opportunity for both sides to vent their feelings and say how they feel. This may lessen the impact of the rejection, but it's necessary if you want to keep the friendship alive. Be honest with how you feel. If the other person tries to brush it off as a joke, it may be best to follow through with that and move past the episode as quickly as possible. Otherwise, it's a good idea to talk about what happened as friends. Make sure to let your friend that you care about her as a friend, in spite of any added attraction you've had for her.   You might start a conversation with something like this: "I know how this might look. While I am attracted to you, I also value you as a great friend. I hope you don't think I feel any less of you because of this."  , Following the seduction, you need to move forward. This is true whether the seduction worked, you're staying friends, or the friendship was ruined as a result. The outcomes vary wildly, but even in the worst case, there is no benefit in letting yourself suffer over it. An important part of life lies in accepting your decisions and learning from them. Even if you regret making the seduction, you should forgive yourself as soon as you can. After all, you were taking a risk, and for that, you should feel proud of yourself.   If the seduction fails completely and your friendship is terminated, fill the emotional void with something new and fresh.Keep yourself occupied. The people who heal from emotional pain the fastest are those who stay busy. Don't take it personally. Move on, and fuel your frustrations towards getting to a better place in life. If the seduction fails but you manage to remain friends, try to let things resume as they did. Staying friends is easiest if you manage to talk things through when the seduction happens. Accept that some feelings aren't mutual, while others are.If you're rejected at first and the friendship stays together, he might begin to see just how much you value him. If you let the subject be for the time being, there is the chance he might change his mind and realize what a catch you are.  If you are already friends with someone, there is some chance you can figure out your chances of success based on your existing interactions. Is there already some flirting involved in your interactions together? Is she involved with someone else already? Do you get the impression she already finds you attractive? If you get a less-than-desired answer for at least one of these questions, it does not necessarily mean there is no hope for you. Rather, you'll have to play your cards right, and possibly change things about yourself to suit her needs in a partner.   Having expectations beforehand is an important part of making things work. Even if you do successfully seduce your friend, things can go sour quickly if you don't know where to go from there.  Whether they respond well to your seduction is another thing, but you should keep in mind that you friend may already have feelings for you that you haven't noticed yourself. If you go about it in a way that isn't weird or demanding, the gesture can seem affectionate if anything.  Unlike trying to date a stranger, there is more of a risk factor in meaning to seduce a friend. For starters, you could ruin your friendship. Even worse, the fallout from it could affect other mutual friendships as well. On the other hand, a friendship that is strong enough can usually survive a failed seduction, provided things are discussed openly.Cross-reference your expectations with your expected chances and decide for yourself whether you should go through with it. There is no easy answer to a question like this, but it is important that you live with whatever decision you make. Although going for the seduction may seem like the riskier move, staying quiet can result in just as much pain if you really like the person.  It should also be said that there are varying degrees of success that relate to your expectations. If you want a relationship but think you'll only get a one night stand at best, it is up for debate whether it is worth it. Likewise, it is also dubious to attempt a one-night stand with someone you think may get emotionally tied to you after the fact.  There are a lot of degrees by which you could seduce a friend. You may want to get a full relationship with her, and it's possible you may otherwise prefer a 'friends with benefits'-type situation. If a 'friends with benefits' arrangement is what you're specifically looking for, it's recommended you try looking for one of your friends that is already open and comfortable with sexuality. 

be a good friend first.  make sure the circumstances are right.  spend a lot of time together.  find a quiet moment together.  make the interaction light and playful.  express attraction through light touching.touch is an important part of flirting.  hold your friend's gaze.  work flirtation into your conversation.  gauge your friend's current reaction.  make a bold move.  open yourself to the possibility of being seduced.a strange thing about seduction is that it sometimes becomes hard to know who is seducing who.  accept the consequences.  talk things through.  take things forward.  consider your chances.  recognize that your friend may already want to be seduced.seduction is essentially a form of positive attention, and there isn't a person who doesn't enjoy feeling wanted.  determine whether or not a seduction is worth it.  pinpoint your expectations.  decide what you want from your friend. 

 If you tell him and he likes you, but then realize you don't It could ruin your all's friendship!; , If you do something big and flashy he will know something is up. But instead of going with all your friends, just go with him. It'll be fun and you can have some alone time with him.  If he is not, well, you can change that. I mean you're his friend, right?  ,, Short and simple. Just like "(insert his name here), what do you think about me?" And if he says "What do you mean?", tell him, "I think I like you more of a friend. And I was wondering how you feel." .  If he changes the conversation, do not worry: he knows. Did you think he would just get up and kiss you? He probably is nervous too. And when and if he does, stick with it.  It may be a bit awkward at first, but if things go back to normal quick then it wasn't meant to be.  Don't text, he can use this against you.  If you say no/not for a long time he might feel like you would be uncomfortable so he won't ask you out. If you say yes/just recently he might feel more comfortable asking you out.  

make sure you love him first.  do something you and your friends usually do.  decide what mood he is in --if he is all goofy he might not take you seriously -- he should be in a happy mood.  get his attention by saying his name.  ,  look him in the eyes, and say it.  keep looking at him, and wait for his response.  go to different places together.  talk to each other, laugh, enjoy each other, if you get too nervous you can always call.  if he loves you he might ask if you have had/recently had a boyfriend. 

 It is important to know that your changed feelings towards your friend are for real and are not just some flight of fancy brought about by a soppy movie or seeing other friends together as couples. This must be a genuine hit-in-the-gut experience, when you surpass the standard friendship reality and envision the two of you together for years to come. Ask yourself:   Is this real? Or am I just wanting something that I know isn't going to work out? Do I have the fortitude to cope with being rejected if I suggest a more intimate relationship and he rejects me? Do I think things can be patched up should this happen? Has he shown me any signs of interest? Is he currently in a relationship?; , It's no good barging in on an existing relationship he has with someone else, proclaiming that he's making a mistake by not choosing you instead. Not only will this seem very out-of-the-blue to him but it's possible that your friendship won't recover if he sees this as an act to destabilize and existing relationship.  Nurture your friendship. If you still feel this way down the track and he breaks off with this person, you'll be there for him. If he doesn't break it off, then friendship it was meant to be. Hollywood movies aside, it is just not that helpful to go around busting up your friend's love life.  If he still has a fire for his ex, you don't want him as a beau. So, how do you find out? Ask him! Do it casually, as part of your usual conversations. Get him to talk about his feelings for his ex, whether they're good or bad. Get him to reveal whether he's seen his ex lately, if they still keep in touch, and so forth. If he's not over his ex yet, back off. If he is, then consider him available (with caution, of course).  Let your guy friend know in no uncertain terms that you are 100 percent over that "person" who broke your heart. Still being hung up on an ex is a major deterrent for any person seeking a close relationship; nobody wants the drama and disappointment that comes with that. Hence, if you want this guy friend to know that you're available, make your relationship health status very clear.  Let your guy friend know how much you highly think of him and how much you think he would make a great boyfriend for someone one day. It is a subtle yet obvious enough clue to hear that you think he would actually make a fabulous boyfriend.  But don't call it a date. In its place, invite him out to the movies one night, as friends. If he asks you out the following weekend and you ask him about again, the next thing you know, you both will find yourself dating.  Send him comical text messages and e-mails. It's a fantastic way to build your friendship and future relationship. Guys want to feel that they can be themselves with you. By letting all hang out, you're letting him know that you're fun and cool at the same time.  

work through your feelings before doing anything else.  be certain that he's free from commitment.  if he is dating someone right now, back off.  if he had an ex recently, find out whether he is over the ex yet.  if you've recently had an ex, reassure him that you're over this person.  hint to your guy friend that you're interested.  ask him out on a date.  text and e-mail him. 

 Some of these will be fairly obvious. She may want to be with someone with the same religious values, or a non-smoker. You don't have to necessarily meet all of her criteria, but you should avoid failing to meet her standards, as this will often remove you from her romantic pool.Make a list of features shared by all her previous boyfriends. These are likely things she makes it a priority to find in her romantic interests, and may be characteristics you should consider cultivating in yourself.; , This is often related to her own personal characteristics. Many people, including your female friend, search for a partner with the same positive characteristics that they like in themselves, but want qualities in a partner that are opposite to the things they dislike about themselves.After you find out some of the things she dislikes about herself, show her how you can compliment those areas with your strengths. You could say: I hate how competitive I am. I think I'd be much happier if I learned to enjoy things instead of making them into a competition. What about you? If you could change one thing about yourself, what would it be?"  , Psychologists have discovered that as we go through life, we start developing a "love map," or an idea of who we want to be in a relationship.Some aspects of her love map will be conscious, like she might want an educated partner, but these can also be subconscious preferences, like how affectionate her partner is. By understanding her love map, you can meet her needs better. Though there are many variables that will affect her particular love map, look for these criteria to guide you in understanding her love map:   The expectation of romantic relationships to involve commitment. The accepted duration for a relationship. A belief that the "right" romantic partner will bring satisfaction. The ideal length of time acceptable before arriving at a romantic commitment (saying “I love you”). The length of time between a breakup and becoming involved in a new relationship. The acceptable length of time spent waiting for a partner to commit. The level of acceptable disagreement on basic life values. Whether or not an argument with a partner is exciting or frightening. Whether or not a polyamorous relationship is acceptable. The amount of time expected to be spent seperate from friends, family, and social events/obligations., Be on your best behavior when you do so, because these people will give you a window into her life that few others will have at their disposal. If you're serious about your love for your female friend, expressing your genuine caring for her to her friends will likely earn you their respect, and maybe their approval.   You don't have to bare your heart and confess your love to her friends; try to earn the respect of her friends by being a nice guy. Explain how you've noticed she's been stressed and ask what they think you can do. Or mention that she's been a good friend and you want to do something nice, what do they think she'd appreciate?  , Breakups, especially difficult breakups, will cause her to revise her love map, whether consciously or unconsciously. By showing her that you are different from her ex, you'll make yourself a more desirable potential partner., Science has shown that the chemicals released when you and her experience fear together are linked closely with arousal and attraction.Thrilling experiences can give you both a dose of good anxiety, and set the tone for the next stage in your relationship.   Roller coasters and amusement parks are a great way to get the blood pumping without actually scaring her. A suspenseful thriller can also have this effect, though you might want to avoid slasher and gore-filled films. You don't want yourself associated with the homicidal, even if you do want her heart.  The physical response you have to a workout mimics your body's response to arousal.By exercising together, not only will you both be riding an endorphin high which she'll start associating with you, but also, she'll likely see you in a more attractive light., This may seem underhanded, but if you really are a good match and she just can't see it, your efforts to win her over can get a boost when supported by a trusted source, like her friends.If her friends think you're great, chances are she'll agree. This can only work to your advantage while winning her heart.  The more you hear something, the more you'll believe its true.This same fact will work in your favor when winning over your female friend. You don't have call every five minutes, which might put her off, but by staying in sight or being around her frequently, you'll reinforce the naturalness of your presence there.  This may seem a little over the top, and you might not want to employ something as obvious as a candlelit dinner. After all, you don't want to come on too strong. However, studies have shown that large pupils are a signal to which your female friend will unconsciously respond.Dilated pupils can be an indication of many things, but for your situation, most important is that pupils dilate when feeling physical or psychological pleasure.Going to a movie as friends or a dimly lit coffee shop and making eye contact will send her subconscious the sign that you have chemistry.  When you feel like you've met your perfect match, it's easy to say too much too soon. Holding back can be difficult, but by not giving her all the details, she'll find her mind wondering more and more about you, which could lead feelings of friendship to something more., This can be tricky, as every woman will have a different level of flirtation she is comfortable with. Take cues from her past relationships. What did you notice other guys did that worked? What flopped? Remember, its important to respect her boundaries, even when trying to win her heart.   Compliment with a hint of sexiness. Instead of saying that she looks good, you might instead say, "If only my last date were as breathtaking as you." This way, you indicate subtly that you think you would be a good match while complimenting her. Find ways to be physically close. In all relationships, closeness is a sign of comfort and intimacy.Though keep in mind, some people need more personal space than others. Don't force closeness; find ways of naturally and comfortably coming together. The hushed atmosphere of museums makes whispering while standing close normal. Allow your touches to linger. You will need to gauge her comfort level before attempting this, as an unexpected touch can come across as pushy. But physical touch releases oxytocin in the blood, sometimes referred to as the "love hormone.", If your female friend is externally dependent, that is, if she relies on people or things outside of herself to feel good about herself, it's likely she will be thrilled if you chase after her.Be wary of coming on too strong. Many independent women consider that kind of behavior to be suffocating, which won't win you points in her book of love.  This is your friend, and even if you've been suffering with these romantic feelings for a long time, the last thing you should want is to make her feel uncomfortable. Strong emotions make it easy to get carried away; don't allow your strong feelings to compromise your friendship.   Journaling about your feelings can help you feel less overwhelmed, which can be a powerful preventative for making a hasty, emotional decision.Write a personal letter. This will help you get all the things you want to say down on paper, without having said them to your female friend. Now you can think about whether these might come across as too strong; the last thing you want is to scare her away, especially if there's potential for love.  Does she constantly want to hang out with you alone? Do you find her looking at you more frequently, or did she break up with a boyfriend for no particular reason that you know of?These can all be signals that she is becoming interested in you as more than just a friend.  This can be dangerous, as sometimes friends will make decisions on their own that they feel is best for your female friend. However, if she has a friend that you are also friends with, and trust, you can get a clear read on the situation by asking if you stand a chance.   Be sure you express yourself clearly: "Has she said anything about me? I really want to be the one to tell her myself, but I've been thinking lately that we might be good as more than friends."  , As her friend, this will be a lot easier for you to determine than some stranger off the street. Pay attention to her work schedule, home life, social life, and any other factor that might be adding stress to her life or making her unhappy. You don't want these to influence her decision negatively.   To give yourself the best odds, you should ask on a clear, comfortable day, when she is not too tired or stressed., Unfortunately, as uncomfortable as being vulnerable can be, this is the only way you are going to be able to express your feelings for your female friend.But you can take comfort in the fact that everyone at some point feels vulnerable, and use this to your advantage.   As an example, you might confess your feelings by saying, "This isn't easy for me. I'm not the best at being vulnerable, and it's always been hard for me to put my feelings out there. I don't want things to change between us if you aren't comfortable, but lately I've been finding myself wondering about what it would be like if we went out on a date together."  , Especially if the friendship is important to you and you want it to continue even if she isn't interested in dating, it's important that you let her know this.You: "I hope I'm not making you uncomfortable by saying this, and I want you to know, no matter what happens, nothing will change on my end if you don't want it to. But I can't stop myself from feeling like there might be something more between us, and I have to know if you feel this way, too."  , This does not mean hire a string quartet and sing out your love in front of her apartment complex. The way you express your feelings will be unique to your relationship. If she's the type that likes grand gestures, maybe the string quartet is the way to go. But remember, you are shifting the nature of your relationship, and that's a big step already. Be careful you don't say anything over the top, or jump into things too fast; this may only hurt your chances with her., If you're pretty sure she likes you as more than just a friend, too, there's no harm in seeing where things go. If you can help her see you as a romantic interest, it's possible love will grow from the friendship - it happens all the time. If she flirts with you sometimes, or says things like "I can always be myself with you, and no one else," feel encouraged to open her eyes to your love for her.  If she hasn't flirted with you or otherwise shown romantic interest, you can still reveal your feelings to her. While you can't control how she'll react, you can be yourself and see if she'd consider dating you instead of just being friends.  She may like things just the way they are. Revealing your feelings is going to be a game changer. If she says she likes you too, the relationship will change; if she says she's not that into you, it will also change. Worst case scenario, she won't feel as comfortable with you anymore, and she won't feel able to just go back to your normal friendship.  Respect her feelings and her answer. No matter how much you love her, you can't make her love you back. She doesn't owe that to you. If you really care about her, don't keep trying to "win" her after she's already turned you down.  

discover her conscious romantic standards.  figure out her unconscious criteria.  chart out her love map.  meet her friends.  contemplate her past relationship(s).  learn what thrills her.  research her preferred method of exercise.  use mutual friends to your advantage.  use repetition.  set the mood with soft lighting.  cultivate your mystique.  flirt with her.  be persistent, when appropriate.  don't rush yourself.  gauge her feelings.  ask her friends.  choose your moment carefully.  get comfortable with your own vulnerability.  reassure her while telling how you feel.  express your feelings honestly.  try winning her over if you think she likes you back.  try it once if you're not sure how she'll respond.  beware sharing your feelings if you value the friendship.  always take no for an answer. 

 Don't change things around otherwise it won't be confusing.  or something like that. This will be SO convincing.  Say that he called you to ask you out, and if you can, show your call history, and make it seem like he called you at those times to ask you out (and you know it was only to have a casual conversation really).  You can do all kinds of settings to make it look like you really did text each other. Make believe he texted, Will you go out with me? and you replying, Yes.  You might want to avoid the banners that may appear on the pictures too that show where the picture was made from. That would be a dead giveaway. 

again, come up with a whole story, and stick with it.  if you know how to write like your crush, write a note in his hand writing saying, will you go out with me, (your name)?,  if you prefer, tell a story if you really do have each other's phone numbers.  if you have an iphone, there are websites where you can make fake text messages.  now come up with casual stories about dates and you're good to go!  

 The next time you see your best friend, note whether you feel tingly inside. When he or she talks to you, the words in your mind get tangled up in a huge knot and you don't know what to say. You try your best to get those words out of your mouth but it ends up that you just can't bring yourself to. If talking just became a huge challenge for you, it may be a sign you're falling in love.; , When you go somewhere and get bored. Or, if you have extra time and feel like it, you take out your binder and a piece of paper and a few colored pencils and start doodling his or her name on the paper you brought out. You do this to make yourself feel that feeling, that feeling of love and a crush.  When you're asleep at night, you dream of you and him or her living a carefree and happy life together. Maybe you even dream about a honeymoon. Sometimes you get this one dream where he or she asks you out, and you say yes, and until you wake up you feel that that dream is real––you never want it to end.  If you try to stop it, you just can't. He or she has altered your mind somehow and you can't get him or her out of there, everywhere you go and anytime of the day that's all your imagination has in store for you, more of him or her.  You sit down for a while and start writing, until you run out of ideas and you start to daydream about him/her and you like it. Until the point when someone snaps you out of it and you go back to reality. Your daydreams seem timeless and you imagine that you and him or her are the only two people in the world.  You start listening to slow love songs, and those songs explain a sweet love story and strangely remind you of him or her. Then it becomes your favorite type of music for a long while. You listen to those songs again and again and you just can't get enough, pretty soon you'll know every single one of the lyrics.  If you're falling in love, you'll likely find that you just can't settle down and you find yourself wanting more and more of him or her. Maybe your friends also notice you've been acting strange lately. Somehow you seem to be getting a little bit clumsy––you start getting clumsy because he or she is the only thing that seems to go around in your mind and nothing else.  If you find you miss him or her at all times, it's likely to be falling in love.   You are hungry to meet up again, often. You find most happiness when you're both together, not apart. You just can't wait to hang out together again.  More than before that is. This is an indicator of growing love.  If you feel that you don't have to have a kind of "mask" around him or her and you feel like you can be yourself and express thoughts and feelings openly, things are off to a great and healthy start!  

notice the telltale sign of butterflies in your stomach.  notice your inability to concentrate.  recognize those dreams of a future together.  consider whether you think about him or her every minute of every day.  notice your daydreaming.  note how music leaves you feeling.  consider how easy it is for you to stay put.  think about how it feels when you're apart.  consider if suddenly you seem to care about what he or she thinks of you.  think about how you feel when together. 

 Your guy friend will notice the extra time you spend to look nice when you're around him and will appreciate it. All you need to do is do your hair in a pretty way (straightened, curled, braided, etc.) and put on some makeup. Be careful not to put on too much makeup; don't go overboard and look 'easy'. If you need help with makeup, ask a friend, older sister/cousin, or look up makeup guides on YouTube. Also, wear some cute clothes that you love and feel confident and beautiful in. Try to make them a little form-fitting, but again, don't go overboard.; , He will never know that you want to be more than friends if you don't act like you want to be more than friends! Twirl your hair or play with his hair and don't forget to smile and laugh. Don't act like an airhead, though! Be smart and confident. Never play hard to get; it will confuse him. Just be a flirtier version of yourself.  Don't be afraid to talk to him; he's your guy friend, isn't he? Talk to him about the usual stuff and throw in some humor here and there. Try to see how he reacts when you ask to make plans to go see a movie or something.  If you're not yourself, he will be more confused than ever. Don't change who you were when you were just his 'friend who's a girl'. Be who you are, otherwise he won't get to know the real you! Don't make everything you've worked for with him a lie.  Ask him if he likes you, or tell him you like him. This might not be a great idea, but if you believe that all the signs are there, then go for it. If you don't say anything, you'll always wonder "What if I had told him that I liked him?". Don't regret not doing anything. If you take that leap of faith and he doesn't like you back, move on and ask him to try to stay friends. Don't let it become awkward. Don't let it get you down! If he can't appreciate the real you then that's his loss and you don't need that.  

pretty yourself up!,  flirt, flirt, flirt!,  talk about things you both like and throw in some jokes.  be yourself.  just come out and say it. 

 After the breakup it is necessary to minimize contact for awhile. This does not mean that you should completely ignore the person, as it will lead to hurt feelings. Instead try to create some space and time, so you both can heal. But if something (not break up related) comes up, feel free to share it with them. This way you are maintaining a dynamic without the intensity.; , If that is not possible, try to attach a positive emotion to it, but instead of a romantic one, try to think of it as something a friend or family member would have given you. This will also help with shifting your feelings for the person.Take some time for yourself to go through both the good and the bad moments together. Really decide if this person is someone who you want to be friends with. If you truly feel that you do want to be ONLY friends, then you should re-establish contact again. During this time work on yourself too and do things that make you happy.  It is important to find a time frame that works for both of you. When that time is up, make contact with the other person (decide who will contact whom), and carefully ask them how they are doing. If either of you needs more time, then give it.  Don't let them find out from someone else, because that will definitely be the end of the friendship. But you must also realize that just because you were friends before, you can not discuss the details of your new relationship with them, as it would hurt too much. You may find you will never be able to do this again without jealousy coming from one of you.  It takes time to heal, so keep that in mind. All you can do is be patient. But you may find that you have both grown apart, or don't have anything left to give. If that the case, then that is okay. Just remember the good times, what you've learned, and move on. Sometimes the best thing really is to let go, and let other opportunities come your way.  

minimize contact.  put away items that remind you of the person.  discuss how much time the two of you won't be in contact for one another.  if either of you decides to date someone new, and you do want to maintain a friendship with them, then let them know what is happening.  despite your best efforts, you may find that a friendship isn't possible for months, or possibly ever again. 

 Jealousy is natural and often something that we cannot control. If you choose to make your girlfriend jealous, understand that you may unearth some feelings that she is not ready to deal with like insecurity or shame., Jealousy stems from being self-critical. Be careful how you choose to make your girlfriend jealous because she might already have an unhealthy perception of herself., Your girlfriend may have experienced damaging relationships in the past but be too ashamed to tell anyone or she might have consciously moved past it; however, subconsciously, she still may suffer from its negative effects. Shame can influence how jealous and insecure your girlfriend will become so avoid exploiting her innermost sensitivities.Do not open old wounds. If she has shared something intimate with you, you will damage your relationship by using it against her.  Whether you’re trying to make her jealous to reignite your relationship or as a playful prank, learn what will trigger her jealousy. The attention you pay her will not only allow you to learn how to make her jealous but it will also create a bond. Consequently, be aware that the stronger your bond the more toxic jealousy can become.Some people are more sensitive than others so be aware of what triggers will push her too far. For example, some girls may find playful flirting with strangers amusing while others may find it very disrespectful and will end a relationship over it. Tread lightly.  Don’t go too far with this charade. Ask yourself what you’re hoping to achieve by making your girlfriend jealous. Evaluate what your relationship means to you and proceed with caution if you think that jealousy is the best course of action.  Relationships can be fragile if you introduce elements that can easily play on your girlfriend’s psyche. No matter how open-minded she says she is, it’s easy to play up her paranoia with logic. For example, keeping a relationship with an ex may easily bring about jealousy.If she says that she does not want you to interact with someone, do not use this against her. Her paranoia is already at high alert so breaking your promise will do irreversible damage. Avoid using an ex to make her jealous. Knowing that you already have had a romantic relationship makes it easy to believe you can rekindle it at any moment. Do not mention high profile friends. Whether you have mutual friends that are on tv, play professional sports, or have high paying jobs, their social status makes them an alluring romantic pursuit. Your girlfriend may easily become jealous if you show too much favor to a high profile friend.  Make plans to watch sports or hit the bar with your buddies. Make your girlfriend jealous by showing her that you have a healthy social life.Don’t make her feel like a burden or that she isn’t fun to be around. This is just meant to show her that you are fun to be around.  Like a photo or leave fun comments to friends that you know she will see. Social media can be open to interpretation. Your girlfriend may easily become jealous if your social media is littered with Likes towards other women. It can also be filled with inside jokes or photos of experiences that she was not there for., Your job can be an easy source of jealousy because you probably can spend a lot of time at work and justify it as ambition. Be careful if she becomes jealous of your relationship with a coworker because her paranoia may end up costing you your job if she begins asking other coworkers about the two of you. Worse yet, your girlfriend may reach out to your coworker's husband or boyfriend and you could ruin your coworker's relationship unintentionally.  Whether you increase your social media interactions or invite them out to activities, your girlfriend may become jealous if your interest in her friends suddenly increases. This is especially effective if the friend you choose is single or has complimented you in the past.   Be careful if you get too close to her best friend as it may cause deep emotional damage. Learn the dynamics she has with her friends so as not to open up deeper issues. One of her friends may have a history of stealing men.  Compliment celebrities on tv or strangers within your line of sight. Your girlfriend may become jealous because she may automatically compare herself to that person. Celebrities are an especially easy target as the media is obsessed with body image and managing persona., While it is perfectly acceptable to interact with any gender, your girlfriend may become jealous if your interactions play on her insecurities. Only you will know what is appropriate and what will make her jealous. Some women don’t mind if playfully touching and joking with a waitress while your girlfriend may become jealous if you smile at your server the wrong way., Invite a mutual female friend with you to an activity that normally only you and your girlfriend do together. Be cautious not to make this an obvious wedge but rather a harmless afterthought. Say something like, “I invited Julia hiking tomorrow. She said she hasn’t been to Eagle’s Canyon so I told her we’d pick her up if she wanted to join us.” This shows that you have been paying attention to other women without being immature or obvious. 

know that jealousy masks deeper emotions.  evaluate your girlfriend’s self-confidence.  find out about your girlfriend’s past.  pay attention to her.  establish boundaries.  avoid things that can legitimately be considered threatening.  make plans on your own.  utilize social media.  immerse yourself at work.  become friendly with your girlfriend's female friends.  compliment other women.  speak to women in front of her.  bring a third wheel. 

 If he is flirting with another girl a lot, then don't care! It might hurt inside, but assume that you are the most attractive person on this earth and that you can get any guy. Confidence makes guys melt.; , Got a Facebook? Make it obvious to the player that you are interested in someone else, only if they show the interest in return. Write on their walls, exchange gifts, etc. People look at everyone's stuff on Facebook at some point.  Plan things. Do stuff with friends.  Have other guys notice you, and notice them. Make the whole thing a game. Players are difficult to deal with, and no one wants you to get hurt.  Act in your comfort zone, and don't change for anyone else except around the player and some of his friends. Don't ever give in to the player, and don't betray any of your friends. They are there for you, and if you are a good friend, they will be there in return.  Take special moments to get close to him, and right after seem like there is no connection. Be nice, but at the same time, seem like you have no idea that you are not giving the player the attention he wants. Players live off of attention. They would not survive if they did not get the attention they wanted. Seem interested in him, but when the time comes, be nice but uninterested at the same time. Talk to other guys, flirt with other guys especially.  Do not do things that all players want from girls, but seem interested ever so slightly.  Will he play you, or have you reeled him in? Do not do the things that all players want girls to do! Wait a couple of weeks, see what he does and how to work with each other. If you want a relationship with this guy, you need to judge if he is really capable of that. If you just wanted to play this fool, forget about him, and don't talk to him anymore. He will probably feel the same way girls have felt when he used them.  

don't flirt with this person anymore.  flirt with his acquaintances.  seem busy.  if you are dating this player, look great, and make sure everything about you is perfect.  be a bad girl.  begin playing him.  if the player starts to get more and more clingy, saying stuff like "i need you," and other junk, start to let him in a little bit.  make the decision. 

 This is the first part of allowing yourself to be the partner and not the crush for your boyfriend––acknowledging that the fantasy phase of the chase has ended and the reality phase of coming together and forming a relationship is now truly underway. Also accept that making a good relationship requires effort––it doesn't just happen.; , When put to the test during actual dating, your ideal of what you dreamed him to be and the person he really is may conflict. Realize this when it happens and learn to respect and love the person he actually is, rather than the one you'd imagined he be. This can be a weird stage in your relationship but it's vital that you can tell the difference between your preferences and the reality of the person you're now dating, so that you don't have too unrealistic expectations.  If you keep it under wraps for too long, it'll feel like you're still crushing, keeping things to yourself. It will become fairly obvious to people that you're acting differently and in time, people will see the two of you together, so it is important to decide with each other early on that you'll announce to others that you're dating. This definitely shifts things out of the crush zone.  This means letting down your guard and letting him see the real you, not just flirty you. Having a crush on somebody usually means flirting with them, and giving subtle signs of your interest. Try being more open about your feelings. Now that you're a couple, there should be no need to hide how you feel. If you do feel the need to hide aspects of yourself, this is a warning sign that the relationship isn't good for you.  Show him some love in front of people. Try to hug each other whenever you see each other, or just have him hold you in his arms when you guys are hanging out. Don't keep your feelings limited, you not crushing anymore.  Do the small things that show him that you care about him, such as noticing when he's down and trying to cheer him up, being someone he can talk to without judgment and helping it out when he has a problem. Make it clear to him that he's not replaceable.   Support him in his endeavors. Turn up to his sports matches and cheer him on. Clap loudly if he receives an award at school. Tell others about his achievements.  That's what a relationship is largely about, enjoying each other's company.  Keep up your own interests and activities, be involved in your schoolwork and stay in touch with your friends. Your relationship with your boyfriend is an important part of your life but it isn't all of your life and the best thing you can do for your relationship is to continue cultivating all those things that make you unique and strong.  

accept that this is a transition.  be aware that when crushing you may have formed an ideal of your boyfriend.  tell people that the two of you are dating.  be comfortable in your boyfriend's presence.  be affectionate.  care for your boyfriend.  aim to have fun.  care for your own needs. 

 Pull yourself together so that you have the guts to ask your crush what his/her email is. Take a deep breath in, count to 5, and exhale, this will help relax yourself. Play out the situation in your head and think about what you want to say.; , To get their email you have to find them first. Look for them in places they usually go to. After you've spotted your boyfriend, crush, or girlfriend walk over casually and strike a conversation, don't walk up to them and ask for their email right away then leave, as this will only seem rude. Once he or she is about to leave, suggest trading emails.  Just drop it if he or she says that they do not have an email address or if they decline your offer. If they say no, be cool about it and don't bug them about it in the future.  Make sure the person confirms they do have an email address, and don't be too anxious about sending an email to them, however don't email them the day you trade emails as you may seem desperate to the person.  

calm yourself before going up to the person.  approach them and ask for their email.  dont overreact if they don't exchange emails with you.  give him/her your email if they say yes. 

 Tell them about you plan to get you crush, boyfriend, or, girlfriends email.  All 3-4 of you get some paper and start "swapping" emails, obviously you would already have your friend's emails, you're only doing this to get their attention.  Try to talk and laugh really loud (not too loud you'll look obnoxious) this will make him/her curious and they may come over to your group of friends.  Even though it may be scary to talk to your crush, boyfriend, or girlfriend, try to sound confident and have a nice smile on your face when talking to them.  You could also ask them yourself if you're comfortable asking.  Write their email in your notes so you won't forget, they may not give you their email again if you ask a second time. , Say something like "Just a test email, reply if you get this."  , You now have them hooked. Reply saying something along the lines of "Hi, how was your weekend?" (note:only ask this if it's Monday or Tuesday, otherwise it just seems odd).  Have one of your friends casually ask him/her "Hey, did you get -insert you name here-'s test email?" He/she should then that afternoon check their email and reply to you. Understand that your crush, boyfriend, girlfriend, has other things to do and can't text you all day long.  

get together two or three of your friends in a class that you all (including your crush) have together.  begin to talk and trade emails.  if done correctly your crush will come to see what you're doing.  explain to him/her that you are trading emails.  have one of your friends invite him/her to swap his/hers email also.  he/she should now be giving everyone, including you, his/her email.  when you get home that day enter his/her email into your address book.  ,  send him/her and all of your friends who were "swapping" emails a "test email".  if he/she emails you back, great!,  if you don't get a reply, don't worry! 

 A closed body position is one where her body is pointing away from you, her arms are crossed, or she is hunched over to take up less space.Closing her body position sends signals that she is uncomfortable or nervous about something. If she is doing this consistently in a relationship, it may be a sign she's not that into you. If your girlfriend used to stand close to you with her arms down or on her hips, but now she turns away and crosses her arms when you talk, she is telling you that she isn’t interested in talking anymore. If she conveys closed body language every time you are together, it is probably time to rethink your relationship because she might be wanting to end it.; , Eye contact is an important factor in body language and can convey a person’s emotions.If your girlfriend keeps her eyes locked onto yours while you talk then no problem, but if you find her avoiding eye contact, something may be wrong. If she darts her eyes around, looking at many different things while you talk to her, it might also be a sign that she isn’t enjoying the conversation or being with you.  Physical touch is one way that girls use to flirt with and show interest in a guy. Things like putting her hand on your chest, holding your hand, or brushing her fingers through your hair all show that she is interested in you.If your relationship started with a lot of physical touch from you, but now she hardly gives any at all, it could be time to talk to her about where the relationship is going. A change in the amount of public displays of affection, like holding hands, can also be a warning sign. When a girl isn’t interested in a guy anymore, she might stop touching him all together and go out of her way to avoid any sort of physical touch.  Cancelling plans is a red flag that something may be wrong. While circumstances often occur with valid reasons to miss a date, if it happens more than 50% of dates, you’re in the danger zone.When a girl starts to repetitively cancel plans or is always busy, she is sending a clear message. A girl that is interested in you will make herself available and want to spend time with you, so if you find your girlfriend constantly ditching plans, take it as a sign. If you see a pattern of canceled dates or if she constantly has other plans it is time to sit her down for a heart to heart.  If she is always inviting friends to meet up with on your dates or suggesting group or double dates, this could be a sign that she doesn’t like being alone with you anymore., If she is constantly leaving in one room to go talk to another group of people this might be a sign that she doesn’t enjoy spending time with you anymore. Likewise, going to parties and social gatherings without inviting you is also a sign that something might be wrong with your relationship., Girls like to talk, so if your girlfriend is calling or texting a lot less than she did in the beginning of the relationship then consider it a warning. If you are constantly the one making the calls or sending the texts first, it might mean she is beginning to lose interest in you., If your girlfriend is checking out or flirting with other guys in front of you, she is probably looking to get out of the relationship.  If she talks about other guys more than she mentions other girls, or if she consistently compares you to other guys, it might be a sign that she's ready to end things. She could be friendly to everyone, but if it comes on suddenly, there are many examples of comments that should raise a flag:“That guy in my math class is so smart! I bet he would be a good tutor for me!” or “I met this guy at the gym yesterday and he was lifting 150 pounds! He could’ve lifted me!” ”The new guy is kinda cute; I wonder where he’s from.”  , Girls will naturally get a little jealous if you flirt with or check out another girl in front of her. She may also get mad, and this could easily lead to unnecessary confrontation, or push her away.If your girlfriend doesn’t care that you are flirting with the waitress on your date then you might want to reconsider your relationship. Try flirting with or being overly friendly to other girls on a date to see how your girlfriend reacts.  Fights are bound to happen in all relationships, but if they start occurring more frequently, there might be a problem.If arguments over little things start to become big blow-outs every time, you should take some time to evaluate your relationship. She may be starting to lose interest in you romantically.  The best way to have a good relationship is to be honest. Ask her openly how she feels, and be willing to work through any problems if you want to stay together., Give her your full attention, and participate in the conversation.Rephrase what she says and repeat it back to show you understand "Just to be sure I understand, you're saying...." Allow her to speak without interrupting or arguing. Ask questions to clarify and elaborate on what she is saying.  Through honest communication you can discover the root of a problem if one exists. Once she's shared her feelings you'll be able to determine how to move forward in your relationship.   There may be nothing wrong and you're overthinking things. If she is ready for things to end, bringing up the problems may make it easier to handle. If she's upset and you want things to work, you'll know what you need to change to keep her happy.  

observe her body position when she is with you.  study her eye contact.  notice how much she touches you.  keep track of how often she cancels plans or is too busy to go out.  notice the type of dates she wants to have.  pay attention to how she behaves with you in social gatherings like a party.  take notice how often she calls or texts.  pay attention to how she talks to other guys.  listen to what she says about other guys.  see if she gets jealous.  notice what kind of fights you have with her.  ask her how she feels about your relationship.  listen actively when she is talking.  make changes based on the conversation. 

 You shouldn't change yourself for a guy because then he will like the fake you and not the real you, and that's not good. That is taking the wrong direction. Don't go there. Do whatever you feel like doing and act however you feel like acting. Dart if you feel like. If you usually pick your nose, pick your nose! Wear what you like, say what you like, act how you like. Do whatever you feel like. If you're genuinely a quiet, calm, serious sort of person be like that. If you are really kinda crazy, be crazy! If he doesn't like you for who you are, he's not worth it.; , He would rather see your face and real body then all that fake glob on your face and clothes that show your body off. Its okay to put on some make-up, maybe even a little blush or something else (whatever you want) but - don't use what you feel is too much. It's for your own good. He won't see the real you if you put fake stuff on you when your really beautiful inside and out. Do not care what other people think of you, say about you, or anyone who doesn't like you (in a mean way.) Again, if he doesn't like you for who you are, he is not worth it.  A guy is not going to like you right away just because he sees you walking in the hall to class. Try to get him to catch you glancing at him at least a few times . Get him to stare at you through sheer willpower.  As said earlier, if you aren't the bold, chatty type who finds it easy to talk to guys, don't do this, as you won't be being yourself if you talk to boys just to get another guy to be jealous when you wouldn't normally. When around him (such as lunch, in the halls, or before and after school), let him start seeing you either talking to another guy, flirting with another guy, staring at another guy, or just with guy friends in general., Before you do that, be sure he knows that you know he is around by force of will. Don't glance at him as you do this. He may think you're trying to make him jealous and that's a turn-off.  For example, say you're in lunch, and he sees you with friends. Do a dance move randomly if you are the kind of person that does this normally, or go to a guy and put your arm around him. Do something like similar to this. Other ways to make them want your attention include having something noticeably in common. Notice what he's into and if you are into it too, advertise that! If you have a band tee-shirt he does, wear it. If you have a book you've noticed him reading, let him see you reading your copy, or something similar. Wear his favourite sport's teams colours or some supporters gear, carry your binder decorated with Greenpeace symbols if he has one, take your flute to school if he plays flute or join the chess club if he's in it. Look for things you like that he likes and use them to make a connection. Again, do not change yourself for him.  This will just mess you up, unless you are being true to yourself doing so. Lots of people are conceited, do think they are all that and believe that they are incredibly popular, when they actually aren't. If that's you, don't change, be yourself.  Be nice to him, if the opportunity arises even though you don't know home. Be polite, hold the door for him, say hi, let him go in front of you in a queue, these acts are about all you can do with a boy you don't know and hardly see. Also, smile. Happy girls are the prettiest.  Don't notice him and let him see you with other guys as much as possible. He'll be eating out the palm of your hand in no time!  

be yourself and stay who you are.  do not change the way you dress, the way you look,or apply new make-up.  let him notice you.  talk with other guys in places where your target guy will see you doing so, if it's normal for you to talk to guys.  if he just sees you with guy friends in general no flirting or anything, or doesn't even listen to your conversation, do not stare at him at all, or don't stare at him as much as you usually do.  make him want your attention.  do not act like your "all that" and/or "popular/conceited" or something in any way.  be friendly and nice to him.  act normal for you and how you feel is cool around him and act as if you never stared at him or liked him. 

 If he does, this simply means he doesn't know what to say to you because he doesn't want you to know that HE wants YOU BACK. He just wants you to hang on to him.; , If he does, then he digs you and is hiding his feelings. UNLESS you have either texted him to much or (if you were in person) you could have been calling his name too much and he got annoyed with it. In that case you should just leave him alone if he has already gotten fed up with you. Let him cool down and he'll want you back again and feel guilty/sorry for being mean to you, trust me on this one! Please!  , If he sees you with other boys, does he seem jealous or he doesn't care? Does he do something to try to get your attention? Or he ignores it?  , Is it: Shock :O, Anger <:|,or is it Guilt because he loves you and wants you back? See his reaction to it.  If so,he may not be in the mood for talking,or is thinking of a way to "secretly" get you back without knowing and avoiding could be one of the ways he is doing it to get you going and obsessed with him.  If so,he may be jealous of the people that your giving attention to and is saying bad things/facts about you to turn them off and so they won't even want to hang out with you anymore.  This is the most important step you need to follow. This is the most important thing you need to check out. How is he when you don't pay attention to him at all? Even if its for just one day or a few days maybe even weeks or months, see how he is with you. ,, . ." True Fact. The saying goes on and on and on. . . !~ :P  

see if he ignores you.  when he does get in contact with you, does he say you're annoying or "don't talk to me" or "stop texting me".  when he sees your attention on other boys, pay close attention to his reaction.  if he sees you with just people that get along with you in general,what's his point of view?,  does he avoid you.  does he talk bad about you to other people.  when you don't give him attention,does he care.  & from here on out, you'll see if he still wants to continue having you in his life.  ,  always remember this: "in the end, the truth always comes out no matter what happens".  ,  remember this saying, to: "the more you hate someone, the more you love someone.  ~good luck & i wish you the best!!!! 

 Take the extra 10 or 15 minutes you need to look your absolute best before you see your crush. Even just small things can change you from someone in the background to someone who catches their attention. Not only can looking your best make your crush notice you, it can also give you the confidence boost you need to approach your crush.Pay attention to your hair. Even doing a quick comb through can make a big difference. For girls especially, straightening or curling their hair can give them a confidence boost. If you wear makeup, make sure that it is applied well and will last all day. Also make sure that you are taking care of your body in general by getting enough sleep and taking care of your skin so you look fresh and healthy.; , Dressing differently than the people around you is a good way to get noticed. This works especially well if you are in an environment where everyone dresses in a similar way.If people at your school dress similarly or in uniform, wear a statement necklace or a pair of cool sneakers to catch the attention of your crush. If you are in a professional work environment, wear something that is appropriate but different. For instance, wear a collared shirt with an interesting pattern or a sparkly headband.  If red is your color, go for it. Studies show that both genders are more attracted to people when they wear red. Pull out a red dress or shirt from your closet to get your crush’s attention. If you don’t like wearing red, choose another bright color to help you stand out from the crowd., When trying to impress a crush, it’s easy to take it too far. You want to look nice, but remember to wear clothing that’s appropriate for the situation.For instance, if your crush is in your yoga class, don’t dress for class like you’re headed to the red carpet. Remember that everything is better in moderation. This goes for perfume and cologne as well.  Do your best to be in the line of sight of your crush. If you are in the same class, try to sit near or in front of him. If you see him at the gym, work out nearby. Do this until you are sure that your crush has seen you and knows that you exist!Don’t do it to the point where you’re around your crush more than you should be. There’s a difference between making sure your crush sees you around and stalking your crush.  Get involved in whatever space you see your crush. If you go to school with your crush, join a sports team or an extracurricular activity. If you volunteer with your crush, take on more hours. Becoming more involved will make you more visible and show you as a person with drive and purpose, which are both attractive qualities. 

spend extra time on your appearance.  look different.  wear red.  don’t go overboard with your outfit.  make sure your crush has seen you around.  get more involved. 

 Notes are one of the most common and effective ways to confess a crush. It tends to be less awkward than in-person confessions, giving you some space and comfort if the person doesn't feel the same way. Write a short note confessing your crush, and pass it to the person in person, or put it in their locker.   Make sure your note is hand-written, legible, and relatively short and to the point. It doesn't need to be clever, or overly romantic. Just cut to the chase: "I've always noticed that you seem really sweet, kind, and cute. I'd love to get to know you better, because I really like you." When you want to confess to your crush, in person is always better than just over a text, or online. A note is a good balance, because it can be personal, but also gives you some space if you're nervous. If all else fails, having a conversation on the phone, or via Skype is always preferable to texting it.; , In some cases, your actions can make your crush more obvious than saying, "You know, I really like you." If your crush gradually becomes aware that you like them, it'll be more natural and clear than having to say so bluntly.   Go out of your way to talk to your crush and "bump" into them in the hallway. Change your routes so you see them regularly, and always make a point of saying hi. Always make eye-contact. Don't shy away from it, like you're embarrassed. Make eye contact and smile flirtatiously when you see the person you're crushing on. Show an interest in what they do and what they are like. Try to get to know your crush as a friend first, before you confess anything. It may grow naturally.  One great way to start a conversation or to get your crush talking is to ask some help with something simple.Depending on who your crush is and what they're like, this can get you into some flirtatious conversations.   Ask for help with a homework assignment for a class that you're in together. Start with a compliment, like, "You seem so smart in this class. Do you think we could talk a little sometime about this assignment? I need some help." Pretend you lost something. "Hey, have you seen a book around here? I just had it..." When your crush helps out, say, "You're so sweet..."  , In some cases, a rumor started could actually work to your advantage. If you tell a friend that you've got a major crush on someone, and that gets around to a friend of your crush, which gets around to your crush, you might have done the job without really doing anything at all. Then they'll know, and talking will be a lot easier.   Tell a couple of your friends, and don't be embarrassed about it. If it spreads, you can always deny it later. If you never actually said anything, there'll be no evidence that you did anything embarrassing, or got rejected. Never deny it, if you're really interested in someone. Why would you care if someone knew you liked somebody? That's nothing to be embarrassed about.  The scariest thing is not knowing how your crush feels about you. It's a lot easier to confess a crush bluntly if you're pretty sure that your crush likes you back. One great way of figuring this out is to invite your crush to some kind of event, like a party, or an after-school activity, which isn't necessarily a date.   Keep an eye out for things your crush might enjoy going to: "I know you really like Marvel movies, so I thought you might want to come see the new Iron Man, because my dad gets extra tickets. I was just curious, thought you might appreciate them." If your crush gets really excited, or seems really flattered and really wants to go with you, take it as a good sign and take the next step when you get a chance.  Be friendly and flirty whenever you get the chance. This can do a whole lot more to communicate a crush than saying so out loud. Talk to your crush the same way you might mess around with your friends, or other people you're comfortable around. Just be yourself.   Tease your crush in a friendly way. Find funny reasons to let your sense of humor out when you talk to them. Instead of saying, "Hey, how are you today?" say something like, "I'm thinking of organizing a jailbreak from school. Need an accomplice. What do you say? In or out?" There's not much romantic about the phrase, "I have a crush on you." Instead of telling someone, make it obvious that you're interested, so it will become unnecessary to say out loud.  

write a note and pass it to your crush.  introduce the idea without saying anything.  ask for help with something.  let it "slip out" to someone else.  find reasons to invite the person out.  just flirt. 

 If you’re too nervous to talk to your crush, try to talk to his friends. If a friend of yours knows one of your crush’s friends, go up together and chat. If you don’t have any connections to your crush’s friends, try to meet one or two of them by chatting about any circumstances you have in common, like a class or a work project.You could start a conversation with something as simple as, "So when's the final project for English due again?" If you end up talking a lot to your crush’s friends, you’re bound to meet or hang out with your crush before long. Becoming friends with your crush’s friends is a way to get into your crush’s good books. Don’t talk about your crush to his friends. If you start asking about your crush immediately after meeting them, it will be obvious that you like him. Try to play it cool.  If you feel nervous about approaching your crush, there are several things you can do to get her attention and appear interested.Make eye contact and smile. Eye contact and smiling shows that you are friendly and approachable, but you have to make sure not to overdo it. If your crush doesn’t respond the first time, don’t keep doing it. If you’re a girl, play with your hair, especially if it’s long. Twirl your hair around your finger or brush it to the side. Drawing attention to your hair is a way of highlighting one of your assets.  If you’ve never spoken to your crush before, it’s time to take the plunge. Find a reason to talk to your crush, preferably when there aren’t many people around so you won’t get interrupted. If you don’t know your crush, talk about something relating to the circumstances that you’re in.For instance, if you are waiting in line for something, ask your crush, "Hey, do you think the wait is worth it?" If you are in the break room at work you could say, "Have you tried the cookies Susan brought in? They're really good!" Asking a question is a good way to start a conversation. For instance, if you are in the same class you could ask, “Hey, what did Mr. Feinstein say the homework was again?” You could also ask for help. Whether it be opening a jar, reaching for something, carrying a heavy suitcase, or getting help with homework, asking your crush for help is a great way to start a conversation. It also will make your crush feel good about himself, which is a good way to have your first interaction with him be a positive one.  Once you have started talking to your crush, talk about anything you may have in common. People are naturally attracted to people that they have things in common with, so talking about shared passions is a good way to create a bond.For instance, If are both on the school track team, ask your crush "So how are you feeling about the next track meet?"  , Asking your crush a question shows her that you find her interesting and want to learn more about her. Since people like to talk about themselves, it also can be a good way to keep the conversation going.For example, ask your crush, “So how long have you been working here?”, or, “What other classes are you taking this semester?”  , After you've asked your crush about himself, you may be worrying about what you are going to say next, how you are going to respond to what he's saying, what to do if there is a lull in the conversation... all of this can be solved by listening. It's difficult to listen to someone and also focus on how nervous you are — listening attentively should take your attention away from yourself and bring it to the subject at hand.   Try to respond with meaningful follow-up questions, or something that shows your crush you are interested and listening. If your crush is talking about taking scuba lessons, ask him how he became interested in diving, or where he's taking classes, or how long it will take to become certified. Don't see a pause in the conversation as an opportunity to change the focus over to yourself. Conversations should be give-and-take, so you shouldn't spend the entire time talking about your crush, but it also shouldn't seem like you're just waiting for him to take a breath so you can talk about yourself. Showing that you are a good listener and genuinely interested in your crush and what he has to say can help him feel comfortable around you. If it doesn't make you too nervous, make eye contact with your crush to show that you are listening and engaged. Don't stare — that could be a little too intense — but try to meet his gaze occasionally. Show that you're listening by nodding or make an affirming sound (like "Mmm hmm" or "Right").  As superficial as it is, people love flattery. While you are talking, try to compliment your crush on something. A compliment is also often a good way to keep the conversation going because it puts it on a new course.If you know your crush through a sport, you could say, “I’ve seen you playing soccer. You’re really good!” You could also just say, “I like your shirt,” or compliment her on some other aspect of her appearance. Limit yourself to one compliment to avoid looking like you are sucking up to her.  Another way to flatter and connect with your crush is to laugh at his jokes. It shows your crush that you have a similar sense of humor and that you find him funny. Laughing together is a great way of connecting and sharing a moment.As you laugh, you can even say, "You're so funny!" If want to be extra flirtatious, touch your crush’s arm while you laugh. This adds another layer of connection and is a way to make your crush feel closer to you.  Try to keep running into and talking to your crush. Every time you see your crush in the hall or around town, say hello. Pick up conversations from the last time you talked. If you feel like your crush likes you, amp up your flirtiness or even ask him out!  

meet your crush’s friends.  flirt non-verbally.  start a conversation.  talk about common interests.  ask her about herself.  be a good listener.  compliment your crush.  laugh at his jokes.  stay in contact. 

 Take a look at your wardrobe. Make sure that all your clothes feel like you, and aren’t just things that you’ve had for years and can’t bring yourself to get rid of. Your clothes are a great way to express yourself and show off your personality. If you have a very defined style, it can give your crush some idea of who you are and what you’re about, which could make your crush interested in talking to you.If you’re a sporty guy, wear your favorite team’s jersey. If you’re feminine and cute, embrace this side of yourself by wearing pastels and lacy clothes. If you’re more of a rebel, wear band shirts and black jeans. Don’t copy your crush’s style. Just because your crush has a very preppy style, don’t think you have to dress like you’re going to a country club if that’s not your look. You need to feel comfortable and feel like yourself in your clothes.  Make yourself heard when your crush is around. If you are in a class with your crush, participate and answer questions. Voice your opinions and feedback in work or club meetings. Even just try to chat with friends around your crush. This will give your crush a better idea of what kind of person you are.Try your best to be cheerful and upbeat around your crush. People are naturally attracted to happy and confident people, so do your best to be positive when they are around.  Social media is a great way to reach your crush in an indirect way. Even if your crush isn’t your Facebook friend or isn’t following your social media, he still may see your posts or pictures through mutual friends.Try to craft your social media presence to show you in the best possible light. Make sure that your posts and pictures present you as a positive and interesting person. Make sure that you aren’t tagged in any unflattering photos or photos of you doing anything inappropriate.  Even if your crush makes you feel nervous, do your best to act confident. Stand up straight with a relaxed smile. Don’t cross your arms, look down at the ground or fidget; these behaviors can make you look protective or nervous. Also try to keep your body turned toward your crush as opposed to away from her. 

define your style.  speak your voice.  use social media.  use confident body language. 

 The best time to confess a crush? Right now. There's no use in waiting, because you're only giving your crush the opportunity to start dating someone else, or find someone else to crush on and forget about you. If you know someone and like them, the perfect time is now.   The only time you should wait is when your crush is currently dating someone. Telling someone that you like them while they're in a relationship can make things kind of complicated. It's best to find someone else to crush on for a while, and return to the person later when they're single.  Despite what you may think, telling someone that you like them shouldn't be a big deal. Even if they don't feel the same way, it'll be such a nice thing to say! Especially if you approach them in a calm and cool way, being gentle and humorous in your approach. Make it easy and try to take the pressure off yourself.   Build yourself up before you do it. Look in the mirror and say, "I got this. I'm a cool person my crush should want to be with." Then go put yourself out there. Look your best on the day you decide to do it. Wear clean, stylish clothes that fit you well and flatter you, and make sure you're fresh-breathed and clean-haired., If you don't know your crush very well, it can be kind of difficult to confess a crush. The last thing you want to do is to take the risk of saying so and having them say, "Wait, who are you?" If you're not sure whether or not the person knows you, go up to them and introduce yourself.   It doesn't have to be complicated: "Hey, I don't know if you know me real well. We're in the same grade, I think we had Mr. Robinson's class last year? Well, I've wanted to tell you something for a while..."  , The best way to have this conversation is in private. It's important that both of you feel as comfortable and calm as possible, to avoid making this a super-big-deal, but it's also good to have a little privacy so it's less embarrassing.   Passing between class periods can be a great time to catch someone really quickly. Right after class or when you're leaving the same class is a good time, too. Or, you could try to sit together on the bus. Just hang back and say, "Hey, can I talk to you for a minute?" Never go up to a crush while they're in a big group, or try to confess in the middle of the lunch room while everyone can hear you. It can be really awkward if it doesn't end up going well. It's a private conversation, so do it one-one-one.  If you say, "I like you" and your crush says, "I like you too," then what? Are you just going to say, "Well....cool." No! It's important to have a specific date in mind so you can follow up.   If a dance is coming up, say, "Cool, I hoped maybe we could go to the dance together. Would you like to?" If there's nothing school related, or you're not in school, say, "I hoped we could get a bite to eat sometime. Want to go for pizza this Friday? Say around 7?" In some cases, it might be better to not rush it. Don't expect much of an answer if you tell someone that you like them. They may want to think about it for a while. That's a good thing. Don't worry about waiting.  The big moment doesn't have to be a big deal. There's no point in making it complicated, or super-creative, when the content is "I like you." Just introduce yourself, smile, and say, "You know, I've wanted to say this for a long time. I've always noticed you, and you seem really cute and sweet. I find myself thinking about you. I like you a lot."   Don't follow a "script" when you Try to talk. Lots of people who feel awkward in this situation think it will be better if they're reading from a script, but that'll just make you sound like a robot. Talk naturally, as if you were talking to one of your oldest friends.  You know what? It happens. It's happened to everyone. Being rejected might sting a little at first, but it's a whole lot better than wondering what might have happened if you'd have said something, but didn't. You'll grow up, you'll move on, and so will your crush. Just get out there and go for it.   If you get rejected, just smile and say, "Well, I'm glad to know at least. Have a good rest of your week." Never complain, scoff, or do anything dramatic. Even if you're feeling upset, at least you know now and can move on.  

don't wait.  try to stay calm and cool.  introduce yourself, if necessary.  talk one-on-one, in person.  have a specific date or event in mind to follow up with.  just cut to the chase.  don't worry about rejection. 

 One good way to do a little research and get to know someone before you confess a crush is to be friends on Facebook, or follow them on Twitter. If you're waiting, stop waiting and reach out online first to make contact. Having a couple of online chats can help break the ice when you finally talk in person.   To get a conversation started when you're in person, you can bring stuff up that you already talked about online, or reference something that everyone saw on Facebook that day. Good ice-breaker.  One of the most important things to find out before you confess a crush is whether or not your crush is currently seeing anyone. If they are, it's probably a good idea to hang back, because you don't want to make things over-complicated for someone that you like.   Online is an easy way to check, or you can also just watch closely and see whether your crush seems to be committed. Talk to mutual friends or ask around.  Reach out to friends and acquaintances if you want to learn more about the person you're crushing on. Find a reason to hang out with people that are friends with your crush and just start asking about them. "What do they like? Do they like anyone? Do you think they'd be interested?" All good questions to ask.   Remember, if it slips out, that's not the worst thing to have happen. Might end up making your job and your stress a lot easier.  Find reasons to hang out with your crush, but not in the context of a date, or a one-on-one hang out. Get to know them better by inviting them to do things with your group of friends.   Organize a simple group hang-out, like a movie night at someone's house, or a group dinner somewhere, and invite your crush. If you're still worried about approaching your crush that way, have someone else ask. If you find out you don't actually like them, good. At least you didn't confess a little crush and make a mistake for someone you don't actually have that much in common with.  If you want to learn more about someone and find out whether or not you might be good together, part of it is to just start opening your eyes a little. Who does your crush seem to enjoy hanging out with? What is their sense of humor like? What do they like to do in their free time? Spend some time paying attention and watching (not in a creepy way) to learn as much as you can.   Watch for signs of body language when you're around each other.If your crush starts using "closed" body language, arms crossed and not making eye-contact, it could be a sign she's not interested in you. You might save yourself some grief.  

befriend them online first, if you haven't already.  make sure your crush isn't seeing anyone.  talk to mutual friends about your crush.  hang out in groups.  pay attention. 

 Just run up to him/her and say hi, then ask them if they want to sit with you at lunch, or something similar. Don't flirt with him/her, though. He/she may already be in a relationship; you never know. You're aiming to get to know them as a friend, not a girl/boy friend. If you can't come up with the courage to just walk up to him then pretend you are doing something for class and you need to talk to him/her about the homework or lesson. You could try telling them you have to complete a class survey, which can be a really good way to find some information about the person, though it can be kind of risky (if they find out there is really no assignment).; , While this may work in emergency situations (long awkward silences), it doesn't give the impression that you want to know him/her as a person. Ask questions! Get to know them! Find out if you really do like him/her after all, or if the crush is only skin-deep.  If you don't get something, call him or text him and ask for help. This will show that you think they are intelligent. If you think you have lots of trust built up, ask them to come over to your house and explain something to you.  Tell him/her some of your secrets, invite him/her to places (as friends), and just do things you normally do with your friends.  You don't need to fake anything! You're just trying to get him/her as a friend.  Buy him/her cute gifts, see his/her games (if he's/she's in sports), and just visit him/her occasionally.  It might make him/her feel uncomfortable.  And don't gush about feelings or problems, they'll start to think you are over-excited.  

don't be shy!,  talk about a subject he/she likes, preferably not about school.  ask for help on your homework.  over time, gain his/her trust by trusting them in return.  be yourself.  take an interest in his/her life.  don't talk about personal stuff, such as ex-boyfriends or ex-girlfriends.  don't dive in too fast or your crush will know you like him/her. 

 Since they’re your crush, you probably have a general idea of their schedule. Think about when you’ll see them in class, in the hall, or during free periods. Figure out a time when you know you’ll be around them and will have time to strike up a conversation.   Use common sense and change your plans if you need to. If you planned to talk to them at recess but see them cramming for a test or having a heated discussion with a friend, postpone your chat. You don’t want to force them into a conversation when they’re busy.; , A nice, "Hey! What's up?" works as a conversation starter in almost any situation. It’s an informal way to start the conversation, rather than launching into a pre-planned spiel. Additionally, your crush might let you know if it is a good time to talk or not. If they say, “I’m just in a hurry to meet someone at the library!” then you know it might not be a great time.   It may sound silly, but using your crush's name can induce some warm fuzzy feelings right off the bat. Saying, "Hey, Brad!" sounds much more personal than "Hey!" If you can't make "What's up?" flow off the tongue naturally, open with anything that feels natural to you. You can say something like, "Are you excited for class today?", "Did you watch the new episode last night?", or anything else that can smoothly start a conversation.  It doesn’t have to be anything major, but it’s an easy way to get in their good graces right from the start and hopefully launch into a full-fledged conversation. You can tell them that you like their new haircut, a piece of clothing, or any other appearance-related thing. Noticing something and complimenting it shows your crush that you pay attention, and provides them with the opportunity to tell you about it.If applicable, you could also mention a recent accomplishment or noteworthy achievement of your crush. You can say anything from, "Congrats on winning that football game last Saturday! I heard you played great," to, “I liked what you said in class today and I totally agreed.”  , If they engage in conversation with you but continuously look at their phones, glance over their shoulder, or angle their body towards the closest exit, wrap it up.They might be saying friendly things but their focus is not in the conversation, for whatever reason. If they are facing you, listening to what you’re saying, and making eye contact, proceed.  This could be anything, from the crazy history teacher you both have Monday morning to how your little brothers are best friends. Finding common ground is a great way to not only find something to talk about, but to forge a real connection.If you can't think of common ground, create some! If you don’t have any of the same classes or social circles, find something to connect over. If you know he absolutely loves a certain genre of music, tell him you started listening to it and want some recommendations. If you know he is passionate about a cause, ask him how you can learn more and get involved. It doesn’t matter if you are total opposites– find something that you can bring up to relate to him and bond over something.Not only will you show your crush that you’ve taken note of what he is interested in, you can also truly learn something new about both him and about whatever subject matter you discuss.  If you’re shy and this is your first time speaking to your crush, conquering your fear and talking to them is a victory in itself. If you want to take it a step further, try to find a “to be continued…” moment. For example, if you discuss a television show you both enjoy, say something along the lines of, “Well, we will have to discuss again after next week’s episode!” This ensures that you will talk to them again.   If you’re bold, you can ask for their phone number, social media info, or email address. Then, you can continue chatting outside of school.  This is the next step if you're feeling particularly bold. Even if it’s something simple like studying for the exam you both have, it will guarantee that you’ll get more face time with your crush. This doesn’t have to be a date - it can still just be two people getting to know each other better. The romantic part may come later.   No matter how eager you are to talk to them more and spend time with them, it is best to let things evolve naturally. Don’t hit them up for their phone number three minutes after meeting them.  Sometimes, it helps to get your confidence up before approaching your crush at all. Do whatever you need to do to make yourself feel good– wear a new t-shirt, spend a little extra time doing your hair, or pump yourself up with your favorite song. Embrace those days when you just feel great about yourself, and strike up a conversation then. If you feel good, you’ll exude that confidence.Wearing a lucky shirt, standing up straight, and visualizing a great conversation in your head are all additional ways to give yourself that boost of confidence you need. If doesn’t matter what you do to feel good, just do it!  , No matter how cute, smart, funny, or cool your crush seems, they are a person just like you. They feel awkward sometimes, they want to be liked, and they want to make friends just like you do. Try not to put them on a pedestal, because it will only make talking to them even more intimidating.   For all you know, they’ve been admiring you from afar this whole time. You owe it to both of you to try., No matter how anxious or shy you may feel on the inside, it’s important to look like you’re calm, cool, and collected. Flash them a big smile and try to look at them when you speak. Show them that you’re sure of yourself, and they will automatically be impressed.When you speak to your crush, make sure that you're facing them, speak loud enough to be understood, and use a friendly tone. You can also lean towards them to better hear what they're saying. If you look terrified, they’ll most likely feel a bit awkward. Camouflage your nervousness and summon up all of your confidence.  You are a smart, capable, and charming person. Think of your best qualities, and all the wonderful things you have to offer the people around you. Love and appreciate your strengths, and that's all that matters. Your crush will either see that and be grateful to speak with you, or they will be silly and it's their loss. Go forth and conquer!   Also, try to calm yourself down right before you talk to your crush. Whether you listen to some calming music, go on a walk, have a quick chat with a good friend, or watch a funny video, calming yourself down will help you get rid of the jitters that can come with talking to your crush.  

pick a good time.  greet them casually.  compliment them on something.  note their body language.  find common ground.  find a reason to continue the conversation.  offer an invitation.  set yourself up to feel good.  remember they’re just like you.  smile and make eye contact.  give yourself a pep talk. 

 Seek out a mutual friend to better understand why your crush might hate you. Sometimes your crush doesn’t hate you at all, and your perception is wrong.   You could ask a friend by saying, “I’d really like to get to know John better, but I think he hates me. Do you know if there’s any truth to that?”; , Your crush might hate you because of a misunderstanding. Clearing this up can bring you two closer together. Let’s say you found out from your friend that your crush saw you in their open locker, and this is the reason they hate you. You could approach your crush and try to clear things up.For example, you could say, “Hey, I think you may dislike me because you believe I stole something out of your locker. I wanted to let you know that the reason I was in your locker at all was because the school administrator thought no one was using it. She opened it for me with a master key. It was purely an accident.” You could say, “I totally understand why you might think that was a strange thing to see. If I were you I’d probably think so too.”  , If your crush has a real reason to have bad feelings towards you, apologize to them to try to make things right. Be genuine in your apology and try to say plainly that what you did was wrong. Don’t try to justify your actions.For example, if your crush hates you because you made fun of them in public, you could say, “Hey, I’ve had some time to think about that, and I wanted to let you know how sorry I am. That was not right.” Another apology could go, “I’m sorry I participated in that mean prank we pulled on you. I really regret doing it.”  , Find a good time to approach your crush when neither of you is busy. By catching them at an opportune moment, they’re more likely to be receptive to conversation. Make sure you pick a time when they are not busy working on something or engaged in conversation with someone else.If you see your crush sitting on a bench, you could say, “Hey, mind if I sit with you?” or “It’s a beautiful day out, isn’t it?”  , A smile makes you seem happy and open. To appeal most to your crush, flash them a smile to let them know you’re feeling friendly. If you feel intimidated, imagine your crush as an old friend to feel more at ease., If you’re not sure what to say when you approach your crush, try some easy phrases that can kick off any conversation. These don’t have to be particularly loaded or customized to your crush, just break the ice.   You could say, “So, what are you up to this weekend?” or “Have you done anything fun lately?” Other examples are “Do you know what the weather’s supposed to be like this week?” or “What was the highlight of your day today?”, If you and your crush have friends in common, they can be a great source of conversation. Try to incorporate your mutual friends in a group hangout or simply discuss how you got to know someone you are both close to. You may discover new things in common.   You could say, “I met Damien in cross country because we both love running. I think you’re friends with Damien too. How did you guys meet?” or “Sarah and I met at a poetry slam. I think I saw you hanging out. How do you guys know each other?”  , It’s possible you and your crush already have certain activities like sports or classes in common. To make for easy conversation, try to draw on shared experiences at school.For example, you could say, “I thought school assembly was really funny on Tuesday. What did you think?” or “Did you see the school soccer match Friday night? It was really close.”  , Ask your crush thoughtful questions about their hobbies to engage them in a positive way. It shows you’ve been paying attention to the things that are important to them and are interested in getting to know them better.   You could say, “I noticed you play tennis. Did you watch Wimbledon this year?” or “I liked the cookies you brought in to homeroom. What’s your favorite thing to bake?”, Do not engage your crush in a debate or argument, which can feel badgering, even if you like to do that with your friends. Try to be your kindest most appealing self. You can do this by paying an earnest compliment or exhibiting common kindness.For example, you could say, “Hey, I really like that sweater. It looks nice on you,” or “I bought an extra soda at the vending machine. Would you like to have it?”  

find out why they hate you through a friend.  address any misunderstandings.  apologize and make things right, if needed.  choose a good time to talk.  smile.  try easy conversation starters.  discuss mutual friends.  draw on joint activities.  ask about their interests.  be kind, not argumentative. 

 One of the simplest ways to be closer is to find activities and interests that you and your crush both like. Talk with your crush about something they like. Identify the interests that match your own, and spend more time on those activities.Consider asking things like, "What's it like being on the soccer team? I used to play soccer" or "I noticed that you like to draw. What kind of things do sketch? I like to sketch in a journal sometimes." Do more of the activities that you both enjoy. Just make sure that not all your time is spent on this. Look at the ways that you and your crush are different. Sometimes getting to know someone involves seeing how common interests may be different in approach.; , Though your romantic feelings may be hard to control, it's important to get to know the 'real' person that is your crush. Wouldn't you want that person you like to be someone you also want to be friends with? If you don't feel like your crush would be a good friend, or that your interests are too different, think about what that may mean. Would you want to be close with someone who you don't think would be a good friend? Allow your friendship to lead into romance, rather than the other way around. Don't rush into something. Try to find ways to keep your mind off your crush, and focus on how to be their friend first. Consider asking your crush and his or her friends to hang out with you and your friends for a weekend event. Keep the interactions casual at first, rather than trying to find out if he or she likes you.  Make an effort to listen to what your crush likes. Be positive and smile. Give signs that you are listening to what he or she is saying. Don't be distracted by other things. Don't avert your eyes due to shyness.   When you actually listen to what your crush is saying, and not just think about the way he or she looks, you'll be able to really know what the person is like. After listening, consider responding with, "That's really interesting" or "Wow, that's cool." Ask follow-up questions. When you are actively listening to your crush, you're paying attention to what he or she is saying. Ask for details about what they are talking about, or clarification if something sounds confusing.  It's important to be your true self. Be honest about what you like and don't like. Don't try to be fake, or someone that you hate. Think about what things matter to you.   Act and dress in a way that feels comfortable and natural to you.  You are a unique and amazing person. Get yourself some credit, and be proud of who you are and what you've done. You don't need to shy away from being yourself, and showing others that you are confident.Be positive, and surround yourself with other people who are positive.  Kindness is key. While being approachable and friendly may get your crush to notice you, they may be hesitant to be your friend, or let you be close if you're rude, cold, or stand-offish.   Try to overcome your shyness by at least having a short conversation. Consider compliment your crush. Or talk about something that you both are doing. Consider saying things like, "I like your shirt," or "You play the guitar well."  , Be presentable by taking care of your body. Have clean hair and nice clothes. You don't need to get "dressed up" every day, but someone is more likely to talk with you, or notice you, if you have a nice appearance.   Avoid wearing provocative clothes. You may be sending the wrong message to more than just your crush. For girls, you don't need a ton of makeup or high fashion clothes. But having a presentable and healthy appearance is good. Consider wearing a mild perfume. For guys, avoid looking like you just rolled out of bed. Make sure to have clean outfits. Consider wearing cologne.  Your crush is likely someone you know, but aren't close friends with yet. Like anyone new, it may lead to something close, or not. Avoid idealizing your crush. He or she is still a regular person, just like everyone else.It takes time to develop a new friendship or relationship. Your crush will not notice your overnight. Realize that your crush may not intentionally be ignoring you. If it's a large class, school, or workplace, oftentimes you may not notice someone until you interact with them a few times one-on-one.  Find ways to separate yourself from your group of friends, and do something where it's just the two of you. Consider these ways:   Walk home with him or her after class. Hang out in an area of the school, or after school where it's just you two for a little while. Work on school work together. Make yourself available to help him or her out with something.  There are various ways to give non-verbal cues that you're interested. Make eye contact. Smile. Laugh when they say something funny. Put your hand on their shoulder. Place your hand near your lips while they talk. If he or she seems sad or worried about something, give a hug.If you are sitting next to your crush on a long car ride, you can put your head on his or her shoulder. See how your crush respond to your body language. Do they act the same way? Or do they pull back? Non-verbal cues are a good way to understand what someone is thinking but not saying.  Consider being openly flirtatious by complimenting your crush. Say something that you like about them, without just saying "I like you." This can be through non-verbal body language, a note to them, or by directly talking with them about what you like about them.Consider saying, "I really like talking to you" rather than just blurting out, "I like you." Or consider saying things like, "I like your hair" or "I like hanging out with you" or "You're really cool."  , If you're spending a lot of time around your crush, and they seem to be hesitant to talk, try to avoid coming off as clingy. It's the same for your friends, family, or anyone you spend time with. Showing that you are independent can actually make you more attractive.   Don't center all your time around your crush. Remember that there are lots of cool people and fun things to do out there. And your crush shouldn't be only thing that matters. Your crush may notice you more after you've had some time apart. Let them miss you a little. Hopefully, they notice when you're not around.  

find common interests.  start off as friends.  be a good listener.  be yourself.  have confidence.  be approachable and kind.  take care of your appearance.  avoid over-analyzing the situation.  make time to talk one-on-one.  use your body language.  flirt with your crush.  give them space. 

 Smile or gently wave to those who may happen to walk pass you. You would like the person you're giving your first impression to, to know that you are nice.; , Make sure your clothes are not worn out or inappropriate for the occasion. Look presentable.  It may give you more insight into what they like or dislike.  Make it known that you are interested in the person you are talking to, by eye contact. Ask them about themselves and their hobbies.  If you're talking to someone shy, try to make them laugh and make them comfortable, because though they may not be active in the present conversation, you want to leave them with the impression you're a nice person to talk to, so that next time, they will be more comfortable around you.  Compliment on their clothing or accessories, not their body parts. Save the latter for later, when you know them better.  Shake their hands, not too light (as if they have germs) and not too firm (as if you're apart of a military) just gently.  Make sure that this person has an interest in talking. The worst thing to do is interrupt someone who is working on something or talking with someone else.  Try to avoid hitting this person who you barely know. Whether a love tap, or not. You don't want to come on to strong whether you're trying to gain this person as a friend or boyfriend/girlfriend.  Try not to stumble across your words, and make sure you know what you are talking about before opening your mouth. Don't over talk, either. You don't want anyone to think you're a "know-it-all" or a "motor mouth" when wanting to give a first impression.  When ending a conversation, let them know that you enjoyed the conversation with a comment like "It was nice talking to you" or something you joked about in the conversation like "Remember, you owe me one if the Cubs win!" You want to leave with the impression that you're nice and have a sense of humor. Leave them with a big smile and a pleasant good-bye.  

be polite.  look nice.  listen to what they have to say.  be interested.  be fun and nice.  compliment them on something.  smile- when approaching someone, greet them face-to-face with a smile.  never interrupt/disturb.  don't flirt.  be calm.  the goodbye. 

 One of the most effective ways to help you get over your crush is by distancing yourself from them. Minimize any contact or the potential for contact so that you can get over them without having any lingering ties that could upset you or reinforce your feelings for them.Distancing yourself will be hard at first, but it’s ultimately for the better and will make the process of getting over them easier and faster.; , One way to assure that you won’t have any contact with your crush is to delete his contact information from your phone. Also consider erasing any text messages from them that you may have. Deleting this information will not only keep you from contacting them in a moment of weakness, but won’t be an ever-present reminder of them, either.If you’re reluctant to delete their information entirely, consider writing it on a piece of paper that you won’t see every day and store it in a safe place. Email copies of their text messages and then archive them if you aren’t ready to completely delete them. Remember that even if you delete your contact, they may not delete you. If they contacts you, you can either not respond or choose to send a brief, polite response., The large number of social media sites, such as Facebook and Instagram, means increased accessibility to people, even those with whom you don’t necessarily want to be in contact. By removing your crush’s presence from your social media accounts, you can further limit the amount of contact you have with them.If you’re concerned that you might hurt your crush or leave others questioning your motives by unfollowing or defriending them on social media sites, find a way to minimize what you see on these apps. For example, on Facebook you can simply unsubscribe from their posts, which will make sure that you don’t get status updates., It’s natural when you have a crush on someone to talk about them and to think about them a lot, but this will only reinforce your feelings. Consciously not mentioning them in conversations and actively shifting your thoughts when you do think about them will help you get over them more quickly.It may be difficult to not mention them in conversations, especially if you have mutual friends, so try to not talk about them or ask how they are too often. You can also step away from conversations about them. If you need to talk about them to process your thoughts and feelings, do so but don’t make it a regular habit., If your friends know that you have feelings for your crush, they may occasionally mention them. This will only remind you of them and may hinder your ability to get over them, so ask your friends to not bring them up or update you if possible.There will likely be situations, especially in groups with mutual friends, where your crush’s name is brought up. In order get over them more quickly, step away from these groups until they’ve moved on to a new topic of conversation.  You and your crush may have many things in common, including friends, classes or workplaces, or favorite places. Avoid situations where you run the risk of seeing them.   If you take classes together or work in the same place, don’t sit near them. If they sit next to you, you can also find a way to relocate or decide to keep it cordial. Also do not engage in eye contact with them.Then it could make things awkward or spark a unwanted conversation. If you like the same restaurants, for example, try out new places to eat.  Getting rid of any reminders of them that you may have will help you get over your crush. You’ll want to remove traces of them from everything from your phone and social media to photographs and other mementos in your home.You can either take a gradual or cold-turkey approach to removing them from your life. It might be emotionally easier for you to remove reminders of them bit by bit, or you can also get rid of traces of them all at once. Doing this at all once will be very difficult, but can speed up the process of getting over your crush. Delete emails or get rid of letters, cards, or presents from your crush. Holding on to these things make you hold on to your feelings for them.Delete any photos of them or the two of you together., Getting over your crush is a painful process and it’s completely acceptable to grieve over the relationship you had. But it’s also important to not get mad at your crush in the process- just as you can’t control your feelings for them, they can’t control their feelings for you.Recognize that your crush was something significant in your life. Even if you didn’t have a romantic relationship, you still had some relationship to them. It’s ok to be sad over the loss of this.Don’t be angry with your crush. They might not even know that you had feelings for them or they might be in a situation where they can’t reciprocate your feelings. Don’t get angry with them over something which they don't have much control.There are many reasons why you may have to get over your crush. Perhaps they found a boyfriend/girlfriend or perhaps they were always in a relationship or married. Maybe your parents oppose them, or and maybe it's something as simple as they're too old for you. Maybe you are wise enough to realize that you wouldn't be compatible in a relationship, even though you have romantic feelings for them. These are all factors over which you have very little control, and about which you cannot be mad at them. If you’re having an especially hard time with the process, you can always get counseling to help you with your feelings., There are many fish in the sea and your crush may not be the right person for you in the end. You will find someone else who is great for you, and the quicker you get over your crush, the more open your heart will be to finding this person.Focusing on your crush’s flaws can help you get over them and possibly even find someone better suited for you. 

distance yourself from them.  remove their contact information and text messages from your phone.  remove them from social media sites.  stop talking about them and don’t allow yourself to think about them.  ask your friends not to bring them up.  avoid places they and their friends go.  get rid of tangible traces of them.  allow yourself to grieve and don’t get mad.  know you’ll find someone else. 

 You’re likely not feeling your best as you try to get over this significant person in your life, so this is a good time to lean on- or even reconnect with- your family and friends. From talking about your feelings to distracting you with fun activities, your support system can help you to get over your crush more quickly.Friends and family will keep you from wallowing in your sadness.They can provide an excellent distraction by doing fun activities with you that don’t involve your crush.  Concentrate on yourself while you try to get over your crush. This may make realize that you don’t have feelings for them.For example, start exercising or try a new fitness activity like yoga, which will also help you focus your mind on something other than your crush. You might also want to take a class that will help you with your job.Whatever you do, always make sure that it makes you feel good about yourself., This is also a good time to try out new activities, which will distract you from your feelings. The more often you can do something that distances you from your crush, the easier it will be to get over them.   For example, maybe you’ve always wanted to learn how to rock climb. This new activity will require a lot of practice, leaving less time to think about your crush.  Getting out and meeting new people who don’t have any relationship to your contact is a good distraction from your feelings and your crush. You may find you have a much better time with new friends and acquaintances than you ever did with them.There are many different ways to meet new people, including joining a running group or going to happy hours at new places. Group activities are an excellent way to meet new people and distract yourself from your crush.  You might not be ready to fully commit to another person, but casually flirting with or dating another person can also help you to more quickly get over your crush. This will boost your self-confidence and distract you from your feelings for your crush.A little harmless flirting may be good to help you gain self-confidence and remember that there are other people with whom you might have a connection. Just remember to keep it light and fun. 

lean on your support system.  focus on yourself and your other interests.  try new activities.  meet new people.  consider flirting or dating someone else. 

 If you want someone to be attracted to you (the real you, in a lasting way), you'll need to be attractive first. You do this by being the best possible version of yourself, bringing out all the qualities about you that are good and taking problems head on.          Learn fun skills. Learn the sort of fun skills that you always wanted to have. This will make you happy but it will also make you more interesting to other people. Passion and talent is attractive, and this will go a long way towards making other people like you. Help others. No one wants to be with a real jerk. Show your crush that you are a kind, wonderful person by helping others. You can help your friends and the people around you, or you can help your community by volunteering! Relax. Be funny. Have a good sense of humor. Don't sweat every little problem. And don't panic every time you talk to your crush. People want to be with someone that helps them relax, so if you seem wound up all the time, you're going to have a harder time attracting them. Change what you want to change, for you and no one else. If you have things that you don't like about yourself, you can change them. There's nothing wrong with that. But make sure you're doing it for you and not for anyone else. Forcing yourself to be someone you're not isn't going to work out well long-term and you want someone to like you for who you really are.; , Eat a healthy diet, don't starve yourself, and get lots of exercise. This will help you look healthy and strong, a very attractive quality for most people. You will also feel a lot better, which will show in your everyday interactions.  Stay fresh-smelling by showering regularly and wearing clean clothes. Don't forget deodorant! Smelling bad can really turn a lot of people away, even if you have a great personality.  Wear nice looking clothes and take care of your hair and skin. You don't have to dress like a movie star, or even wear brand name clothes. Just wear what looks good on you and that's really all that people will notice.  Confidence is incredibly attractive to both boys and girls. Of course, you don't have to actually be confident (people are rarely as confident as they seem), just make people think that you are. Do this by not constantly apologizing or being down on yourself, and instead stick up for yourself and pursue the things that are important to you.  Let your crush see the best side of you. Be friendly and kind to them, never complain about your hardships or be really negative around them. Don't gossip or get really angry around them. Let them see you doing things that make you happy and having fun with your friends.  People want to date someone who can basically be one of their best friends. You want to get along really well! Show them that you can fill this role by being a good friend to them. Support them when they're having problems and help them to be their best self by encouraging them to reach for the stars.  You can't get their attention and help them get to know you if you never spend time together! Hang out, either alone or in groups of friends (groups is better, in the beginning), so that they can see how fun you are to be around. You can go to movies, play games at the arcade, or go to special events like local concerts.  Talk to them and get to know them for who they really are. They won't take your attraction seriously if they feel like you don't know them or like them for who they are. Talk about things that matter, like what they want out of life or their ideas about current events. This is a great way to get to know someone (and much more significant than knowing their favorite color).  Let them get to really know you. All of the things that you want to find out about them, let them find out about you. Be open to questions and don't try to make yourself seem super mysterious. You want them to see you as a whole, real person.  Find the things that you have in common. These are things that you can bond over and share. This will help you connect with them on a deeper level and begin to build lasting feelings on both sides. Start with things like movies and music and move on to things like hobbies.  Even if you don't like the things that are most important to them, try to understand those things and see the significance. Understanding the thing that matters most to your crush and maybe even learning to enjoy it with them is an important part of developing a relationship.  Now, one reason that a lot of people are reluctant to get into a relationship is because they think it will mean that they're going to lose a lot of their freedom. Show your crush that with you they have nothing to fear by not only letting them be their own independent person, but also showing them that you can be independent too.  Don't make your crush think that you're into someone else. Make sure to project that you are single and you are looking to date. Don't flirt with other people too much and don't spend a ton of your time with someone of their same gender.  Start showing your interest in your crush by flirting with them. They may not be asking you out or showing an interest because they don't realize that you like them, so start dropping hints. Just don't start flirting too early on. You need to establish a basic friendship first, if you want to help guarantee success.  Not there! Jeez. A gentle touch to the shoulder or forearm (or even their hand or face if you're feeling bold), can show them your interest or even really get them to feel that spark! These are very intimate, affectionate gestures and their intent is difficult to mistake. Do it casually, in conversation, and definitely not randomly. You'll need an excuse, or it's going to seem forced.  If they aren't getting the hint, you may need to just come right out and admit that you like them. It's terrifying we know. Our sympathies. But you can do it! Be bold and brave! Taking the initiative may even make them like you more.  If respond that they like you to, or even if you want to skip that last step and go straight for this one, you might just have to ask them out yourself. This responsibility is usually going to fall on the guys, but there's nothing wrong with girls taking the lead! Find some time alone and find out once and for all if you have a chance.   Don't sweat rejection. If they just don't feel the same way they they aren't the right person for you! You'll find your special someone. It just takes time.  

work on being the best you.  take care of yourself.  keep yourself clean.  look nice.  be confident!,  show them how wonderful you are.  be a good friend.  spend time together.  get to know them.  let them get to know you.  find things in common.  share in their passions.  let them be their own person.  show your availability.  flirt with them.  touch them.  tell them that you like them.  ask them out. 

 Maybe your crush is in the jazz band, or the choir, or on a sports team you can join. Participating in the same groups as your crush gives you an excuse to be around them. It also increases the chances that when you do talk to your crush, they’ll recognize you.Only join organizations or clubs that you’re really interested in. If you’re doing something you don’t really like, it will show, and your crush might become less interested.; , Flirting with your crush is a really easy way to get noticed and can lead to them befriending you. Flirting can be as simple as complimenting an outfit, the way they’re wearing their hair, and lightly touching their arm as you walk by. All of these subtle hints can let your crush know you’re interested.For example, you could say something like "Steve, is that a new haircut? It looks really nice on you," or "That's a pretty dress, Karen." You could also lightly touch your crush's arm when you say hello in the hallway or at work. Don't use too much pressure; just lightly rest your hand on their arm to get their attention.  If you have a class with your crush, try sitting near them. If you work with your crush, you can sit near them during meetings. This increases the chances your crush will notice you and also gives you a chance to talk to them more.You can get even more notice if you ask, "Is this seat taken?" before you sit down directly next to your crush. It can be a great way to get a conversation going and also makes sure that your crush notices you for sure.  

join organizations they’re in.  don’t be afraid to flirt.  sit near your crush. 

 The easiest way to befriend anyone, including your crush, is by introducing yourself. If you're not sure your crush has never noticed you, this is a great first step to befriending them. If you think they've seen you around but you've never been introduced, this can break the ice and move you toward being friends.For example, if you see your crush in the hallway, you can say something like, "Hi! I've seen you in my classes but I don't think I know your name. I'm Taylor." This way your crush learns your name and you've broken the ice.  If you've never met your crush, but you have mutual friends, ask one to introduce you. This gives you a little bit of a connection to your crush and makes the initial introduction easier.Ask one of your mutual friends to introduce you by saying something like, "Hey Jimmy, you know Kyle, right? Could you introduce us?"  , Once you’ve said hello a few times, you can move on to more substantial conversations. Texting is a great way to stay in contact and have a longer conversation while still keeping it casual. Send short, simple text messages about things you have in common, even if it’s just school.You can also have these types of conversation over social media, if that makes you feel more comfortable. You can say something as simple as “Hey Jake! Can you believe what Jason did in math class today?”  , Once you’ve been talking to your crush for a little while, you might have a better idea of what they like to do. Then you can have a conversation about the things you both like. Talking about shared interests is a great way to befriend your crush and get them interested in something more.For example, you could say something like, "I know you said you really like all the superhero movies that have been coming out. What do you think of the new Wonder Woman movie?"  

introduce yourself.  ask your friends to introduce you.  keep in touch.  talk about shared interests. 

 No matter how pretty or nice you are, no one's going to like you if you look or smell dirty. Take regular showers, and use a light-scented body wash and a loofah. Use a sweet-smelling lotion after your bath/shower. Use deodorant if you want. Brush your teeth twice a day and make sure to wear clean, fresh clothes. Also don't do anything gross in public like pick your boogers or something.; , Don't wash your hair every day, only wash it 2-3 times a week. If your hair gets disgustingly oily in a day without washing, invest in a good dry shampoo. Use a good shampoo and conditioner and make sure it smells subtle but pleasant. Try to let your hair air dry and use heat as less often as possible. Use a heat protectant if you must use heat on your hair regularly. Don't bleach or dye your hair too much either. Curl it, straighten it, put it in a bun, ponytail, braid, anything you want. Or you could just leave it down. Use some cute hair ties and hair accessories. Switch up your hairstyles and make sure they look cute with your outfit. Make sure it is tangle-free and soft.  You can't be wearing Hello Kitty long sleeved T-shirts and huge, grey sweatpants every day. Shop at places like Forever 21, H&M, Aeropostale, Brandy Melville, Lulu Lemon, etc. Own a lot of black leggings. Those go with anything. Make sure not to go too crazy with patterns or colours. For example, if you wear a striped shirt, try to wear solid-coloured pants. Black and white is a timeless trend. Wear what you think looks nice on you and also keep in mind your comfort. Poky clothes just ruin your day. Also get one pair of good runners (Nike is a good brand), some Uggs, a pair of converse, and some cute flats. Good shoes take you good places. Wear jewelry tastefully and try to wear real jewelry instead of fake jewelry.  Being healthy solves all your problems. You have shiny hair, strong nails, porcelain skin, and you feel great. Indulge in junk food but don't go overboard, and try to eat healthy foods too. Eat lots of fruits and veggies as well as protein like chicken, eggs, nuts, tofu, etc. Drink lots of water and get a good amount of sleep in. Sleep is one of the most important things ever. Try to get some exercise in each week. You could play a sport, ride your bike around the neighbourhood, go to the gym, do some crunches and push ups at home, anything you want. Just get that heart beating and muscles working.  Try to be as organized as possible, as it makes school much less stressful. If you aren't an organized person, make a plan to be organized starting the next school year. Listen to the teacher (this is like 60% of being a good student), take good notes (use colourful gel pens to make it more fun), study (read the textbook, use index cards, study with a friend, etc.), and just try your best. Be confident that you're going to ace that test/project/assignment. Try to participate and ask questions if you don't understand as well. Also make sure to do your homework. At all times. No excuses. Getting good grades makes your future that much brighter and it makes you feel good about yourself. People also see smart people as more attractive and enviable.  If you're that girl who always keeps a smile on her face and positive thoughts, everyone's going to like you. Make sure to smile even when you're feeling down and laugh whenever you feel like it. Even if no one else is laughing. Try not to be negative or looking at the floor all day. Just remember to be yourself and be nice to everyone.  Something like "couch potato" or a twist on their name or some kind of inside joke is always fun. Make sure to only tell your closest friends who your crush is just so you can talk about him with them and not keep your feelings bottled up.  If you're really quiet or shy, this is the most daunting step. Try to get him to notice you by making eye contact when he does talk to you, or laughing at his jokes. Make sure to walk confidently and be slightly bold. If you want to do something old-fashioned, try to "accidentally" bump into him in the halls. Your books will go everywhere and if he says sorry you could say something like "That's okay it was my fault too." This just gets him to notice you. He can't like you if he doesn't even know you exist. If you're not afraid, try to make conversation with him and get to know him a bit more. If you're laughing about something no one else knows about with your friends, you can get noticed too.  Do really subtle things like play with your hair or smile directly at him. Try to tease him a little and steal his stuff once you're a bit more comfortable with him. If you want, you could add some physical contact in by nudging him with your elbow or even hugging him once you get really comfortable.  

be clean.  have gorgeous hair.  have a sense of style.  be healthy.  be a good student.  smile.  make up a secret nickname for your crush with your closest friends.  get him to notice you.  try to start flirting. 

 Asking your crush to a dance can be nerve-racking, but knowing you have a good shot of them saying yes will go a long way to boosting your confidence. To figure out how interested they are, pay close attention to how they act around you. For example, do they frequently initiate conversation or seek you out in crowds? If your crush is consistently going out of their way to speak with you or to be near you, it’s likely they’re attempting to convey their interests.If they make note of the things that interest you to bring back up later in conversation, that’s also a good sign they may like you.If you’re still unsure, try getting your friends to gauge your crush’s interest. You don’t want them to directly ask him/her outright, but they can fish for information by bringing you up in conversation and then seeing what your crush says or how they react. Keep in mind that if your crush is shy, they may be extra awkward and quiet around you, so you may have to drop hints to help them open up.; , Once you’ve got a good idea of how your crush feels, it’s time to reciprocate. You want to let your crush know that you’re interested and open to any potential advances. The best way to do this is to talk to them as frequently as you can. This may seem a bit awkward, especially if you’re constantly nervous around them, but there are a bunch of easy conversation starters you can try.   For example, compliment your crush every now and again when you see them. This can be anything from, “That sweater looks really good on you,” to “Did you get a haircut? Your hair looks really nice today.” Just remember not to go over the top or try to force it. You can also ask about their interests. For example, if your crush plays sports or is a big gamer, try to ask them questions about their favorite sports teams or an upcoming game release you know they’re excited about. You can also get involved in some of the activities that they enjoy, like going to concerts of bands they like. Just make sure you are staying true to your own likes, you don’t want to change yourself just to get your crush interested., If you and your crush talk frequently or have at least started to, try talking about the dance in general. You don’t have to say anything about going together, but simply talking about the dance will introduce the idea and make it less awkward later when you ask them out. It will also let them know you’re interested in going.   Try talking about the theme of the dance, who is going, or what music you think they’ll play. For example, you could say something like “I heard Jerry and Jess are trying to get a group together to take a trolley to the dance instead of a limo. How much do you think that’ll cost?” or “Do you think the DJ will take requests? I want to dance to Beyonce.” Talking about the dance will also give you a good idea of whether or not your crush plans to go to the dance.  This is the simplest method, even if it is usually the most stressful. To make the situation easier on both you and your crush, try to ask them when you’re both alone. For example, between classes, on the bus, or at lunch if you get a minute to yourselves. Not having a bunch of people or friends around will make you both more comfortable.   Make it simple, to start, say something like “Hey, could I speak to you a moment?” Then, once the two of you are alone ask, “I was wondering if you’d like to go to the dance with me?” If you’re nervous, try practicing the conversation with a friend beforehand.  Whether you and your crush talk frequently or not, texting is a great way to communicate without the extra stress of speaking in person. You can take your time and revise what you want to say multiple times. Try inserting the question into a normal conversation by building up to it. For example, try talking about school or homework, then lead into the upcoming dance, and eventually ask them if they’d like to go with you.   For example, text a simple, “So, are you planning to go to the dance?” or “So, do you have a date for the dance yet?” If your crush says no, then ask, “Would you like to go with me?” If your crush plans to go with friends, ask if they’ll at least save you dance.  Another easy, relatively stress-free way to ask your crush to the dance is to leave them a note. If you’re feeling bold, you can pass them one in class for an immediate response. However, if you’re feeling a bit shyer, simply slip a note asking if they’d like to go with you into their locker. You can even leave directions on the note like, “Circle Y or N and slip this back into my locker by the end of the day.” If not, you may have to approach your crush directly for an answer., If you want to make a bit more of an impression, try making some sweet treats for your crush. Find out their favorite cookie or cupcake and make them a bunch. You can spell out D A N C E ? on top of the cupcakes in frosting. For something more subtle, hand out cupcakes or cookies to all your friends - girls and guys alike - and give your crush a special one with DANCE? written on it.If your crush doesn’t like sweets, try doing this with a pizza.  If you’ve got the downtime in class or a study hall, rope your crush into a game of hangman. When it’s your turn to come up with a word or phrase, mark out spaces for either D A N C E ? or “Will you go to the dance with me?” Then simply hold tight as you wait for your crush to figure it out.You can try this tactic with other games like Pictionary or Scrabble, too.  This might take a little bit more work, but shouldn’t be too expensive. You can buy a big thing of fortune cookies online for around $10. Simply change out the fortune in one and then make sure to give it to your crush when you’re handing them out to friends or classmates. Just make sure that your crush actually opens it and doesn’t give it to someone else!  , This is a great idea if you and your crush have similar tastes in music. Try putting together a bunch of songs you think your crush would like and write a message for them on the inside of the CD case. You don’t need to write anything long, just “Would you like to go to the dance with me?” You could also just write “Go to the dance with me?” directly on the CD.  Another cute idea is to put a note asking them to the dance in a bottle or mason jar. You can then fill this jar with candies like jelly beans, m&ms, sour patch kids, or any other sweet they like. Just make sure that your note is big enough to be found and not get lost amongst the candy.  

look for signs of interest.  make your feelings known.  hint to your crush that you want to go the dance.  ask them in person.  ask them via text.  leave them a note.  give them baked goods.  play hangman.  put a note in a fortune cookie.  make a mix cd.  send them a message in a bottle. 

 This is the easiest and most personal way to make contact with your crush as their secret admirer. You can either buy stationary or create your own personalized card that will contain your romantic message.   The first time you contact your crush as their Secret Admirer, you want to make it clear what your purpose is. Pick out a Valentine's day card or when making your own use reds and pinks to accentuate the romantic theme.; , Write clearly and to the point. Explain in your own words how you think they're fantastic and why you admire them so much.Don’t talk about yourself. This is their time to shine and you’re making that happen by telling them why you think they’re so special. Don’t simply say “I like your hair” or other generic platitudes. You want to be sincere, unique, and specific.  Even your handwriting is an detail that might give away your identity. For example, if you sit beside them in class or in meetings, they may know what your penmanship looks like. Since you're writing a love note, go ahead and also take the time to make your script elegant and legible.   If you normally write in print, then try writing in cursive. Or vice versa if you usually write everything in cursive. If you're worried that your handwriting is illegible and your message will be lost, then use a computer to type your message and pick a fun font.  Make sure that their name is visible on the card. That way, if the card is delivered in error there's a better chance it will make its way back to your crush. You don't want to send a heartfelt note and then find out that they never received it.Obviously you don’t want to use your real name. Instead, pick a fun pseudonym like the classic “Secret Admirer” or “Your Valentine’s Day Cupid.” Make sure you are comfortable with revealing yourself to your crush if you want to use your real name.If you use your real name then you're only an admirer and not a secret one.  Depending on your research, your crush may prefer daffodils to roses, or maybe they love chocolate chip cookies and that would be a perfect surprise on a tough Monday morning. Determine what you could give them to make their day a little brighter and attach your card.   Don’t get too personal. Jewelry, lingerie, expensive items, or photos are better for when you’re dating this person, not when you're trying to get a relationship started., This is the trickiest part of being a Secret Admirer. You need to get your card or gift to this person without them knowing it was you. Sneak notes in their locker, gym bag, car window, or mailbox. Pick a location that your crush frequents regularly so that they see it. You could also enlist a friend to be the deliverer. The more anonymous you can be the better.   Timing is everything. You can either start leaving notes and gifts for your crush leading up to Valentine's Day or you could use the whole holiday to lavish them with gifts and messages throughout the day. If you choose to start wooing your crush before V-Day, keep your displays of affection to one a day so that you don't spook your crush.  You don’t just have to give physical gifts to your crush. For example, if you know they’ll be occupied all day, you could wash their car and leave a small note on the windshield from their “Secret Admirer.” If you know this person well, you can find out what their needs are and help them out.  Instead of giving a gift or as a way to deliver a gift or card, you could create a scavenger hunt for them on Valentine's Day. This method is also a great way to lead your crush to you on the big day.   Start by slipping your crush a note with the first clue. Write clues that aren't so vague that they can't figure them out and leave them in relatively nearby places. You don't want your crush running town all day so try and keep things within your school or neighborhood. With each clue, leave a small gift like a flowers or chocolates. Leave the biggest gift or most personal gesture for the end. Their excitement will build during the hunt and you want to save the biggest surprise for the grand finale.  You want to pique your crush's curiosity just a little bit. For example, in a note you could say that you love seeing them at the same coffee shop you go to every morning, or that you loved their presentation in class the other day., Unless you want to string your crush along forever, you need to be brave and tell them who you are. At some point they're going to want to know who is responsible for all of the sweet things you’ve done for them. Choose a convenient time for both you and your crush. For example, plan on meeting them after their last class of the day for the big reveal.   Listen to what they've been saying about their secret admirer. If it sounds like they're excited to find out who it is, then it's time to reveal yourself. If they don’t seem interested, you may want to stop. You can’t control another person’s feelings and you should be respectful if they're feeling creeped out.  Coffee shops, parks, and restaurants are all good starts because there will be people around but not so many that you won't have privacy. Remember, you don't want to scare your crush away so pick somewhere relaxing. A bench in a park can be a beautiful setting, but a dark movie theatre will make you seem like a stalker and not an admirer., You could write a note that says something like “I’ll be wearing a red shirt and sunglasses.” Even though you’re trying to convey an air of mystery, you need to be clear in your directions so that your crush can actually identify you.  If you’re already involved in this person’s life, they may recognize you. However, this is your moment to show them that you're their mysterious and sweet admirer. After the big reveal, follow up by asking them on an official date so that you can continue to get to know each other.  Chances are, you know this person a little bit already. You probably have a few reason already as to why you admire them. However, you will need to know a few more details in order to do things for them and not get caught., If you don’t know your crush too well, survey the people who are close to them. You can either ask innocent questions in a conversation or ask them outright what your crush likes and dislikes, or what their class schedule looks like.   Be careful when talking with friends and family or your crush. If your crush starts to ask around trying to find out your identity, a friend might accidentally slip up. For example, they could comment that you've been asking about your crush a lot and then your cover would be blown. It may be better to tell the people you're surveying that you're going to be your crush's secret admirer if you think they can keep a secret. That way, you have someone on the inside who can help you out.  You shouldn’t know when they brush their teeth every day, but it’s good to know if they’re busy in gym class or in a meeting. That way you can plan when you’re going to leave little surprises for them without being seen or getting caught.  In other words, don’t be creepy. If you need to do a little research to find out their favorite candy, that’s fine. But don’t dig so deep that you find out their shoe size and their pet's name. Do some preliminary research so that you can deliver them heartfelt notes, but you should really get to know them personally once you reveal your identity., Decide what your end goal is. If you want to go on a date with this person on Valentine's Day, then you need to start wooing them a few weeks before. Or if you want to just surprise them for one day, you can create a more elaborate, one-time plan. For instance, you could have your crush go on a day-long scavenger hunt on Valentine's Day that leads up to them meeting you that evening for a date. 

start out with a simple card.  write a thoughtful message to your crush.  disguise your handwriting.  sign both their name and yours.  give them gifts.  deliver your card or gift.  do thoughtful acts of kindness for them.  plan a scavenger hunt for your crush.  drop clues to hint at your identity.  pick a time to reveal yourself.  choose a public place.  tell your crush where and how to find you.  introduce yourself as their secret admirer.  learn more about your crush.  talk to their friends and family.  take note of their schedule.  avoid getting to know them too well.  make a plan. 

 You are being treated with respect by the man who is asking you out, as he values you enough to want to form a more intimate relationship with him. So, be sure to return that respect. Listen carefully and look attentive as he explains his wishes.; , Smile and nod if it's appropriate to do so, but wait him out. When he finishes and makes it clear that he is waiting for a reply, offer your reasons for turning him down.  

be polite when you hear the guy's request.  avoid interrupting. 

 This is harsh sounding and puts an end to the connection. While you don't wish to date this guy or get on intimate terms with him, it still remains important to respect his dignity and let him down gently.  Begin by explaining that you're flattered by his interest in you and that it is very kind of him to ask. However, you'll also need to explain your lack of interest in general terms, without suggesting that there is anything wrong with him. For example, you might say something along these lines:   "That's nice of you to ask but right now I'm still looking for the right guy." "Thank you for your attention, that's so sweet and I am really flattered. The trouble is, I'm just not interested in dating anybody at the moment. But it was so kind of you to ask."  , Avoid laughing or using jokes as a way of negating what he has just asked you. Make it clear that you've appreciated the effort and his courage but that's the end of it; no need to rub salt into the wound.   If you do wish to make humor, use the self-deprecating sort that rebounds on you, not on him or anybody else. And don't overdo it, or it'll look as if you're trying too hard.  If possible, tell him that your current focus is absolutely on your career, your new business start-up, your university exams, your overseas trip, whatever. This way, it doesn't feel like a personal rejection but is simply an outcome of a broader reality that you're just too wed to something else.   It's not your place to butter up his ego but it's always a nice thing to offer a soft letdown to anyone who receives rejection.  Don't drag it on and become nervous, chatty or full of excuses. Any of these things will make it more awkward for you than it is for him and opens up too many possibilities for him to try to convince you to make space for him in your life.  

avoid coming out with just a "no".  reject his advance with a compliment.  try not to make it to embarrassing for him.  make it seem as if anybody who asked you out right now would not succeed.  keep it short and sweet. 

 If you don’t absolutely know that he likes you, don’t act upon it. You may ruin a friendship based on rumors that other people have told you or an assumption that you’ve made because you think he likes you. There are some tell-tale signs that he is truly into you.He consistently asks you out. He persistently tries for body contact. He persists on hanging one-on-one.; , The longer you wait, the worse it’ll be. His feelings will grow and it will be impossible to maintain any kind of friendship after you tell him the truth., You can pretend all you want that he’ll “get the hint” if you simply avoid him. Well, he won’t. You need to find a time to talk to him. Make it a time when it’s only the two of you, so that he doesn’t get embarrassed in front of a group of people.  Write down what you’re going to say before you say it. If you fumble over your words, you’ll make the conversation longer, more awkward, and a worse time than it needs to be. In your plan, you should have some points about why you aren’t interested in him. Don’t attack him with reasons he’s gross—just be honest about why you’re not into him.You can’t seem to move on from your ex-boyfriend. You just aren’t physically attracted to him. You like someone else.  If you have a conversation on the phone or over text, you can still implement all of these into your conversation. The most important part when doing that is being ultimate. Make sure he knows that there is no future chance for the relationship.  You need to let him know that you want to have a serious conversation. This way, he takes what you’re saying to heart. If you don’t take the time to do this, he may not understand the level of importance of the talk., Let him down easy. Add a compliment or two into your talk but convey to him that it’s not enough.   “You’re a great friend, but we can’t be together.” “You’ll make someone very happy, but it’s not going to be me.”  , Even after giving him the reasons you’re not into him, he may not fully understand. Deliver your official “back-off” message after you’ve told him your reasons.   “We won’t have a romantic relationship.” “We can stay friends if you’re going to keep it at friendship.” “There isn’t the right chemistry between us.”  , If you don’t tell him flat out that you’re feelings aren’t going to change—he might hope for it. Don’t let him leave with any questions of you having romantic feelings for him in the future. Set some ground rules for your friendship (if there is still going to be one)., Let him ask some questions if he wants to and answer the honestly. There’s no sense in protecting his feelings with lies: tell him the truth. This will help him move on more quickly., Rehearsing the conversation in your head helps, but can also hurt you by creating preconceptions in your head about how it will go. Rather than attacking him with your thoughts, sit across from him and hear what he has to say so that he will listen to what you have to say., To ensure that he’s gotten your point fully, ask him what he thinks about it all. Stand your ground and don’t leave the conversation without him understanding that you don’t like him. Don’t leave without clarity., Just because you told him that you don’t like him doesn’t mean you have to ignore him or be rude. Don’t think of him as weak or broken because of your choice. He’ll move past it, so treat him like a human being. Don't just ignore him forever., Don’t go out of your way to see if he’s doing alright. If you run into him, be cordial, but don’t reach out to him outside of that. Rejection hurts, and if you’re constantly reminding him about it, he’ll constantly be hurting. This could eventually lead to self-esteem issues, anger, or even aggression—you don’t want to be at fault for that., If he decides that he can stay friends with you after having the conversation, make sure to set a clear line of appropriateness. This can be in a separate discussion if either of you need time to think about it. Having this discussion will help both of you put some closure on the previous one.   Discuss if it’s ok to comment on how one another looks. Talk about if physical contact (hugs, holding hands, etc.) is still appropriate.  

know that he likes you.  don’t procrastinate.  don’t avoid him forever.  make a plan.  talk over the phone.  acknowledge the seriousness.  be nice.  give him your “back-off” message.  ensure him that your feelings aren’t going to change.  be honest.  be willing to listen.  agree to end the conversation.  be polite.  give him space.  don’t lead him on. 

 Regular exercise can help lift your mood, and can help you keep busy. This will give you less time to ruminate over what happened with your ex-boyfriend. Try picking up a new exercise routine to help boost your mood and forget your ex.Choose a type of routine you like, as you'll be more likely to stick to it. If you hate running, don't commit to a weekly run. Instead, go for a bike ride after work. Start any new workout routine slowly. You may want to talk to your doctor first, especially if it's been awhile since you worked out regularly.; , Do you have any old hobbies you no longer do? Now may be a good time to pick up that hobby. If you can stay busy with a particular hobby or interest, you are more likely to forget about your boyfriend.Think about something you used to do that got away from you. Maybe you used to be an avid knitter, but got busy with other things. Try taking up a knitting project again after breaking up with your ex. If you can't think of any old hobbies, try a new one. Find something you enjoy that you've never tried before. For example, maybe you could join a sports league. A new hobby can easily help you get your mind off your ex.  Stock up on comedies and feel good movies. It's a good idea to allow yourself to embrace something silly and lighthearted in the wake of a great betrayal. Make a Netflix collection of comedies. Marathon watch your favorite humor television show. This will keep your mind off the pain and help you forget., There's no sense closing yourself off from others in the wake of a breakup. As you attempt to forget your ex-boyfriend, surround yourself with supportive friends. A solid support system can help you forget how your ex hurt you. You will also feel grateful for all the good people in your life, even if your romantic relationship ended poorly.In a relationship, you get used to having someone around all the time. With a significant other, you feel like someone is always a text or a phone call away. When things end, you may find yourself wishing for that closeness again. Remember, you do have people in your life. You have friends and family members who care about you. Reach out to them on your bad days. Do something fun that will take your mind off your ex.  It seems counterintuitive, but this will actually help you forget your ex. Studies show if you try to not think about something, you'll just end up thinking about it more. Instead of trying to obliterate your ex from your consciousness, allow yourself to occasionally engage in thoughts of your ex.Do not panic if you occasionally think about your ex. Instead of thinking, "I need to not think about this. Why am I letting this get to me?" stop and accept the thoughts. Think something like, "It's normal to still feel sad sometimes. I'm going to let myself experience these thoughts." Instead, allow yourself to experience the thoughts for a few minutes. Remind yourself why you're upset, but ultimately better off. Remember, this person cheated on you and broke your trust. You're better off without him.  Dealing with a cheating boyfriend may cause you to start to evaluate your own actions and wonder if you could have somehow prevented the situation. If you find yourself doing this, take a moment to remind yourself that your boyfriend chose to cheat and that you had nothing to do with that decision.   Try saying something to yourself like, “This was his decision. I could not have stopped it and I did not cause it.”  , This can actually help you feel better about the breakup, allowing you to move on and forget faster. When you start feeling sad about the breakup, remind yourself of your ex's bad qualities. This can stop you from romanticizing the relationship. You can acknowledge your ex's imperfections in a healthy, cathartic manner.Obviously, the infidelity is a major flaw. However, that is not something you have to focus your energies towards if it makes you sad. You can think about small things. For example, "I hate that he always made us late to movies" or "I hate that he clipped his toenails in the living room." Allow yourself to be a little petty.  If you're still in contact with him, you're not going to be able to forget him. If you don't want to continue the relationship, then cut off contact. Stop texting him, calling him, or interacting with him on social media.Avoid the temptation to call him in moments of weakness. If you're upset and need to vent, turn to friends over your ex-boyfriend. You should only reestablish contact when you're ready to have a relationship again. Keep in mind, however, you may never feel ready for a relationship again. Many people struggle to stay friends with their exes. It's okay if you do not want this person as a friend.  You do not want to emotionally unload on everyone in your friend's group. Having everyone know your business may make it hard to forget. You also open yourself up to potentially unsolicited advice. Pick one or two close friends and tell them about the infidelity.Try to limit your venting, however. You do not want to end up upsetting yourself by making your ex the subject of too many conversations. Talk a little about your ex to these friends. Then, discuss other topics that help you forget and move on.  If your ex-boyfriend cheated, you may want to know everything possible about the man or woman he cheated with. However, seeking out details is only likely to make you feel bad. Nothing good will come of looking through old credit card receipts and emails, or looking at your ex's social media profile. You do not need to know the details now that the relationship is over.If necessary, have an action plan in place when you feel the need to dig up details. You can think of something specific to do instead. For example, instead of going through your ex's Facebook posts, have a video game to play instead.  Dealing with a cheating boyfriend can make you feel sad, angry, and confused. You can use self-soothing activities to help you to feel better as you experience your emotions. Some things you might try include:   Taking a long bath. Listening to some of your favorite music. Writing in a journal or drawing. Reading a book or watching a movie. Spending time with your pet or with family members.  Self-care should not be neglected in the wake of a breakup. Make sure to take care of yourself while healing. If you neglect things like healthy eating and sleeping, you end up feeling worse. This will make it harder to turn your energy away from your ex.Anxiety-inducing thoughts get worse if you're hungry, tired, dehydrated, or deprived in other ways. Stick to your regular routine to keep your mood as good as possible. You should also find healthy ways to deal with stress. Avoid things like heavy drinking. Instead, get a small treat to eat. Go to a spa for a day. Treat yourself to a new outfit.  If an ex cheated, you may sometimes feel yourself trapped in bitter thoughts. If you feel like you're drowning in feelings of anger and resentment, stop and say, "I want to be happy." This will help shift your focus to all the positive things you have, instead of focusing on how one person hurt you.Remind yourself you actually want to be happy in moments when you feel yourself getting sad. This will help you tune out the small frustrations in favor of embracing the future. For example, you see a romantic Facebook post from your ex's new romantic interest. Instead of getting angry, say, "I want to be happy." You will remember your goal is happiness, and you'll find other things to focus on.  Infidelity can make you feel invaluable. Remember, you decide how much value you have and not another person. When times get difficult, and you feel bad about yourself, think about your good qualities.Write a list of all your good qualities. Jot down everything in your life that makes you feel valuable and happy. Then, write down things you have to be grateful for. Think about things like your friends and family members.  There's no sense harboring negativity when considering the future. Say to yourself each day, "I deserve better." Embrace the fact you're a good person who deserves a faithful partner.Tell yourself you're going to meet someone better. Everyone goes through breakups, and everyone sometimes feels they will not recover. However, you're bound to eventually find someone who is kinder to you than your ex was. Each time you start feeling bad about your ex, say something to yourself like, "It's okay. I can and will do better."  , If you were cheated on, it can seriously affect your sense of self-worth. Take steps to rebuild your self-confidence in the wake of infidelity. Prioritize positive self-talk and finding ways to feel good about yourself.Make a list of things you like about yourself. This can help you remind yourself you have value. Think about your current relationships. Remind yourself you're lucky to have close friends and family members who value you, even if someone else hurt you. Remember everything you do right. Congratulate yourself for your recent successes and take stock of your talents and abilities.  

exercise to regulate your mood.  pick up an old hobby.  watch lighthearted television.  stay around people.  allow yourself to think about your ex in moderation.  remind yourself that it was your ex’s decision to cheat.  remember the bad parts of the relationship.  cut off contact with your ex.  talk things out with only a few people.  do not seek out details.  use self-soothing activities to feel better.  take care of yourself.  remind yourself you want to be happy.  embrace the good in yourself.  look towards the future with a positive attitude.  rebuild your self-confidence. 

 Literally remove yourself from her. The more you see your ex in person the more difficult it will be to forget about her and the pain she has caused you. Find ways to change your routine so that you are not forced to confront her.   Avoid places that you know she frequents. This may include her favorite restaurants and coffee shops, or shops near where she lives. Avoid social gatherings that you know she will be at. This will only cause unnecessary tension and cause you to obsess over the past. If you are both invited to a party or event, tell the host that you are busy. Missing a few social gatherings is worth the jealousy and frustration that you will feel if you see her again.; , Remove any of her belongings from your room. Get rid of anything you deeply associate with her.It will only bring you unnecessary pain to hang onto any souvenirs from the relationship.  Do not allow yourself to contact her, including through text or email. It may be tempting to engage with her at first, but this will only open up the door to more pain and conflict. The more you communicate with your ex, the harder it will be to forget her.   Consider unfriending or unfollowing her on social media. Social media allows us to paint a positive picture of our lives. Such images of her will only make you nostalgic about the relationship. If this feels too drastic, consider removing her from your news feed or phone contact list. , If you share a friend group, spend time with a new social circle.   Reconnect with the friends you had before you met her. They are friends with you outside of the context of your relationship with your ex. They will help you forge a new identity without her, and are less likely to bring her up.  

get physical distance.  get rid of the evidence.  cut off communication.  avoid hanging out with her friends. 

 This allows room for both points of view and states your position as an agreement. It also puts you on more equal footing in the discussion, and encourages a more cooperative approach.; , A lot of times suggesting a break up is a sign of desperation when needs are not being met. What does he need from the relationship that he's not getting? And are these things realistic? Does he maybe feel pressured by your wishes and are those realistic?   Encourage him to talk about what he needs, and listen to what he's saying. Put aside defensiveness and try to understand where he's coming from. Ask for specific examples of situations where he felt his needs were being neglected. Examine any recent disagreements you might have had, and try to identify the needs that were associated with them.  Does he need more affirmation from you for his accomplishments and sacrifices? Does he feel that you are contributing equally to the relationship? Is he bored with his current routine? Are some of the expectations from the beginning of the relationship not being met? Do you have conflicting values about family and relationships?    , Let him know that you are willing to compromise and refocus the conversation on specific problems, rather than having the whole relationship called into question.   This also means that the next time he mentions "break up", you try to confirm what issues he's concerned about. Make sure he understands that he's able to address issues without mentioning the break-up as a threat to you. Mentioning breaking up without the urge to follow trough can cause lots of anxiety. Rather than trying to figure out everything by yourself, try to open up a discussion on finding solutions besides a break up. Give him some suggestions for changes you can make to help him get what he needs. These depend on your particular situation, but here are some commonly applicable ones.  Suggest rearranging your schedule and habits to make more time for him. Suggest fun activities you can share that align with some of his goals. Let him off the hook sometimes for some social obligations he doesn't enjoy. Be realistic and compromise to make sure he supports you at functions where you really need him bu can bow out of non-essential obligations. Set up a compromise for when you disagree about movies, music, or other cultural activities. Try to mention out loud that it's not necessary to have a discussion about this. Say: 'It's not important to have a discussion about that video. We disagree; that's all right.' Agree to give him more time alone to spend with his own interests, family, and friends, if that's his wish.  The goal is to find common ground, so you can work together to solve conflicts. You are each entitled to your opinions, but ultimately the relationship depends on finding ways in which you can both be "right".  Remember that even if what you have to say is valid, how you present it counts. Anything that sounds oppositional or accusatory might be taken as the start of a fight, especially if he's already agitated.  Understand that you probably won't fix everything in your relationship over the course of one talk. Allow yourselves time to express your thoughts.   Exercise common courtesy. Don't talk over him, and don't interrupt. Things might seem really urgent at the moment, but it's important that he feels that you're listening. Take his emotional state into account. Give him some time to adjust. He might be angry, and possibly confused. Set the tone for fairness, and give him room to cool off.  Move past blame in order to find positive solutions. Telling him what happened is his own fault can soothe your ego when he's threatening to break up with you, but if you want him to stay, let him know that you can accept the person that he is.   Be careful when bringing up the past. Aristotle maintained that the main purpose of the past tense was to identify where blame should be placed. Be evenhanded in your recollection of past events. And write down relevant past behaviours, so that they won't interfere with everyday-situations. Don't berate him over things he can't change. Putting him in a state of permanent condemnation over things he has no control over makes it seem like he's incapable of pleasing you. Don't assault his character. Nobody wants to be around people who dislike their inner qualities. If you feel you have to criticize, emphasize that you are talking about his behavior. And you're doing this to help him. You would want the same from him. Understand the difference between expressing feelings and assigning blame. Yes, you should respect each other's feelings, but starting a sentence with the words "I feel..." doesn't mean you can say whatever you want without consequences.  When you start a sentence with "I feel..." make sure the rest of the sentence contains a feeling like "happy", "frustrated", or "confused." Be aware that it's very common to say "I feel..." to disguise an accusation. "I feel you're seeing it wrong" is not talking about a feeling.  Nobody wants to admit they can be manipulative, but sometimes in the heat of an argument, logic flies out the window and it's easy to resort to childish tactics to trick the other person into giving you what you want.   Learn to notice manipulation. The main way to recognize it is that it unfairly limits the other person's choices. Look for a good relationship counseling reference for more examples and discussion of manipulative tactics. Here are some common ones:  Name-calling: "Only a stupid person would think that." Stonewalling: Giving someone "the cold shoulder" in order to punish them. Giving them time or taking time, is different. If you need some time, mention this! "I need some time, leave me alone for a minute, I feel frustrated." Threats: "Go ahead and leave, but I'm keeping the dog." appeals to pity: "How can you leave me after everything I've been through?"   Instead, give positive reasons to stay. Emphasize that you love him, not that "he can't do any better". Manipulative behavior doesn't address the real problems in the relationship, and can only breed resentment.  As infants, we can die if we're abandoned, and so if we think we're being left behind, we react with extreme fear and emotional outbursts. These emotional reactions can persist into adulthood if they are not adequately addressed, and can complicate relationships.Remember that no matter how painful a break up is, you can survive it. Even if you don't want to break up, remembering this can help you find the strength to make necessary changes and express your feelings without breaking down or acting childish. If he needs to think, give him the space he needs. Tell him that you want him to stay, but that you respect his decisions. Doing this shows you are not desperate or clingy, and that he's allowed to have his own feelings. Don't let go of your position of strength. This doesn't mean that you shouldn't admit that you might be wrong, or that you can't show your vulnerability. Just remember that whatever happens, you can trust yourself.  The overwhelming urge will be to panic, become upset and lash out, but this will only make things worse. Take a minute to relax if you feel like you're about to say something you might regret.   Think of anything that you do well and easily, even just a routine task like doing the laundry, and recall the sense of competence you feel when doing it. If you get really angry or upset, try counting backwards from ten and taking deep breaths.  Remember you have a lot to offer, and you can prove this to yourself and to him by acting your best. Being friendly, polite, strong, and loving is more effective than just listing the reasons why he should stay. Remind him of why he fell for you in the first place.  

agree that changes need to be made, and the relationship cannot continue as it is.  sincerely try to empathize with his misgivings about the relationship.  look for concrete ways for how some of his needs might be addressed.  remember you are not trying to "win" an argument.  express yourself clearly.  be patient.  be on his side.  avoid manipulative tactics.  acknowledge your feelings of abandonment.  be your most mature self.  believe that you are worth staying with, and act that way. 

 Letting yourself be angry and frustrated for a short time can help you cleanse your system and it will be easier to forget her.  Allow yourself to be upset for a set amount of time and then refrain from indulging anymore. Be disciplined with this timeline.   Try starting with one week. During this week allow yourself to cry, get angry, listen to sad music, or do whatever rituals you feel necessary to your healing. When that one week is up commit to moving forward. Don't panic if you find yourself thinking about her. If you try to forbid yourself from thinking about her, you will only think about her more. This is called the "white bear effect."If you think about her, accept the thought, and then let it go.  Talk to a family member or good friend about your feelings. Vent about her so that you no longer fixate on the pain.   Write out your feelings in a journal. Writing is a good way to come to terms with a subject so that you stop thinking about it. After you have allowed yourself to vent about her, don't bring her up again. Avoid talking about her and try to move quickly from the topic if someone asks you about her.  

let yourself be sad.  give yourself a timeline.  talk it out. 

 One tried and true way to get over a past lover is to meet someone new. If you feel ready, be open to making new connections.   For the first few dates, avoid bringing up your ex. Over time you will be able to talk about her, but while it is still fresh it will only prevent you from moving forward.  Even if you don't feel ready to date, make sure you are spending time with friends. Stay connected to your social sphere.It's normal to want to be alone after a break-up. Do not isolate yourself for too long or it will keep you from moving forward.  It will be more difficult to forget about your ex if you continue doing the same things you did when you were together. Find new activities that are not associated with her, and will allow you to surround yourself with new faces.   Explore new bars and restaurants so that you meet a new batch of people. There are probably many places you never had the chance to explore while you were together. Join a new club or find a new activity that will allow you to make new friends. These new friends and activities will distract you from the past. They will also share a bond with you that is totally outside of your ex.  

go on dates.  exercise your social muscles.  find new ways to be social. 

 Focus your energy and emotions toward a new goal. When you feel yourself missing your ex, redirect these feelings toward a different goal or passion. Obsessive thinking about your ex activates the same craving region in your brain as drugs and alcohol. Replace your addiction with something productive.  Working out relieves stress. Excess stress can make you more likely to crave companionship., Being single means you have more time to think about yourself. Use this opportunity to redirect your attention back to your own needs and wants.   Think about your professional goals. This is a great time to push your personal growth at work or at school.  If there is something you have always been interested, such as cooking or a new sport, now is the time to pick it up. It will be a great distraction from your sadness.  See your current pain as a temporary state. With time, it will pass. Your mindset is essential to forgetting about someone. Keep a positive attitude and tell yourself that you will get over her with time. It may seem impossible to you now, but if you view it as an impossible task, you will never forget your ex.  

find a new goal.  go to the gym.  focus on yourself.  get a new hobby.  get some perspective. 

 When it comes to break ups, face-to-face interaction is optimal but there are a variety of reasons why writing a letter might be the best option.   If you're in a long distance relationship, communication can sometimes be difficult even over a phone or web cam screen. Some people are also simply uncomfortable with phone calls and if that's the case for you, a letter might help you get your words out in a calm, straightforward fashion.If your partner might become hostile or emotional during a face-to-face break up, preventing you from explaining your point of view, a letter might also be a better option. Closure and open communication is important for a clean, healthy breakup and if you don't think your partner will allow this face-to-face, it may be better to write your thoughts out in a letter.; , A breakup letter should only be used as a last resort. Unless you're experiencing one of the extenuating circumstances from above, it's better to try and communicate face-to-face.   Face-to-face communication is ideal because non-verbal cues can provide comfort during a breakup. A smile or hug, for example, can tell your partner he or she still matters even though the relationship is ending. Such moments are absent when breaking up happens in letter form.A breakup letter can also be somewhat cryptic. If there's anything your partner does not understand, he or she will be unable to ask for clarification. A lack of closure can leave him or her emotionally scarred and entering a new relationship may be difficult.If you truly feel a breakup letter is the best route despite its drawbacks, leave room open for communication. Tell your partner he or she can call you or see you in a few days or weeks to talk if he or she needs to do so face-to-face. Give him or her time to cool down, however, so you can both talk calmly as adults.  Delivery options are important in regard to a break-up letter. You want to make sure you deliver the letter in a way that does not come off as cruel or spiteful.   E-mail, Facebook, and other electronic means of delivering the letter are probably a bad idea. As some many people now have smart phones, that means all day internet access. You do not want your partner to open the e-mail on his way to work, school, or any event where he needs to stay focused. Mailing the letter may be necessary if you're in a long distance relationship. However, give some kind of heads up. Do not pretend things are normal after you've sent the letter. Give your partner a heads-up to expect a letter and tell him or her you've expressed some things you feel are easier to discuss in a written format. If you live in the same town, you could deliver the letter yourself or have a friend or family member do so.  A break-up should be a clean break with no room for ambiguity. You should be honest from the get-go you want to end the relationship.   The letter's intent should be obvious from the opening line. Easing someone into a break-up seems less cruel, but it actually comes off as a mixed message. It can easily be read as uncertainty, making your partner think there's a chance you might change your mind.Your opening line should be concise. Begin with a simple sentence that communicates the letter's intent. Something like, "I have come to the difficult decision to end this relationship" or something along those lines works. This comes off as certain, leaving no room for confusion., Breakups can be difficult and cause a lot of feelings of failure and anxiety for both parties. Open communication is important as it removes the stress of not knowing. Your partner deserves to understand why the relationship ended, so providing specifics as to why you feel things aren't working out is vital to a break-up letter.   Information-sharing is an important aspect of any relationship. In a breakup, sharing the reasons you feel the relationship should end conveys you respect your partner and want him or her to have closure. The idea of a winner (you, as you're leaving) and a loser (your partner, as he's being left) are diminished if you're honest. The blame is not on one individual but rather the incompatibility between the two of you.Even if your partner did something that made you unhappy, avoid name-calling and blaming. Simply state the specific behavior that resulted in incompatibility. Instead of saying, "Your friendship with your ex is damaging to our relationship" try to state it in a way that focuses on your personal feelings rather than applying objective facts. For example, "The fact you and Jane are still so close makes me feel it would be difficult for me to trust you longterm."Specific behaviors that were damaging to your relationship are important for your ex to know. He or she can use this information to improve his romantic relationships in the future. If you phrase things in a non-confrontational way, it may be helpful for him of her in the future to know why a past relationship ended.Remember, it's not always something the other person is doing. Sometimes, incompatibility causes a relationship to end. If this is the case, say so. This is often easier to accept and your ex will not end up feeling bad or guilty about past mistakes. Say something like, "I feel that we ultimately want to end up in different locations and as I'm getting older, I want to find someone I'm compatible with in the longterm.", Remember, as you're not face-to-face the non-verbal cues that can be reassuring are absent. Kindness is important in a break-up letter. You want your partner to understand that, even though the relationship has ended, they still matter.   While you need to be firm that you're ending the relationship, there's no need to be spiteful or aggressive while doing so. Even if you do have feelings of resentment, expressing yourself is an aggressive way could lead your ex to retaliate with his own letter or an angry phone call. End the letter by saying something positive, like "I valued the time we spent together and I hope you find someone you work better with in the future." The absence of non-verbal cues can make you come off as cold, so you want your ex to feel that you do care and that he or she is valued even though the relationship is over. Another reasons kindness is important is that letters bind you to your words. In anger or sadness, we often say things we do not truly mean and you do not want you or your ex to carry around physical evidence of a regrettable phrasing or tone.  When a relationship ends, it's important not to deny or minimize the feelings of sadness that follow. You need to experience your breakup in order to get over it.   Grieving is a normal part of a relationship ending. Even if you know the decision was for the best, you will likely miss your partner in the days and weeks that follow the breakup.Many people deal with such feelings by avoiding them. People may take up a big project or start socializing or drinking heavily. However, this is not a good idea. Ending a relationship, especially a serious and longterm one, is one of the most difficult emotional blows a person can endure in life. You need to be able to accept and face the pain to process the emotions you're feeling about the loss., Biology plays a factor in how we cope with breakups. Understanding your biological functions in the wake of a failed romance can help you better cope.   The human brain is wired for bonding, so the breaking of any bond is emotionally difficult. A breakup can be similar to drug withdrawal as the feelings of longing for another person remain even weeks after the relationship has ended. Areas of the brain associated with drug use are activated during romantic relationships, and so you're biologically wired to miss someone and feel regret or loneliness in the direct aftermath of a breakup.Understand such feelings are temporary and, as time passes, they will lessen. While past relationships do affect how you function in current relationship, the acute feelings of pain lose intensity with time., Oftentimes, in order to justify or dismiss a relationship, people indulge in ruminating over things they disliked about an ex. Such negative thoughts do not help you get over someone. They simply increase the amount of time you spend thinking about an ex, prolonging the process of getting over someone. Instead, try to focus on the positives and look towards better prospects in the future. 

figure out if a letter is the best means for breaking up.  consider other options.  decide how to deliver the letter.  be honest about the letter's intent.  explain specifics.  be kind.  give yourself time to grieve.  understand biology plays a role in breakups.  resist negative feelings. 

 Let yourself have one last deep cry. Let all your sadness out. Scream if necessary. Try to come to a point of final release. Then, commit to not crying about this person or relationship again.   Consider journalling during your cry about all the feelings you are experiencing. Describe the things you disliked about your ex. That might make you less sad that you broke up.Have a friend with you during your final cry. Hugging someone can help, as it causes your body to produce oxytocin, which helps you feel warmer and happier.; , A trigger is something that will cause an emotional reaction when you see/hear/or smell it and will remind you of your ex.It could be anything from a piece of clothing or a bottle of perfume or cologne, certain music or songs, notes, drawings, ticket stubs, photographs – anything that reminds you of your ex. Put away, donate, or dispose of these things. Removing triggers will help you move forward and heal, as the reaction to a trigger item is often involuntary. You could be feeling great and positive and then smell your ex's perfume and experience the pain anew.While you might want to keep some mementos, put these in a box and out of sight.  Unless you broke up on very good terms, consider “de-friending” your ex on Facebook or putting him/her on limited profile. Seeing constant updates about your ex will not make you feel better and might bring on tears. You also might consider removing his/her contact information from your phone. This will prevent you from texting or calling the person during moments of weakness.  When you feel like another bout of crying is coming, try breathing very deeply from your diaphragm. Breathe in for a count of five and then exhale for five seconds, making a “ts” sound. This process will calm your body.   See Stop Yourself from Crying for more physical tips on how to stop crying.  No matter how tempting it is to rehash every detail of your relationship and/or breakup, resist the urge. Instead, practice living in the moment. Reflect also on what you have learned from the breakup. As you cannot repair the relationship, let go of your attachment to it.Go for a long run in a scenic place. Take a walk around your neighborhood and inhale the scents of the bakery. Listen to people chatting over coffee. Watch the changing leaves or blooming flowers., Although this sounds very simple, studies have shown that by making positive facial expressions, people can actually feel happier.Even though you might feel like crying, smile and see if you feel better.  If your crying is triggered by painful thoughts or memories, there are things you can do to combat those feelings. Learning to self-soothe, or comfort yourself, can help you stay calm and keep your bad feelings from overwhelming you.Try some of these techniques when you find yourself feeling down or flooded with painful memories:   Use affirmations. An affirmation is a way to remind yourself that you have value even when you're feeling down. Say these out loud, quietly, or simply write them down. Some examples are:  I deserve to be happy. I deserve to be loved and appreciated. I am more than my sadness. Things will get better and I will be happy again.   Pamper yourself with a warm bath or massage.Watch a funny movie, TV show, or clips on online.Listen to relaxing music.Relax in the warmth of the sun.Play with or pet an animal.Eat a comforting meal.Get lost in your favorite book., Oftentimes, we feel sadder when we are alone. After your break-up, make a point of visiting your friends and family.Perhaps ask a friend to visit you and bring a funny movie. Alternatively, you could dress up and go to dinner with a group of friends. Being in public will help you cry less. When you remember what joy and laughter feel like, you can start to feel better.   When socializing after your “final cry,” try to avoid bringing up your ex in conversation. While you certainly should share your feelings with your closest friends, constantly harping on your breakup will make you sadder.  When your life has been wrapped up in one person for a long time, it is easy to forget who you are. By joining new activities, whether a sport, club, or musical group, you can craft a new part of your identity.This part of you will not include any memories of your ex. Additionally, if you find some new friends, they won’t know you as part of a relationship. They will just get to know you for you.   Activities like salsa or swing dance are particularly good. Not only will you learn new skills and exercise but you will meet new people and have platonic physical contact. This can be very important when you are used to having someone to touch.  Ride your bike or swim. By doing some exercise, your body will release endorphins. This will make you both happier and healthier.  One way to feel refreshed is to get a new hair cut. You might enjoy being pampered at a salon. Sometimes telling a new or trusted hair stylist about your breakup can be cathartic. Updating your glasses or clothing choices is another option. When so much of yourself is associated to your ex, it can be beneficial to make small changes that make you feel better. Additionally, you might feel that even though your emotions are out of control, you control your style and can still feel confident and good., Avoid drug or alcohol use. Although it is tempting to use substances to alleviate the pain you are feeling, refrain from doing so.Right now, you might be feeling vulnerable and you would not want to over-use any substances. Instead, seek your comfort foods (though not in excess). Food with serotonin also can boost your happiness levels. Good foods would be bananas, yogurt, turkey, eggs, nuts, cheese, or beans. 

cry one final time.  remove trigger items.  remove the person from your social media and contact lists.  practice deep breathing.  stop ruminating.  smile.  learn to avoid crying spells before they begin.  spend time with loved ones.  join a new activity.  exercise.although you might feel like staying home, leave the house and take a walk or run.  consider changing your style.  make healthy choices. 

   This is the most important step to moving on from a breakup. There are times when you wonder “Was it me?” “Was it my ex?” “Can we work on our problems and get back together?” or “Will I connect with anyone as much as I did with my ex?”  These questions were all meant to be thought up and answered before the breakup. If the relationship has ended, continue to follow through. If your ex broke up with you, the chance for you to be informed as to why has come and gone. Crying due to being hurt by the unexpected surprise is never an excuse, especially since all mourning of a discontinued relationship should be done in solitude.; ,   Relationship memorabilia is everything that reminds you of being in a relationship with your former lover. These things include your ex lover’s clothes, gifts you were given, gifts that were given to you as a couple, pictures, texts between you and your ex, and the connection between you and your former lover on any and every social network.  This may seem a tad extreme, but it helps you from undergoing a mental breakdown or unwanted yearning for a particular mismatch of a counterpart later on. Burning a jacket that the not-so-significant-other left behind at your apartment may be just as healthy. Then again, so would returning said jacket to its owner. Totally your call.    Everyone in your life who knew about your relationship is going to want to know what the cause of the breakup was. The storytelling, unfortunately, leads to the constant reliving of the event and the reopening of emotional wounds and tension. Whether you have a good poker face or not, your character may be negatively perceived by others since sharing a stressful moment, or discussing someone you dislike, typically leads to the use of venomous speech and causes you to be as worked up as you were while actually experiencing the incident. Just stick to the basics: The two of you are no longer together, you are much happier now, and you will never continue the former partnership.    Never force friends to pick between you and your ex. Instead, after the news of the breakup has been shared, allow your true friends to make the loyal – yet mature – moves that they should in order to remain prominent in your life. Those whom you have met through the relationship should not be expected to only keep up with simply you; mutual friends will feel the need to spend equal time with both you and your former lover. Friends that have been a part of your life before you met your ex will not hesitate to cut your former “better half” out of their daily lives – same should be expected of your ex’s associates and confidantes. A thorough weeding of the friends list of your social networks is definitely in order as well.    The coincidental run-in with a potential, current, or former lover is never unintentional. One of the factors in deciding whether or not you should go to the biannual school fair or college night at the local bar is whether or not you will run into a specific someone or someones. If there is ever the slightest chance of you running into your ex at a public event or venue, do NOT pass “Go.” Altering your plans and regular hangouts should never be the case, however. Just be aware that if your ex knows of your usual hot spots for a night on the town, he or she will not give up a chance to make at least one night an awkward time for you. Nothing good will ever come from a reunion. Never.    Whether you randomly remember a good experience or a very tragic occurrence, if the event has anything to do with your insignificant other, move the account to the back of your mind and never utter the name of “thou-who-must-not-be-named” ever again. Memories are precious things which you are able to carry with you even when times you spend with others – or those you have spent life-altering moments with – have come and gone.  Memorable times with your ex could be mistakenly excused as being cautionary tales or moments to look forward to with your next, and hopefully final, love of your life, but these should never be the case. Constantly thinking of your ex will cause you to constantly crave to spend time with him or her, or wonder what he or she is up to. Mentioning your ex means that you are thinking of your ex – which should never be the case because…..your ex should always remain your ex.    The relationship is over, and, if you have accepted the breakup and decided that you would like to move on with your life, interactions with your former lover are over as well. Keeping in contact with an ex creates that illusion that the two of you can remain friends, the emotional relationship which was forsaken once you became lovers.  Never wish the ex a happy birthday. Refrain from sending a holiday greeting. Delete that urge to ask, “How are you?” This may seem like a step to becoming a bitter ex, but it is in fact part of becoming a smart, emotionally stable individual. You must accept the fact that you cannot change every situation in your life that has gone astray, and you are most certainly also unable to stay in the good graces of everyone you meet. All you can do is let go of the past and stay open to positive future experiences.  

accept the breakup completely.  get rid of all relationship memorabilia.  refrain from over-elaborating on the breakup.  reduce spending time with mutual friends.  avoid venues and events which may result in a run-in.  refrain from discussing your ex at all times.  never contact your ex for any reason. 

 Don't sleep with people on your first date - especially if there's any idea that this is not your perfect match! Dating is meant to give you a chance to talk and get to know someone, you don't have to have sex. Frankly, most people can tell within a few minutes whether they are interested enough for a second date - if this is the case with you, don't even offer a kiss goodnight. Keep things very platonic and nice, but don't allow it to escalate into sexual action of any kind. This makes it much harder to later convince the hard-headed that you really are not interested.; , You may not think this person is a match for you, but s/he is a human being whose only crime was being interested enough in you to want to get to know you better. Bear this in mind, even if you found this person boring, overly introverted, too fixated on his/her hobby, or just not compatible.  Maybe this person was an arrogant, obnoxious boor. If this person was a jerk when you were on your date, remember that this is the last time you will have to talk with him/her. There's no need to make an enemy - just be direct and don't get hostile.  Your phone rings - it's him/her. This is not the time for prevaricating (wavering). Don't let it go to voice mail - answer it. Don't give in to the temptation to say things like, "Sure, I'd love to do it again sometime - call me next week." You think it's harmless and vague enough not to matter, but it's not. That's a lie, and it's wrong. If you're lucky, he/she is calling to say thanks for a nice evening, and nothing more. If that's the case, you need not say anything more than "You're welcome. Thank you, too." However... if s/he is calling for another date, go on to the next step.  Just say, "I think that you're a great guy/girl. You're just not MY great guy/girl. I know your great mate is out there. Good luck to you." If s/he tries to persuade you to give it just one more chance, it's up to you, of course, but if you've already made up your mind, just say, "I'm sorry, but I don't think we have enough in common for a long-term relationship. Thanks, though." That's firm - and final - and leaves no room for doubt as to where your head is at.  Wavering because you feel sorry for someone is not a good idea. Many times, this person is a friend of a friend. Your mutual friend tells you how upset this person is that things didn't work out, and how s/he'd really like another chance. Maybe he/she has even been crying or is incessantly begging your friend to work on you, trying to get another shot with you. It's fine to feel compassion about his/her pain; rejection is never easy. But giving in to another date will only compound the error, and you will go through it all over again after the next one. Stay firm in your resolve, and tell your friend, "It's great there is a friend like you who is so kind and cares so much about his/her happiness. The thing is, it would just make things worse. It's not that he/she isn't a good person, it's just that we're not a match. Let's leave it at that." If your friend persists, say, "You're a good friend, but it's not going to happen. Tell him/her that I said good luck, and let's drop it. Now."  

minimize possible damage from first dates.  be kind.  take the high road.  don't beat around the bush.  address the situation directly: being direct and honest need not be harsh or mean.  keep to your decision. 

 This will just leave a bitter taste in your mouth and is not a great way to end something that was good while it lasted.; , Both of you liked each other a lot, or you wouldn't have become involved, right? So, be thoughtful and make the break somewhere secluded and pleasant. Try to pick somewhere you can share a local dish, favorite drink or other pleasant memory. And don't forget to pay for it.  Tell him that the fling was fun but that living in completely different places doesn't bode well for your future relationship and that you are dreadful at keeping in touch. Tell him that you really enjoyed the time together but that it was only a "holiday thing" and that it would be unkind to pretend it can continue back in everyday life.  Hear him out. It may well be that he feels the exact same way as you. If not, let him express his sorrow and be kind to him. It doesn't hurt to ask him to Try to be realistic about the whole situation and to let him know how great he was and that you're sure jealous of his next girlfriend.  There's no harm swapping addresses if you want to. Maybe someday you'll cross paths again. And as time passes, it can be good to have a friend in another part of your country or even the world to drop in on and borrow a couch for a night or two!  

make sure you are not already having a huge fight over the end of the holiday season or that you have led him up the garden path about your intentions.  find a private area where you can talk and not create a scene.  simply sit down and let him know how you feel.  listen to what he has to say.  leave on good terms. 

 Honesty is usually the best policy. It is disrespectful to lie to someone. If you don't want to date someone, you should say so.Sometimes it is easy to be honest. For example, you might be able to truthfully say, "No, thank you, I already have a date for that party." Other times, you might need to find a kinder way to be nice. Maybe you are not attracted to the person. Instead of bluntly saying that, try saying, "No, thank you, I just don't think we would be a good fit." Avoid making up a phony excuse. For instance, don't tell someone you will be out of town this weekend if you won't be. There's a chance that you might then run into them at the movies, which would definitely cause hurt feelings.; , A compliment sandwich is a really effective way to provide feedback. Essentially, you "sandwich" your negative comment between two positive things. Try using this method when you need to reject someone.An example of a compliment sandwich is to say something such as, "You're an awesome person. Unfortunately, I'm not interested in dating you. Someone else is going to be really lucky to date someone with such a great personality!" You could also try, "You are a really nice person. I'm only interested you as a friend. I like when we hang out in big groups together!" Be sincere. If you offer false compliments, the other person will likely be able to tell and feel hurt.  If you do not want to date someone, it is best to be upfront about your feelings. Do not beat around the bush. If your mind is made up, it is best to clearly state your response.If someone asks you to date them and you don't want to, you can be direct and kind at the same time. State your answer clearly. You can make your feelings clear without purposefully hurting someone else's feelings. Try smiling and saying, "That sounds fun, but no thank you. I'm not interested in dating you." Don't beat around the bush. If you do not want to accept the date, there is no need to say, "Let me think about it." It is best to get the rejection over with. You don't want to give someone false hope. Avoid saying something like, "Let me check my schedule and get back to you."  , Try to treat the person the way you would want to be treated. This means that you should choose your words carefully. Be thoughtful in your response.It's okay to pause before responding. You might be taken by surprise and need a moment to collect your thoughts. Say thank you. It is a compliment to be asked out. You can say, "I'm flattered. Unfortunately, I can't accept." Don't laugh. Many people laugh nervously in awkward situations. Try to avoid giggling, as that is likely to result in hurt feelings.  Sometimes it is not what you say, but how you say it. If you need to reject someone, think about factors other than your words. Non-verbal communication matters, too.Use the right tone of voice. Try to sound gentle but firm. Make eye contact. This helps convey that you are being serious, and also shows respect for the other person. If you are in public, try not to speak too loudly. It is not necessary for everyone around you to know that you are turning down a date.  

tell the truth.  use a "compliment sandwich".  be direct.  treat the person with respect.  communicate effectively. 

 Do you feel like you two have nothing in common anymore? Does she do things that make you angry? Are you going off to college and want to stop before the relationship becomes a long-distance one? This should not be a decision you make quickly or in anger. Think carefully about your reasons for wanting to break up with your girlfriend. Explore your feelings and ask yourself if you have good reasons, or if they are issues that you could resolve by talking to her.If you’re angry after a fight, take time to think about whether you want to break up or if you’re just angry in the moment. If you are jealous of her relationship with her friends, talk to her about that rather than just breaking up over it. If she is abusive, end the relationship. Verbal and physical abuse is a dealbreaker.; , When you break up with a person, they want to know why. Be ready with answers for her. Be honest but kind.  "I’m sorry, I’m heading off for the army and I need to focus on that and not on our relationship. I am going to be so busy there won’t be any time for a relationship” "I’ve had a great time with you, but I think we’ve both changed and aren’t the same people we were when we got together. We don’t seem to have anything in common anymore.” "I’ve really tried to give this a go, but I don’t want to go out with you anymore. I feel like you’re not interested in me. That makes me sad. I’ve tried to talk to you about it, but it seems like you don’t want to resolve it.”  , Think about her responses -- sad, angry, silent -- and how you are going to deal with them. Do you want to comfort her, or just deliver the message and leave? Keep in mind that these interactions often don’t go as planned, so be ready to improvise. They are always challenging and difficult, but try to be kind and sympathetic to her feelings.  "I’m sorry you’re so sad. I just don’t think this is right for either of us. I know you’ll find someone much better than I am for you.” "Look, I understand that you’re angry, but I don’t want to fight. I am going to walk away and we can talk about this later.” "I know I’ve made you really upset. I’m sorry. If you want to talk about it sometime later, please let me know.”  , Don't break up with her in the hallway with everybody around. Choose a time that isn’t during the school day. Think about doing it outside, maybe taking a walk. That way you don’t have to look at each other -- sometimes that helps with a really emotional conversation., Don't do it through Facebook, texts, over the phone, etc. No one deserves that kind of treatment. Even if you’re worried about how it’s going to go, you need to be brave and do it face-to-face. Doing it through texts or Facebook may feel a lot better to you, but it certainly won’t to her. If you want to have any kind of friendship with her in the future, do the right thing and do it in person., For this difficult conversation, you might want to start by letting her know that you have something important you need to say. She will probably have some idea that it’s about breaking up.  Start by saying something nice about her. “I need to talk to you, but I wanted to let you know I’ve always thought you’re such a kind person.” Or “Whatever happens between the two of us, I wanted to tell you that you are a great singer and I hope you continue with music.” Tell her why the relationship is not working for you. “I don’t think we share interests any more” or “I’m having a lot of trouble with my parents’ divorce right now, and I need to focus on dealing with my anger, not being in a relationship.” Explain that you want to break up. You need to say this explicitly so she knows that this isn’t a conversation about trying to make your relationship better. “I am breaking up with you -- I’m sorry.” You could also tell her -- “I need to break this relationship off. I’m not ready to be so serious with you.” Be comforting and say something nice about her. “You are such a beautiful person, you are going to find someone who can give you the kind of relationship you want.” You could also say, “You deserve someone smart and ready to be in the kind of committed relationship you deserve.”  , It might be that she is feeling the same way you are. Chances are, however, that she has different ideas about the relationship. She might want to try and continue it, and then it will be up to you to decide if you want to try and work on it or go through with the breakup as planned.  Even if it goes as you planned, you’re probably going to feel emotionally fragile when it’s over. Breaking up is difficult in any situation, because you’re typically going to be making the other person feel bad. Take some time to yourself to think things over after you have talked to your ex-girlfriend.  Even though it might seem like a good idea to get back out there and find someone new, it’s usually a poor idea. You’re not at your emotional best, and you should take a few weeks to think through what you want to do going forward.  Sometimes hanging out with your friends is the best way to move forward. They were with you through the relationship and will be there to support you now. Plan fun activities to keep you occupied and less likely to dwell on your romantic situation. If you want to discuss the break up with your friends, that’s fine, but don’t keep bringing it up -- you need to move on and your friends probably aren’t excited to hear about it over and over.  Even if she wants to be in touch, you need a period where you two are not communicating so that the relationship can end and you can both adjust to the new reality. You might be able to communicate as friends in a few months, but don’t seek her out. If she contacts you, explain that you need time and don’t want to be in contact just yet.  When you see her around, be friendly. Even if she ignores you or yells, it’s better for you to be mature and treat her respectfully.  

think about why you are breaking up with her.  practice what you are going to say.  figure out how to respond to her.  find a private time and place to do it.  do it in person.  talk about the positives with the negatives.  listen to her.  be ready to feel emotional.  don’t jump right back into dating.  reach out to your friends.  don’t contact your ex-girlfriend.  be nice to your ex-girlfriend. 

 Right after a break up, it’s very common for women to blame themselves. However, instead of piling guilt on top of all the negativity you are already experiencing, try your best to be positive and kind to yourself. Remember that you want to reinvent yourself for yourself, not to get your partner back or to prove something to the rest of the world.   Cut out the negative self-talk. Instead of dwelling on your failures and what you could have done differently, comfort yourself as you would comfort your best friend. Tell yourself you did what you could, reflect on what you’ve learned from the experience, and give yourself positive affirmations. If you are finding it difficult to get through your days, try saying some daily affirmations in the mirror. Look in the mirror and repeat a phrase several times to your reflection such as, “I am worthy, beautiful, and strong.” It may sound silly, but telling yourself positive affirmations (and doing your best to truly believe in them) can help reset your thinking and encourage a more positive outlook on the world.; , The extreme stress caused by a break up causes different reactions but regardless, taking care of your physical health is of utmost importance, especially when the break up happened recently. You may have difficulty sleeping, turn to food for comfort, or have no desire to eat at all. Regardless of how your body reacts, do your best to maintain as many healthy routines as possible.   You may crave chocolates or other unhealthy foods but try to maintain a healthy diet with lots of fruits and vegetables. Not only will this help you feel better, but your body will also thank you and you will avoid the dreaded post-break up pounds. Eating healthy doesn’t mean depriving yourself of all treats. If all you want to do is eat your feelings in the form of a gallon of ice cream, try spooning out a reasonable portion of ice cream into a separate bowl and enjoying it slowly. Satisfying your craving can actually boost your psychological state, but if you overdo it by binge eating, you’ll end up feeling worse about yourself in the long run.  Any form of exercise, whether it be yoga or even just running around the block for fifteen minutes, can also offset some of the anxiety and sadness you experience through an uptick of dopamine and other feel-good chemicals in the brain. A break up can be a great reason to treat yourself to a one-month trial at a new yoga studio or even try out a new activity, like pole dancing or Zumba, that gets you working out in a supportive and upbeat community.   You may not feel like leaving the house or moving at all. If that’s the case, try doing some light stretches or just walking around the block until you are feeling better. After all, every little step counts. Losing yourself in a new workout activity or sport can not only be a great way to distract yourself from the negative emotions you are processing, but can also contribute to a fitter, stronger body which could improve your confidence and contribute to the new, reinvented you.  In the aftermath of a relationship, it’s always good to take some time to reflect on your life. After all, no matter how in love you were with the person, your life is ultimately your own and this can be a great opportunity to reflect on your hopes, goals, and dreams--what you ultimately see as your own purpose in life.   If you don’t have any concrete goals, now could be a great time to start! They can be as simple as “learn how to salsa dance” or “get a promotion.” If you already have some goals, such as getting A’s in school, brainstorm what you can do on a regular basis to get to that point. Coming up with regular to-do lists can contribute to your success and also get you back into rhythm after the post-break up trauma. Many of us lose track of our goals when we’re in a relationship. Whether this was the case for you or not, try to keep sight of your goals as and think of them as an umbrella to shelter yourself from disappointment. Pinning your hopes on yourself and working towards your goals in a concrete manner will help you move on and even potentially put you in contact with people who are better suited to you., After all, reinventing yourself is all about re-centering your focus on your life, including how you feel and how you present yourself to the world. For some, reinventing yourself may be all about getting on track with your life goals while for others, physical alterations are more important.   If possible, have a friend tag along or even do a makeover with you. Not only will you have more fun, you’ll also get some friendly guidance that will help steer you away from any potentially regrettable decisions. If you and your ex had a shared social group, reach out to a friend that is either outside of that friend group or is much closer to you than your ex (such as a childhood friend who became friends with your ex much later). You don’t want to put anyone in the uncomfortable position of choosing sides.  There's nothing like a good pampering to ease all the troubles away, so treat yourself to a massage, facial, or a mani-pedicure. Or if spa treatments aren’t your thing, buy yourself a new perfume or even indulge in your favorite candy.   If you can’t afford expensive spa treatments, doing facials or mani-pedis at home can still give you the same benefits. Inviting a friend over can further help lift your spirits as well.  Doing so will increase your self confidence and also help you psychologically adjust to your life in the aftermath of a break up.   If you can’t afford a new hairstyle or clothes, don’t despair. You can always check out thrift stores for cheap, interesting pieces or dye your hair yourself rather than going to a salon. Even a change as small as parting your hair differently can have a dramatic impact on your look and, more importantly, how you feel about yourself. If you usually wear a signature perfume, try changing it up. Many of us connect memories with scents and so continuing to wear a certain scent may remind you of your ex and bring you down. Buying a new perfume will not only be a great way to treat yourself, but could also help you begin a new chapter in life., When talking about makeovers, people usually focus on the outward changes in appearance but you should apply the concept of the makeover to your personality and emotional state as well. Take some time to reflect on what you would like to change about your attitudes or behaviors and what you can do to implement those changes.   For example, many people suffer from low self-confidence, especially after a break up. Try boosting your confidence by focusing on the positives, in your outlook and your self-image, and changing your body posture to communicate confidence (such as standing straight and keeping your shoulders down)., Many people give up activities they once loved or stop spending as much time on them when they are in a romantic relationship. This is natural but now that you are newly single, take the opportunity to take up reading your favorite books, jumping back into your favorite sport, or spending more time with your girl friends.  Go through your belongings and get rid of mementos, old clothes, anything that you feel doesn’t serve a purpose other than to remind you of the pain of the lost relationship.   This includes truly letting go of the relationship you were in. If you two have agreed to be friends, be sure to have a set “time out” period so that things can cool off between you two. If the break up ended badly, do your best to just forget about your ex and move on with your life., After a breakup is a great time to start a new hobby or learn a new skill. All that time you once spent with your ex can now be channeled into doing the things you want to do. Reflect on if there’s anything you’ve ever wanted to do but somehow never found the time or drive to act on that desire.   Some women even take this as an opportunity to make an ambitious career or education change. If you’ve always secretly wanted to finish your degree or apply for a job abroad, then take the break up as an opportunity to do it! Trying something new doesn’t have to be dramatic, however. For some women, taking up painting, getting through that stack of classics that’s been collecting dust, or taking an online course can be just as satisfying.  After your initial mourning period, it’s important to not get stuck in a post break up rut. Whether it’s going to the park, going dancing, or just reconnecting with close friends, it’s important to go out and do fun things. Remember that at the end of the day you live life as an individual, so get out there and live your life.   Just be sure to not go out of control. Many people resort to harmful or self-destructive behaviors (such as drinking too much or acting out) during grieving periods. You can avoid this by doing emotional check-ins. For example, if you make plans to meet at a bar with friends but are really only looking forward to the drinks, you should examine where that desire is coming from and plan to do something else with your friends, or ask them to monitor how much you drink so that you don’t lose control. Don’t go to parties or other events that your ex is also likely to attend. You both need a substantial period of time apart in order to heal and move on. If you’ve already said yes to a party and only find out later that your ex will be there, cancel and make new plans for the evening unless you are positive that you are emotionally ready for a possible interaction.  This step may be further down the line, but make sure to take what you have learned from your last relationship and carry the lessons with you. Reflect on what kind of partner the new you would like and what you have to offer them..   Remember, you and your ex broke up for a reason and part of reinventing yourself is to have a happier, more fulfilling life so look for qualities in other people that will make that happen.  

be gentle with yourself.  eat healthy.  exercise.  reflect on your purpose.  reflect on why and what kind of makeover you want.  treat yourself.  splurge on a new hairstyle or a wardrobe change.  change the inner, not just the outer.  reconnect with what you love.  get rid of what’s holding you back.  try something new.  get out and have fun.  seek out the right relationship. 

 Maybe you are already dating someone and you no longer want to be. There are ways to kindly reject your significant other. Your first step is to face the situation head on.Don't try to delay the breakup. If you want to end the relationship, it's best to get it over with. Don't wait for the other person to break up with you. It can be tempting to try to be mean or avoid making plans so that your partner will end the relationship. Making someone want to breakup with you doesn't make you the nicer person. It's just a way of putting the burden on someone else.  Ending a relationship can be painful. It can also be a very awkward conversation. Try to make it as smooth as possible by being as kind and gentle as possible.Don't play the blame game. You don't need to say, "I'm breaking up with you because you're a horrible person!" It's okay to voice your concerns. Just be honest and constructive. For example, you could say, "I can't date you anymore. It really bothers me that you repeatedly break plans with me without any warning." You can also say something nice. You could try, "There are a lot of great things about dating you. However, it's time for me to move on."  , You might be nervous if you have to reject someone. Sometimes it can ease your anxiety if you make a plan. Put some thought into how you will approach the conversation.Think about the main points. For example, if you are breaking up because you don't want to be in a relationship, make sure to say that. Write down some notes. It can be useful to see your thoughts in writing. It can also help you remember what you want to say. Think about the other person's feelings. Try out some different variations of "This isn't working" to figure out what feels natural and honest.  Anytime you have to have "the talk", it's going to be difficult. If you choose an appropriate time, you can make it a little more bearable. Take the other person's perspective into account.Break-up in person. It can be tempting to send a text or e-mail, but you should avoid doing so. It is kinder and more respectful to have a face to face conversation. Try to avoid having a public breakup. For example, don't choose a friend's birthday party as the setting for an important conversation. Give some warning. Let the other person know that you need to have a serious talk. Try saying, "I have to talk to you about something that you probably won't like."  , Ending a relationship can feel complicated. You might feel like easing out of dating is nicer to the other person. However, it is more effective to definitively end things.Set clear boundaries. You can try saying, "I think it's best if we don't communicate at all for a while." Consider blocking the other person on social media. That way, no one will be tempted to monitor Facebook or Instagram statuses. Don't lead anyone on. After you have broken up, do not flirt with your ex or try to make plans with them.  

take responsibility for breaking up.  use compassion.  plan what you want to say.  find a good time.  make a clean break. 

 Rejecting someone can cause a lot of emotions. In fact, it can make some people very angry. If you need to reject someone, look for some warning signs.Your safety is top priority. If you think rejecting someone could cause them to become very upset, take steps to stay safe. One red flag is a bad temper. If you have seen the person lose their temper before, consider rejecting them in public. It might be more awkward, but you'll be safe. Know when to walk away. If your rejection causes anger, don't stand there trying to explain yourself. If the person starts yelling or being mean, end the conversation. If the other person seems to have an anger management problem, it is okay to use e-mail or text to reject them. That is an exception to the "face to face" rule.  Rejecting someone is not an enjoyable experience. In fact, it can make you feel pretty bad. However, it's important to remember that your emotions should be your priority.Don't say "yes" simply to avoid saying "no". Only accept a date with someone you are interested in. Know that your happiness is important. You do not need to date someone that you don't like. Consider your motivations. Try not to let your friends influence your dating choices. Say "yes" or "no" based on your own opinions.  It can be tricky to know that you need to reject someone. If you know that someone is going to ask you out and you want to say no, consider getting some advice. Talk to a friend or family member that you trust.Think about asking a sibling for advice. They might be able to help you think of a nice way to say "No, thank you." Choose a friend who can be trusted to stay quiet. You don't want other people to know about the breakup before your boyfriend or girlfriend knows. Be honest about your emotions. Try saying, "I need to reject someone, and it's making me really nervous."  

watch for red flags.  prioritize your feelings.  confide in someone trustworthy. 

 If you want to play a player, you have to get his attention. Do you get his attention by fawning all over him, running your hands through this hair, and telling him how hot he is? Absolutely not. To play a player, you have to start off by completely ignoring him -- be an ice queen if you have to. If he walks into a room and tries to charm you and your girls, look away, stare into your drink, or barely say hi before you check your phone or disappear to the girl's room.   He'll notice you precisely because you didn't notice him. Players expect to be worshipped by every woman around, and he'll wonder why his magic didn't work on you. You don't have to be outright rude to him. Just look completely uninterested, like you have better things to do than to talk to him. But that doesn't mean you should insult him or call him names, either.; , After a while, whether it's a few weeks later at the same party or a few hours later at the same bar, you can start to open up a bit. You should let him know you see him, but just enough to make him curious and to want to get to know you and win you over. You can do this by introducing yourself, repeating his name when he introduces himself, or by smiling at him from across the room.   Don't let him make you laugh, ask you to dance, or lavish you with complements. If he insists on buying you a drink, you can let him, but don't let it be an excuse for him to spend the night trying to charm you. Take the drink, thank him, and walk away.  Now that you've got his attention and have shown some minimal interest in him, you need to remind him that you have better things to do than to be with him. Let him see you having a good time with your girls by laughing it up with them, hitting up the dance floor with them, or just having a general good time without him.   You can do this anywhere, not just out at a bar. If the player is in your school or someone from town, let him see you having fun with your girls no matter what you're doing, whether it's eating lunch or going shopping. Just make one thing clear: you do not need him.  To reinforce the idea that you don't really need the player in your life, let him see you hanging out with other guys. Whether you're hanging out with your guy friends or if another guy is showing interest in you, you should let him see that every guy wants some of your time and that you like all of the attention -- as long as it's not from him.   Just by chatting or laughing with other guys, you'll be showing him that you don't need him. You don't have to grind with another guy on the dance floor to show that he's not needed. Don't look over at the player to make sure that he sees you having a great time. He shouldn't even consider that you're trying to get his attention by ignoring him.  Once you've acknowledged the guy only to mostly ignore him with your girlfriends and other guys in your life, it's time to reel him back in again. After you think you've driven him crazy enough, it's time to have a quick, flirtatious conversation where you let him fawn all over you and show him that you may be interested.   Play it cool. Don't flatter him. Just let him know that you like talking to him. Keep things light and fun. That'll make him want to talk to you more. Tease him a little bit. Don't let him take himself too seriously or think he's all that.  Let him see that while you like flirting with him, you're not going to fall for his usual lady-killing tactics. You can make fun of him, call him Romeo, or refer to the pack of girls behind him as his girlfriends. This will only drive him crazy and make him want to prove how different he is.   If you don't let him charm you or flatter you, he'll only become more persistent. That's exactly what he wants.  

ignore him at first.  slowly acknowledge him.  let him see you having fun with your girls.  let him see you having a good time with other guys.  flirt a little bit.  be immune to his charms. 

 Come to terms with your own feelings and make a firm decision to end the relationship. Ask yourself: Is this really what I want? Do I really want to end a relationship with him? How can I do this without breaking his heart? Ask yourself these questions before you come to a conclusion.; , Once you decide to break up with your partner, immediately think about how, when and where you will take action. Do you want it to be now? Tomorrow? Next month? Do you want to be break up with him at the park, your house, at school/work? Decide.  Don't give a third party the opportunity to tell your partner that you want to break up before you have the chance to discuss the matter alone. That will ruin everything.  Approach the topic when both of you are calm and rational. Don't announce your intention to break up during a heated argument or a moment of anger.  Help your partner understand why you want to end the relationship. Be tactful, not brutal.  

acknowledge that the relationship is really over.  don't delay the inevitable.  make sure you're the one who personally delivers the news.  find or schedule an appropriate time.  show your resolve by being firm, decisive and honest. 

 Now that you've played hard to get, it's time to continue to be elusive while making the player want you. The first thing you should do to make him really want you is to be mysterious. Don't open up too much or talk about your past, your hopes for the future, or your biggest fears. Instead, make him guess what's really on your mind and speak in hints and innuendos instead of being honest.   If you have to leave, don't tell him where you're going. Let him guess. Make him figure out who you really are, from what you love to do to how many siblings you have. Let him do all of the work instead of doling out all of the information for him. Don't keep him up to date about your schedule. If you're busy over the weekend, you're busy over the weekend. You don't have to tell him it's because you're celebrating your Aunt Mary's 50th birthday.  Part of the reason players play girls is because they're tired of girls who drag them down, fall in love, or want them to do serious boyfriend-like things like go to the grocery store or let you cook a never-ending meal for them. Well, if you want to make a player want you, you can't drag him down. You should be fun, spontaneous, and up for anything, whether it's a trip to the beach or a nice run through a rain shower.   Always keep things light and fresh. Remember, you're trying to play this guy, not marry him. Talk about the fun things you'll do that day or that week -- stick to the present. This player won't be in your future. Laugh, don't cry. This is not the person who should see your insecurities or the things that upset you.  Even though you're spending more time with the player, you shouldn't make him think that he has your heart. If you run into another guy you know, don't be shy about flirting with the other guy. And if you're going out with another guy, tell the player about it like it's no big deal. If he knows there are other guys in your life, he'll want you even more because he'll have the need to compete for you.   If you really want to make him jealous, you can even pretend that you're meeting another guy when you're not. If another guy calls you when you're with the player, don't be afraid to answer. Be fun and flirty as you talk to the guy who called you.  If you really want to drive the player crazy, then you should show no signs of caring if you see him with another woman or if he gets a text from another woman. Players thrive from having multiple women compete over them, or from the rush of trying to juggle a few women without any of them knowing. If you act like you couldn't care less if he sees another girl, he'll only want to make you more jealous.   To gain the power to play a player, you have to stand out to him. It's likely that every other girl in his life has been jealous. This is why you'll be different. If someone calls or texts him, don't say, "Who's that?" Look bored or uninterested as he talks into the phone. If you see another girl he knows, be extra nice to her. Show him that you don't view her as competition.  Players are used to girls who text or call them all the time and don't give them any time to themselves. Well, that's where you'll diverge from the pack. You can call him or text him once in a while, but let him do the majority of the communicating. If he reaches out to you, don't respond right away like you have nothing better to do than to sit by the phone and wait for his call.   Don't waste time stalking his Facebook profile. Go online to do your own thing. If you know he's out, leave him alone. Don't text him or call him or he'll think you're obsessing over him. If he knows you're out and he texts you, don't get back to him until the next day. Let him worry about what you were up to while he was away.  Maintaining your independence is a larger part of limiting your communication. You should have your own busy life, your own friends, and even some other guys to date while you're seeing the player. Don't make your schedule revolve around his; make him shift his plans around to see you.   If he cancels on you, don't let him reschedule for the next day. Tell him you're "booked" for the next few days. Make him feel like he really missed out by flaking on you, and he won't do it again. When you're with him, talk about your other friends or the fun things you do that don't involve him. Let him see that you have a life outside of worshipping him.  If you really want to play a player, then you have to be a player. Make him think that you like him while juggling him with two or three other guys. Flatter him and make him feel special while knowing that everything you say is meaningless. You should only do this if you really want to play the player or to get back at him for some reason. Changing your lifestyle this extremely can get a bit exhausting.  

be mysterious.  be fun.  make him jealous.  don't be jealous.  limit your communication.  maintain your independence.  beat him at his own game (optional). 

 Once you've tantalized the player enough and have remained mysterious, sexy, and independent, he should be eating out of your hand. He may even be obsessed with the idea that he has to win you over or that he'll be some kind of a failure if you're always immune to his charms.   When he's eating out of your hand, you'll know it. He'll be calling you all the time, complimenting you, acting jealous whenever another guy or other plans come up, or he'll just want to spend all of his time with you. The look in his eyes will tell you all you need to know. If he was shifty-eyed or distracted in the beginning, but now he stares at you like you're a true wonder, then you've got him where you want him.  Before you cut him loose, you should get him at the peak of his affection for you -- if you cut him loose too early, it won't mean as much to him, but if you cut him loose too late, he may have given up on you. You should say goodbye at the peak of his affections for you, or when you get even the slightest inkling that he's growing bored with you.   You can also say goodbye just because you're getting tired of playing him. It's a tough job. If he starts getting really attached and even tells you he loves you -- and actually sounds like he means it -- then you should cut him loose immediately. If you wait too long to say goodbye, you may also begin to fall for him, so don't forget to protect your heart.  Once you've decided it's time to say goodbye, you should cut off all contact with the player. You don't have to be honest about why -- you can tell him that you got sick of him, that you've got better things to do, or that you're just not into him. Don't make a big production of it or take him out to dinner to end things -- just take a few minutes to tell him how you feel at a time that's reasonably convenient for both of you.   Or if you really want to hurt him or get him back, just let him catch you out with another guy. When he sees you, don't even look surprised or like you've been caught. That will hurt him even more and he'll get the picture.  Once you've cut the player loose, your decision is final. There's no turning back -- you won't hang out with him again, return his calls, or even grab coffee with him because you feel sorry for him. Remind yourself why you played him in the first place. Either he really hurt you or another friend, or you just realized that he's the kind of guy who doesn't respect women. If he doesn't respect women, then why should you respect him?   If you give in and do see him again, he'll quickly lose respect for you. If he's a true player, he'll only want you if you don't really want him all that much. Once you've played a player, you'll be better at recognizing them in the future. Watch out for these cagey guys and protect your heart as you move forward in your love life. Remain humble. Don't let this accomplishment get to your head; although it does add an extreme boost to your confidence (you might start to think that you can get any guy you want or feel that you're "playing" some guys when they only look at you as a friend)the tables can turn quick if you get caught up (with other dudes). They might know the game a little better than you do.  

have him eating out of your hand.  know when it's time to say goodbye.  cut him loose.  have no mercy. 

 When we lose something important to us, the healthy response is to grieve. Psychologists believe that all people generally go through the same stages of grief, or the same set of emotional responses. Understanding these can help you understand your feelings and know that how you feel is normal and healthy. These stages last for different amounts of time for different individuals and certain stages may not present at all. It is important to remember that everyone is different.Denial. It may be difficult, at first, to believe that your relationship has ended. Especially if you have been together for a long time, the idea of not being together may feel unnatural and unreal. You may perhaps feel that your partner isn’t really gone, they just need time to cool down. While this is a normal emotional response, it is important to acknowledge that your relationship is over, as denying this will just make things harder for you and your partner. Anger. This is often described as a feeling of “Why me?” You may feel the strong need to blame the end of your relationship on any number of factors. You may blame yourself, your partner, your God, your family, your friends, your job, or any other number of factors. It is important not to act out, however. Fault is often shared between many factors or may not exist at all. Bargaining. This is a time period where people often try to return to their ended relationship. You may beg your partner to take you back, promising to change whatever you perceive as being the source of the breakup. This is likely not a good idea, however. Even if the relationship can be repaired, it should be done after serious reflection and positive changes. This stage generally ends when one realizes that the relationship cannot be repaired. Depression. This is usually the longest lasting stage of grief. You will feel very sad and often as if there is no hope. You may feel like you never want to love again or that life is pointless. These emotions are normal but remember that feelings of suicide are not. If you feel this way, seek help immediately. Like all stages of grief, this stage too will end and you will be happy again. Acceptance. Acceptance of what has happened to you usually follows or coincides with the Depression stage. You will come to understand that the end of your relationship is not the end of the world. You will feel okay about what has happened and you will be ready to move on to the next stage of your life.; , It is important to be sad. Don’t pretend that everything is wonderful. Bottling your emotions like this is unhealthy and can lead to problems later on. You should allow yourself to be sad. Cry, if you want to. This is a normal, healthy response when bad things happen to you.   Watching sad or hopeful movies, eating comfort foods, or getting some good snuggle time with your favorite pet is a good way to spend time being sad. Of course, being sad for a long time or being sad in a way that significantly impacts your quality of life may be an indication that it's time to start turning your feelings around. If you can't do this on your own, get help.  When you are at this stage, it is important to have time to yourself. While being with others is important and can significantly help the healing process, you need time to yourself as well. Use this time to take care of your own needs. Focus on what makes you feel better and thinking about what you want at this stage in your life. Having others around can be distracting, which is good in moderation but will keep you from taking care of yourself if in excess.   Set aside at least a few hours every day where you can be by yourself and really process your feelings. In the evening, before bedtime, is usually the easiest for most people. If your home is not a good environment for alone time, try going on a walk in your neighborhood, to a local park, or to your local library.  After a breakup, especially if the relationship was long-term, you may feel like you wasted time or that the whole thing was pointless. This is never the case and it is important to keep that in mind. Even bad experiences serve to teach us about ourselves, what we want from life, what we value most, and how to better interact with other people.Though your relationship has ended, it has undoubtedly provided you with invaluable life experiences. If it did not, you would not feel so upset about it ending.   Finding meaning in your experience can be a really powerful way to move on, instantly transforming a negative experience into something that (while it may not be fully positive) will as least make you happy on some level that it happened at all. Finding that meaning, however, is difficult and how you do it will depend on you, how you think, and what you gained from the experience. Try not to look for negative life lessons, since these will only make you more bitter. Instead, look for something that is really a gain in your life. Good examples of lessons from tough experiences include: "Now I know that I can survive tough situations." or "Now I know more about what I want as a person and what is really important to me." or "This has made me realize how truly wonderful the people in my life are and helped me to appreciate them while I have them."  , Don’t pretend like your ex never existed. Like bottling your emotions, this is an unhealthy response. This person played a role in your life and that role needs to be acknowledged. Know that the time with your ex is over, but remembering those times fondly will help you feel better in the long term.   While many people make themselves feel better by thinking about the bad things about their ex, it is also important to think about the good things. Focusing only on the bad things will lead you to be bitter and may lead you to regret things about your relationship that you enjoyed at the time. This poisoning of your own memories will just hurt you in the long run. To remind yourself of the good parts of your relationship, write down the things about your ex that you liked or particularly good times you had together.  Failed relationships, like anything in your life that ends badly, can serve as a wonderful learning opportunity. Reflect on your relationship, the good things and the bad things, so that you can use that knowledge to bring positive change to your life. This will allow you to improve future relationships by learning from your mistakes and learning more about what you want from yourself and another person.   Think about your partners failures in the relationship, as well as the things they did well. Which of these qualities would you like to see in future relationships and what qualities should you avoid in the future? Maybe your ex was very lazy, which didn’t bother you in the beginning but became a problem over time. This might be something to avoid in your next relationship, even if it isn’t so much of a problem in the beginning. Acknowledge your own faults. There were likely things in the relationship that you handled poorly as well. Think about what these things were and how these traits negatively impact your relationships with other people. These can be qualities which affect friends and family as well. Think about how and if you want to try to change these things about yourself. Maybe you find that you forget to consider the feelings of others, for example. This may be a quality to change, in order to create better relationships with everyone around you. Love yourself. Remember to think about the good things about yourself as well. You are a good person, even if you have made mistakes. Bad experiences in life should not keep you from feeling like you have something to offer the world. List the things about yourself that you and others like. Focus on really making those qualities shine and you will feel better in no time.  

the five stages of grief.  be sad.  get some alone time.  there is a point.  remember your ex.  reflect on your relationship. 

 * Remember friends ALWAYS make you laugh. If you want to get over it, you have to be with your friends so they can help you forget about it and make you feel better.; , (It always helps.)  ,, Erase his phone number. There is no sense in having it anymore if you want to make a true, finished, clean break.  'Cry, scream and feel sorry for yourself'. Wallow in self-pity. However, one day while you are wallowing you will suddenly say, "Hey I don't feel like wallowing anymore today. I feel better." And the next day you will feel better and each day after that you will feel even better. Soon, something amazing happens, you rediscover your smile and actually laugh at who you were back then. Suddenly you are thankful for what the experience taught you.  A great piece was posted here on the Breaking Up is Hard to Do board a while ago. I kept it, and I read it every morning when I sit at my desk. The first line is, 'Promise yourself to be so strong that nothing can disturb you.' For me, that has worked! Reading a simple little piece someone posted has made such a great impact on how I view it all. It does get better, and within a couple of weeks, the hurt goes away.  If you think you are beaten, you are. If you think you dare not, you don't. Success begins with your own will. It's all in your state of mind. Life's battles are not always won by those who are stronger or faster. Sooner or later the person who wins is the person who thinks he can!  , In the beginning of a break-up, you might want to show people that you are fine. This might cause you to go out and act as though you are moving on full swing. You might even start dating immediately. If the relationship meant a great deal to you then you are going to need time to mourn the loss of it. Never assume you need to apologize for feeling bad about your new path in life. As a relationship ends, you will need to grieve. Take time to get past the emotions of anger, sadness, and loss. Once you can accept where you are and that the relationship is in the past, then maybe you are ready for a new relationship.  This will let you concentrate on something new and interesting and get you out of the circular thought process you may or may not develop, thinking about your ex too much.  Turn up your favorite music and dance like nobody's looking. Whether you like bubblegum pop or screamo, you'll let out some stress!  

go out with your friends.  write out your feelings on a piece of paper.  do not become his/her friend unless you are truly and completely over him/her!  ,  erase all the little notes and messages he gave you or left on your phone.  get it all out.  find some words of wisdom and live by them.  think positively.  never be ashamed of your feelings.  start a new hobby or pastime.  dance it out!!! 

 If he stops calling regularly or text messaging you in the middle of the day (if this is something you normally did), that could be a sign.; , Is he as interested in talking to you as he used to be?  , If he's thinking about leaving, he won't want to hug or kiss you as much as he used to.  Does he flirt with them in front of you?  , He may be telling others that he is going to break up with you, but hasn't told you yet. You can also just gauge how excited he is about the relationship.  Does he hang around his friends who are girls more often? He might be trying to tell you something. , If he does might be a sign he just wants to mess around with other chicks and wants you to feel special in a way too. He may want you as a friend with benefits, or perhaps he wants to break up but doesn't have the courage to go all the way. 

think about whether he keeps breaking plans or avoiding you.  listen to your conversations.  get physical.  watch his behavior with other girls.  talk to his friends.  does he purposely hang around girls you don't like?,  if he is constantly telling you he has to go when you're on the phone, he's just making up excuses.  ,  does he tell you he wants a break?,  don't keep annoying him or pestering him as he may think something's going on and may think about dumping you more just act natural.  

 If you have no room in your house to get rid of the items, just tell someone in your household to store them safely in a safe place for about 6 months.; , Google provides a lot of useful information.  Good question! Sites such as Yahoo Answers can help you with what you're dealing with. Or, just search for an article on this site! This site has several articles similar to this one and they have better information.  Some friends, or even best friends are great with giving advice. Be sure to listen attentively and gather all information once they're done. A little bit of everyone's data put together can really help you.  Discovering new hobbies can help wash away your past and put you into a healthier position. Try out a new hobby that will make you focus only on the positive things in life. Maybe try becoming athletic, or cloud watching, or maybe even writing! Writing can help you remember great ideas and just push everything aside.  Maybe you should try changing your schedule if you're in a social class with this person or whatever. Try telling the host of that activity that you cannot join at that certain time because you may encounter something utterly painful. He/she will understand and do their best to help you with avoiding that certain person. Avoiding contact puts you into a better position. You cannot see that person, hear them, or anything, therefore you do not know what to think about if you cannot see them. , Think about the good things if you want to think about him/her and smile.  Smiling can help you stay confident. Try to smile around more people.  Laughter is the best medicine.  Do not bring up the whole 'my-relationship-was-painful' discussion or they'll bring it up at times. This may hurt you. If a new friend accidentally forgets and just mentions this person, tell them that it may upset you if they go any further.  Well let's go!  , Being confident can push you onto higher levels in life and make you much, much happier!  , Meeting someone new can definitely help you reach your goal. , Ask this person, What are your hobbies? When is your birthday? What drinks do you enjoy? Asking these questions can cause you to only focus on this person, and this person only. This is what you want, so DO NOT stop yourself once you start to do this.  He/she may want to get in the middle, and then it's up to you to choose the person you love.  (:  

in order to forget about a previous poor relationship, you first have to get rid of any of that person's belongings.  try going onto google for more steps on how to forget this person!,  what other sites provide good information?,  to forget about a certain someone, simply ask a friend for advice!,  try getting into certain hobbies that you've never gotten into once before!,  avoid contact with the person that you are trying to avoid.  if you catch the person's attention, or accidentally create eye contact, try to fix your eyes on something else or do something different so that that person does not notice you any longer.  ,  try not to think about the bad things in your relationship and lighten up!,  smile!,  laugh!,  try to hang out with better people and just focus on them mostly.  are you ready to finally start a new chapter?,  the first part to trying to start brand new is being confident.  meet someone new!,  do not try to fall in love too quickly, as this may cause another painful tension in your recent relationship and it just may end up repeating.  ,  get to know this new person.  once you both fall in love, do not tell this person about your past or anything.  be happy now, because you finally met someone new and you finally have the chance to just be happy. 

 Reflecting on yourself and your relationship can teach you a lot about yourself as a person. This newly found knowledge can give you a better appreciation of who you are, your strengths, and what you want out of life. You may find that things you sacrificed in your relationship mean more to you than you thought at the time.   You may find that hobbies or skills you gave up because of time constraints or the tastes of your partner are actually very important to you. You may find that work you put aside for the sake of your relationship gives you a greater sense of purpose than you thought. You could also find that you sacrificed your friendships more than you wanted over the course of your relationship. This new beginning can give you the opportunity to explore these things that are important to you in ways that you could not before.  It is important to forgive during the healing process. Forgive your ex for hurting you and forgive yourself for any failures you perceive. Remember that blaming people, yourself or someone else, does not make problems go away. Blame will only serve to make you bitter and keep you from future happiness. Forgiving is essential to moving on.Begin the forgiveness process by identifying exactly why you’re mad. Understanding the real reason that you feel hurt will allow you to better deal with the feeling and identifying who you need to forgive specifically. Express your feelings. Begin by writing down your bad feelings. This will help you purge your anger. Next, express your feelings to friends and family. They will help you understand your feelings better by giving you a new perspective. Then, decide if you want to tell the person who hurt you about how you were hurt. Find compassion. Realize that everyone is human and the person who hurt you did so because they have faults, just as everyone else does. Understand that you make mistakes too. It may even be that the person that hurt you was only doing what they thought was right or best. Try to understand the reasons for their actions. This will help you forgive them.  The act of laughing releases endorphins into your body. Endorphins are used to regulate your emotions and make you happy. It will also remind you to find enjoyment in life and get you into the habit of being happy again. Finding the humor in bad situations will especially help you to experience them less negatively. Laughing and placing yourself in situations with the opportunity for laughter will significantly aid your healing process.   Spend time with friends who make you laugh. Surround yourself with people who, when you are with them, make you laugh and provide you with positive experiences. Don’t spend time with people who make you sad or are constantly sharing negative emotions. This will hinder your healing process. Watch comedy. Watch funny television shows or go watch comedy acts at a local club. These activities can be done alone or with others. Seeing these things will distract you from bad emotions while reminding your brain how to feel happy again.  When we are in relationships, we tend to become very dependent on the person we are with. You lose much of your independence in relationships and this can lead you to stop doing things that you enjoy.   While it sometimes feels good to have someone to rely on, being independent can feel good to. It gives you the freedom to do the things you want to do, when you want to do them. You don’t need someone else’s permission and you don't need to worry about how your actions will make someone else feel. Examples of ways you can enjoy your new independence are: going to see a movie your ex would not have enjoyed, wearing clothes that you like but your ex found unattractive, spending time with a friend your ex did not get along with, as well as the sort of individual activities like reading books that are hard to find time for when you are dating.  The best way to get back to life is to live your life. You're alive and the world around you is an amazing place. Everyone has things that they've always wanted to do and this is a fantastic opportunity for you to try new things and experience the world around you.   Exercise. Exercising releases endorphins into your body, much like laughter. By exercising, you can make yourself naturally happier as well as healthier. This is also an activity which many people find they don't have as much time for when they are in a relationship. Getting a healthier, toned body can make you feel like a new person. This feeling of a fresh start can help you move past negative feelings and memories and on to the better things that are waiting for you. Volunteering. One of the best ways to make yourself happy is by making others happy. Taking responsibility and helping another person will give you a sense of purpose, which you may be lacking at a time like this. It gives you the opportunity to see that everyone has problems and that some problems are much bigger than yours. This perspective can be comforting and teach you to appreciate all of the wonderful things and people that you do have in your life. Try volunteering at a soup kitchen if you’re looking for something less time consuming. If you want a bigger commitment, try something like Habitat for Humanity.  Traveling will give you something to be proud of, as well as creating new memories both good and bad. Put yourself in a situation you've never been in before, go somewhere where you do not speak the language. This will create experiences much bigger than those with your ex and you will find yourself excited to return to your life and share your experiences with others.  

discover yourself.  forgive.  laugh.  embrace your independence.  take up new activities.  travel. 

 It is important to spend time with other people. This will help you remember the inherent goodness in others and that interaction will not always result in you getting hurt. Spending time with your friends will distract and help you cope with your pain. They will also help you see the good things about yourself, as well as help you have new experiences to remember fondly.   Take part in activities with your friends, as this will help you think about positive rather than negative emotions and experiences. Go to the movies, attend parties, or try something more ambitious like a hiking trip. Take this opportunity to spend time with friends that you may not have seen in awhile. Sometimes we neglect people when we are in relationships and this is a great time to reconnect and remember how much fun you have when you're with them.  Having new friends and or a new social circle is always a good thing. Who doesn't want more people that they enjoy being around? Go out and meet new people, either through your existing friends or through social settings like school, clubs, or a bar. This will give you new things in life to focus on, rather than your recent pain.  Once you have processed the negative emotions from your break-up and feel like it might be time to move on, you may wish to attempt casual dating. Meet someone new and go on a few dates. This will help you understand that there are more people out there for you. It is best not to rush into a whole new relationship, as you might find yourself in an unhealthy rebound relationship. Instead take things slow and approach dating casually.   You aren't looking for a new partner, you're just look for new and positive experiences. With time, you will find someone who feels right and before you know it you'll happily be in a new relationship. Using the the coping skills and analysis discussed above, you should be better prepared for a more successful and enjoyable experience!  

spend time with friends.  meet new people.  try dating again. 

 It's normal to feel upset and a little heartbroken when your crush rejects you, but anger will not help anything. Getting angry can be particularly damaging if your crush is a close friend, as getting mad may ruin the friendship.Wish your crush good luck and try to smile. If you were/are close friends, let your crush know you'd like to remain friends, and that you hope this won't change things between you. It's the best way to save face and maintain the friendship after getting rejected.; , One of the best ways to get over heartbreak and rejection is to surround yourself with friends. Whether you go to a movie, get food, go out for a drink (if you're old enough), or just hang out at home, it's important to be with friends during difficult situations.Let your friends know you're going through a rough patch, and ask them if they're free to spend some time together. Some friends will make the effort to reach out to you, but other friends may need to be invited. If your friends don't immediately reach out to you, try approaching them and let them know that you could really use some company., If you're feeling the sting of a crush's rejection, it can be helpful to seek out activities that make you happy. Whether you enjoy listening to music, reading a book, watching a movie, or simply going for a walk or bike ride, doing things you enjoy can help you feel good and stay positive in spite of how you're feeling., Some people may assume that journaling won't help, but studies have shown that journaling can help people put their thoughts into perspective and remain positive after experiencing heartbreak.  Invest in a new, high-quality journal. This will ensure that the journal will stand up to any abuse from daily use, and will make you more likely to want to use your journal every day.Set aside time everyday to write in your journal. Try setting a timer to force yourself to write for longer periods of time.Allow yourself to experiment. Your journal isn't intended to be read by anyone else, so let yourself be open and honest. Give yourself permission to think things through on the page, as you're figuring it out. In other words, it doesn't have to be a perfectly thought-out and well-articulated document. It can just be a jumble of thoughts, feelings, or observations., Maybe you were rejected in front of a group of people and you're feeling embarrassed, or perhaps you just had really high hopes that things would work out with someone. Whatever you're going through, don't be afraid to talk about how you're feeling if you're really devastated over a rejection. If you don't think your friends or family would understand, try talking to a counselor or therapist.Many schools and universities offer free counselors, or you can search online to find a therapist in your area.  It's natural to feel a little hurt after getting rejected, but it's important that you don't let yourself become afraid of rejection in the future. That kind of fear and avoidance are part of catastrophizing, which involves assuming that one experience is part of a larger, more serious pattern.Remember that even though rejection may be inconvenient and even painful, it is not a horrible, life-or-death situation.Keep in mind that rejection is never permanent. New opportunities will always present themselves eventually., Many people respond to rejection by internalizing it. It's easy to feel that someone's rejection is a reflection of your own worth, but it's simply not true. You've no doubt had crushes on some people and not had feelings about others, and it has nothing to do with how attractive or interesting or likable that person is. Much of it boils down to compatibility. Other times, a person may just not be ready for a relationship. Whatever the reason, it does not reflect on you.Never let someone else's approval or rejection define your own worth. Remember that you are wonderful just the way you are., Yes, it's unfortunate that your crush didn't feel the same way about you, and it's probably a little painful. However, it's just one person, and that person wasn't right for you. Try to think of rejection as an opportunity to find a better situation with someone who will feel the same way about you.If your crush didn't think you'd be compatible together, that just means that there's someone else out there with whom you'll be even more compatible.  If your crush rejected you, it's possible you were more attracted to their appearance than their personality. Whatever the circumstances of your rejection were, now would be a good time to be honest with yourself and determine what you want from an ideal partner.Think about traits you would want from an ideal partner. Perhaps you want someone who is warm and caring, or maybe trustworthiness is more important to you. Shared interests or worldview is also a common trait people seek in a partner. Whatever it is that you think you want from a partner, figure it out before you start having feelings for anyone else., While ideal partner preferences shape the type of person you actively seek out, you also have an unspoken emotional reaction to most people you meet. Sometimes we're blinded by our emotional reaction to someone because of their looks or charming personality, but it's important to learn to recognize the emotional reaction you feel in someone's presence.  Emotional reactions are typically unconscious, and you can't change that reaction. But as you analyze your emotions over time (perhaps through journaling), you can learn to recognize the emotional reaction that you have to a person., Even if someone has traits that you find ideal and you have a positive emotional reaction to that person, you may simply not be a good match when it comes to longterm compatibility. Learning how to evaluate a crush for real, meaningful compatibility can be the difference between frustrating relationship problems and a meaningful, fulfilling partnership.Think about the personality traits you find most desirable. Do you have a "type"? Does that type typically work well with you? Or are you only seeing the surface of people you have a crush on?Trust your gut. If you find someone attractive but don't have much in common with them, it probably won't work out, and you probably already know this. Learn to trust your gut as you evaluate potential partners, as this will help you avoid getting hurt and rejected in the future. 

resist getting angry.  spend time with friends.  do things you enjoy.  start journaling.  know when to ask for help.  avoid fearing rejection.  separate yourself from rejection.  try to see rejection as opportunity.  learn your ideal partner preferences.  recognize your emotional reactions.  evaluate crushes for realistic compatibility. 

 Teenagers tend to be highly insecure. They dislike feeling like they're being judged for their choices. Instead of laying on the blame when talking to your teen, look for patterns of behavior that are detrimental to a healthy relationship. Combating the patterns is more effective than simply chastising your teen for his or her behavior.   Try seeing things from your teen's perspective. Why do you think he or she is resistant to having a healthy relationship with you? Where is he or she coming from in regards to the conflict? Is there anything you're doing that's ineffective when it comes to communication?Do not worry about who is right. Look for the pattern. What behaviors are creating a negative home environment and how can the two of you work together mutually to address those behaviors? Try beginning a conversation like this: "I notice that I ask you to do put your dirty dishes in the sink. Even when you say you will, you don't end up doing it a lot of the time and I end up having to get on your case. This causes you to get angry. What do you think we can do to solve this problem more effectively?"; , When you're frustrated with a relationship with a family member, you may feel inclined to look back at past interactions. This is a means to collect evidence, with a strong confirmation bias, that you're right and your teen is wrong. Such a strategy can be detrimental when trying to repair a relationship. You're working on moving forward so dwelling in the past is preventing you from moving beyond negativities of the past. When interacting with your teen, focus on the present moment and the present problem., You cannot force your teen to want to talk to you. If you try to pry, your teen is likely to pull away. However, if you strive to simply make yourself available your teen will come to you when he or she is in need.   Always let your teen know if they need you, you can be there to talk. Do not pressure them or make them feel obligated to share. Simply say something like, "If you need me, I'm always here to chat."Make sure your teen knows when he or she can reach you when you might not be readily available. Have your work phone number available for emergencies. Text your teen if you can't take a call at a given moment., Teenagers are known for their insecurity. If you come off as judgmental to your teenager, this may alienate him or her from you. Try to be as non-judging as possible when talking with your teen.   People begin to explore new behavior during their teenage years. Sexual feelings emerge and your teen might be curious about exploring aspects of the adult world, like engaging in drinking. Allow your teen to express themselves to you without judgment, but serve as a gentle reminder that safety is important. Do not be afraid to talk to your teen about the dangers of drinking and unprotected sex. Just make sure you do so in a way that makes it clear you want your teen to be safe and happy. Do not frame it in a judgmental tone.Try saying something like, "I know teenagers are curious about trying new things, but I want you to be safe and happy. Can we spend some time this week talking about drinking and drug use?"  , When trying to repair a damaged relationship at any age, people sometimes get tunnel vision. They feel like they should be hyper focused on potential outcomes. This obsession with meeting goals, which are often difficult to measure in relationships, skews their ability to focus. Place your energy towards putting in a solid effort and goals should happen organically., Many parents find it difficult to talk with their teen. If you want to build a healthier relationship with your teenagers, learn how to talk to your teen effectively.   Withhold judgment during conversations but maintain honesty. If certain topics inevitably lead to judgment and hostility, halt the conversation with something like, "I don't think we should talk about this."Make time for casual conversation. If you only discuss relationship problems with your teen conversation will always feel stressful and forced. Talk about fun, unimportant matters like movies, TV shows, celebrity gossip, and other fun interests.Ease into making conversation with your teen. You can't expect your teen to want to open up and be friends with you over night. Take tiny, gradual steps when it comes to repairing a damaged relationship., Parents are sometimes guilty of not truly listening to their teenagers. Having a healthy relationship with your teen means listening to his needs and wants and treating them as valid.   Practice active listening with your teen. It's important for teens to feel heard and acknowledged. Give non-verbal clues, like nodding and smiling when appropriate, to show you are listening. Repeat back what your teen just said in a brief summary. For example, if your teen is saying he feels like his friends ditched him at the hockey game last week say something like, "So, you're feeling left out because your friends didn't seem to want to spend time with you?" This will show your teen you're paying attention and care.Active listening prevents misunderstandings, a factor that can damage any relationship. It also forces you to listen and take in what your teen in saying., An underlying mental health problem like depression or anxiety could be affecting your relationship with your teen. Such ailments can manifest themselves differently in teens than in adults so familiarize yourself with the warning signs.   Feelings of sadness, frequent crying bouts, fatigue, loss of interest in activities, and difficulty concentrating serve as symptoms of depression in both teens and adults. There are some symptoms of depression that teens tend to show more often than adults. These include an irritable or angry mood, complaints of various aches and pains, sensitivity to criticism, and withdrawing from friends and family members.A teen may act out when experiencing depression and anxiety as a means to cope with emotional pain. He may experience problems at school, academically and behaviorally, and become addicted to going online or abuse drugs and alcohol. Your teen may also develop chronic low self esteem, engage in high risk behaviors, and sometimes lash out at others in violence., If you want to work on repairing a relationship, work on tweaking your listening skills. When someone tries to communicate with you, do your best to show you are listening.   Actively listening means giving verbal and non verbal cues you are paying attention to what's said. Nod on occasion and say things "Yes" and "Uh-huh." Smile and laugh at appropriate times.When it's your turn to speak, take a few moments to reiterate what the other person said. Briefly summarize the points they made, something like "I understand you feel like..." or "I'm hearing you're feeling very...", If a friend or romantic partner feels hurt by something you did, apologize to that person. Teens are often preoccupied with what others think, making them reluctant to apologize. However, whether you feel you were in the wrong or not you should sincerely apologize if you hurt someone's feelings. An apology can go a long way towards repairing a damaged relationship.  Withholding judgment is important to repairing damaged relationships. Try to put whatever circumstances lead to you and this person's disagreement aside. Proceed without judgment, despite any past negativity. Make a conscious effort to see things from the other person's perspective. Even if your feelings were hurt, what do you think drove this person to behave how he or she did?, Ask yourself whether this relationship is truly worth repairing. Teenagers often make poor decisions relationship wise due to insecurity. Make sure you know the qualities a good friend should have.   Think about past friendships that were positive as well as your relationships with family members. What did you like about these relationships? Did you feel supported, secure, safe? Did you feel this way in regards to the damaged relationship? Why or why not?Look for friends that bring out the best qualities in you. If you don't like how you behave in the presence of a particular person, that friendship might not be worth your time.Repair relationships only with those who treat you with respect. Some relationships became damaged for a reason. If you feel disrespected, there is nothing wrong with wanting to end a relationship., Abusive relationships can take the form of friendships and romantic relationships. Teens are often unaware of healthy relationship dynamics as they're still exploring themselves and the world. Learn what a bad relationship looks like so you know what kind of people to avoid.   Abusers tend to be very jealous. An abusive friend or boyfriend or girlfriend will get jealous easily and worry about abandonment. Abusers mistrust you when you try to ease their fears and will likely ignore the things you say.Abusers often lash out in anger. An abuser might curse at you, yell at you, or blame you for problems over which you have little control. This anger can sometimes turn violent. You should never stay close to someone who harms you physically. 

recognize patterns of behavior.  stay in the present.  be available to your teen.  limit judgment.  focus on making an effort over the ultimate outcome.  learn how to talk to your teen.  listen.  watch for the warning signs of depression and anxiety in teens.  listen actively.  apologize.  do not judge.  identify desirable qualities in friends.  learn the signs of a damaging relationship. 

 If you want to make the girl jealous, you should first show some level of interest in her, so she is intrigued by you and has a sense that you want to take things to the next level. Body language is the easiest way to let her know you somewhat want her without even saying a word. You should only spend a few minutes giving her your attention, so every gesture counts.   Catch her eye from across the room. Be a man and hold her gaze if she notices you, and even give her a big smile. When you approach her, turn your body towards her, stand tall, and lean in towards her slightly, showing that your body is giving her its full attention. Lightly touch her on the arm or back if she seems up for it. Maintain eye contact while you're talking. She should feel like she's the only girl in the world -- for a few minutes.; , Once your body had done some of the talking, you should let your words do the work. A few careful compliments can show that you're paying attention to her and that you want to get to know her better. If it's someone you already know, then the compliments will show that you're still thinking of her. Here's how to do it:   Compliment her appearance. Go for subtlety with this one. Instead of "Damn, you look hot," just say, "Blue is a great color. It really brings out your eyes." Compliment her laugh or her smile. Tease your way into a compliment. Find a way to playfully poke fun at her while complimenting her at the same time.  Asking just a few questions will show that you want to get to know her and that you're invested in who she is. Just a few lighthearted and well-placed questions will hook the girl and will make her want you even more.   Ask her a flirty question. If she mentions she has a sister, say, "Is she as beautiful as you are?" Ask her a silly question but act like it's really important. Ask her what she thinks of men who are in love with their dogs or men who wear leather. Ask her something about herself. Ask about one of her hobbies or what she likes to do for fun. Make the girl think you care about her -- just a little bit.  

work your body.  compliment her.  ask her a few questions. 

 Once you've shown enough interest in the girl and have flirted enough to make her think she has a chance, it's time for a turnaround. Slowly start talking about another girl, whether it's someone she knows or a random girl you keep calling "my really good friend" or "this girl I've known forever."   Find a way to mention the girl every few minutes. Don't do it every few seconds or it will be too annoying, but make it sound like you're constantly thinking of the other girl. Find ways to complement the other girl. Without being too obnoxious, say things like, "She's like, my favorite person," or "She can get any guy she wants." Make the other girl feel inferior. You can also make this person up. If you're a good liar, this "other girl" can be completely fictional. Repeatedly say, "You should really meet her. I think you'd get along." This will drive the other girl crazy.  Instead of just going on and on about another girl in your life, you should take the opportunity to talk about lots of other girls. Just make yourself sound like a ladies man who hangs out with a ton of cute girls whenever and wherever.   Mention a party you went to where there were so many amazing girls. You can even say that you were one of the few guys there but that it was okay -- you're used to it. Talk about a fun weekend trip you took to the beach, and mention how all the girls you were with were wearing the most ridiculous bikinis. Just mention "this one girl I was seeing" after another. Make it sound like you go on a ton of dates. Just make sure not to sound gross or like a total player. The girl will lose interest if you make yourself out to be too much of a Lothario.  While you're talking to the girl about being with other girls, your phone will be a great prop in making her jealous. Keep your phone handy and check it from time to time and even be prepared to answer it.   Check your phone from time to time and smile to yourself, as if you've just received a naughty message from a girl. Say, "Excuse me" and smile as you type back something that may be equally naughty. Have your phone ring once while you're talking to the girl. Pick it up and say, "Hey, how are you? Can I call you back?" Don't overdo it and call the girl "honey" or "baby" over the phone. Just make it clear that you're talking to another sexy lady from the tone of your voice. Don't overuse the phone tactic. A girl's patience will quickly wear if you spend all of your time on your phone.  

make her your #2.  talk about lots of girls.  use your phone to make her jealous. 

 Once you've talked to the girl enough to give her an inkling about your affections, it's time to go into ignore mode and to start chatting up other girls at the bar. You should do this after just a few minutes of talking to the first girl. Here are some great targets to try:   Whether you're at a party or a bar, just pick a girl near you and start talking to her. Slowly transition from talking to the original girl to being absorbed by the new girl completely. Make sure you look like you're laughing and have a great time. Take the other girl to the dance floor. Don't make out with her or grope her. Just dance with her for a song or two and look like you're having a great time. Pick a pack of girls to hang out with. Make them laugh and let the other girl watch.  If you want to stay more local to the girl or if you're done with your random girls, you can make the girl jealous by paying attention to her friends. This will let you stay close and keep her focused on you while making her doubt your intentions.   Make all of the friends like you. Be your most witty, charming, and charismatic self. Make a point of ignoring the original girl in front of her friends. Even if she's standing right in front of you, act like she's not there. Don't isolate the friends too much. Try to get all of them to like you while you flirt it up. If you pay too much attention to a close friend of the girl's and she starts to like you, then you may create unwanted drama.  This is a bold move. If you're out at a bar or a party, leave with another girl at the end of the night. You don't even have to end up going home with her. Just let the original girl see you walking out with another girl.   Acknowledge the original girl with a small nod or a smile as you walk out. Let her know that you know she's watching you.  You can make a girl jealous even in the daytime. If you're hanging out with another girl, whether it's just a friend or someone you're also flirting with, let the girl see you having a great time with someone else.   If the girl you want to make jealous sees you with another girl, make sure to look completely focused on the girl you're with. When you "finally" notice jealous girl, you can say, "Oh, I didn't even see you there." Of course you didn't -- you were too busy having fun with another girl. Pick places where you know jealous girl will be. Parade into her favorite cafe or dining spot with a gaggle of girls and look like you're having as much fun as possible. If you have a class together, sit away from her and next to another girl, and let her see you whispering to the other girl and doodling in the margins of her notes.  This is an important point. If you're just using jealousy to make the girl see you as desirable and to want you even more, you shouldn't spend too much time courting other women or talking about them, or the girl will see you as a playboy and will be turned off.   If you're using other girls at a bar or at a party to make the girl jealous, don't spend all night talking to them and then ignore her. Come back to the girl you want after a few minutes, before she loses patience. Once you see that the girl is really interested, stop talking about other girls or chatting up other girls in the vicinity. The chase is over -- for now.  

flirt with random girls.  flirt with the girl's friends.  leave with another girl.  let her see you with other girls during the day.  don't wait too long if you want her to like you. 

 It does no one any good if you act out against girls because you’re angry at all women, or blame them for your problems. You are the person in charge of your life, and you have to own that. No one is responsible for your actions but you- and this can be a freeing thought, because if you decide the ladies aren’t for you, it’s entirely your choice.   No one can tell you that you’re wrong. Be kind and gentlemanly to women, even if you’ve decided that dating isn’t for you at the moment.; , Making the choice to get away from girls, even for a while, has a certain gravity, and you may find that you gain a certain monastic clarity by giving up on the ladies. If you decide you’re fed up with the dating game, quit playing it. Making a clean break will help you gain perspective and give you a new and refreshing outlook on life.   It may be difficult, but when you find yourself getting hung up on those same negative thoughts about girls or a girl, remind yourself that it’s just not worth it.  You’ll get nowhere by holding grudges, even if a girl left you for someone else, or you feel that you were led on, or had your heart stomped on. When you hold on to anger, it does no one any good, especially not you. Decide that you’ll be single for positive reasons, not negative ones. Focus on the positive aspects of being single, rather than the negative experiences you may have had with girls.   Give it time. When you experience heartbreak, the only thing that can really make it better is time.  

act with positivity.  remove yourself from “the game”.  forgive wrongdoing against you. 

 Once you do this, you can both begin to work through the hurt and the anger and find a way to move on with your life.; , People deal with break ups differently. Some people get very angry and are inclined to burn all his things, some will be very depressed for a long time and hang on to all the memories and some will pretend they don't care.  The two of you obviously broke up for a reason so try not to dwell on what could have been or who was at fault the most. Remember the good times but don't idealize him just because you miss him; make sure you recall the bad times too.  When people break up, the shock and upset caused is often so great that it makes their judgement blurred. If you got back together straight away, it might be okay for a while but eventually the old problems will start to creep their way back in. The way you feel now isn't the way you will feel six months or a year down the line. Give it some time.  Even if your goal is to be friends eventually, you need some time to start off with. Things will be too raw for you to be friends while one or both of you is still hurting. You need time away from the relationship to evaluate what you want and to learn how to be yourself again. If you are somebody who constantly needs to check his Facebook, bombard him with texts or look through old pictures, delete them! Delete his number, get rid of his things.  Take every opportunity, do things you couldn't do before and fill your time. However, make sure you give yourself time to grieve for the loss of your relationship.  This isn't about showing him you're not upset or that you don't care because obviously you do but have dignity and pride. Try not to get too low.  There will be so many people telling you different things but just do what feels right in your heart. If it takes you a month or two to stop sleeping in his jacket then so be it and don't feel bad for it.  Holding grudges and being angry is very consuming and takes a lot of effort. You're better than that and once you face facts, it does get easier. Try not to think about it too much, don't let it take over your life. Learn how to be by yourself outside a relationship. Don't do things just to spite the other person.  

establish that the relationship is definitely over.  find a way to move forward.  think realistically.  don't take him back straight away.  get some space.  embrace single life!,  stand tall.  deal with things in your own time.  let go. 

 Relationships sometimes experience moments of doubt where one or both partners simply don’t know what to do. They may feel that ‘things will get better’ or that they should give their partner another chance, but those second chances don’t always work out.  If you’re having doubts, stop and think about them. Think about what’s causing the doubts, and why they’re bothering you. Are your doubts uncalled for, or reasonable? Do you or your partner have a chance of overcoming these doubts? Should you give your partner a second chance? If you decide it’s time to end the relationship, make sure you fully understand your reasons and are able to explain them to someone else. Prepare yourself to talk about your reasons. But also realize you don’t have to justify your reasons.; , Breaking up with someone shouldn’t be done on the spur of the moment. But you also shouldn’t try to avoid it because you’re scared of hurting your partner, or you’re nervous about having the actual breakup conversation. Once you’ve had the time to think your reasons through, and you know what you’re going to say, it’s time to speak to your partner.  Part of your preparation should also be to think about how your partner is going to react. Think about your responses to their reactions so you don’t have to struggle with what to say.  No matter what location you choose, it is kinder to do it in person. Breaking up with someone via phone, email or text is disrespectful and hurtful. You wouldn’t want someone to do that to you, so don’t do that to them. You also need to consider how your partner is going to react to the breakup.  You may want to choose a private location so you don’t embarrass them if they get upset or angry. You don’t have to humiliate someone to break up with them. Breaking up with someone is a personal process, it’s not something you bring friends to. If you feel you need the support afterwards, make plans to meet up with your friends later. If you have a long-distance relationship with someone, and it’s impossible to get together in person to breakup, using the phone (or something like Skype) is acceptable.  Breaking up with someone isn’t an opportunity to criticize every last annoying thing about that person. It’s okay to explain WHY you want to breakup, but don’t be harsh or brutal about it. Be gentle and respectful. Always remember to treat your partner like you’d want them to treat you.  Let your partner know that they still matter to you, and that they’re still a great person. List some of their awesome qualities to help boost their spirit. Being honourable and respectful also means NOT spreading negative comments about your soon-to-be ex-partner behind their back.  One thing to keep in mind when you’re breaking up with someone is that you’re prepared. You’ve had the chance to think things through and come up with responses. You’ve also had a chance to start processing your emotions. Your partner hasn’t. To them the breakup could be sudden and/or a shock. As such, don’t assume it’s going to be a quick and easy process.  Go into the conversation knowing you might need to listen to them plead, beg, complain, get angry or even be relieved. You can’t walk away after you’ve told them you’re breaking up, you need to hear them out as well.  You’ve broken up with this person, now isn’t the time to suddenly call, email and text them all night. It’s entirely possible they may never want to talk to you again. If you want to try to remain friends, it’s worth a try, but realize it might not work out. Or it might not be the same type of friendship you had before you dated.  After a few days consider sending them an email to ask if they’re okay. Or saying ‘Hi’ to them in the hallway when you pass by. Don’t ignore them if you see them, but you don’t have to try to engage them if they ignore you.  Who you share your feelings with is up to you, but it should be someone you can trust to support you and keep your personal life private. Hopefully you have a friend of family member whom you feel you can trust, and you can speak to them about how you feel. If not, consider talking to a counsellor at school.  This trusted and supportive person may be able to help out, or they can provide you with advice on who can. Whatever you’re going through, realize you don’t have to go through it alone.  Crying gets a bad rap. There’s nothing wrong with crying because you feel sad, upset or even angry. Crying can actually make you feel better because it releases stress hormones through tears.  Allowing yourself to cry on your own terms will help prevent getting upset at an inopportune time, like in the middle of class or a baseball game.  Going through a breakup can be extremely stressful and emotionally draining. You have enough to deal with on an emotional level, you can’t allow yourself to get physically unhealthy as well. This means you need to remember to continue eating properly, getting enough sleep and exercising regularly. Taking care of yourself physically will help you get through your emotional trauma successfully.  Once you’ve had the chance to express your emotions initially, keep yourself busy. Continue to do the things you enjoy, like reading, going to a movie, baking, etc. You might need to take a moment every now and again to have a good cry or get a hug from a friend, but once that’s over, get back to being busy.  Consider this as an opportunity to redecorate your room or learn how to play the guitar. Focus your energy on something productive as often as you can.  You aren’t going to feel better instantly, it’s going to take a little time before you get back to your ‘normal’ self, but that’s okay. Take the time you need, don’t rush yourself. But do realize that you will feel better eventually. These bad feelings will not last forever, no matter how bad they feel. Each person recovers from a breakup at different speeds.  Don’t compare your healing process to others, you aren’t them, and they aren’t you.  No matter how the breakup happened, whether you’re the one who initiated the breakup, or someone broke up with you, you’re still an awesome and lovable person. Breakups happen for a whole number of reasons, and they are almost never because of only one person. Don’t blame yourself for what happened, and don’t assume you deserve to feel badly.  If you start thinking negatively, take a moment to stop and think of all the awesome things about yourself. Write them down if you have to. Put sticky notes on your mirror to remind you how awesome you are. As corny as it sounds, it does help!  , Unfortunately some people get so bogged down in the emotion of a breakup that they look for unnatural ways to make themselves feel better. And in some cases, those unnatural ways can be drugs and alcohol. This is obviously a dangerous thing to do and it’s not a road you want to go down. If you notice yourself thinking about drugs or alcohol, or you feel tempted to do things that are ‘out of the ordinary’ for yourself, get help.  Don’t be afraid to tell your parents, friends or a trusted teacher that you need to talk to someone. It is worth the effort to stop yourself before something truly destructive happens.  It’s no ones fault, and no one did it on purpose, but sometimes after a period of time both sides just realize they weren’t meant for each other and it’s time to move on. After getting to know someone, you might start to realize they aren’t the person you thought they were, or that they don’t share the same interests and values as you.  Heartache can happen when one of the people realizes the relationship is over before the other. Even if you’re the one who notices first and decides to call it off, it’s still not your fault. You’re simply doing what’s right for you, and in the long-run, what’s right for both of you.  Seeing someone from a distance, or even knowing them as an acquaintance, doesn’t give you a lot of insight into who that person is. Spending more time with them in a relationship sheds light on a lot of things you wouldn’t have known about beforehand. And sometimes these things you learn about the other person are not things you hoped for.  You might find that the person you thought you could get along with wants to do nothing but argue with you, or maybe they’re too protective or overbearing. It might have been impossible to know this before you starting dating.  Probably one of the more painful reasons people breakup is because one of the people in the relationship finds themselves in love with another person. Hopefully this person broke-up with their partner BEFORE they acted on their feelings for this other person, but that doesn’t always happen.  If you’re the one who has fallen for someone else, respect your existing partner enough to breakup with them BEFORE you cheat on them. It’s okay to fall for someone else, but acting on those feeling while leading someone else on is dishonourable.  

think it over.  take your time.  choose an appropriate location.  keep your intentions honourable and respectful.  listen.  give your ex-partner space.  share how you’re feeling with someone you trust.  cry as much as you need to.  take good care of yourself.  keep yourself busy.  allow yourself the time you need.  realize you're still an awesome person.  stop yourself from developing bad habits.  realize people sometimes grow apart.  understand that people are not always who you thought they were.  recognize that one of you has fallen for someone else. 

 Nowadays, being single can have distinct advantages. Whether it’s the extra time, the general freedom of movement, or simply getting to spend all your free time exactly the way you want, making the choice to disassociate yourself from romantic attachment can benefit you in the modern century in ways it might not have in past times. , One of the major advantages of singlehood is the sheer freedom to focus on yourself. Do what you want, when you want. Now you don’t have to be beholden to a significant other! When you give up on girls, you open the door to have a self- gratifying existence.  As a single person, you are less likely to stress about chores and money. Enjoy the lack of stressors, and get out and have a good time with your new found freedom. Having less to stress about will make you happier, and open the way for you to enjoy your new-found freedom from girls and worrying about them.  There has always been a stigmatized, stereotypical idea that single people are lonely and vulnerable. However, today more than ever, it simply isn’t true! More and more people in the modern world are finding the benefits of singlehood, and society is embracing that.   Singles are now a majority in the U.S. Just over fifty percent of Americans are now single. , If you become a priest, a nun, or enter into other monastic orders, the decision to give up on girls is already made for you! If you join an order for which celibacy is a prerequisite, you won’t have to worry about struggling with your decision, and you have the support of all your fellow celibates. You’ll also have a new path of self and spiritual exploration that will reduce your need to think about girls.  

embrace singlehood.  live life for you.  stress less.  get over the stigma.  become a member of clergy. 

 When you make the decision to do without the ladies, you have an opportunity to focus your energies on other activities and interests. Without having to juggle romance, personal time, and work, you’ll find that you’ll have a lot more time to focus your energies on self-advancement.   Singlehood can be great for your career. When you are single, you can spend much more time being creative and exploring your passions.  Now that you have overcome the heartbreak, and made a clean break from the romantic sphere, you will have found you have more free time on your hands for activities that you have always wanted to pursue. Did your girlfriend never want to go camping? Did she prefer to stay home and cook dinner rather than go to that restaurant you had been wanting to try? When you give up on girls, you can pursue all the activities that girls held you back from.  Being single can have distinct advantages for your health. Single people are less likely to gain weight and you’ll have plenty of “me” time to exercise and get more in shape. Without the need to constantly worry about finding that next date, or stressing about a date went, you can redirect your energy into getting in shape and being physically healthy.   Join a gym. Spend the time in the evening that used to be consumed with romance to jog, swim, or work out.  When you have no need for a girlfriend, you have more opportunity to spend time with friends (even if they are girls). When you get the guys together, you won’t need to worry about getting home for dinner if you don’t want to. You’ll also have more of your income available to spend on things that you want to do, rather than having to compromise with your girlfriend.   As a single person, you are more likely to have close friends, and to keep in close contact with your siblings. Not having a romantic life means you have plenty of time for having fun and bonding with your platonic relationships- and this can fulfill the same needs as a love interest. , Giving up on girls doesn’t have to mean that you’re done with love and romance forever. It can be a rewarding time of self-reflection and enjoying your personal space and freedom. You can also use the opportunity to watch other couples and learn from their mistakes. Being on the outside looking, even for a while, in can have distinct learning advantages- and if you do decide to get back into meeting girls and dating, you’ll be better prepared to deal with all that you wanted to get away from.   When you take on the journey of abstaining from a romantic love, you have an opportunity to enter into a realm of possibility, adventure, and sheer fun- a realm of focusing on what’s best for you. Make the most of it- you never know when that certain someone will stumble into your life, and you’ll find it rather difficult to maintain your vow of giving up on girls.  

focus on other things.  enjoy yourself.  get in shape.  have better friendships.  look forward to future possibilities. 

 You can’t move on until you’ve accepted that you and your former partner are no longer together and that the relationship isn’t coming back.; , Don’t call, text, email, or otherwise contact or talk to your ex. It will only make it harder for you to get yourself together and move on.   There may be a time when you and your former partner can be friends, but that time is definitely not now.Absolutely under no circumstances visit their Facebook page. Unfriend them and stay away.Also stay away from his or her close friends. It may be difficult if you have mutual friends, but for the time being, stick close to your own friends. You’ll avoid getting pulled back into any drama and hearing about what your ex is up to.  Go through and get rid of any mementos, photos, or other reminders of your former relationship.   You can’t move on if you’re still clinging to remnants of the relationship, and you definitely won’t move on if you still attach sentiment to them.  Hanging out in places the two of you used to go will make it harder for you to move on.   You may be able to begin going back to them eventually, but for now, stay away.  Recognize the feelings that you still have about the person and/or relationship, whether it’s anger, sadness, disappointment, longing, or resentment.Don’t try to hide from the feelings. Instead, allow yourself to feel them fully; so if you need to wallow, then wallow. Accept your feelings so that then you can begin to move on.  Think critically about why the relationship ended, including mistakes you made as well as mistakes your ex-partner may have made.   Use what you've learned from the mistakes each of you made to begin building strategies to avoid similar missteps in the future.  Using healthy outlets will not only help you deal with your feelings but also improve your own well-being at the same time.   Beating yourself up or becoming self-destructive will make the situation infinitely worse and make the process of moving on much longer and harder.Let your friends and family be your resource--talk to them and let them be there for you. Going running, hitting the gym (hello, punching bag!), taking a hike, joining a yoga class...all excellent options. Write--but don’t send--an angry letter. Let all your ugliest feelings out and let yourself have some catharsis. But do not send the letter. It will make your situation worse rather than better and stop you from moving on., Look for a strong role model you can look up to as well as take inspiration from. Perhaps a friend or character or public figure who got back up better than ever after getting knocked down.The more you can take inspiration from people who have stumbled and caught themselves, the easier it will be to envision yourself doing the same.  It’s harder to pine for an ex when you’re seeking new partners. But make sure to keep your feelings about your ex and the relationship out of your new dating scene.   Avoid bringing up or grumbling about your ex with a date--don’t let the old relationship taint your new ones.  

accept that the relationship has ended.  cut off communication.  get rid of reminders of the relationship.  stay away from places you used to frequent with your ex.  deal with your feelings.  learn from the relationship.  find healthy ways to vent.  find a role model.  date other people. 

 Sometimes, a relationship will go sour. Can you determine why? Figuring out what went wrong doesn't mean you'll fix it, as sometimes it's not able to be fixed, but identifying what makes you feel this way can be a huge help.   Do most conversations that start off friendly or romantic end in fights? Does your friend or partner not listen to what you say or take you seriously? Do they mock you, belittle you, put you down, or tell you that they wish you didn't exist? Do they play mind games or manipulate you, and "expect" you to know something that you have no way of knowing, such as what they're thinking? Do they physically or sexually abuse you, or threaten to do so? Does the relationship as a whole just cause you to feel drained, exhausted, worthless, or like you're trying so hard for something that isn't giving you results?; , There's never a relationship that's always happy and cheerful, and healthy friendships or relationships do have the occasional argument here and there. In addition, stressful situations and hard times can make a person act like they "aren't themselves" and cause you two to get into fights. However, there's a difference between a fight here and there, and a destructive relationship. If the number of days where you're fighting are outnumbering the days where you aren't, or if your friend or partner is causing you serious physical or emotional harm, it's time to think about whether the relationship is healthy.   For example, if you've identified that many of the conversations end in fights, but nothing else, it's quite possible that the relationship is just in a bad place that may fade. However, if the fights contain verbal or physical abuse, manipulation or mind games, or leave you feeling depressed and like the relationship isn't worth saving, then it may be time to cut the relationship short.  If you have determined that the relationship is abusive, and you tell your friend or partner that you wish to leave, they may manipulate you into staying by begging, crying, or threatening you or others. Don't fall for it. Yes, the person can change like they say they're going to, but what's the likelihood of them doing it?   Recall all the times this person made you feel bad about yourself. If they've made you feel bad or harmed you many times, they're not likely to stop because they know you won't leave. On the flip side, if you are the one belittling or hurting your partner, then it's best to cut the relationship short yourself. Don't tell them that it's their fault. Be honest. Tell them that you don't think it's safe for you to be friends with them or dating them, and you need to cut contact in order to try and work on yourself. Then do it. Don't transfer this behavior to somebody else. If your friend or partner actively prevents you from leaving, such as by taking important things like car keys or money, or threatening serious harm to you, get to a safer place such as a parent's house if possible and call authorities. If the relationship is that destructive, there's no way of getting out safely by yourself.  If you have determined the relationship is destructive, keep an eye out for what is commonly called the cycle of abuse - the honeymoon period, the tension, and then the blowup. It's very common for a destructive relationship to have this pattern with one or both parties, as they can be rather emotional.  Depending on how destructive this relationship is and if you and the person live together, you may not be able to do it face-to-face. While a face-to-face discussion is best for other situations, it isn't worth the risk if you suspect it won't go over well.   If your friend or partner is significantly abusive, do not do this face to face. They likely know you well enough to manipulate you into staying around, and if they can't trick you, you may end up getting emotionally hurt or physically injured. Try to avoid over the phone if the person is verbally abusive, as well. If you live with this person and suspect they'll stop you from leaving the house, wait until they leave and call someone you trust to come get you. However, if the situation is desperate, you can try going to a neighbor's and phoning a person you trust there, or the police.  Depending on how you plan to leave, you will have to know how you'll do it and how to stay calm. If the relationship is destructive and the other party agrees that it's best for it to end, it may be calm, but it may not end calmly.   Think of how the person may respond and come up with answers to those responses. However, keep in mind that they may throw you for a loop by asking a question or saying something you didn't expect from them. Remember to stay calm, no matter what they said to you. If you can't end things face-to-face, it's best not to end it officially at all, as this requires leaving something behind. Even something like a note or a voice memo can work against you if the person takes it to someone else to try and track you.  If you're ending it face-to-face, approach the person. Tell them calmly, "I don't think this relationship is healthy anymore. I think it's best if we go our separate ways." Be aware that they'll likely be upset by this, but stay calm regardless of what they do.   If the person is not verbally abusive, but is physically abusive, do not carry it out face-to-face. However, a lot of people who are physically abusive will also be verbally abusive, so in this case it may just be best to flee without telling the person if you fear getting hurt.  If you don't live with this person, it may be easier to get away from them, since it's possible you may only have to see them at school or work. However, if you live with the person, you will need to make plans on how to get away if you've deemed it necessary. You don't necessarily have to move into a new home or apartment, but staying with another friend or a family member will suffice.   Do not leave any traces of where you will be going. If you are discussing this with the person you plan to be staying with, discuss it in person or over a phone call so that you don't leave evidence in texts or letters that you will be leaving. Don't write it in a journal or anywhere you suspect the person may look. If they suspect you will leave and want to prevent you from doing so, it will give them pointers as to where to wait for you or cause them to harm somebody. If you think this person is going to stalk you, file a restraining order. While a piece of paper may not do much to deter the stalker, it will be evidence to the police that this person is harassing you.  If the person pleads with you that they can change, don't believe them - there's a reason you're leaving, after all. Why would you be leaving the relationship if you didn't feel it was destructive?   If the person threatens to commit suicide over you leaving, make it clear that you don't control what they do, and believe it yourself. Remember that you don't have control over anyone that isn't you.  Even if you know the relationship was destructive and extremely unhealthy, you may grieve the loss. Let yourself grieve, but don't let the grief consume your life. After at least a week, try to get your life back in order.   Do not return to the relationship, no matter what you're feeling about it. If you find yourself remembering all the good parts and thinking that maybe it can work if you just change this one piece of it, recall what made you want to leave in the first place and how often it would happen. Do you really want to be friends with or dating someone who doesn't treat you like you're worth all that you are?  , After you've had some time away from the relationship, find something to occupy your time. You can go to schoolwork, your job's work, resume an old hobby or pick up a new one, or anything else you want to try.   Do not take up destructive habits. If you begin to drink excessively, use drugs, or begin injuring yourself, then get help immediately.  Maybe while in the destructive relationship, you abandoned old friends or family members. Try to reach out to them and apologize for shutting them out. If you want, make plans to see them, and make sure to have fun while doing so!   Keep in mind that depending on how you treated your friends, they may no longer trust you or want to be your friend. If they forgive you, don't jump right back into how things used to be - take some time to rebuild the friendship and trust in it.  Depending on how destructive the relationship was and how long it lasted, you may be scared of opening up to people again, or feel like what they said about you was true. However, remember that not everyone will treat you poorly, and you are not somebody else's words or actions. You are you, and what happened in your past does not make you undesirable, dirty or worthless. Keep yourself open to new people.   If you feel constantly sad, empty, guilty, or worthless, or if you feel anxious or jumpy all the time, try to see a therapist. It's possible that a destructive relationship can cause mental disorders, such as depression. If you begin engaging in self-destructive habits, such as self-injury, reckless driving, reckless spending of money, or abusing alcohol or drugs, get help immediately. Nobody should make you behave in ways that are destructive to your health.  

figure out why the relationship is destructive.  know that no relationship is perfect.  watch out for manipulation.  recognize the cycle of abuse.  know when to end the relationship.  know how to cut things off.  end the relationship.  leave the area.  do not go back.  expect conflicting emotions.  get to work.   try to reconnect.  don't shut yourself off. 

 Without the benefit of hindsight, it’s often quite difficult to know what’s motivating the other person or what they truly feel or think about you.   Rather than assume they must just hate you, allow for the possibility that you’re projecting feelings that may not be there. Understand that they’re just as human as you are. Everyone has struggles in their lives that contribute to how they act--it’s entirely possible your enemy is antagonistic because of difficulties they're struggling with. Learn from the quote often attributed to Abraham Lincoln: “I don’t like that man. I must get to know him better.”, Pay close attention to the people who get along with your enemy. Learn from how they handle the dynamic to gain insight into what may not be working between you and your enemy and why.   If it’s a kind of behavior you’re comfortable emulating, try picking up tips from your observations to see if you can rejigger the tenor of you and your enemy's relationship., Knowing what they’re trying to achieve is crucial to dealing with the problem. Are they jealous of something you have? Did you (consciously or unconsciously) slight them in some way? Do you do something that annoys them?   Knowing what’s driving their behavior can help you get out in front of their negative behavior and possibly blunt the effect their actions have on you.  When you know what’s motivating the person’s behavior, you can begin to address it. You’ll have two options: improve the relationship or learn how to limit their effect on you.   If it’s an issue of a small habit or behavior you have that irritates them, you can consider not doing those things around them or sitting down with them to explain your behavior and help them accept it. If it’s a more serious issue or you simply can’t figure out what their problem is, confront them about it. Nothing shuts down misconceptions or bad feelings like addressing them head-on. Apologize if it’s warranted. If you did something either knowingly or unknowingly to upset them, apologize sincerely (and don’t do it again) so you can both move on. Talk to the person calmly and coolly. Don’t accuse or antagonize, just have an honest conversation.  Even if your enemy says rude or insensitive things about you, your friends, or your family, don't give them the satisfaction of seeing it upset you.   In these situations, your enemy is simply looking for a reaction, and when they get one it will only encourage them to continue the behavior. If you want it to stop, start by ignoring them and their comments.Don’t listen to or spread rumors; it only perpetuates the problem. The more emotionally engaged you become, the more power you’re giving to your enemy. Avoid them. Limit your contact with them as much as possible. Sometimes distance is enough to diffuse the situation., Nothing balances the negative impact of an enemy like having allies. The more people you have on your side and who see you as kind, helpful, respectful, etc., the less impact any potential enemy sabotage can have on you.When you're tempted to say something negative about your enemy, turn that energy around and instead say something nice to another person. Spreading positivity rather than negativity will give you the advantage over your enemy.  

know the limits of your knowledge.  learn from others.  find out what they want.  decide how to respond.  don’t encourage their behavior.  cultivate allies. 

 Bullies love a reaction, and they particularly love an emotional reaction.   As soon as they know they’re getting to you, they’re going to keep digging in deeper. If you must react to the bully at all, do so calmly and coolly. Being the calm one not only makes the bully look immature, it shifts the power dynamic to make you the powerful one--a state of affairs that bullies hate., Don’t allow the situation to escalate before taking measures to manage it. #*The longer a bad situation goes unchecked, the more negatively it will impact you and the more powerful and entitled the bully will feel., The bully’s issue is entirely their own--it isn’t about you, it’s about their weaknesses and insecurities.   Don’t ever allow the bully to convince you that you brought this on yourself. They alone are responsible for their own behavioral choices.  Look into the types of bullying behavior, what motivates a bully, and how to understand bully.   Many bullies are victims of violence themselves and are acting out. Knowing this can help you have some compassion as well as help you better understand the true power dynamic between the two of you.  Build a support network: the more people you have on your side who are willing to support you, the harder you’ll be to target.   Having allies will also help you feel confident and supported, two characteristics that bullies find very defeating.  Write down the time, place, and a description of each encounter in case you need to bring a formal or informal complaint against them.   Having specific times, places, and descriptions of your encounters with this person will make it very difficult for them to deny the truth of what you’re saying or to try to shift the blame onto you.  The less you see them, the fewer opportunities they'll have to manipulate you.Not having opportunities to bully or otherwise manipulate you will leave a bully bored and they’ll begin searching for a more gratifying target.  If the problem can't be solved by simply ignoring or avoiding the bully, it's time to get someone with authority involved.   If you've been keeping a record of the events--which is recommended--show the other person your records, describe the bully’s behavior to them, and explain how that behavior impacts you., Find healthy ways to vent your emotions, whether it’s working out, doing yoga, or writing in a journal. It's important that you spend time caring for yourself rather than caring about what the bully is saying or thinking.   If the bullying is a significant source of stress, consider talking with a therapist to help you manage the situation..  

stay calm.  take action early on.  know that it isn’t about you.  do your research.  gain allies whenever possible.  keep a record.  avoid them as much as possible.  get a supervisor, teacher, or other authority figure involved.  take care of yourself. 

 He has a girlfriend and it is not you. It happens. This is not going to change until further notice. This is difficult to accept sometimes, but you won't be able to get over him until you do.; , It could be that you're not even attracted to him and there are other reasons why you're pursuing him. Perhaps you don't like his girlfriend and are trying to hurt her. Something else in your life may be causing his attraction as well.  This includes friends of his and ex-girlfriends, if possible. In learning about his personality or certain character flaws he has, you may find yourself becoming not attracted to him.   Be aware that the reverse issue could happen and you may become more smitten with him the more that you learn. If this happens, realize that there plenty of other guys out there for you.  Don't spend all day obsessing. Figure out ways to fill up the time and it will become easier to move past this. Join a sports team, an arts class or volunteer within your community. Meeting new people and being exposed to new activities is a great way to take your mind off something that you'll realize is not very important in the long run. The goal is to get him out of your head!  , Plan a trip to the park or beach, or indulge in a day of retail therapy.  A great way to get over a guy is to dress up in some of your most stylish clothes and go dancing. Clubs are a great place to possibly meet other guys. Even if you don't meet any, the music and physical activity from dancing will put you in a better mood. Dance until you feel better.  In the early stages, don't put yourself in a situation where you have to be around him. If you share a class or work together, make an effort to limit your time around him to as little as possible.This helps you to move forward with your life.  The best way to get over a guy is to see who else is out there! Flirt with other boys. If you become attracted to someone else, you'll quickly forget about this other person.  Does he chew with his mouth open? Does he smoke? Does he not like your favorite band? Seeing the flaws in him will help you get over him.  

accept the reality of it.  analyze why you're attracted to him.  talk to people who know him.  take up a new hobby.  go out for the day.  go dancing.  avoid him at all costs.  meet other guys.  try to think of things about him that actually bother you. 

 You've been hurt - expect the tears to keep coming. There are few people who can get over heartbreak without shedding tears, so let them flow. If you bottle up your feelings, you'll only end up making yourself feel worse later and moving on will be even harder. Let everything loose and don't hold anything back.; , Activities you enjoy will help you relax.  That's what they're there for! A good friend you trust will be a good person to talk to. A parent or sibling may also be a good choice.  Focus for a while on your career and family. If you help someone else out, you'll feel good, and have a chance to take your mind off the pain. Good times are a great way to help you get over heartbreak. Keep on going with your day and focus on your work.  Think about the positive things in your life, and what you have left. Think about what you can do with your future, and don't let your loss destroy the rest of your life too. Letting the feeling overcome you will lead you down a road that isn't too pleasant.  Get engrossed in new things, and try not to look back on the past. The more you move forward, the less it will hurt. Keep yourself occupied, so you don't have time to be upset. Keep moving forward.  You may need to see a psychologist or other such professional person if your grief is really destroying your life. A professional will care and will know how to help you. They can almost certainly offer further and better advice.  You might never quite be happy about the event that caused your heartbreak, and you might always shed a tear thinking about it, but eventually you will find that you can live without it getting in the way. Just remember that every relationship is a learning experience, and every learning experience will positively effect your future. Time heals all wounds, especially in the case of heartbreak.  

don't be embarrassed to cry.  find something to help take your mind off your heartbreak for a while, the feeling will pass with time.  talk to your friends and family.  focus on moving on.  keep it in perspective!,  rebuild your life.  talk to a professional.  accept it. 

 At the end of any relationship, there will be a period of grieving. You have suffered a loss, and so for a while, you are going to feel deeply sad. Accept and allow this. Take some time to cry and process what has happened.With major emotional experiences, psychologists say that our "firsts" are usually more memorable and continue to have emotional power throughout our lives. This means it's going to take some time to get over your ex. It also means you will probably never forget him.Rather than trying to forget, just accept your feelings as they are.; , By the same token, while emotional firsts are powerful, it is possible to exaggerate their importance. In our culture, losing one's virginity is often viewed as a major turning point in life, but for most people it really isn't a defining moment.After you've had a few days to grieve, try to put things in perspective. You are the same person you were before you lost your virginity. Keep in mind, too, that you get to define what the important romantic and sexual moments in your life are. If you don't want to look back at this as the sexual experience of your life, you don't have to. You've had one experience with one person, but a different type of sexual experience with someone else may be more special later. The "big moment" for you may not have happened yet.  For many people, when a relationship ends, there is a tendency to think negative thoughts about themselves. This is especially true if you are not the person who chose to end the relationship. These feelings of rejection can lead to negative self-talk.If you feel rejected by your ex, you might be telling yourself it happened because you are not good enough or not attractive enough. You might be telling yourself you won't find happiness again. If you've lost your virginity to someone and then been rejected, these ideas can be hard to push aside. If you notice yourself thinking these thoughts, try to replace them with more positive ideas. Your ex may not want to be with you anymore, but others will. Her rejection of you doesn't make you a lesser person in any way.  When you're ready to start thinking about the future, there are two realities you should try to keep in mind. First, you will find happiness again. Second, you and your ex must go your own ways.Try to be realistic about your possibilities for future happiness. You were happy before this happened, and you will be happy again. In your life, you will love other people. Try not to dwell on thoughts about getting back together with your ex someday. Young love is powerful, but in most cases, doesn't last. You and your ex are both at a point in your lives where you are changing quickly and still discovering who you are. These changes usually push young people apart. It's no one's fault, and all you can do about it is move on with your life and allow your ex to do the same.  For your own sake, try to limit the amount of time you spend grieving your ex. After a few days, if you can start setting your grief apart from other parts of your life, you can start to get past it.For example, you might decided that you are going to spend no more than an hour a day grieving your loss. Maybe you'll set aside two blocks of 30 minutes where you allow yourself to really feel the pain, but after that, go do something else that will keep your mind occupied. After a while, try cutting down to two 15 minute blocks. Some people find that putting their pain in an imaginary box that they open on a routine schedule starts to make that pain boring. Eventually, this can help you to lose interest in these sad feelings and get on with life.  

accept your feelings.  get some perspective.  avoid negative self-talk.  be realistic about the future.  try to contain the grief. 

 As hard as it may be, when you are trying to get over the intense feelings you are currently experiencing, the best thing you can do is put as much distance between you and your ex as possible. Avoid seeing him, and don't call, text, or otherwise contact your ex.This doesn't mean you can't ever be friends, but as long as you still have strong romantic feelings towards that person, spending time with your ex is going to make it harder for you to move on by bringing up powerful memories again and again. Take some time, and if later you're ready to be friends and still want that, then give it a try. If you go to school with your ex, this can be difficult, especially if you have classes together. There's no need to be rude or pretend your ex doesn't exist, but avoid situations in which you have to interact. If necessary, ask him to do the same.  You don't have to go through this difficult time alone. Find a trusted friend or family member to share your feelings with. It's okay to ask for help.Psychologists have found that, even though it may seem like talking about your ex brings up more feelings of sadness or rejection, people who talk about their breakups regularly get over them more quickly.Losing your virginity is a sensitive topic, so make sure to confide in someone who you can trust not to judge you or share your personal feelings with others.  Although you probably will never forget your ex, or losing your virginity to her, you also don't want to be reminded of this all the time. Put any objects you have that remind you of her somewhere you won't see them.This includes any gifts your ex gave you, pictures of the two of you together, or anything else along those lines. Some people decide to throw away or destroy these mementos, especially when they feel angry or rejected. Some people end up regretting that decision later. A better idea is to put them away in a box where you just won't see them. After you've gotten over your ex and are feeling less emotional, you can decide if you want to keep any of those items.  Doing some private writing is a great way to process your emotions. Get a journal and use it to write about what you're feeling. You can use it like a diary, or write poems, stories, or songs about how you're feeling.This can be as valuable as talking to another person, and can be a place to vent feelings that you think might be too private to share with anyone. If good things happen that make you feel better about life, write about them in your journal too. This can help you start focusing more on positive changes in your life.  After a breakup, many people struggle with who they are. Even in a short relationship, it's easy to start thinking of your connection to the other person as a key part of your identity.Getting past this means rediscovering who you are without that person.   This is a great time in your life to think about your own goals and to try new things. Maybe you'll take up a new hobby, spend more time with friends, start working out or playing sports, or make some life change you've been wanting to make for a long time.Focusing on the present and creating new positive experiences will help you move past your feelings for your ex. 

get some distance.  talk to others.  put the memories away.  write in a journal.  rediscover yourself. 

 The unfortunate reality of any breakup is that it will take some time to get over, and there is no way to fast-forward through to end of the painful part. Accept that it will take a while to completely get over your ex, and don't try to rush it.   Psychologists have found that it takes the average person 11 weeks to start feeling positive changes after the end of a relationship.Don't be surprised if it takes a little longer for you. The fact that there was a memorable "first" in your relationship makes this recovery emotionally intense.  Many people feel that the best way to get over someone quickly is to go out and find someone else as soon as possible. Some people believe that having sex with another person will cause you to get over your ex. These "rebound" experiences, however, are often not healthy.   Dating (or having sex) again before you are over your ex can lead you to make comparisons between the new person and someone you still may love. This can end up making you feel lonelier than you were before you started dating again.Rushing into a new relationship before you're over your ex can end painfully for both you and the new person you have started dating.Especially if losing your virginity was a negative experience, do not rush out and have sex with other people right away. A negative "first" like this sometimes leads people to seek out similar experiences with others, leading to more bad experiences and heartbreak.Wait until you have gotten your emotions under control before getting romantically or sexually involved again.  When you feel you are over your ex, or at least not dealing with intense emotional pain on a regular basis, you can start looking for a new relationship. Only you will know when it is the right time.   After a hard breakup, many people are afraid to love someone again. It can feel scary to open yourself up to the possibility of being hurt. In the end, though, it's worth it.Having new romantic experiences will enrich your life and help you see that breaking up with the person who you lost your virginity to is not the end of the world.  

give it time.  avoid rebounds.  start dating again when you feel ready. 

 Stick to the facts and the truth. Don't drag up past behavior unless it's extremely relevant - such as "He used to verbally belittle me like that right before he got violent and that's why I'm concerned about my safety."; , It doesn't matter that you two used to be an item. What he's doing is bullying and if he's doing it to get you back, have enough self respect to keep saying No. You deserve better than that. No one deserves to be bullied by a partner, let alone an ex-partner.Or even if he is a stranger.   Stay away from him as much as humanly possible. Document instances of harassment and report them to the authorities. Do not do anything he asks you to do, for he is attempting to take control of you again. He will be as devious as anyone can get. It is recommended you get an injunction or restriction order on the person in order to silence him completely. To do that, you will still need evidence, such as photographs of his behavior.  Keep friends around you and stay within sight of teachers and authorities, especially those who are sympathetic or known to act promptly dealing with bullies.  They will be able to refute the nasty things being said about you. Don't be shocked if guys you don't know expect you to act as described, set them straight about it in a firm but casual way. "He wishes I was that kind of girl who pretends to be who she's not. I'm not. Go find someone who is." Don't blow up and have hysterical outbursts, that's exactly what the bully wants if he put your number on the bathroom wall or something like that.   Keep your dignity. This will enrage him more than anything else and it's a good way to get uninvolved people on your side. Don't play the same social games back at him, just keep your dignity.  Get on with your life; after a time, it will become clear that the issues are with him and that he is bad.   Do not believe any of the negative things he says about you. Remember that his motive is to make you feel ashamed and miserable. It's easier said than done, but vitally important to your sanity. He does not know you better than you know yourself. Listen to what your friends say about you for accurate feedback. If your friends and enemies both agree on something about you, it's probably true but may not be anywhere near as bad a thing as the way he puts it.  If you need to clarify anything about your relationship with this person, just tell the facts. Do not embellish and make sure that what you can say can be established easily by others.  They might be a source of support as they have probably been through this too.  

whatever happens, do not say anything bad about your ex as he could use this against you if you decide to tell a teacher.  treat him like any other bully.  record everything that is life threatening or abusive include times dates locations what you were doing , how this incident started  take reasonable precautions against ever being alone with him.  tell your friends what is happening and get their support.  ignore your ex's verbal comments.  stick to the facts.  look for other exes he has left in his wake. 

 If your relationship is over, stop talking to your ex. That means no Facebook or G-chatting, no texting, no keeping up to date with his dating situation online. Nothing. Even if you plan to be friends later, give it a few weeks at least, to let yourself get over him.   Every time you see him, your feelings are going to bubble back up to the surface. It makes it really difficult to try to get over someone you have to deal with regularly. If you have to see him at school or elsewhere, keep your interactions as brief as possible. Say, "I don't have anything to say to you," and walk away. Avoid the ex-stalking Facebook stage of the break-up. There's pretty much nothing to gain from this. If he's already dating someone else, he's a loser anyway and you're lucky to be rid of him.; , Being single can be a good thing. Look at it as a change to get out there and meet more people and have fun with your friends. Just use this point in your life to hang out, instead of worrying about a guy.   Be around people as much as possible. The more you're alone, the bigger the chance you'll end up obsessed over the dude again. Be around people who'll keep you having fun and thinking about other things. Let yourself meet new people you might be interested in when the time is right, but don't rush it. Jumping from boyfriend to boyfriend isn't usually the best idea.  The cute teddy bear your boyfriend gave you last Valentine's Day? Cut its head off and throw it in the garbage. The little calendars and cards and letters he made for you? Toss 'em. Mementos do little but remind you of the loss. Don't keep them to help remember the good times, throw them away.   If you're not ready to complete lose this stuff, then put it in a box at least. Put it somewhere you won't be able to see it for a few weeks. Give it to a friend for safe-keeping if necessary.  Get your friends together and talk about how you're feeling. You don't need to solve your problem, but talking about it honestly and openly is a good way to start the healing process.   Be indulgent. Eat chocolate and watch sappy movies together. Talk about your crappy relationship and support each other. No shame. Alternatively, sometimes you might just want to be alone for a while. That's fine. There's no one perfect way to get over a guy. Do what feels natural to you.  Sit down with some paper and pencil or pen. Write his name at the top of the page. Pour yourself a drink, get a box of tissues, and just start writing. Pour out everything that you're feeling, everything that you're angry about, onto the page. Address it to him. Really let him have it. Then, tear up the letter, or burn it, or throw it away. Don't even give him the satisfaction.  Use your body and your mind to do positive things, instead of mope. If you're feeling depressed and obsessing over a guy, try to work on yourself instead. Exercising helps to expel energy and boost your mood by releasing feel-good endorphins in your brain.Get moving if you want to feel better.   Make your own exercise routine. Find a cardio workout by picking 5-10 exercises that you can repeat three times each, about a minute for each exercise. Do this three times a week at home.  Spend some extra hours at work, or at school, doing what you need to do. If you're on a sports team, devote extra energy to planning events or extra workouts with your teammates. Put yourself deep into some project to help yourself focus on other things.   The best revenge is living well. If your ex sees how productive, busy, and happy you are? That's the best way to stick it to him. Show him what he lost. On the other hand, it can also be good to take some time off, if you need to. Call in sick, if you're really feeling unproductive and crappy. Take the time you need.  Use your newfound single-status as an excuse to do other new things. If you've always wanted to write a book, but never had the time because of your relationship responsibilities, you've got no excuse now. Pick a new hobby to throw yourself into and distract yourself from the way you're feeling.   Start reading more. Getting lost in a good book can be a great way of forgetting about your troubles. Do something creative. Painting, drawing, or other art projects are a great way to get busy. Pick a daily-baking project, and try to cook something new each day. Channel your frustration energy into fun projects in the kitchen.  Every break up is a mixed bag. On the one hand, you're alone. And it usually sucks. On the other hand, you're alone. That means, you can do whatever you want, without worrying about how your ex will react. There's nobody to hold you back anymore. Do what you feel.   If you feel like blasting Katy Perry at 7 am and eating Fruit Loops in your ugly pajamas, do it. Nobody's going to judge that. Celebrate the fact that you're single. That thing he always hated to do? Yeah, do that thing. And enjoy it.  The moping around and being sad is an essential part of getting over a guy. Don't let anyone tell you otherwise. But, it shouldn't last forever. Eventually, you've got to be the one who says, "This is enough." Decide when you've had it, and when it's time for you to get better. Then move on.   Good rule of thumb? Don't grieve a relationship for more days than months you were together. If you went out for a year, it's ok to be sad for a couple weeks. But eventually, you've got to get over it. Eventually, all the sadness will just get boring. Decide you want something more. Decide you want to be happy.  Do something little, but that feels big for you. Let it be a statement of your freedom. Color your hair in a new way, or chop it all off. Do something crazy, or unexpected, like singing karaoke with your friends. Pick something to celebrate your freedom in a surprising way. It'll help.   Tattoos can be great ways to commemorate a big change in your life, like a break-up. Or unfortunate decisions that you'll be stuck with. If you've had a design in mind for a while, but your guy didn't like it, then go for it. If you just want to get some ink to be cool, then maybe you should think about it for a while.  Some relationships can hold you back. Was yours? If so, consider making a bigger change in your life. Use your new freedom and your new time to improve yourself. Decide to change your life for the better.   Try moving to a new place, especially if you shared your old one with your boyfriend. Move out and explore a new neighborhood. Did you sacrifice things so that you could work on your relationship? Are you doing what you want to do in life right now? If the answer is no, then make a big change. Switch jobs. Move to a new town. Do what you want to do.  Sometimes, when you break up with someone, you can lose a lot of your friends as well. If that's true of your relationship, you might need to find new friends as well so you can hang on to your social life. Don't let a break-up ruin your ability to hang out and have fun.   Hang out with different sorts of people than you might normally hang out with. If you're a sporty-type, hang out with some artsy kids. If you're a smart kid, hang out with some jocks. Give some people a chance.  You deserve to be happy and feel confident. Work on developing yourself for a while, instead of worrying about your relationship. Do what you want to do. Live the way you want to live. Let yourself be a little selfish for a while.   Make decisions based on what you want. Work on things like school, and developing your own identity. Be yourself. Hang out with your friends. Make memories.  If you're young, there'll be plenty of time to worry about dating. Even if you're not young, it's good to take a little time to worry about other things. Don't worry about finding a new boyfriend for now. Worry about living your life.   Stop worrying about "the one." Lots of people date for a long time before they have a single serious relationship. If you had one, count yourself lucky. Take a bit of time before you start looking for a relationship that you consider serious and lasting.  

stop talking to him.  go out with your friends.  get rid of the mementos.  talk it out.  write it out.  keep yourself distracted with exercise.  do more at work.  try a new hobby or activity.  make yourself celebrate your freedom.  put an end-date on the sadness.  make a little change.  make a significant change.  make some new friends.  be selfish for a while.  don't rush back into another relationship. 

 Even if your intentions may be pure, he will think you're returning his affections if you linger with him. At this point, his mind will be clouded, and he will be focused on getting something out of the relationship he has with you. Any action you perform that hints of romantic interest will only encourage him to continue, even if you truly didn't mean anything.; , Avoid looking eager, even if you secretly might be. Responding to him or looking interested will only encourage him to continue, and he might hurt you badly in the process - physically and/or inwardly. Be firm when telling him "no," and show negative feelings towards him if need be. Don't be gentle or kind to him because he'll take it the wrong way at this point.  If it becomes obvious that he is interested in you, ask him why he is playing around with you while he still has a girl. Chances are he will tell you she is boring, and he will claim he wants to break up with her for you. However, avoid falling for that. He is only batting around with your feelings in order to persuade you into giving him what he wants.   Note that he might deny it. However, keep your guard up and be on the alert for signs that he is flirting with you.  Firmly tell yourself that he doesn't want you. He is only using you for his own selfish needs. Despite how intimate he may be with you, he truly doesn't care about your feelings. He only wants your body. Although it might feel good at the start, you will start to realize that you're only preparing yourself for a terrible crash. He will start to detach from you, and he will eventually leave you.  You are no different. To him, you're just another girl whom he will use to get what he wants. Although he might tell you otherwise, he doesn't love you, and you should avoid hurting yourself.  Remember you are still young, and you still have a chance to find someone who truly loves you. It's best to keep yourself pure for the one who gives you unconditional love so that you won't have to show him the scars you could have avoided. There will be plenty of guys who will rock your world and make you feel like the beautiful girl you already are.  Think about the consequences, even if there might not seem to be any at the moment. Remember that you must stay true to yourself, and you come first - not him. Avoid scarring and wounding yourself by stepping into a horrible relationship like that. Do something that your future self will thank you for.  If worse comes to worse and he won't leave you alone, approach a trustworthy adult, and tell them about the situation before it's too late. You could also share your worries with your good friends, but remember that they might not be able to help you or give you the best advice. Don't count out your family - realize that they will possibly be the most supporting and helpful in this situation.  

avoid spending time with the boy.  appear neutral towards the boy.  confront the boy.  get a grip.  realize that if he is cheating on his girlfriend with you, he will possibly do the same to you.  don't feel bad.  resist temptation.  ask for help. 

 If you loved your ex a lot and had a happy relationship, you're most likely feeling downright depressed. If you pretend that you're fine and don't process your feelings, though, you're only causing yourself long-term emotional damage. Take a week or two to mourn over the breakup, but make sure your mourning period is not so long that it interferes with your ability to enjoy life in the future.; , Was the relationship a happy relationship, or was it toxic? If the relationship was toxic or manipulative, breaking up was the right move. If you find yourself still wanting your toxic ex back, make a list of the negative qualities of your ex and the reasons why your relationship was poisonous. Sometimes losing the worst relationships hurts the most.   If your relationship was perfectly happy and compatible and the two of you decided to break up because you just felt as if it's time to start seeing other people, remind yourself that people change and grow, especially during the teenage years. Typically, in middle school, relationships are not long-paring and breakups often occur at this stage. Perhaps your ex broke up because he or she felt drained by the commitment of your relationship and desired for more time with friends and family.  

give yourself time to mourn.  examine the relationship. 

 The people who know your relationship best likely spend the most time with you and your boyfriend. Perhaps they have noticed a change in his behavior or seen some activity that would confirm his infidelity. Since they know you well, they are likely to empathize with you, too, if they have something to share.It’s hard to broach this difficult topic, but you could try by saying, “I believe Mark is cheating on me. I trust you and wanted to know if you have seen or heard anything to support that.” By letting the person know what esteem you hold them in, they will be more likely to help you if they can. Try to control your temper when seeking out information from trusted people to confirm the infidelity. They are more likely to clam up if they feel accused or somehow complicit in the cheating.; , In today’s modern age, it’s very difficult to carry on an affair with no paper trail, particularly an electronic one. Begin investigating your boyfriend’s public communication channels to confirm that he is cheating.   Check out his social media pages. Are there any unusual posts on Facebook, Twitter or Instagram? Keep an ear out for any odd phone calls he makes or receives.  A disruption of longstanding patterns could be a sign your boyfriend cheating. Is he a morning person who has suddenly turned into a night owl? Think about all the facets of your life together that have recently undergone large changes you can’t explain.   If your boyfriend is keeping very different hours than he typically does, that is something of note. Is he constantly running late lately when he is usually very punctual? Observe your home life. Are you two people who rarely fight who are now fighting all the time? Think about when any changes in established patterns began and how long they have been going on. Can they be explained another way, such as a large project as work? If not, they could be meaningful. Physical intimacy is an important part of a relationship. If you’re normally intimate frequently, but you haven’t had sex in months, there could be someone else in the picture.  Do this only if you have found evidence of cheating. Many people, even cheaters, feel an overwhelming sense of guilt about their behavior. If you think you know who your boyfriend is cheating with, it can he helpful to talk to them before confronting your boyfriend. They may feel they owe you some information for having disrupted your relationship.If you go this route, stay calm when talking to them. The person you should be mad at is your boyfriend, who had a commitment to you rather than this outsider. It’s even possible they did not know he was in a relationship. You are only talking with them to find out further details. This can be a controversial approach, and so is best undertaken only if you feel calm and comfortable in this conversation. Approach the other person only if you have clear evidence. It’s best to connect in person or on the phone, so they have to contend with the fact that you are a real person. They’re likely to ignore a message. You could call and say, “You may not know this, but Mark and I are in a relationship. I believe you’re having a relationship with him as well. I wanted to talk to you about it.”, Don’t confront your boyfriend on his lunch break or right before you need to sleep at night. You will need adequate time to talk about what has happened. Try to find a time when he is not busy with other tasks, or make time on his calendar if necessary.   You could say, “Do you have a good time today or tomorrow for us to talk about something important?” He will likely make time right then and there. Trust your instincts and try not to back out once you've set your time. Remain centered, and calm yourself through deep breathing.  Confronting your boyfriend about something as loaded as cheating may feel very stressful. You may be angry or depressed. Before talking with him, take a few deep breaths or talk on the phone with a friend to calm yourself.Being overly stressed may cause you to attack him, which will make him defensive. The goal of confronting him is to let him know you know and find out any relevant details that have not been revealed.  If you are certain he is cheating, you could say, “I have evidence that you are cheating on me.” This is more difficult for him to deny than your asking, “Are you cheating on me?” If you are pretty sure he’s cheating, but not 100%, you could say, “I believe you are cheating on me.” This feels more declarative and firm than “I think.” Pause and let him respond. It is his job to explain himself.If he denies an affair, present evidence that proves he’s lying, if you have it. If you do not have firm evidence, you will need to make a difficult decision about whether you can trust him to be truthful about this or not., Gather all the information you feel you need to make a decision about the future of the relationship. Good questions might include: “How long has this been going on?” “Are you in love with her?” and “What does this mean for you and me?”  , He may have cheated because he wanted to break up but was too cowardly, or he may be desperately seeking forgiveness for this terrible decision. Either way, it’s important to understand whether your boyfriend has a desire to proceed with the relationship or not.   If he wants to stay together that doesn’t mean you need to want that, too. If you find you do want to move forward, though, you’ll need to understand if you have a willing partner or not.  Does what you learned about his cheating make you want to move forward with him? Don’t make a decision in the heat of the moment. If he presses you for a snap decision, buy yourself some time. You could say, “I’m not ready to make that decision right now. I need some time to think.”Talking long walks or talking with friends are great ways to work through your feelings.  If you do not wish to move forward with the relationship, you will need to break up with your boyfriend. Find a good time to talk in person. You do not need to provide an elaborate explanation or justify how you feel. You can simply end things respectfully.   For example, you might say, “I’ve thought this over, and because you cheated on me, I don’t want to be in a relationship with you anymore.” Deliver your news in a calm way. Try not to be vindictive, even if you’re hurt. Just because you were not treated well by your boyfriend does not mean you need to stoop to his level., If your boyfriend has violent tendencies, be sure to let a friend or relative know where you will be breaking up and when. It can also help to break up in a public place with other people around. You could say something to them like, “I’m breaking up with Mark today at 3PM in the park. If I’m not home by 4PM, please call the police.”, After your relationship ends, you may be full of mixed emotions. Take some time to focus on yourself and restore your self-esteem. It may be helpful to reconnect with people and activities you enjoy that fell by the wayside during your relationship.For example, if you used to love painting, you might join a neighborhood painting class. The idea is just to connect with yourself as an individual rather than as part of your old couple. It is helpful to take all the time you need to heal before entering into a new relationship. Take the time you need to strengthen your friendships and relationship with family, and learn to take care of yourself before you start a new relationship.  If you decide you want to work through the cheating and continue with the relationship, it will be important to tell your boyfriend what he needs to do to gain your trust back. Make a list of all the concrete actions he can take to begin repairing some of the damage he’s done.For example, if the person he cheated with is someone you both know, you may need him to stop seeing them even as a friend. Or let’s say your boyfriend’s cheating got started through late night drinking. Maybe he will need to come home by a given time for a month to begin making you feel as though you can trust him again.  Your boyfriend should understand that you might need more communication from him than usual to start building trust again. It can be helpful to have predetermined check-ins when you are apart, so you don’t start to get worried.   You could say to him, “I know you’re going out with your friends tonight. Can you text me after dinner and then again when you’re getting in the cab home so I know what to expect?” Telling one another how you are feeling as you work through the aftermath of this affair will keep you connected. It will also enable him to act in a way that is considerate of your emotions going forward.If a disagreement about getting married spurred the cheating, for example, you should make an effort to discuss that part of your relationship. You might say, “I understand that you felt unwanted when I rebuffed your proposal. I love you very much, and I do want to marry you one day. I just need to go slow right now, though.”  , Setting new relationship ground rules helps build trust that your boyfriend will do what he says he is going to do. This is especially critical as he is telling you he wants to recommit to the relationship. Now, more than ever, he needs to prove that he will follow through on his intent.   For example, if your partner cheated through an online dating site, you might set a rule that every time you come into the room and he is on the computer, you can look over his shoulder to see what he’s doing. This temporary power imbalance can help you restore trust in the relationship, and his small privacy concession shows a willingness to put you first.  If you and your boyfriend both want to work on the relationship but don’t know where to begin, it can be helpful to have a third party mediate the difficult emotions related to cheating. A couples counselor can provide constructive feedback and exercises to do at home that will help you both build trust again.A counselor can also help you address underlying issues in the relationship that may have contributed to the cheating in the first place, too.  

talk to trusted friends and family.  look for suspicious communication.  observe his schedule and note any deviations from established patterns.  talk to your boyfriend’s cheating partner.  create a good time to talk.  remain calm.  say it.  ask about details.  find out his intentions.  decide how you feel about what you found out.  tell him directly.  take precautions if your boyfriend is violent.  focus on yourself for a little while.  outline what he needs to do to earn your trust back.  ask for more communication.  set rules to rebuild trust.  seek couples therapy if necessary. 

 Keeping these objects will only make you miss your ex more and more. For example, if you have a picture frame of a wonderful day that you had at your favorite place, you can place that frame out of your reach until you've gotten over your ex, but don't throw it away; you will probably regret it in the future.   You should also avoid visiting any places that remind you of your ex, whether it be a local park or the skating center. Visiting these places will only make you even more depressed.  If you previously maintained contact with him or her on social media, unfriend/unfollow and block him or her. If you have your ex's phone number, remove it from your contacts. Refrain from texting, calling, emailing or using any way of keeping in touch with him or her. If you try to keep in contact with your ex, this could upset him or her, and it is not worth it since the two of you already broke up.  For example, if he or she always goes to Gameworks, avoid going to Gameworks. If you suddenly run into your ex, it could be very awkward.  If there are alternative ways of getting to class where you wouldn't have to worry about running into each other, use one of those ways. If you can't avoid your ex at any cost, remain friendly but don't say much when you see him or her. A simple "hi" is okay, but refrain from chatting casually on the way to class.  Those friends will probably not wish to discuss this topic, and asking about your ex will only make you want him or her back more.  

remove all objects or mementos that remind you of your ex.  avoid contact with your ex.  avoid going to places where your ex could be.  avoid using the same routes at school, if possible.  refrain from asking you and your ex's mutual friends how he or she is doing. 

 Breakups often interfere with the ability to take care of yourself; after a breakup, many people lose sleep, have reduced appetites and feel depressed, and some people even have suicidal thoughts. Make sure you eat enough, get 7-8 hours of sleep, and drink enough water.  Your friends and family are your support network and they'd love to spend time with you! Hang out, talk and even plan a fun activity that all of you enjoy. This could be a valuable distraction from thoughts of your ex.  Whether it's eating at your favorite restaurant, chatting with an old friend or taking a walk, bath or shower, doing something you love will definitely help you to enjoy your life again.  

take care of yourself.  make time for your friends and family.  do something you love. 

 Learning a new skill is a great, productive way to refocus your mind on something else. Think of something that you've always wanted to learn how to do. You probably ignored it because you were too busy before, right? Take advantage of your new-found freedom and do that thing you've always wanted to do.; , Exercise is another great distraction. Not only will taking this opportunity to get in shape give you something else to think about, but exercise also has another important benefit: it releases endorphins. Endorphins are the brain chemical that help make you happy. Your brain won't be able to resist feeling better!  , Volunteering is another great way to help you forget your problems. Not only will you make a positive impact in your community, but you'll build your confidence and your skills. Stable, long-term volunteering also looks great on resumes! You can volunteer at a shelter, soup kitchen, animal rescue, or for whatever cause you identify with most.  Gaming is a great way to not only distract yourself but multiple studies have shown that they can also teach your brain vital problem solving skills. It can also provide a safe environment in which to release feelings and express yourself, depending on what types of games you play.  Games like Journey or Flower are almost meditative in their relaxed quality. Role playing games (or RPGs, as gamers call them) can allow you release pent-up feelings that you didn't even know you had. Violent games can be a healthy way to release anger so long as you play the right ones. Board games and other tabletop games, meanwhile, can be a great way to bring new people into your life and help you build new social relationships.  Writing can be a great way to express yourself in a healthy manner. Do whatever kind of writing appeals to you and makes you feel better and more fulfilled. You can help others by improving wikiHow articles. You can give yourself a great feeling of achievement by writing a book (try fanfiction if you're new to creative writing). If you want to work on your emotions and dealing with them in a healthy way, you can even try keeping a journal.  Traveling is probably the best thing that you can do to help yourself feel better about the things that have happened to you. Especially if you take challenging trips, like going to a foreign country for an extended period of time, you'll find yourself proving to yourself that you're made out of tougher stuff than the sadness that you feel now. Traveling, if you do it right, challenges your skills and ability to survive and the things you gain from it are things that you really need right now.  You don't want to just distract yourself and forget when you have a problem though. This isn't healthy and in the long run you'll have problems. Confront the problem in order to bring yourself real happiness and long-lasting mental strength.  Start confronting the problem by analyzing it and coming to understand what happened. Did you lose an important relationship? Did you suffer an environmental change that you resent? Did someone do something that hurt you? Figure out what problem is at the root cause of your pain. Be real and honest with yourself about why exactly you're hurting, because you can't solve the problem if you can't acknowledge it.  Understand that the problem you had was out of your control. It doesn't matter what problem it was, believe us, it was out of your control. It's impossible to control every little thing that happens. Even if you made mistakes, you have to understand that everyone makes mistakes. Stop blaming yourself and feeling guilty about what happened.  The past is the past: you can't change it. All you can do is work to make things better. Stop trying to get back to what you had and instead embrace the possibilities of tomorrow. By accepting that the world is the way that it is, you can start to feel happy again.  Never forget that despite the things that have happened to you, despite the mistakes you might have made, you are still a good person. You can make people happy and you can to great things. You matter. Don't let bad experiences take away from you the incredible things you are capable of.  Understand that by pulling yourself out of this sadness, you will be a better, new person on the other side. When we go through trials like this, they turn us into stronger people. People that are proven to be able to take more. You will find that if you can really overcome this problem, then you will be ready for almost anything life can throw at you in the future.  When you're ready to be happy again, it's a good idea to spend a little time focusing on yourself. Spoil yourself, take care of yourself, and focus on making the changes that you want to make in your life. This will help give you time and opportunity to learn something about yourself and become a better person.  You'll always feel bitter if you are left thinking that your suffering had no purpose or that those once happy memories are now spoiled because of how things turned out. Help yourself to future happiness by finding meaning in the things that happened. Look for a lesson to be learned or a knowledge gained. See that your bad experiences are there to make your life better and embrace them for that.  A great first step to living your new life is to try something new. This will help you feel the tangible difference between who you were then and who you are now. It will help you see your new strength. Do something you've always wanted to do. Do something adventurous. You can travel, take a new job, or anything else that you feel gives you new experiences.  Eventually, you'll want to find yourself a new community. A new place to belong, a new group of friends, maybe even someone new to love if that is what you lost. These new people will also help you do new things and have new experiences to build happy memories of. You can meet new people by taking a class, joining a club, or even joining an online community.  You might feel, even if you don't realize it, that if you enjoy yourself "too soon" or you find happiness "too soon", that it diminishes the worth of the thing you lost. But that isn't true. And it keeps you from being happy. Let yourself have a good time and don't feel bad about it. You do deserve to be happy.  If you find that you're having trouble getting back to business as usual on your own, and that maybe your sadness might be out of control or unusual: seek help! Don't think that getting professional help means you're weak or broken. Just the same as how you'd see a doctor and take medicine when you have the flu, you should get professional help when your brain doesn't quite act right.  If you're trying to forget a friend, ex-boyfriend or girlfriend, lost family member or other person, there are specific things you can do to help. Forget negative emotions like revenge and embrace positive emotions like happy memories.  If you're trying to forget a bad memory like something embarrassing or traumatic that happened to you, the best way to go about it is to build new memories that are positive! There are other things you can do, however.  Repression and replacing memories are two techniques that you can use if you want but use them sparingly. Repression especially tends to come back to haunt us for years and years. It's better to get help if you feel the need to repress a memory.  An important part of forgetting about the bad things that happen to us is to work on leaving the past behind. You can't change the things that have happened but you can move forward and help your sadness mean something. Don't give up...you can do it!  

learn a new skill.  exercise!,  try volunteering.  play games.  write something.  travel, if you can.  confront the issue.  understand the problem.  relinquish guilt.  accept the reality.  remember your own worth.  find your strength.  focus on yourself for awhile.  find meaning in your experiences.  try new things.  meet new people.  let yourself have fun and be happy.  get help.  get help forgetting a person.  get help forgetting an event.  work on repression and replacing memories.  get more help with leaving the past behind. 

 Before you can start to forget the girl, you have to recognize that it's time to stop thinking about her. You should stop denying that thinking about this girl is not only taking up a large chunk of your day and keeping you up at night, but that it's also making you absolutely miserable. Here's how to know you can't stop thinking about her:   If you feel like you can't go five minutes without thinking about the girl. If you only end up thinking about the girl even more whenever you try to forget her. If you compare every girl you know or meet to the one you're thinking about. If you find it impossible to be interested in other girls, even if they show an interest in you. If you find yourself obsessively writing about the girl or drawing her face. If every song you hear reminds you of her. If you can't go more than a few hours without checking the girl's Facebook profile or Twitter feed. If you feel like you'll never be happy if you can't be with the girl.; , Once you've admitted you have a problem, you need to think about why you can't stop thinking about this particular girl. Understanding the root of your problem will help you find a solution. Here are some reasons why you're thinking about her:   You have never met such an amazing girl in your life and are convinced there is no one else like her. She's so special that you have to have her. If this is the situation, tell yourself that you will be able to meet another girl that is even more special if you have patience. You are so unhappy with so many aspects of your life that you feel that this girl will solve all of your problems and will bring you true happiness. If this is the case, you should work improving other aspects of your life, such as your health or your relationships. You think this way about every girl you like. You jump from obsessing over one girl to the next. If this is the case, your obsessive thinking may be keeping you from enjoying your life or any future relationships. You're getting over a serious relationship. If this is the case, it may be even more difficult to stop thinking about the girl, but you'll be able to do it eventually. Before you do, you'll have to take the right steps to learn how to Fix a Broken Heart.  Once you've reflected on the reasons behind your obsession with the girl, you need to create a plan to stop thinking of her. You may feel that it will never be possible to forget her, but once you develop a plan and commit to execute it, you'll find that it's easier than you think. Here are some things to include in your plan:   If you haven't done so already, cut off contact with the girl. If the girl is in your group of friends or in your class, try not to go out with your friends quite as much, or try to sit as far away from her as possible. But if you're only in touch with her because you keep talking to her, or if she talks to you just to taunt you, then cut things off. The less time you spend around her, the quicker you will be able to forget her. Don't stalk her on social media. Make a plan to stop looking at her Facebook page. If you check it all the time, make a goal to check it one time less each day, until you're able to go a day, or even a few days, without checking her profile at all. You can also take more extreme measures by ending your friendship on Facebook, or deactivating your Facebook account all together. Delete her phone number. If her number is in your phone, get rid of it. If you really need it for some reason, write it down and hide it away. At the end of each day, try to estimate how much time you spent thinking about her. Make a goal to think about her for thirty minutes less each day. Just note that this may be hard to track, and that if you're obsessing too much about how often you're thinking about the girl, your obsession may get worse. Set a date for when you will officially forget the girl. It could be a few months, or even a year away. Be patient. Before you start forgetting the girl, tell yourself that this will take time, and don't get frustrated if you can't stop thinking of the girl right away, or you feel like you're thinking about her even more when you first start executing your plan.  It's important to spend time with as many people as possible to remind yourself that the girl of your dreams isn't the only other person in the universe. Maintaining a healthy relationship with your family will keep you grounded and from heading into a tailspin of obsessive thinking. Here's what you can do:   If you live near or with your family, offer to help out around the house. You'll not only be helping your busy family members, but you'll feel more useful. Call home to check in as much as you can. Before you do, you can even jot down a few things to discuss to make sure that you can talk about things other than the girl. If you're close with your family, ask for advice. Hearing other people in your family talk about their ability to get over a past obsession will make you feel less alone, and like your goal isn't insurmountable.  Your closest friends can make you feel more loved and needed and can distract you from the girl you're always thinking about. Spend meaningful time hanging out with your friends, or attending concerts or movies with them, in order to take your thoughts off of your girl. Here's what to do:   Find fun activities to do with your friends, such as canoeing, checking out a new restaurant, or training for a 5K together. Having tangible goals to reach together will keep from brooding when you're just sitting around talking to your friends. Open up to your friends. Without complaining about the girl of your dreams all the time, find a way to discuss your problem and see if they have any insight. If your friends know you're going through a hard time, they will try to hang out with you more and may even force you to get out of the house. If you're feeling too upset to leave the house, ask your friends to come over. If your obsession is so debilitating on some days that you don't even want to leave the house, ask your friends to come over with a box of pizza or an old movie---you're guaranteed to feel better just from being around them.  Even if you're not yet ready to see other girls romantically, don't underestimate the power of hanging out with your close female friends, or just being around the girlfriends of your friends. Here's how this can help:   Think about what makes these particular girls so great. This will make you see that the girl you're thinking about isn't so unique. After a while, work on seeing other girls on their own terms, without comparing them to the girl you like all the time.  Don't underestimate the power of a rigorous schedule. There's a good chance that you can't stop obsessing over the girl because you have too much time on your hands. Creating a schedule will keep you focused on what you have to accomplish and won't leave much time for idle thoughts. Here's what you should do:   Create a plan for your mornings. Tell yourself that you have to go for a jog, read five newspaper articles, or accomplish another task by a certain time every morning. Create a plan for your days. Keep a schedule that includes time spent at work or in school, hanging out with your friends, and pursuing other interests. Check your schedule to make sure you don't have a lot of down time. Create a plan for your evenings. You may find that you have a lot of free time in the evenings after work or school, so make a goal to read a few chapters of a book, see a new movie, or hang out with your friends every evening so you don't end up staring at the girl's Facebook profile for hours instead.  If you're so hung up on a girl that you can barely function, chances are that this is because other areas of your life are lacking. Improving other parts of your life, such as your friendships or body image, will not only make you a happier person, but it will also take your mind off your girl. Here's what to do:   Focus on your relationships. If you're having trouble with your friends or family members, try to work them out. You'll feel better because this will make you less alone. Work on your health. If you're obsessing over a girl, you may not having time to focus on your health, so try to exercise at least three times a week and focus on eating three balanced meals a day. Change your environment, if you can. If your room or home are in disarray because you've been too busy thinking about your girl to notice the mess, take some time to clean up or rearrange your furniture. Your life will feel less cluttered, and you will be refreshed from the process.  If your general environment, such as your city or workplace, is making you deeply unhappy, then maybe your obsession with the girl is only part of the problem. If you can, change where you live or what you do. If you're in an environment that constantly makes you think of the girl, changing it may be a dramatic move, but it will ease your pain.   Improve your ability to care for others. You may have become so focused on not having your girl that you've stopped looking at the world around you. Work on being a less selfish person by reaching out to volunteer in your community, or by helping your friends or family members accomplish a task, whether it's to fix a piece of furniture or paint a wall.  Doing anything out of your routine or comfort zone will make you feel like you're getting out of your rut. Any new interest you pursue will not remind you of the girl of your dreams and will make you feel like a more dynamic person. Having a new interest will also make you feel like a new-and-improved person and will give you something to look forward to. Here's what you can do:   Take up traveling. Getting away from where you live can help you get out of your own head. If you can't afford to take a vacation, plan to take some weekend trips and invite your friends along. Express yourself. Take singing, improv, or dancing lessons. This will help you release your emotions and will also just be fun. Get hooked on a new writer. Lost love is a favorite topic in good literature, and if you discover a new writer who echoes your thoughts, you will feel less alone. Reading will make you a more interesting person---just make sure that reading doesn't make you feel more isolated. If you're reading a book, taking it to a park or a library so you're surrounded by people.  Once you feel healthy enough to start dating other girls, it's time to put yourself out there. You can start dating again by asking out a new girl you like, asking friends to set you up, or creating an online dating profile. Here's what to do:   Start slowly. When you go on a first date with a new girl you like, take it easy and have fun. Work on having a good time and be serious only when the time comes. Don't talk about your old obsession. Your new girl will be turned off, and you may look like a person with obsessive tendencies. Remind yourself that you're not likely to have the same feelings for the first new girl you try dating, but reward yourself for trying.  It's wonderful that you're ready to move on, but you should work to make your next relationship different from the one you previously had with the girl you couldn't stop thinking about. Try to break the cycle of obsession and despair in the following ways:   Don't get too attached right away. Though it's important to open yourself up to love and you can appreciate a new girl, try not to think about her all the time, or you'll get hurt if the relationship ends. Don't replace obsessing with one girl with obsessing with another, because you won't feel any better. Keep busy and active even if you found someone you really like. Even if you feel that you were able to forget the previous girl and truly like the new girl you're with, make sure to maintain a busy, active life and fit the new girl in it. If you devote all of your time to the new girl, you're setting yourself up for heartbreak. If it feels right, open yourself to love. As long as you're not being obsessive, it's okay to love again after a while. You shouldn't be so worried about not getting attached that you're unable to have strong feelings again.  

realize that you have to forget the girl.  figure out why you can't stop thinking about her.  make a game plan.  spend time with your family.  spend time with your closest friends.  spend time with other girls.  make a schedule for your day.  improve other aspects of your life.  pursue a new interest.  start dating again.  try to limit your obsessive behavior. 

 Emotion-focused coping is important to dealing with a breakup. This means allowing yourself to feel grief, sadness, and anger. These are normal and natural emotions that are felt after a relationship ends. Give yourself the time to grieve and recover, at your pace. Take care of your own emotional needs.   If you want to stay a home and cry in your bed, do so. One way to accept your emotions is to tell yourself, "It is okay for me to feel bad right now. I'm going through a difficult time." Getting in touch with your emotions and tolerating distress is about accepting the emotion without judging it or necessarily trying to change it. Sit with the emotion and observe how it feels. What do you feel in your body? This information can indicate how you are feeling and help you process your feelings in a healthy way.; , Your overall perception of social support can help you throughout the process of healing from a breakup.Processing your feelings out loud with trusted individuals can help with emotional healing; not to mention the support you’ll feel from others that care about you. It is important to acknowledge that you’re hurting; bottling it up may result in a melt-down later.   Ask a friend to come over and support you during this time. You could stay in your pajamas and watch a movie. Use this time to connect with your friend and discuss your feelings regarding the breakup. Go out for coffee or bite to eat with a family member.  A lot of times, your friends will want to keep you busy and help you feel better. Let them if you feel up to it. Distraction is a great way to temporarily feel better after a breakup. Additionally, your need for intimacy may be stronger after a breakup., Creative and expressive writing is a very useful tool in processing emotions and thoughts related to a breakup.Write down your thoughts and feelings about the breakup on a Word document or journal. Avoid status updates, blogs, or other online posts because these can leave you feeling exposed. You could write a letter to your ex that you never send. Tell him how you feel. Let your anger out. You don’t have to worry about his reaction if you don’t send the letter.  Individuals that blame themselves for a breakup may end up experiencing distress, anxiety, depression and reduced health outcomes.Individuals who do not blame themselves are able to process their emotions better and look at negative events from the past more realistically.   Instead of blaming yourself or thinking negatively, forgive yourself for any mistakes or transgressionsFirst analyze what you think you might have done wrong. You could write these down if you wish. Then, go through each item and say or think to yourself, "This was a mistake and I forgive myself for it. I did not want it to turn out this way and I know what I did was wrong. I will work toward not continuing to make this mistake in the future."  , Sometimes when people split up they make ruminate over the relationship, thinking, “What could I have done better? Am I not good enough?”However, this may lead to more distress and less emotional adjustment.Avoid re-playing the situation in your mind over and over again, and thinking about what you could have done to fix the situation. If you find yourself doing this, distract yourself with an activity or think about something else. You can also remind yourself that you may not have been able to do anything, and you could not have predicted the outcome. Avoid social media such as Facebook.It can be difficult to avoid cyber-stalking your ex and will social media will not serve as a useful distraction if it constantly reminds you of your ended relationship. One study showed that people who looked at their exes on Facebook had higher distress and longer for their ex-partner.Be busy and pack your social calendar full with activities and events. Try new things and rekindle old friendships.  

allow yourself to feel bad.  talk about it.  let your friends take care of you immediately after the breakup.  write about it.  don't blame yourself.  distract yourself. 

 New relationships can cause you to expand your sense of self because you adapt to another person. However, after a breakup it can be difficult to regain your unique identity and make sense of your daily activities.So, work on redefining yourself and celebrate your individuality and uniqueness.Some people can get a sense of freedom after a relationship ends, use this feeling to your advantage and explore new activities.Explore activities that you previously liked but were too busy to engage in. Get a new haircut or style.  Many people find that breakups, while hurtful and difficult, produce positive results in the end.Identifying some of the positives outcomes of the breakup may help you feel less sad or angry.   For example perhaps the breakup helped you focus more on school, work, or other obligations. Some people feel that breakups allow them to have more freedom. You may also have personal positive outcomes from the breakup such as more confidence, self-reliance, and self-acceptance. In addition to environmental and personal outcomes, you might also have gained more communication skills throughout the relationship and learned valuable relationship skills (i.e. learning to admit when you’re wrong).  Some breakups occur due to lack of satisfaction within the relationship, inadequate personal investment, or perception of alternatives (“there’s plenty of fish in the sea” mentality. People are more likely to break up if they have a strong social support system outside of the relationship.   For example, individuals may be more likely to breakup if they are unsatisfied or not respected. Attempt to identify things that you could have done better, but don’t beat yourself up.View the relationship as a growing opportunity that will help you navigate future relationships. Try to reflect (think logically) instead of ruminate (getting caught up in negative thinking). 

focus on yourself.  identify the positive consequences.  learn from your mistakes. 

 Individuals who are friends before a relationship are more likely to remain friends after a breakup.You will be less likely to remain friends if you completely withdraw from the person after the breakup.However, you may need this time to get space and be alone.  Though you may wish to stay friends, you may have an easier time getting over your ex if you don’t see and talk to him.   For now, it can be helpful to remove him from your Facebook friend list, delete his number from your phone, and avoid hanging out with him. If your ex wants to stay friends, let him know that you’re going to need time and that you’ll contact him when you’re ready.  It may be easier to get space to grieve if you are not reminded of your ex by everything around you. Letting go of the physical and digital may help you let go emotionally too.For example, if he left a toothbrush at your place, throw it out. Seeing it every morning could trigger negative feelings for you and color your day. If there is something that shouldn’t be thrown away or given to charity, give it to a mutual friend to give back. Delete or toss away the photos if you wish. If you want, you can save the photos of yourself using Photoshop or some other editing program to carve out your image without your partner.Delete your ex's number from your phone. If you need his number, delete every message or voicemail from him––a clean slate!  , It only hurts you to turn the breakup into an ongoing fight.   If it is too painful to address your ex at this point, try to exit the situation so that you can avoid talking to him. Setting boundaries is an important component of the healing process. If you don’t want to talk to him, you don’t have to. If you do decide to speak to him, acknowledge him politely and smile. Be respectful. Aggressive speech such as saying, “I hate you!” or behaviors, such as throwing objects at your ex, do not solve problems.  Just because the relationship has ended doesn’t mean you have to erase it from your life. It is likely that the person you had a relationship with had a big impact on you and your life, and you can cherish those changes. This is especially helpful if you have a lot of anger and resentment toward your ex. Focusing on the positive may be able to assist you in positively coping and gaining closure from the relationship.   Forgive your ex for his mistakes. Harboring resentment only makes you feel worse and stunts the healing process. You don’t have to tell him face-to-face or even on the phone, you can forgive him in your heart and this is just as effective. Avoid ruminating over the happy times. This can lead to longing and prolong your grief process.  

decide if you want to be friends.  get space.  get rid of things that remind you of your ex.  be polite and brief if you bump into each other again.  hold on to your good memories. 

 If you're trying to forget someone, a good way to start is logging the relationship. Recording your feelings about the relationship as honestly as possible can help you understand why it ended in a more objective sense. If you lost someone due to death, logging the relationship can allow you to grieve and feel a sense of closure.Regarding a broken romantic relationship or a relationship with a friend or family member that fell apart, try and be as objective as possible when recording your relationship. Be honest about how you felt around this person. Were you happy or did they make you feel uncomfortable? Was the relationship stable? Were there any signs of instability you may have missed?If you're commemorating a lost loved one, write about a happy memories. What will you miss about this person? What are the best times you had together? How do you feel about moving forward? Review your relationship log after writing it. Seeing the relationship recorded in its entirety can allow you to have the objectivity needed to move forward.; , After logging about your relationship, take some time to look for patterns. Consider the full scope of your life and any other relationships you've had. Are there types of people you tend to get involved with? Do you befriend people who have a negative impact on you? Are there reasons for your choices that relate to your personality? While reviewing your past relationships, consider some of the following questions.   How did the relationship or friendship start? Who pursued whom? Were you the active or passive party in the early stages of the relationship? Who was more dominant as the relationship progressed? Who made choices about how you would spend your time? Did you feel like you had adequate say in how things happened when you were this person? Were you ever pushed to do something that made you uncomfortable? Emotionally, how did you feel in the relationship? Happy? Stressed? Depressed? Anxious? Bored? Did you feel like your needs were being met emotionally? Why or why not?Why did the relationship end, who made the decision to end it, and how did you feel in the aftermath?, In the early stages of trying to forget someone, you need to be able to express your pain. While you might want to ignore negative feelings, you need to acknowledge them at some point. This way, you can figure out why you are hurting.   Write a letter to yourself. Keep a journal. Talk to a friend or therapist. Be as overt as possible as to what you are feeling and why. Get everything out of your system. You may end up crying. This is okay. It's important to purge your emotions in order to move forward.Take responsibility as well. In most cases, the reasons a relationship ended do not solely fall on one person. Try to see, objectively, if there's anything you could have done differently. Do not beat yourself up but just try to learn and understand a bit about yourself. Using the broken relationship as a learning experience can help you move forward., Once you've examined your relationships and dealt with your emotions, take care of yourself. In the wake of loss, we often let self care rituals fall to the wayside. Strive to make sure this does not happen with you.   Keep up with good sleeping, eating, exercise, and personal hygiene habits. It may be difficult to want to maintain a self care ritual when mourning a relationship's end, but it's important that you find a way to stay strong and move forward.Do something nice for yourself. Watch a movie you like. Take a hot bath. Order take out. Spend time with friends. Find a healthy way to treat yourself. Emotionally and physically, you need care in the wake of a relationship loss., You cannot force yourself to forget someone prematurely. Take as much time as you need to adequately grieve as there's no prescribed timeframe over which you should be over someone.   If possible, perform some kind of grieving ritual. This can help you gain closure. As rituals are driven by intent and action, many people feel empowered by engaging in them.Some people like to burn old items and mementos. If you're mourning a loss through death, writing letters to the deceased and placing them near a gravesite can help. Pick a ritual that's meaningful to you and seems like it would help you move on., If you're looking to forget someone, you need to get rid of reminders. Go through your home and find anything that reminds you of the person you lost: pictures, DVDs, presents, certain foods, souvenirs.   If you're not comfortable throwing things out, try storing them in a box and have a friend hold onto them until you're ready to fully let go. Do an electronic purge too. Delete music off your electronic library that reminds you of this person. Delete any pictures of him or her you have saved.  If the person is your Facebook friend, chat pal, or any other type of technological contact, remove or block him/her. It will not be helpful to see constant updates from this person. Additionally, if you want to forget the person, reducing avenues for communication is a key place to start. Removing the temptation of chatting on Facebook or Twitter can really help you move on., A good way to forget is to find ways to keep your mind focused on the present. Ruminating over the past makes it near impossible to forget a loved one.   Try and remember that you cannot undo the past. The only thing you have the power to change is the present moment. Go forward with the intent of making today the best day possible. Some people find using a conscious cue helps. For example, when you find yourself lingering on the past stop and say, "That was then, this is now, I want to focus on my own happiness."Meditation, yoga, and exercise are all great means to keep your mind focused on the present. Try signing up for a local gym or enrolling in a yoga or meditation class., Hobbies can be a great way to distract yourself and focus on moving forward with your life. Try a new video game, take up knitting, join a local sport's league, or start doing crossword puzzles. Anything you can do to help you stay in the present and move forward can be really helpful to forgetting someone and moving forward., After ending a relationship or friendship, it is important to spend time with other people. It will help keep your thoughts on other things and less on that person.   Make plans with your existing social network. Go out to a bar for drinks. Meet someone for coffee. Have friends over for a movie night.Do not hesitate to reach out to people you haven't seen in awhile. Get on the phone with a family member you do not talk to often. See if an old classmate is free to grab dinner sometime. Catching up with people you've neglected during a relationship is a great way to help you forget and move forward., If the person you’re trying to forget is in your social group, it will help to branch out. Find a way to meet new acquaintances.   You might consider volunteering somewhere. Many people meet new friends through shared interests. Find a cause you care about and get involved. Not only will this help give you a sense of purpose when you're feeling emotionally vulnerable, it will allow you the opportunity to meet likeminded people.The website "Meet Up" is a great way to make new friends. The site allows different groups and people to make plans based on a set of interests. You enter your information and a bit about yourself and a variety of groups, catered to your interests, will show up in your interest will surface., If it is feasible financially and time-wise, leave town for a few days. You might take a short flight to a nearby city or just drive into the country. Seek new sights and make new memories. Being in a new environment can help clear your thoughts. If you're unable to take a long break, even a weekend across town can help you leave unwanted, troubling thoughts behind and allow you to move forward., If you're stuck in a rut and can't forget someone, therapy can help. Negative feelings associated with the end of a relationship can be addressed by a skilled therapist. Ask your general practitioner for a referral to a therapist or see what's covered under your insurance. If you're a student, you may be entitled to free counseling through your college or university.  Once you've taken some time to actively work on forgetting, try and feel gratitude for what was lost. It seems counterintuitive, but finding ways to appreciate the good times can actually help you gain closure and forget.   If you're grieving a loss through death, feel grateful you were close to someone for as long as you were. Allow yourself to happily experience the good times. If you're mourning the end of a relationship, do not forget the positives. Even if you and your ex weren't right for each other, be grateful you got to experience love. If a friendship has dissolved, remember a great trip you took together and feel thankful for the memories. 

make a relationship log.  look for relationship patterns.  express your emotions.  nurture yourself.  grieve the loss.  put away reminders.  disconnect on social media.  focus on the present moment.  take up hobbies.  seek support from others.  meet new people.  take a vacation.  see a therapist, if necessary.  feel gratitude. 

 It's no good shouting "it's time we had a break from each other" and then storming off. The decision to take a break in a relationship is a really tough one and if you don't take it together, in a calm and considered manner, it bodes ill for the outcome. Find a moment to sit down together and be honest with one another. Talk about what has brought both of you to this point and why you think a break would be a healthy option right now.; , Do not interrupt or fob off his worries. You both need to hear each other clearly, without passing judgment.  This is about setting the ground rules and your hopes for reconciliation post-break. It is an important time to reassure each other that this is about clearing your heads, determining what you both want from the future and being absolutely sure about getting back together.   Set ground rules you can both agree on.  For most people, it is not an excuse to fool around; it's important to make that clear. Determine how each of you will deal with approaches from other people who find out you're on a break; that will help to quell the anxiety that a new relationship might be inserted into the space.   What changes do you think will be needed? What changes does your boyfriend want? Reach a happy compromise in relation to each other's wants. What will stay the same without feeling awkward or uncomfortable? Will you continue to talk to one another face-to-face? Will you use social media to stay in touch? Will you take a complete break from communicating with each other? Will you set times to catch up and review how things are going? You need to face these questions now, and not just wander off blindly in the hope that things will resolve themselves as the break takes place. Things unsaid have a way of turning into confirmation that whatever you or he wants goes.  It could be a week, a month, six months, etc. Alternatively, you may prefer no set time, just subject to review and mutual agreement some time down the track. ,   Create an activity list. This will give you an opportunity to look forward to each new day that approaches, instead of pacing and worrying about if he will call. It is important to learn that your life should never revolve around one single person. That only sets you up to be devastated if they end up wanting a break up.  This can be your time to shine academically or professionally. , Meet new people and try new things. , That said, learn to tell the difference between loneliness and solitude. Solitude is the time for you to reflect about your future, your wishes for the relationship and to consider your feelings about the break. Use times of solitude to write your journal, write out your feelings and prepare lists of issues you want to raise with your boyfriend.  If you feel like the odd one out, you may end up losing your nerve and feeling awful. You might also make poor decisions based on what everyone else has; it is best to hang around with people in all sorts of different stages of life.  You'll both need to reassess the direction things are going from time to time, so it's important to talk at least for the purposes of determining how both of you are feeling about the future. This could be a two-weekly, monthly or even quarterly meet-up. Choose what suits both of you. Try not to rush things though; give each other sufficient time to have done some good thinking before discussing "what next".  Keep notes about the things that occur to you while contemplating the future of your relationship together. It can feel overwhelming when you get back to together and you may forget to raise some of the key issues that you really want addressed. Suggest that he does the same thing, so that you can "compare notes" and not leave the important things left unsaid.  For example: "I feel _ when you _, and I would appreciate it if you would _, instead of _."  , Whether you've set a deadline or you've mutually agreed that it's time to decide "what next", you must be honest with yourself. Do you want the relationship to resume or has the break changed your perspective and you think that it'd be best if the two of you just stayed friends?   Be careful of feelings of loyalty. While it's noble to be loyal, this isn't the reason for staying with someone when the fire has died out. You can transfer the loyalty to a friendship. Be aware of his feelings but be careful not to let these take over your own feelings. For example, he is really sad and disappointed that you've decided not to resume the relationship, avoid feeling obliged to resume it just because of his sadness. It will pass.  Since this is a real possibility, and you have probably harbored a lot of fantasy notions about things going back to the way they were, it can be a real whammy. What is really important is to use the break to reach acceptance that this is as much a possible outcome as resuming the relationship. Consider what you will do if you do break up for real and you will need to move forward. This is where the "keeping busy" and resuming your other social linkages comes to the foreplay; it will hurt to know things aren't going on but you're not being thrown back into a void. Rather, you have friends, family and your own pursuits to fall back into.  This will be a challenge too, because the time apart was spent thinking things through and possibly reaching conclusions you hadn't wanted to face before. It is really important to talk about what feelings you had during the break, how these have changed your perspective and what changes you want to bring to the relationship and into the future. Listen to his changed perspective too. Seek to incorporate each other's different perspectives into a new and refreshed relationship.  

discuss the reason for the break with your boyfriend.  listen to your boyfriend's concerns, reasons and thoughts.  reach an agreement on what this break means for both of you.  discuss what will change in the relationship and what will stay the same.  consider deciding how long the break will be.  once the break starts, follow the rules you agreed on.  ,  stay busy.  invest more time in doing work or studying.  devote more time and energy to doing things that make you happy.  ,  be more social.  re-connect with old friends you may have neglected.  ,  avoid spending too much time by yourself.  consider avoiding hanging out in situations with a bunch of couples.  catch up now and then.  be honest with your boyfriend about your questions and concerns.  use assertive statements when expressing yourself.  consider how you feel after the break.  think about how you will react if you wish to continue with the relationship but he doesn't.  think about how you will react if both of you wish to resume the relationship. 

 Sometimes, we think friendships aren't as important as other relationships, such as romantic ones or familial ones. You may feel like you don't have the right to grieve when a friend drops out of your life. Nonetheless, your friends are vital to your well-being, and you are friends with the people in your life for a reason. When you lose one of those friends, you're going to need to grieve that person's lose in your life, just as if you'd broke up with a boyfriend or girlfriend.If you try to avoid the pain, you'll just hold on to it for much longer. By acknowledging that you are sad, you can grieve and start the process of moving on.; , Your other friends and your family are there to help you out. When you're going to through a hard time, it's good to lean on your friends and family. They can lend an ear to hear you out or just be a safe place where you can cry. Don't be afraid to ask people for help.It can be helpful to talk to a therapist about the breakup, especially if the person has been your friend for a long time., It's a natural tendency to want to be strong and to not cry (too much). However, crying is a natural release of emotion, and it's important to let yourself feel that emotion. Yes, you eventually need to move on. Right now, though, you're hurting, and crying is a part of releasing that hurt., You may find yourself thinking some irrational thoughts right now. For instance, you might be saying to yourself, "I don't think I can live without this person in my life." or "I must have something wrong with me if my friend doesn't want to be friends with me anymore." The key is to change these statements in your head. Tell yourself, "I can create a new life without this person. I don't need her to go on living. I do need food, water, and air, but I don't need one person." or "I don't have anything wrong with me. We're just in different places.", Take a moment to think about the good the person brought into your life. Consider the ways she made your life better, and think about the good memories you had together. Despite what's happening now, recognizing that the person brought good into your life can help you to move on., You don't actually need to see the person again for this step, but you do need to find some way to say goodbye to the person to help yourself move on. It will help give you the closure you need.One way you can do this step is to write a letter to the person. You don't have to send it, just write it, telling the person all the things you left unsaid and saying goodbye.You can also have a conversation as if the person was there. Say all the things aloud that you wanted to say to the person while you were still friends.  You don't have to be an artist to use art to help you heal. Doing something creative helps channel your grief into something physical. Try painting or drawing what you're feeling or even going to an art therapy class. It doesn't have to be good art. It simply has to be a representation of what you're feeling.Don't think too much about what you're going to paint or draw. Just start doing it, letting your emotions take you where they will.  Make sure you are getting your fruits and veggies. Also, make sure you are eating on a regular schedule. Don't forget to include some healthy proteins, low-fat dairy, and whole grains. Not eating healthy will just make you feel worse., Make sure you are getting enough sleep at night. You should be getting at least 7 to 8 hours at night and even more if you're younger. If you're not getting enough sleep, you're going to feel even more upset and anxious., It also releases endorphins, which naturally makes you feel better.Try for 150 minutes of aerobic exercise a week. One way to get your exercise in is to take a walk at lunch. The sunlight will also help boost your mood.  Alcohol may numb the pain for a moment, but it could lead to a longer addiction. Plus, it doesn't allow you to face the pain like you need to do., If you love painting, spend time painting. If you enjoy going to the movies, do that. Go out with your other friends and enjoy the people who are still in your life., That is, if you have mutual friends, don't make them pick a side. In fact, try not to say anything negative about the friend you broke up with around mutual friends. It will only drive a wedge between you and your other friends., Now that you've had this experience, you can be clearer about what you want in a friend. If you broke up with your friend because the relationship was bad for your mental well-being, consider the qualities that made it bad, and what would be better in new friends.For instance, maybe your friend wasn't trustworthy or didn't respect your boundaries. When you're making new friends, you need to make sure you're not choosing people who are going to cause the same problems.  If you're going to make new friends, you need to put yourself out there. Talk to people in the coffee shop. Join local clubs that feature your hobbies. Take a class at your local community college. Try to meet new people everywhere you go.You can't just go to these events. You have actually talk to people and try to get to know them.  

feel the pain.  talk to someone.  let your tears out.  change your thinking.  appreciate what you had.  tell them goodbye.  pour your grief into a creative project.  eat well.  get enough rest.  get out and exercise.exercise will keep you feeling better overall, and it will help keep your energy up.  skip the alcohol.  do things you enjoy.  be kind to your other friends.  determine what you want in new friends.  make new friends. 

 If you care about the girl at all, then you owe it to her to spend some time finding a way to give her the bad news as nicely as possible. If you don't plan ahead at all, then you may accidentally end up hurting her even more, confusing her, or just sounding like a jerk without meaning to. You don't have to rehearse every word, but you should have a sense of what you're going to say to end the relationship and what reason you're going to give for doing it. Here are some things you can say:   "I'm really sorry, but I just don't think things are working out between us. I feel like we're becoming different people and can't find a way to make it work." "This is really hard for me to say, but I think we should end our relationship. I know we both have been unhappy for a while because we're not really compatible, and we both need to move on." "This relationship just isn't working out anymore. I've been spending so much time at work and you've been so busy with your other friends that we haven't made our time together a priority. I think it's too late to turn back from that." Avoid anything like, "Well, I'm kinda bored of you." Or, "I've found someone else."; , If the girl means anything at all to you, then do her the courtesy of breaking up with her in person. If you dump her over text or email, then you'll always be the jerk who couldn't build up the courage to dump his girlfriend like a man. Though you'll feel a momentary relief when you press that "send" button, the repercussions of your actions won't be worth taking the easy way out. Give the girl a chance to hear you out and to have a conversation about the breakup. If you care about her, then you'll want her to have a real chance to get some closure.   The only reason you shouldn't break up with the girl in person is if you're in a long distance relationship and won't be seeing each other for a while. In this case, it's better to do it over the phone than to wait until the next time you see each other.  There's no perfect time to break up with someone. No matter what, the person will be upset, stressed out, and possibly angry. However, you can minimize the damage a bit by making sure you're picking a time when the girl has nothing going on afterwards, and when you know she won't be incredibly stressed because of a huge test/big game/important interview the next day. If you pick a time when she's less likely to be stressed, then you'll make it easier for her to get the message.   If she's constantly stressed and has a lot going on at all times, don't let this delay you from breaking up with her for too long -- just try to find a day when she's less stressed than usual, if you can.  Your first priority is picking a quiet, isolated place where you're not likely to run into anyone you know. After that, just try not to pick a place that means a lot to you, like the bench where you shared your first kiss or your favorite restaurant. Breaking up with her in a place that is meaningful for your relationship will only worsen the pain. Just pick a place that is quiet, neutral, and as unromantic as possible. If you take her for a long walk through a rose garden or on a beach, then yeah, the break up will take her by surprise.  Don't act too serious or sad when you ask her if she's free later. Just keep your cool and ask if she'll be around later. You can say, "There's something I want to talk to you about," but that'll make it pretty obvious that you have some bad news to deliver, so if you can, keep it a bit vague. This doesn't mean you should catch her by surprise completely, but that you shouldn't upset her too much before the conversation or she'll want to have the talk on her terms then and there, and you may not be prepared.  You can say something nice or make small talk first, but there's no use in prolonging the pain. After a minute or two, once you and the girl have settled in, you should just tell her that you want to end the relationship. The longer you sit there, the more nervous you'll get, and the more likely you are to get off track. If you and the girl make small talk for twenty minutes before you break up with her, then you'll be much more likely to confuse her. Just take a deep breath and tell her that it's over as nicely as possible. Here are some things that you can say:   "I'm sorry to say that I think our relationship has run its course. We'd both be happier if we moved on." "This relationship is no longer working for me. I know we've tried everything, and it just won't get better." "It may not be a surprise that I haven't been happy in this relationship for a while. I really care about you, but I just don't think we should date anymore."  , If you really don't care at all, then there's no point in faking it. But if the break up really is hurting you, then make sure she sees it. Look into her eyes, talk slowly, and let her see the pain on your face. Most people don't think that the person doing the dumping also feels pain in a break up, but both people actually suffer. If she sees that you're not making an easy, careless decision that means nothing to you, then she'll have a better chance of understanding where you're coming from.  If you care about the girl, give her the respect she deserves and let her tell you how she feels, ask questions, and share her feelings. She may just want to cry and be upset, and that's okay. She may start name-calling and getting angry -- in that case, you may need to wrap things up. If she's rambling on about the same thing over and over, then you can cut her off, but if she genuinely wants to share her feelings and is really hurt, then do her the kindness of letting her talk to you.   She'll likely have some questions for you, and you can decide how much you want to explain.  If you've fallen in love for someone else or realized that the girl you're with is just totally boring, you can do her a favor and not tell her as much. But if you do feel like she deserves an honest explanation of what really went wrong, then you can answer her questions and explain the breakup in more detail. Just remember that you only have to tell the girl what you're comfortable with, and the more you say, the more pain you may cause. Find a balance between being honest and protecting the girl.   Really, she'll just be asking a different version of "why?" over and over; once you feel like you can no longer give her new information, it may be time to wrap things up.  You came there to dump the girl, so don't leave there deciding to be together but to work things out, promising her that you just want to take a break for a month, or saying that you should still date but have an open relationship. The girl may break you down by how cute, sad, or just how gosh darn persistent she is, but you can't let her change your original game plan. If you decided to dump her, then you must have had a good reason, so stick to it.   This is why you should keep the conversation as short as possible. The longer you're out there, the more likely you are to have a change of heart.  Don't ruin your reputation by being a jerk to the girl or going on a date with her best friend. Even if she did something to hurt you or you're just plain sick of her, there's no need to be extra mean or just to hurt her feelings because you don't feel like dating anymore. You want her to leave with a relatively good impression of you, and for her not to tell all of the girls she knows that you should be avoided at all costs. If you feel some nasty words coming up, bite your tongue.  The less time you spend on the conversation, the better. Once you've said your part and have her say what she wants to say, then there's no need to sit around together, feeling sad and letting those feelings of nostalgia bubble up. This will only cause you more pain, cause you to rethink what you've done, and leave you feeling even more sad and confused. You shouldn't dump the girl and then just walk away, but if you feel like you've both said everything you need to say and that you're both just repeating yourselves, then tell the girl you need to go.   If you really think the girl will try to drag it on, come up with a reasonable excuse for leaving in advance.  Though the girl won't walk away thinking you're the greatest guy on the planet, you should have her leave without thinking that you're a horrible person. Say goodbye like a gentleman, say something nice, and try to smile. If you're inside, hold the door for her when you leave. Don't walk away after flinging insults at her, or that will stick with her. You want her to leave the relationship with a somewhat positive impression, don't you?  

figure out what you're going to say.  do it in person if you care at all.  pick the right time.  pick the right place.  stay cool when you ask her to meet up.  cut to the chase.  let her see that you're hurt too.  let her talk.  explain as much as you want.  stick to your word.  don't be a jerk.  keep it short and sweet.  try to end on a positive note. 

 There's no shame in having a broken heart. If you hold back your feelings, your grieving period will last longer and you'll feel worse. In the beginning, it's okay to be honest and open about your feelings.   When you're alone, cry as much as you want to. Try not to cry too much in public, but if you can't help it, don't be embarrassed. Be honest with your friends and family by telling them you're having a rough time. There's no point in being in denial about how awful you feel. Write all of your sad thoughts in your journal. You'll feel better after getting them off your chest. It's okay to be honest about your emotions to yourself and the people who care the most about you, but do not take your grief to social media. Don't post on your Facebook or Twitter account about how sad you are or how awful you feel after your breakup. Telling people you barely know about your deepest feelings will embarrass them and you, and this will be something you deeply regret in the future.  Making time for mourning means not seeing your ex. Don't try to prove how tough or "okay with it" you are by having a weekly dinner with your ex, or texting your ex when something reminds you of him or her. Unless you live together or need to be in contact for logistical reasons, such as getting your stuff back from his or her apartment, cut off contact as much as you can. This will help you heal much quicker. You can try to be friends with your ex when you're ready, but it won't always work.; , If you've had a really devastating break-up, you don't have to force yourself to go out every night right afterwards. Making yourself go out into the world and interact with your friends, or even strangers, before you're truly ready will only make your pain worse. Here's what to do:   If you don't feel like going to big, loud parties for a little while, stay at home and do something fun there instead. If you and your ex run in the same circles, try to avoid any events that he might be attending for a while unless you really think you can act cool about it. Avoid excessive social drinking. If you are out, it may not be the best time to drink heavily. This will bring your emotions to the surface and you may be having a public outburst. While you don't have to be social, make sure not to isolate yourself. Make time to invite your best friend over for a movie, talk to your parents on the phone, or email with your closest friend who lives across the country.  After the first week or two, once you're starting to get your thoughts together, it's time to reflect on the relationship and on the person who broke your heart. Here's what to do:   Write down all of the positive things you gained from the relationship, such as a higher self-confidence, a love for hiking, and a better ability to communicate. Write down the negative things about your relationship. Maybe your relationship kept you from concentrating on your friendships, or you spend too much time thinking about your significant other instead of yourself. Write down the qualities of the person who broke your heart. Recognize that the person has great traits but is a flawed human being. The more negative qualities you can generate, the better. Write down all the other times when you've felt like you could possibly never love again, only to find that you found an even stronger, deeper love the next time. Don't worry if this is the first time you've felt this way.  

let your emotions loose.  don't force yourself to be social.  take time to think about your relationship. 

 Once you've given yourself enough time to mourn your relationship, it's time to slowly ease back into the world. Your family members should be some of the most accepting and loving people in your life, and they will be for you when you're trying to fix your broken heart. Here's what to do:   Try to see your family as much as you can. If your family members live far away, this could be a good time to take a week-long vacation to see them. If can't see your family members, talk to them. Let them know how you're feeling and let them comfort you. If there's something you used to love doing with your family, such as baking pies or watching football on Sundays, pick that up again if you can. Ask your family members for advice. Though your family members may love you so much that they may say anything to make you feel better, ask them about how to deal with a broken heart.  Though your family may have known you the longest, your close friends may have the best understanding of you and your relationship. They've probably met your significant other, have heard you discuss your problems, and have a helpful perspective. Here's how to do it:   Once you feel up to it, try to hang out with your close friends as often as you can. Even if you feel like you're being a drag, your close friends will make you laugh and will take your mind off of your recent heartbreak. Use this as an opportunity to take the fun friend trip you and your friends have been talking about forever. Whether you're flying to Mexico or just driving to a new beach, sometimes a change of scenery with your closest friends can help you feel less broken. Just be plain silly. Invite your friends to an 80s-themed sleepover or a dance party. Just don't forget that your friends have their limits and their patience can wear thin. If you spend all of your time together whining and crying about your broken heart, they may not pick up the next time you call. Hanging out with your closest friends will help the healing process, but try to avoid hanging out with too many couples. Even if your couple friends make a point of not being extra lovey around you, you may still feel left out and even more alone if you're surrounded by people who are in love. You can talk to your friends about your breakup, but stop when you've gone over the same scenario so many times that you're not getting anywhere and it's making you sick. This can actually make you feel worse.  If you were in a committed relationship for a long time, then chances are that you left a few friends by the wayside because you didn't have enough time to pursue your relationship along with so many friendships. Here's what you can do:   If you found out that an old friend from high school or college just moved into your neighborhood, don't be afraid to get in touch. You can reconnect and find that your relationship is even stronger than ever. If you stopped talking to a close friend a while after she moved away from you, use this time to call her up and see how she's doing. You will find that you've missed many things about your relationship. If one of your old friends moved abroad, write him or her a letter. This will help you reconnect and reflect in the process.  

spend time with your family.  spend time with your close friends.  get back in touch with long-lost friends. 

 After your broken heart, you may be feeling down on yourself. Even if there's no reason for this, you need to work to make yourself feel good again in whatever way possible. Here are some great ways to improve how you feel about yourself:   Pamper yourself. Get that overdue haircut, go in for a pedicure and manicure, or even buy a new outfit or two. Feeling better about how you look can go a long way in helping you feel better about yourself overall. Feel better about your body. While you don't have to hit up the gym like a maniac, running in the sun, taking a Pilates class, or eating three balanced meals will make you feel better physically, which will help put your mind at ease. Be helpful. Volunteer at your local library or community center, or help one of your friends work on her garden. You'll feel better about yourself if you feel that you can help people in the world.  Now that you're riding solo, you may find that you have more time on your hands. There's no better occasion than to pursue a new interest. Pick something you've always wanted to do, or something completely random and fun. Here are some ideas:   Learn a new language. This will improve your memory, your ability to land a great job, and will make you a more interesting person. Join a new sports league. Join a local soccer, basketball, or beach volleyball team. You may discover a new talent and will make great friends in the process. Take an art class. Find out if you have a knack for pottery, oil painting, or ceramics. Take an improv class. Develop your funny side and your ability to laugh no matter what.  Though you shouldn't spend too much time brooding by yourself, you should avoid running around with so many things to do that you don't have a moment for some quality "me time." It's likely that you didn't get enough time alone during your relationship. Alone time should be something you look forward to, not dread. Here's what you can do:   Express yourself. Sketch, write poetry, or even try your hand at a short story. Just avoid only writing or creating art about your ex. Develop your love for literature. Try to read a book a week and really think about what it means. If this makes you feel too isolated, join a book club. Make time to take walks for at least 20 minutes a day so you can really reflect on your life. Take time to write thoughtful entries in your journal.  Don't forget that while your heart is aching, there are benefits to being single. You are now free to do whatever you want whenever you want it, and this is no small gift. Here's how you can take advantage of not being in a relationship:   Go to a concert for a band that your ex didn't care for. You may have been missing out on your favorite music because you and your ex's tastes didn't jive. Eat the type of food your ex hated. If your ex was a vegetarian while you're a big meat eater, try the new Korean BBQ place in your neighborhood. If your ex hated Mexican food while you love it, invite your friends out for fajitas. Get hooked on a TV show that your ex refused to watch. Though you should avoid drowning your sorrows in television, try watching a new high-quality television show. This will be fun and will also give you something to look forward to. Don't do things your ex hated out of spite. Just view this as an opportunity to spend more time doing the things you love.  

improve your self-esteem.  pursue a new interest.  learn to love being alone.  do something you weren't able to do during your relationship. 

 Before you jump back into the love game, it's important to make sure your heart is mended as much as possible so that you don't feel worse when nobody you meet stacks up to your old significant other, or end up hurting people in the process. Here's how to know if you're ready:   If you've stopped thinking about your ex all the time. Your ex can cross your mind a few times a day, and you can have a relapse once in a while, but on the whole, your thoughts should be focused on your present life, your goals, and your future. If you don't compare every guy you meet to your ex. It's important to approach dating with an open mind. If you're only out to see how your date stacks up to your ex, then you're not ready for dating. If you only want to date in order to make your ex jealous. If you only want to see new people so your ex will hear about it or see pictures of you and a new special someone on Facebook, then you're not being fair to your potential suitors. If you're feeling optimistic, positive, and like you have a chance---however small---of falling in love again. Don't be frustrated if you can't completely stop thinking about your ex. If six months, or even a year or two has gone by and you're still thinking about him or her, that doesn't mean you shouldn't start dating again. It takes time to get over people, and if you're making an effort to move on instead of being stuck in the past, then dating is healthy.  Once you're ready to play the dating game again, you don't have to jump into it head first---just ease your toes into the water and see what happens. You'll have the best results if you take things slowly at first. Here's how to do it:   Don't jump to conclusions. If your new date doesn't impress you with his looks or attitude right away, give him a chance. You may be too focused on having that initial spark to see if something else is building between you. Keep things light. When you start dating someone new, talk about your friends, your interests, and the fun things you hope to do. Don't jump into a deep philosophical discussion about how to live a happy life, or share the top ten things you're looking for in a husband. This will scare off your new date. Keep things fun instead, and dig into the deeper stuff later. Don't talk about your ex. If it comes up, you can briefly mention your ex and say a few words about why your relationship ended, but try to steer clear of this topic for as long as possible. Once you and your date start opening up to each other, you can talk about this, but you don't want to seem like your stuck in the past.  Once you've stopped thinking about your ex, have gone on a few dates, and are ready for real love again, you need to make sure you can pursue a new and healthy relationship while protecting your heart as much as you can. Here's what you should do:   Be honest about your past relationship. Once you've seen someone for a few months and things are getting serious, don't be afraid to share as much as you want to say about your past relationship. If you keep in all of your painful memories from your last relationship, you won't be able to fully open up. Just be careful not to talk about it so much that your new sweetie thinks you're obsessing with your ex. Try not to make the same mistakes as you did in your previous relationship. If you're ready to start seriously dating again, it means you've reflected on the things that did not work in your relationship. Though each relationship is completely unique, there should be a few helpful lessons you learned, such as not to take anything for granted, to remember to tell the person you're with how much you care, and not to spend all of your free time with your significant other. Don't compare your new relationship to your old one. Though you can take lessons away from your old relationship, you should treat your new relationship as something exciting and malleable, and work to make the new situation as amazing as possible. Open yourself to love. Once you're really ready and feel committed and invested in the person you're with, don't be afraid to let go. There is always a chance you will get hurt again, but if you've reflected and found the right person, the risk of getting hurt will be worth the amazing feeling of falling in love.  

make sure you're ready to start dating.  start dating just for fun.  open yourself to another serious relationship. 

 If you want to get dates, you'll need to ask girls out. If you ask girls out, you'll eventually be rejected. It's a simple fact - rejection is a near-unavoidable part of the dating process.; , Remember that you aren't entitled to a "yes" response. You are, however, entitled to politeness and civility, provided you extend your crush the same entitlements.  No one is perfect, but it's hard to remember this if you have suffer from infatuation (commonly called "puppy love.") Constructing an ideal version of someone before you know them well is a sure-fire path to disappointment. If you're rejected, it will be crushing, and if you get the date, she won't live up to your impossible expectations. Remember that everyone, no matter how attractive, has faults. This will make it easier to work up the courage to ask her out and it will make a potential rejection much less painful.  If a girl asked you out and you rejected her, would it be an indication that you hated her? Probably not. Like men, women have complex emotions. A rejection might not be an indication that she doesn't like you - it might simply be an indication that she was having a bad day. Always remember that the object of your affections is a living, breathing, feeling human like you.  Maintain your friendships. Rejections are easier to deal with if you have friends to fall back on. If you're single, it's also perfectly acceptable to harbor more than one crush at once. This way, if one girl rejects you, you'll still be able to pursue others.  It can be tempting to wait for the perfect moment to ask someone out, but waiting too long can cause problems. It can send the wrong message - that you're not interested. It can also lead you to become anxious or invest undue emotional weight in the crush's response, which can make a rejection more painful. Try to think of the event casually - it will make it easier to ask her promptly and you can avoid adding extra impact to a potential rejection.  Why endure the stress of asking someone out if you run the risk of being misunderstood? Make sure your crush knows you're asking her out as a romantic interest and not as a friend - doing so will ensure an honest response. If you are rejected, she will explain herself, which will provide valuable insight. See our wikiHow for tips on asking a girl out.  Respect your crush's decision. If she says yes, don't tempt her to reconsider by saying "really?" If she says no, don't paint yourself as desperate by saying "are you sure?" Her decision is final for the time being. By calmly accepting it, you maintain respect for her and earn closure for yourself.  If she says no, you can stand to learn something about her (or yourself.) The conversation following a rejection can be surprisingly frank and illuminating, so listen carefully for a chance to learn how to achieve future dating goals. Knowing the reason for a rejection can make coping much easier, especially if the reason is superficial or has nothing to do with you. Here are a few reasons for rejection that have nothing to do with the man asking the girl out:   She is too busy to date. She is working through personal and/or emotional issues. She already has a significant other. She enjoys being single.  In most cases, rejection isn't a judgement of your character. If a girl decides she doesn't want to date you, it doesn't mean she dislikes you or even finds you unattractive. Every instance of rejection is different, but the common thread is that "you" are not rejected. Rather, your request to date is.  If your crush is someone you see regularly, it's normal (but not inevitable) to experience residual awkwardness after a rejection. With time, nerves can cool and normal friendship can resume. Awkwardness can take the form of:   Silences Avoidance Irritation Unnatural, overly-friendly behavior  , A rejection can be a blessing in disguise if it motivates you to find happiness in other people's company. Take the opportunity to pursue social avenues you normally wouldn't. Spend quality time with friends. Ask a different crush out. Go on a blind date. Positive interactions with other people are scientifically proven to raise our happiness, so seek them out.  After heartbreak, it can be rewarding to devote time to improving yourself and pursuing your interests. Over time, you will become more attractive and naturally meet people who like the same things as you.  One rejection doesn't necessarily mean dating someone is impossible in the future. Before asking again, however, it's best to consider your options. Allow time for circumstances to change before asking again.  

know that rejection is a common reality.  temper your expectations.  avoid infatuation.  remember that your crush is a human being.  leave yourself other social options.  try not to procrastinate.  be crystal clear.  don't question her response.  listen to what she says.  realize that rejection is not a personal indictment.  accept lingering awkwardness.  occupy yourself with other people.  focus on your personal aspirations.  consider trying again - in due time. 

 You don't have to spend hours crafting your break-up speech, but if you care about the boy at all, you should put a little thought into what you're going to say before you say it. Figure out how you're going to give the boy the bad news, how you'll prepare him for it, and what reasons you'll give for the break-up. Remember that you don't have to tell him everything if you don't want to. If you're breaking up with him because you just don't like him anymore, find the nicest way to say that you just don't think things are working out.   If the boy has hurt you or done something really terrible, then you don't have to feel bad about being honest with him. If the break up is pretty much his fault, then you might as well let him know.; , Letting the boy see that things aren't going so well before you actually break up with him can help ease the pain. Don't kiss him, hug him, and act like everything is perfectly fine or he will be really confused -- and even more hurt -- when you do finally break up with him. If you've decided that the best time to break up with the boy is in a few days, then don't go on any romantic dates or show him extra affection before then. Just act a little more distant than usual so he may have a sense that something is up.   This doesn't mean you should prolong the pain for weeks. But if you know you're going to make a move in a few days, slowly remove yourself from the relationship in the interim.  Dumping someone over email or text is really not the way to go unless you don't care about the person at all. If you've only dated for a few weeks and you've decided that the guy is a real jerk, then fine, send him a text saying, "I don't think this is working out. I'm sorry," and move on with your life. But if the person means something to you, then make an effort to meet him in person and to give him the news face-to-face. This will let him ask you questions and get more closer than finding out that he's dumped from a phone or computer screen; if you think he deserves this level of respect, then give it to him.   If the boy has a violent temper or you're afraid that he might hurt you after you break up with him, then this will be another situation where it's better to break up in person. If you and the boy are doing the long distance thing and you know you won't see each other for a month or two, you may want to break up with him over the phone -- it's better to do it as quickly as you can than to prolong the pain until you see each other.  You don't have to wait for weeks for the perfect moment to present itself for you to dump the boy. But you should try to pick a time when both of you can be alone, relatively free of stress, and in a neutral place where you can have a meaningful conversation. Don't dump the boy an hour before his math final or his baseball game, or you'll be causing him extra stress that he won't be able to deal with right away. Try to pick a time when you know he'll have nothing to do afterwards and when you have enough time to really talk to him.  Ask the boy to meet you so you can break up with him. Try not to make it sound too obvious or he'll show up filled with dread. Pick a place that doesn't mean something special to you guys -- avoid the park where you always hang out or the place where you went on your first date. Do it outside a library or somewhere quiet after school if you have to. If you pick a place that has special meaning for you both, then that'll make the process more difficult. Though dumping the boy won't be easy no matter where you go, the more you plan ahead, the more likely you'll be to minimize your pain.  You can be nice first and make a little bit of small talk, but there's no point in dragging it on. As soon as you're ready, take a deep breath, and tell him that it's just not working anymore. Say that you're sorry (if you are) and tell him that you want to break up. If he's been nice to you then you can say something about how he was an amazing boyfriend and that you had a great time with him, but there's no point in feeding him lies if you were miserable and just wanted to get out.   Make eye contact and speak slowly. Let him see that this is hurting you too, even if you're the one doing the dumping.  You don't have to give him a blow by blow of exactly why you're dumping him -- in fact, that will only cause him more pain and make him feel even worse about himself. If you've met or fallen for someone else, maybe you don't want to tell him that and hurt him any more (as long as you don't think he will find out anyway). If you just aren't into him anymore, you can find another way to get around that, like saying that you can't make time for him, or that you think you've become different people, but he may be able to see right through that.   If he hurt you, then you won't need to give him an explanation of why you're ending it. He'll know what he did.  If you still respect him, then you can give him the courtesy of letting him talk to you and ask you some questions. If he's just repeating the same thing over and over, then it won't get you anywhere, but if he genuinely wants to know more about why you've chosen to dump him, you can let him ask some questions as long as you don't think this will hurt him more.   He may ask if he could have done anything differently; even if he could have, there's no point in telling him so, because you've already made your decision. Answer any questions you feel comfortable answering, but if it's all starting to feel a bit repetitive, then you can wrap things up.  There's no point in being mean to the boy -- even if he has really hurt you. You want to end the relationship with your head high, and not leave him with extra bitter feelings toward you. Your relationship, however long or short it was, must have had some high points, and you want him to remember you fondly, don't you? There's no point in undermining all of the great and not-so-great experiences you had together just by being mean at the end.   If you feel the urge to say something really spiteful, hold your tongue. Remember that you're the one doing the hurting, and it's likely that the boy is feeling a lot of pain.  Keep the conversation as short and sweet as possible. There's no point in dragging it on or you're both more likely to say hurtful things, and to feel more pain. Also, the longer you stay with the boy, the more likely you'll be to doubt your decision and to feel some regret. But don't let your feelings of nostalgia or disappointment confuse you into thinking you have done the wrong thing.   Tell the boy you have to go once you're done, and make an excuse for why if you have to. If he thinks you have nowhere to go, then he may want to keep you around for longer.  Remember that this is a break-up, not a negotiation. Don't let the boy beg you to stay with him or promise that he'll change if you decide not to dump him after all. Your decision is final, and there's little chance that the relationship will be any different if you go back to round two. The boy may tell you how much he likes or loves you, flatter you, or even beg you and cry -- but you can't let yourself back down under any circumstances. Stay strong and walk away, no matter what the boy is doing.   Just keep saying, "I'm sorry, but I've already made my decision." Let him know that you weren't asking for his opinion on this one.  Though it's unlikely that you'll walk away from the break up as best friends, try to leave the boy with a fond memory. Don't run away after name calling or yelling at him, and don't storm away, either. He may want to do that, but you have to take the high road and stay positive, be as friendly as you can, and tell him that you're really sorry about the way things ended. He may fling insults at you, but you can't stoop to that level.   Give him a hug if he's open to it. But be warned that he may be so hurt that he won't want to touch you.  Let's face it -- it can be nearly impossible to be friends with your ex, and it's definitely impossible to be friends with your ex right after a break-up. So give him some time to cool off, let your own emotions settle, and stop being in touch with him for as long as it takes to heal. Don't start having awkward lunch dates a month after the break up because you think that's the "mature" thing to do; if you still have residual feelings, you're only making it harder for both of you to move on.   There's no magic formula for how long it will take for both of you to let go of your romantic feelings. Each relationship starts and ends at its own pace, so don't feel bad if you still feel confused about the whole thing after a few months.  Once you dump the boy, you should enjoy spending some time with your favorite person -- yourself. This isn't the time to go crazy, hook up with random people, and socialize with your girlfriends non-stop. Though these things can help you forget the break-up, you'll be able to deal with it more thoroughly if you give yourself some time to stay in, write in your journal, take walks, read a good book, or do whatever you have to do to feel centered and like yourself again.   Take the time to do the things you didn't have much time to do because you were always with the boy. This will make you appreciate being by yourself even more.  Once enough time has passed and you feel whole again, you can slowly start to date other boys. Take a risk and let a friend set you up on a date, or accept the coffee date the cute boy in your history class has proposed. You probably won't fall in love with the first -- or the third, or the seventh -- person you meet, but that's not important. The important thing is that you open up your heart again and get ready for love once more.   Don't rush in to another relationship just to stop thinking about the boy you dumped. Rebound relationships are almost always doomed to fail.  If enough time has passed and you can really think of the boy without any lingering romantic feelings -- and if he can think of you the same way -- then you may try to be friends after all. Remember that in many cases, this simply won't be possible, so don't be frustrated if you can't seem to hang out with your ex without feeling frustrated or confused. But if you really do like each other and want to hang out as friends, then take it slow and start hanging out in fun, casual settings and see if you can rebuild your friendship.   The tricky part here is making sure that you both are ready to just be friends. Since you're the one who ended the relationship, it may take a little longer for the boy to be ready to be your friend.  

figure out what you're going to say.  create some distance.  do it in person if you really care.  pick the right moment.  pick the right place.  tell him you want to break up.  explain your reasoning as much as you want.  hear him out.  don't be too mean to him.  wrap it up as soon as you can.  be firm.  try to end on a good note.  stay away from him for a while.  get some "me" time.  start putting yourself out there when you're ready.  try to be friends with the boy if you want to. 

; , For every one thing you like, draw something to patch the broken heart back together (stitches, Band-Aids™, arrows, safety pins, etc.).  For example, what are the reasons why you want to break up with this person? For every one bad thing, erase one of the items you drew that were keeping the heart together.  Analyze the result. At a rough guess, if you have:   0 to 2 stitches left - it's quite possible that you're already walking away from the relationship and patching it together isn't going to work so well. 3 to 5 stitches left - the relationship is quite possibly okay, perhaps average and in need of some enlivening but maybe keep trying a little bit longer. 6-infinity stitches left - the relationship is great and you are possibly dealing with other competing reasons that have encouraged you to consider dumping this person. In this case, perhaps think about the bigger picture that has led you to question the value of this relationship in your life at this time.  It may be that the heart still hangs together quite well but you still feel that it's just not worth the effort anymore. Or, perhaps the threads are all broken but a part of you is screaming to give it another try. At this point, just use the exercise as one way to inform yourself of your real feelings and realize that the decision is one you still need to make by considering everything about the relationship and your life's trajectory. 

draw a broken heart on a piece of paper.  think of all the things you like about this person.  think of the bad things about this person.  look at how many stitches or other items you have left after going through the list of likes and dislikes.  realize that this is just a fun test, not a foolproof method of guessing what is best. 

 That is, everyone fights in relationships sometimes. In the heat of the moment, you may decide it's time to let the person go. However, if you take some time to cool down first, you may realize that what happened isn't as much of a big deal as you made it. You don't want to break up and then regret it a day or two later.Don't hint at breaking up in your anger, then leave. If you have a huge argument, it's not a good idea to say or hint that you may want out and then leave. You'll just leave your boyfriend or girlfriend upset and worried that you want to break it off, even if you just want to work through the problems.; , When you do decide it's time to break up, don't just rush into the conversation. Decide what you want to say first. Establish why you want to break up, and decide how you want to say that., Choose a time when you know your boyfriend or girlfriend won't be busy. Try not to pick a day before he or she has a big test or game. Be considerate of his or her time and that that person has going on.On the other hand, you don't want to hold off forever once you know the relationship should be over. Try to pick a date where the other person is not busy but is not too far in the future.  It's not nice to spread the news around before you tell the person because the news could get back to him or her. In that case, you've effectively broken it off through a rumor, which isn't respectful at all.The exception to this rule is it's fine to talk it over with one person you trust completely not to tell anyone else; that person can help you decide exactly what you're feeling and what you need to do., These types of conversations should be done in person, not via the phone or texting. It shows you respect the other person enough to tell them to his or her face. Don't email or text the news. Even a telephone conversation isn't the best. Ask to see the person before you bring up the topic.However, you don't want to give any indication that the news could be bad beforehand, as the other person will just worry about it until he or she can see you., You don't want to tell someone you're leaving him or her when you're sitting in a coffee shop. He or she is obviously going to be upset, and most people don't like to be upset or crying where strangers can see him or her. Therefore, try to pick a place where you two can be alone., In other words, the best way to break up with someone is to face it head on. It may seem heartless to tell your boyfriend or girlfriend in person that you don't want to be with them, but doing so allows the other person to hear what you have to say and then begin the process of hurting and healing.The problem with other methods of breaking up, such as drawing back from the person, escalating the situation (so he or she breaks up with your), or using another person to do it (such as setting your boyfriend or girlfriend up with someone else), is that they create more drama and heartache in the long run. They don't create a clean break, or if they do, they do it in a more dramatic way.In addition, talking to the person face-to-face will give him or her a chance to ask questions. It also give him or her a chance to talk it over with you, allowing the person to work through some of his or her feelings., A good way to open this conversation is to begin by talking about something you value about the person. Even though you're having a sad conversation, you don't need to start out with negativity.For example, you could say, "I'm so glad we've gotten to spend the time we have together. I think you're a good person."  , That is, when you use "we" to talk about the situation, you invite a discussion about how you should move ahead. If you've decided you want out, you need to make it known that it's your decision to do so.For instance, you should say "I've decided that I need to step away from this relationship," not "I think we should break up.", When you're breaking up, you don't need to go into how you see the other person as a failure. In fact, if you feel the need to talk about what's wrong, discuss the problems you had with the relationship, not the person.For instance, you don't need to say something like "I can't be with you anymore because you're a slob." Instead, talk about behaviors, such as, "I don't feel like I can be in a relationship with you anymore because of the way you don't take care of your room and your personal things. I feel like that's disrespectful to your parents and to me." While even talking about behaviors can be mean, it can give your boyfriend or girlfriend things to think about for the next relationship he or she has., That is, you obviously have cared about this person for awhile. Just because you're ending the relationship doesn't mean you need to hate him or her. Establish that while you'll always care for that person, you just don't want to have the same kind of relationship anymore.For instance, you could say, "You're very important to me, and I will always care for you. However, I don't think we can be together anymore."  , Even if you are ending it, you can invite the person to talk about what he or she is feeling. That gives the person a chance to respond to what you've said. As an example, you could say, "What are you thinking about what I've said?", If you think that the other person still hasn't quite got the message, it's fine to be fairly blunt. You don't have to be mean, just straightforward, such as "I know you would like to continue on in this relationship, but I don't. I wish you all the best, though.", Once you've broken up with someone, don't talk bad about that person. It reflects worse on you than it does on the other person, plus you shouldn't throw hateful words at someone you once cared about. That person deserves better., Even if you broke up the relationship and even if it was the right thing to do, you're still going to feel some sadness that it's over. That's perfectly normal, and you'll need some time to get over it. Give yourself as much time as you need. 

make sure you are actually ready to break up.  think about what you want to say first.  pick a good time.  keep it a secret.  show up in person.  pick a place in private.  use open confrontation.  start with something nice.  use "i" instead of "we.",  don't go negative about the other person.  don't be mean.  ask how the person is doing.  be absolutely clear.  keep your mouth under control.  understand that you'll still feel sad. 

 When you really care for someone, it can be easy ignore the signals that they do not feel the same way. The longer you ignore these, however, the longer you will draw out your rejection and heartache.Some indicators include:   She won't make time for you. She doesn't return your texts/calls. She never reaches out to you to make plans. She says she likes you as a friend. She's not interested in physical affection. She has told you that she's not in love with you.; , Whether you've noticed a series of signs or the girl has straight up told you that she doesn't have feelings for you, you need to do some work to accept that it is true. The heart wants what it wants and it can very rarely be swayed otherwise. Don't imagine that you will change her mind. Take her at her word and accept that it's over.It can be helpful to say it out loud to yourself or a friend. You might say, "My relationship with Katie is over. Katie doesn't love me."  , When you experience rejection, you are likely to feel a range of emotions, including disbelief, anger, and sadness. Do whatever you need to do to feel these feelings and to process them.Cry if you feel like crying. Talk to your friends. Write in a journal. Comfort yourself with things you like, such as ice cream, hot baths, or movies.  In order for you to heal, you need space. If you love a girl and she doesn't love you, you can't just go on pretending to be friends. You're not friends: she is the girl you love. So until you have truly moved on from this heartbreak, you need to avoid any unnecessary contact with her.Consider deleting her number from your phone to avoid calling/texting her. Stay away from places you know she is likely to be. This may mean missing out on certain parties or social gatherings, but it's worth it. If you absolutely must see her (for instance, if you work together) keep your interactions brief and professional.  In the modern era, we have our friends at the touch of a button. Unfortunately, this means you have images of the girl-who-doesn't-love-you at the touch of a button too. Although it is tempting, avoid visiting her pages on social media. Perhaps even consider blocking her (at least temporarily). You need the space to heal and you can't do that if you are cyber-stalking her every move.In order to avoid her online presence, you may want to:   Spend less time on social media. Unfollow her on social media sites. Avoid visiting the pages of mutual friends. If you happen to come across her, quickly put your phone away (or close your laptop) and walk away. Don't let yourself get sucked in.  If you know that this girl doesn't love you, do not allow her to turn to you for emotional support or physical contact. Although this may be very tempting, it is only going to cause you pain. If she reaches out to you, you must find the fortitude to decline.You really shouldn't be communicating with her anyway! If she reaches out to you, simply tell her, "I need to take a little space for myself right now. I don't think we should be spending time together."  , Once you accept that she doesn't love you, you may move through sadness and into anger. You may want to lash out or even seek some sort of revenge (towards either the girl or somebody new that she is dating). It is perfectly natural to have these thoughts, but it's not okay to act on them. Seeking vengeance will not make her love you, it won't feel as good as you think, and you could get into trouble. Instead, allow these thoughts to come and go, so that you can move on.You should also resist the urge to talk badly about her to mutual friends. It will only make you look catty. In the beginning, you might vent to a couple of close, trusted friends. Then try not to talk about her anymore.  In order for you to move on, you need something positive to overshadow the negative. Try to have some fun! Hang out with friends and go dancing. Spend an evening doing karaoke, or travel someplace new. Even if you don't feel like having fun, force yourself to get out there and try. It will probably be better than you think!, You can't control who she loves. The only thing you have control over is yourself. Now is a great time to focus on some form of self-improvement. Have you always wanted to play the guitar, workout more, or excel in school? Now is an excellent time to put your focus on a new goal., Unfortunately, there is no magic pill you can take to get rid of your heartbreak. Instead, this process is going to take time. And even after a long string of good days, a bad day might sneak up on you. That's normal. Just remember that this is a process, and you are healing a little bit every day.  

look for clues.  accept that its over.  feel your feelings.  avoid contact with her.  stay away from her online profiles.  refrain from intimate contact.  avoid acting on feelings of vengeance.  have fun.  focus on a goal.  give it some time. 

 This is the first thing you have to do if you want to move on. If you feel like crying, let out those tears. If you're angry, scream and kick some furniture. If you're hurt, confused, and upset, cry, yell, pout, complain, shout, and do whatever you have to do to get those negative emotions out of your body.  Of course, it's better to do this when you have some privacy, but don't try to keep everything in for the sake of being composed. You're hurt. There's nothing wrong with admitting that.        If you don't show any emotions, then you'll just be in denial about how awful you feel. This will make you feel those same angry, bitter feelings -- for longer. Don't be afraid to show weakness. Crying in front of a close friend is perfectly normal. It's okay to admit that "It's not okay." Everyone knows break-ups suck, and there's no point in acting like you don't care when you do. Sure, if you pass your ex by, you can look as cool as a cucumber. But when you're alone or with close friends? Be who you are and show how you feel.; , You have a lot on your mind and it's likely that you need some time to yourself.  Though you may want to be around people every second of every day because you're terrified of being alone, your best bet is to plan a date with yourself so you have some time to just be sad, stare out a window, write in your journal, or just think about what happened. If you refuse to be alone for a second after your heart ache begins, then you'll never be able to truly deal with it.       Think about it: when is the last time you planned a date -- with yourself? This can be a miracle in disguise. Pamper yourself. Take a long hot bath, put on some lotion, do your hair, and take care of your body. Don't stop with the hygiene just because you're upset.  It's okay to mope, be sad, and just hate life for a little while.  Though you can't be sad forever, being sad for a little while is perfectly natural and much better than forcing yourself to hang out with friends, put a big smile on your face, and laugh about your break-up or make it seem like it wasn't a big deal even if it was. Tell your friends that you're going to stop being social for a little while and that you need a break from social events, especially any that will involve alcohol. Sure, any good friend will try to force you to come out, but try to make them understand that you're just not ready yet.       Of course, don't let this go on for too long. If it's been months since you've really socialized, then you have a problem. When you do go out there, you can keep a low profile. Don't talk too much, laugh, or just act hyper to prove that you're doing just fine.  Though hanging out in big, loud crowds may not be your best bet when you're dealing with a break-up, confiding in a really good friend or two who really gets you can help you feel a lot better.  You can do this over the phone or in person during a The New Girl marathon; whatever feels right to you. Having a person to talk to one-on-one can help you get your feelings out while making you feel less alone.       Sharing your feelings with everyone can make you feel worse, but sharing them with one or two people who really care can help you heal faster. Your friend may offer some comfort as well as some advice for how to move on. It'll feel better to get your feelings out there. Just don't fall into a pattern where you keep being sad and complaining to the same friend or you'll start to recycle all of those negative feelings.  Bitterness and regret are two of the most common emotions that people going through break-ups can feel. You may be bitter because of what your ex did, because of how much he or she hurt you, or because of all the time you wasted on such a bad relationship.  You may regret the way you acted, or regret that you put up with the other person for so long. Well, if you really want to deal with the break-up, then you have to kick these negative feelings to the curb and focus on looking ahead, instead of behind you.       Sure, you may feel like you wasted your time in the relationship, and that can definitely make you bitter. But no time spent on a relationship is really time wasted -- the time you spent in the relationship will give you the perspective and experience you need to approach a new relationship in a more mature and productive way. That may not be a big consolation now, but you'll appreciate this in the future. You may regret certain things you did or said, but there's no taking them back now. You can only move forward, not backward, and dwelling on the past will only slow you down. Romanticize the whole affair. This may sound silly, but pretending you're a character in a movie who's struggling and making everything dramatic can help you feel better.  First, it may make the whole break up seem less intense as blowing it out of proportion makes it more fictional and less like you're involved; this doesn't mean to say, however, at some point you shouldn't confront it for what it is. Secondly, glamorizing yourself might make you laugh and, after all, laughter is the best medicine.  This one takes time. If you really want to deal with a break-up, then you have to see that you're much better off without your ex, even if you may feel the exact opposite.  There's no way that relationship was giving you as much joy and fulfillment as you thought -- otherwise, why did it end? You may think that the thing you need the most is your special someone, but that is absolutely the last thing that will make you feel better.       Make a list of all of the reasons why you are better off alone. Whenever you start doubting the benefits of your singledom, read the list to yourself -- read it out loud, if you have to. Even though it can hurt, it can also help to make a mental note of all of the worst moments in your relationship. Don't rehash them all, but remind yourself of them whenever you start to feel sad and lonely. Remind yourself why the relationship ended. It's most likely a good reason, and nothing that you can really fix. Sure, you had some great moments, but did they really outweigh all of the pain you felt?  , Though it's not impossible to become friends with your ex eventually, it is nearly impossible to be friends with your ex right after a break-up.  Though you may think it's cool to text your ex when something reminds you of him, grab coffee, hang out with him at parties, or just call him to say Hi, the longer you do this, the longer you will prolong the pain. Sure, you're used to talking to your ex all that time, but that was while you were dating. Now, you'll need to wait until you heal to talk to him -- and that could take months, or for break-ups of longer relationships, even years.       Even if you're the one who did the breaking up, don't talk to your ex. If he or she really wants to talk, explain that you're both better off taking a little breather. Take your ex's number out of your phone. That will prevent you from texting or calling in a moment of weakness. If you and your ex have the same friends, you may have to take turns hanging out with them, or you may have to lay low for a little while. It won't be fun, but it's better than opening old wounds.  You won't be able to deal with your break-up if every little thing in your room reminds you of your ex. First off, that means giving back any of his stuff. And those gifts he gave you?  You don't have to throw them out, but it's best to put them in boxes for a little while, and that means you:  Fluffy the bear he won for you at the carnival The necklace he gave you for your birthday ; take it off and put it away in your jewelry box.         You may feel that you've spent so much time with your ex that your lives are intertwined. Getting rid of the things that remind you of your ex can help you unravel your connection. Hide the things that remind you of him even if they weren't gifts. That poster from the concert you went to on your first date? It's time to hang up some new wall art. This will be highly painful for sure. If you don't feel strong enough to do it on your own, invite a friend over for a "spring cleaning" session.  Clicking on your ex's profile again and again to see if he's been hanging out with any new girls -- or just to see how much fun he's having without you -- will lead you to no good, my dear.  Take a week off from Facebook, or even two. See how little you miss it. Don't try to make your ex jealous by posting lots of pictures of yourself having a supposedly great time. Instead, get offline and focus on actually having an amazing time. Who cares if your ex knows about it or not?       If you really are a Facebook addict, limit yourself to just 15 minutes a day. And force yourself to log out any time you click on your ex's profile. If you want to be dramatic about it, you can always unfriend your ex on Twitter, Facebook, and other social media sites.  If you and your ex loved going to the Italian place down the street on date night, pick a new hot spot for your pasta cravings.  If you two loved watching Jeopardy together, bid Alex Trebek adieu for a little while. If you always went mini golfing, hiking, biking, or swimming together, put a hiatus on these activities and find a new form of exercise that you love. #*You don't have to stop doing these things forever -- just until you can do them because you love them, without thinking of your ex.       You may feel like you did absolutely everything with your ex and that there's nothing that you can do to not think about him. That's when you can start finding a new routine that can give you a fresh start.  Though it's unlikely that you can move to a completely new apartment or home (unless you lived together, of course) immediately after your breakup, you can do some redecorating to make your space feel like it's completely yours.  Move your furniture around, hang up new wall art, and put up some new decorations. This will help you clear your head and look at the world with fresh eyes -- not eyes that only land on your ex.       If you can, take a mini vacation. Just falling out of the same old routine for a weekend can help you get your head straight.  At first, you have to slow down and focus on healing, assessing your thoughts, and getting your head straight. But once you feel a bit more emotionally stable and have cut ties with your ex, you can work on having a busy and fulfilling schedule.  Fill your days with friends, laughter, exercise, fun activities, and heck, even some work. Though you should always make some time for yourself, the busier you are, the less likely you are to think of your ex -- or even to try to hang out with him.       Fill your calendar once you're feeling up to it. Don't force it too early. Pick up a yoga or dance class that you can do two or three times a week. This will help add some structure to your days. Spend time with friends on the weekends as much as you can. If you don't, you'll feel sad when you're at home on what used to be your date nights.  You'll never appreciate your friends and family more than you will when you're going through a romantic rough patch  Make girl's night a regular thing, hang out with your siblings and parents more often than normal, and even get closer to some friends you've fallen out of touch with because of your relationship. Remind yourself how lucky you are to have so may people who care about you -- even if your ex isn't one of them.       Get silly with your friends. Play a fun sport, a game, or do charades. Just do something to take your mind off of your situation. Go to the movies with your friends. Try to see every Oscar-nominated movie out that year to keep busy. Take a road trip with your close friends. The new surroundings will make you feel better. Even making time for a phone date once or twice a week with your close friends will make you feel better.  Keeping a record of your thoughts every day or two can help you feel in control of your emotions and can also help you reflect on how you are passing the time. You will be able to open up, evaluate your situation, and get some breathing room from not hanging out with your friends.  You don't have to dwell on all of your feelings about your break-up; just recording your daily thoughts will make you feel more at peace.       Make a date with yourself to do this at least twice a week. You'll be surprised by how much calmer it can make you feel. You can also use the journal to set goals for how you want to feel or act in the upcoming days.  If you want to enjoy your life again, then you have to keep mixing things up and introducing new rewards into your life. What better reward than a new, fulfilling activity you can do on your own?  Try poetry, dancing, running, biking, sketching, writing a screenplay, playing the guitar, blogging, or doing something completely unfamiliar that you've always wanted to try. Take the extra free time you have from not always being around your ex as an opportunity to try all of the things you've always wanted to try, or to discover something new.       It's okay to pick something you know you won't be good at. Failing can be fun and can help you deal with hardships. Picking new hobbies can also help you meet new people who are interested in the same thing. If you already have a hobby that you love, try to devote even more time to it.  Maybe your ex hated Mexican food. Maybe he hated traveling. Maybe he hated big, noisy parties while you couldn't get enough of them. He could have hated hanging out with your sister and her artsy boyfriend., It's time to take advantage of the fact that you can do whatever you want and that you don't have to please anybody when you make your schedule.   Make a list of all of the things you could never do without your ex. Then, check them off your list, one by one! See how good it feels?  , If you want to find peace, then you have to be truly happy on your own. Though being single can be hard, you have to appreciate the perks of the single life before you put yourself out there again.  If you're too eager to jump in to a new relationship just because you don't want to be alone, then you're almost guaranteed to run into Mr. or Mrs. Wrong yet again. You can only truly start looking once you're content to be on your own for a little while.       Indulge in the perks of being single: having fun girl's or guy's nights, being able to flirt all the time, being able to set your schedule and not give in to anyone else's demands.  If you're dealing with a break-up, then you may be eating every bar of chocolate or every bacon burger within a ten mile radius of your home and referring to the effort your index finger makes when pushing the "on" and "off" buttons on your remote as your daily exercise.  Though the last thing you may want to do is haul your butt over to the gym, it'll make you feel better physically and emotionally. Exercising releases endorphins, which are known to make people feel better, and you'll be needing that, won't you?       Exercising regularly also adds some stability to your routine, and you may be lacking it.  As you begin to truly accept the breakup, you can view your own life from a more rational perspective.  You can see that you have so many things to be thankful for: your friends, your family, your health, your looks, all of the opportunities you have in your life It may be hard to think positively and notice all the good in your life when you're reeling from a break up, but as you begin to come to terms with it, you can remind yourself how fortunate you truly are, even if you're still looking for love.       Write a gratitude list. Write down at least thirty things that you love about your life. You shouldn't have to struggle to come up with those. Make a habit of thanking people for helping you more often than usual. You'll feel better about your life, and they will, too.  Once you've spent enough time by yourself and have gotten enough distance from your ex, you can slowly start putting yourself on the dating market again.  Start slow, and go on a date with a guy or girl your friend thinks is perfect for you, or go on a low-pressure group date. You probably won't find Romeo or Juliet on your first try -- or your second, or your seventh. Once you get into the habit of looking and feeling good about who you are, you'll eventually find the right person.       It could take months, or even years, to feel ready to truly open up and be ready for love. Don't be frustrated if you just don't think it's the right time. Once you've found that right person, you'll see that all the suffering you went through from this break-up has made you a stronger, more capable, and more loving person.  

let your emotions loose.  get that much-needed alone time.  don't force yourself to be "okay.",  confide in a close friend.  let go of your bitterness and regret.  start to realize that you're better off alone.  stop talking to your ex.  get rid of anything that reminds you of your ex.  take it easy with social media for a while.  avoid doing things that remind you of your ex.  change your environment as much as you can.  stay busy.  spend time with your loved ones.  write in a journal.  pick up a new hobby.  do something your ex never wanted to do.  don't let him stop you anymore.  enjoy your alone time.  get some exercise.  remind yourself of all the things you're grateful for.  get ready to love again. 

 A good cry often makes you feel better.If you’re too embarrassed to cry in front of your loved ones, do it in private. Shut your bedroom door, curl up on your bed, and let the tears flow.; , Pick one or two close friends to discuss your feelings with. If other friends ask you to bring your ex along to an event, simply say, “We’re not together anymore,” and leave it at that. Giving everyone a blow-by-blow explanation can make you seem bitter, even if you’re not.  Meditate on your grief. This will help you to release any feelings of anger, which only makes grief worse. You could also start a journal to write down how you feel. Don’t worry about grammar or spelling. Just write. Like meditation, journaling will also help you to release negative feelings., Vigorous exercise releases endorphins, which help to heal emotional pain.Go for a run or a power walk. Sign up for a kickbox cardio class. If you enjoy playing sports, ask your friends to play a game with you.  Contact with nature can do wonders to lift your mood.Walk in the park. Help your parents in the garden. Even if you just sit under a tree and watch the local squirrels steal food from the birds, you could do yourself a world of good.  Unless your parents were each other’s first loves, they had to deal with broken hearts, too. When they see that you’re hurting, they’ll want to help. Accept their offer. Express your feelings the same way you would with your friends.   Talking to other people you trust is a great way to get a different perspective on the relationship. Talking to someone can be especially helpful when the person is older than you.  Grief is a natural state that happens to everyone. Depression, on the other hand, can be deadly. When you’re grieving, you acknowledge what still matters. In depression, nothing seems to matter. Seek professional help if:   You lose interest in things you used to be passionate about. You close yourself off from your friends. You engage in destructive behavior like self-mutilation. You think about committing suicide.  Don’t call or text your ex. Back away from their friends and family, as well. It’s okay to eventually work on a friendship, but it’s best to back off in the beginning. This will allow you to get used to life without your ex.If you and your ex had friends in common before you started dating, it’s up to you whether to keep those friends in your life. Choosing to keep them means accepting that they’ll still want to hang out with your ex. Stay civil about the matter. Don’t bad-mouth your ex or their new significant other.If you have mutual friends, make it clear to those friends that you do not want to hang out unless your ex is not around. It is important to set these boundaries and expectations ahead of time so your friend will know.  Unfollow or delete your ex from your Friends list. Stop checking their feeds. Don’t accept their private messages. Make your own posts private so that your ex won’t see them.  Give back your ex’s class ring or jacket. Donate the teddy bear they gave you to a children’s charity. Pawn or donate any jewelry they bought for you. Separating yourself from these reminders will help you make a clean break.It’s up to you if you want to get rid of photos and love letters. If it was a bad breakup, delete or recycle them. If you’ve agreed to be friends, you could stash them away in the garage or attic. For digital mementos, you could save them to a flash drive and ask your parents to hide it for a few years.  It is normal and healthy to take some time to yourself after a breakup before you begin dating again. If you rebound with someone new, you risk experiencing unresolved anger for your ex.Tell yourself that it’s okay to be single, and believe it. Work out your old feelings for your ex before you start dating again.  Invite them to your house for a pool party. Catch the latest blockbuster, and grab some pizza afterwards. Go ice skating or play a friendly game of soccer. Spending time with your friends will boost your self-esteem, occupy your mind with fun things, and remind you that you can enjoy yourself without a romantic relationship.  Maintaining your interests is an important part of moving on. Keep on doing the things you enjoy after your breakup. For example, if you like to paint, then continue to paint. If you play an instrument, keep playing. If you play a sport, keep playing that sport.  Be honest about why you’ve contacted them. Explain your feelings calmly and maturely. Don’t yell or insult them. If this is your first conversation since the breakup, keep it short, and don’t expect instant friendship.You could say:   “Don’t freak out. I’m not trying to win you back. I just think we’re both entitled to some closure.” “I’m just trying to get some perspective on our split. Tell me honestly why you broke up with me.” (Be aware that this question may bring up some unresolved feelings, so you may encounter some criticism if you go this route.) “We might not be a couple anymore, but I hope we can be friends eventually.”  , Don’t spend too much time alone together. Instead, hang out with mutual friends. Avoid physical contact, which could stir old feelings. If you’re trying to rekindle the flame with your ex, you shouldn’t try to be their friend., You don’t have to become best friends. However, you’ll at least show your ex that you’ve accepted their new significant other. When you feel comfortable, just smile or say, “Hi” as you pass each other in the hall. If they’re with your ex when you hang out, include them in conversations. 

cry it out.  don't broadcast your breakup.  reflect privately on your feelings.  exercise.  get outdoors.  talk to your parents.  recognize the difference between grief and depression.  distance yourself in person.  keep your distance on social media.  get rid of reminders of your old relationship.  avoid rebound dates.  hang out with your friends.  continue to do things you enjoy.  talk to your ex.  accept your new status as friends.  reach out to your ex’s new love interest. 

 You may have trouble understanding or accepting that your ex seems okay after the breakup if the breakup was difficult for you. You may want to know that they are as miserable as you are. Instead, you can deal with your ex a lot better and handle interactions with them if you accept the fact that they seem fine with the breakup.   If someone tells you that your ex is doing okay or if you see your ex and they seem okay, then just be happy for them. For example, if a friend says, “Ashley seems cool after the breakup”, you could say, “Okay, that’s good. That makes me happy.” Unless you are prepared to hear that they are happy without you, avoid asking your ex if they are really doing okay or happy since the breakup. You might not like their response. Keep in mind that just because your ex seems fine doesn’t mean that’s necessarily the case. Your ex may just be acting that way so you don’t know how upset they are.; , You can deal with an ex who seems fine after your breakup by keeping your distance.You don’t have to avoid them like the plague, but do make sure that you aren’t going out of your way to interact with them.   Avoid trolling their social networking profiles looking for new posts and pictures. For instance, you should resist checking their Facebook profile daily to see if their relationship status has changed. Don’t call, text, or message your ex unless you have a legitimate reason. For example, calling because you have a child together is a legitimate reason. Calling because you saw your ex’s favorite car isn’t.  Depending on the circumstances of the breakup, you may have some built up anger or resentment toward your ex. When you have interactions with your ex and they seem fine after the breakup you will be able to handle it if you remain respectful. You should also be respectful when you are talking to other people about your ex.   Avoid yelling, scream, crying or making a scene when you are interacting with your ex. For example, don’t walk up to them and start calling them names. Talk to your ex in a calm, confident way when you interact. For instance, you might calmly say “Hi” when you see your ex out in public. Avoid gossiping or badmouthing your ex. Try to say something positive or at least neutral about your ex. For example, you might say, “Oh, ok” if someone tells you that your ex is doing fine.  

accept that they’re okay.  give them space.  be respectful. 

 You don’t want to think of yourself as anybody’s girlfriend until you know yourself better. Otherwise, you risk being defined as somebody’s girlfriend instead of what makes you unique!You can learn about yourself by thinking about why you liked him in the first place. Things you like about your crush can actually give you clues about who you are and want to become.For example, you may feel that you like the guy because he sounds smart when he talks in class. That tells you that you admire the quality of intelligence, and you would probably like to be seen as smart yourself. You may even realize that you don’t know your crush as well as you thought you did.  You wouldn’t want a relationship with a guy who doesn’t like you! A good relationship is balanced.Ask your parents what healthy relationships are like.  Think about your talents and good qualities. Get busy doing things you like to do.Get involved with sports, clubs, and school.Hang out with friends or find an after-school activity you enjoy. Try reading some new books. Remember how special and wonderful you are!  , You can develop better study skills to prepare for your future education if you don’t date in middle school. Being preoccupied with boys gets in the way of homework.Some kids who date in middle school even end up dropping out of school! You want to have an education so that you’ll be able to get a good job and support yourself in the future. You’re also less likely to get depressed if you ditch the idea of dating in middle school. Focus on making good friends instead of thinking about romantic relationships.Dating in middle school involves things like talking, texting, sitting around at a fast food place, holding hands, maybe a hug – you’re not missing out on anything.But you could miss out on some great friends if you’re busy spending time with crushes in middle school. Relationships with your friends and even your best friends can suffer.Guys in middle school are immature. For example, they may be more interested in playing basketball after school than having a girlfriend. If you wait until you’re older to start thinking about guys romantically, you will probably have more freedom to date then anyways: for instance, with curfew, time you can spend on the phone or internet, places you can hang out, etc.  

learn who you are.  think about how you want to be treated.  focus on you.  forget about guys for a while. 

 If you focus on yourself and your self-esteem you can deal with an ex who seems ok after your breakup.Boosting your self-esteem will make it possible for you to recover from the breakup and be okay like your ex.   Make a list of all of the good things about you. Include things about the way you look, skills you have, and things about your personality. Use positive self-talk with yourself. For example, get in the mirror and tell yourself, “I’m a great person with a lot of great qualities.”  , When you are dealing with a breakup, even if your ex seems fine, you need to do things to make sure that you are fine. It will be much harder for you to deal with your ex if you are tired, hungry, or just plain not feeling well.   Avoid eating junk foods as a comfort. Instead, eat a healthy, well-balanced diet. Get 6 – 8 hours of sleep each night. An hour before bed, start preparing yourself to settle down and rest. Participate in physical activity on a regular basis. For example, start jogging, go swimming, or join an athletic team. Do not turn to drugs or alcohol for comfort.  You can deal with an ex who seems fine after your breakup if you make sure that you aren’t bottling your feelings up. Doing this can stress you and make the breakup more difficult to handle. Cope with the breakup and with your ex by expressing your feelings appropriately.Talk to friends and family members to help you process your feelings.   Talk to someone close to you about how you are feeling. For example, you might say, “Would you mind talking with for a little while. I’m having some feelings about my breakup.” Avoid trying to talk to your ex about how you are feeling. They may not want to talk or respond to you the way you want them to. Try expressing yourself creatively. For instance, write a song or a poem or paint a picture about how you are feeling.  During your relationship you may have stopped doing some of the things you like to do in order to make time for your partner. You can deal with an ex who seems fine after your breakup if you focus on doing things that you enjoy and are interested in.Make a list of activities and events that you would like to participate in. Pick one thing off of the list and get information on how to participate in the activity. Make a list of skills and talents that you want to develop and how you can do so. For example, you might put fencing lessons on your list.  

boost your self-esteem.  take care of your health.  express your feelings.  develop your interests. 

 One of the best things you can do after a breakup in order to move on is to make time for the people that are important to you. Reconnecting with people that you care about can provide you with support and encouragement. They can also help you deal with the fact that your ex seems fins after the breakup.Make time to just hang out with each other. You don’t have to have plans to do anything or go anywhere. You can just enjoy each other’s presence. When your friends and family invite you places accept their invitation. You could have a good time with them and meet new people.  Breaking up is a difficult process, and you may be feeling upset about everything that has happened. To help make yourself feel more positive, change your thinking about the breakup. Take the breakup as an opportunity for new growth and experiences. Use it to learn something new about yourself that you can apply to future relationships.  For example, think about why the relationship ended. Take those problems, and improve on them in your next relationship.  Journaling can help you deal with an ex who seems fine after your breakup in a number of ways. Journaling is a way to express your feelings, organize your thoughts, and set post-relationship goals for yourself.Make regular entries in your journal about how you feel about the breakup and how you feel about your ex. Include goals and action steps for moving on after the breakup in your journal. For example, you might write, “One of my goals is to save the money I was spending on date night.”  , A breakup can cause depression, grief, and anxiety, but you can get help to ensure that you heal in a healthy and supported way. Reach out to a mental health professional who can coach you during this time.  The therapist may ask details about your relationship, such as the state of the relationship before breaking up, how long you had been together, and whether the breakup was mutual or not. You can also reach out to friends and family members during this time.  No matter how the relationship ended or how you’re your ex seems to be handling it, dealing with a breakup takes time.In order to cope with the breakup and deal with the fact that your ex seems fine, you should give yourself time to move on.   Don’t let anyone tell you that you are taking too long moving on from the relationship. Give yourself time to heal and be okay. Remind yourself that everything takes time. Tell yourself, “There’s no deadline for moving on and being fine, so I don’t have to rush myself.” Consider talking to a professional if you have been having difficulty for a long time dealing with the breakup or seeing your ex seem fine.  

reconnect with family and friends.  reflect on what you have learned.  keep a journal.  get help if needed.  be patient with yourself. 

 Especially if the relationship was long-term, this will be a difficult and probably a long process. Expect that, and give yourself as much time as you need to heal/recover.; , Don't beat yourself up - your feelings or anger/frustration and sadness are natural and normal.   Cry if you need to. Go ahead and cry, use a whole box of tissues and feel miserable for a while. It's okay. You're entitled. But eventually, you do need to pick yourself back up and move on. Life will go on, and believe it or not, so will you!  , Take everything that reminds you of your ex (pictures, letters, keepsakes) and put it all in a box. Then put the box someplace far away like high up in your closet. Don't throw it away - you may regret it later. Just keep it stored someplace safe, but don't keep re-reading and looking at it all right now and make yourself miserable. Just put it away for now and give yourself a break.  It's going to be hard at first, but you may have to force yourself to eat regular meals and sleep regularly. This too will take time, so be patient with yourself.  Go out and do something you enjoy, like a hobby you have always loved, whether it's biking or karate or drawing, playing guitar, etc. Make sure you are focusing on the activity and the joy that it brings you, thereby distracting yourself., Spend lots of time with your friends and family during this time. They will be your support system as you deal with the aftermath of the break-up. Did you see some of these people much during the relationship? If the relationship was intense and long-term, chances are you have not seen some of your friends or maybe even family for months. Take time to spend quality time with them and do something fun.   Make sure your friends and family know what happened, and ask them to be a support system for you, to help you through this difficult time.  Remember that the relationship happened for a reason, and nothing is ever wasted in life. Perhaps you learned a valuable lesson that you will be able to take with you into your next relationship and eventual marriage. Or perhaps you are only broken up for a short time and the relationship will be restored. Either way though, you must move on with your life.  

know this will take time.  understand the emotions that you are feeling are normal and embrace them.  hide everything that it is too difficult to see right now.  try to keep a regular schedule as best as you can.  try to get your mind off of it.  enjoy spending time with the people who are still in your life.  accept the end of the relationship. 

 You need a reason to break up with her, even if your feelings have simply changed and she hasn't done something wrong. When you're in a relationship with someone, you owe it to them explain yourself. You'd want a reason if you were being broken up with, wouldn't you?   Here are some common reasons that people break up with one another:   Cheating. A relationship is between two people. Three's a crowd.  Disrespect. Your partner doesn't treat you the way you know you should be treated.  Manipulative relationship. Your partner manipulates you to get what she wants.  Falling out of love. You realize, after time, that you don't have feelings for her the way you used to in the beginning.  Distance. The physical distance between you two makes it hard for a relationship to happen. 'Boredom 'When you are not just enjoying the time you spend with each other  ; , Breaking up in person can be really hard, but again, you definitely owe it to her. Where you do it can be virtually anywhere — a room, a park, or a schoolyard, so long as there's not much to distract you while you break the news.   A quiet, public place might be good for two reasons. It's harder to fight in public places because you have everyone looking at you. The breakup will usually take less time if you do it in public. Never break up over text or email. Try not to break up over the phone. These methods can reflect poorly on you, and your soon-to-be ex will probably let every girl know what you did.  It's not easy, but ripping the band-aid off quickly will be less painful for both parties than dragging your feet in the mud. If you can, go right out and say it:   Example: "I hate to do this because you've meant so much to me, but I think we should break up."  Example: "I'm really struggling with this right now, so I apologize if this doesn't come out in a good way, but I think we should call things quits."  Example: "Maybe this won't come as a huge surprise to you, but I think it's best if we called things off between us."   , Tell it like it is. Draw on the reasons you came for why you want to break up, leaning on them. Give her a full explanation, but don't list every single part of the relationship that was bad or out of whack — it could cause her to become angry and combative.   Example: "I know it's not what you wanted to hear, and if I could change the way I feel, I would. The truth is, I don't know if we're really compatible. I don't get along with your friends, you don't get along with mine. You hate sports, I live for them. I tried to ignore our differences in the beginning, but I can't anymore. I honestly think you and I both would be happier with someone else."   , If your girlfriend cheated on you, manipulated you, or disrespected you, there may not be anything you need to take responsibility or apologize for. On the other hand, relationships are usually two-way streets: her actions are affected by your actions, which means you might bear some responsibility for what went wrong in the relationship. Own up to it if you feel you should:   Example: "I know I deserve some of the blame. I shouldn't have let you disrespect me or my friends; I could have told you it bothered me, and maybe you would have changed. But it's become such a problem now that I don't think we can change it anymore."  Example: "Part of it is my fault. I pushed you away when you really needed someone, and I guess you could say that I pushed you right into his arms. I understand why you did it, but I can't forgive you right now. Hopefully sometime in the future I'll be able to."   , Breakup speeches can escalate or go wrong in so many different ways. The key is to stay calm, put yourself in the other person's shoes, and try not to "win" the argument. She'll probably counter with some other facts; she may even call you names. (You probably would, too, right?) Think about what she has to say, don't lose your temper, and try your best not to make her feel bad.   If you're genuinely sad that you're breaking up, and you think it might comfort her, show some gentle affection. Ask her if you can give her a hug; put an arm on her shoulder; look into her eyes and offer her a heartfelt smile. These gestures can go a long way toward reassuring her in a tough time.  She might have questions; answer them truthfully. She might have a different side of the story she wants to tell; listen to her. Let her get things off her chest.   If you notice the argument going in circles and circles, tell her gently: "I know this is hard, but I feel we're just going around in circles. Can I give you some time to think about it?"  Offer her the opportunity to discuss things at a later time. Say something like: "I know this is a lot to process at once. It is for me, too. Maybe you want to talk about it a bit later when emotions aren't going everywhere at once?"   , There probably isn't a breakup "protocol," but there are definitely things that you shouldn't do when breaking up with anyone, no matter who they are to you. They include:   Don't lead her on. If you don't think it's a good idea to stay friends after a breakup, say so. It's better than giving her false hope. Don't be a tattletale. There's a saying "loose lips sink ships." Well, it's not that serious, but what happens between you and her is no one else's business. It's okay to tell your good friends, but don't go telling everyone every single detail of the breakup. Don't get with someone else before you break up. That's what is called cheating. Have a little bit of patience and wait until you've broken up if you're in love with someone else. Don't use the breakup as an excuse to treat them badly. Whatever they might have done to you, it's honestly not worth it trying to make their life hell. Have respect and treat them the way that you'd want to be treated. It'll make the breakup easier on both of you.  

find a legitimate reason to break up with her.  find a quiet, isolated place free of distractions.  start off blunt.  give her a truthful explanation.  take responsibility for your mistakes, if possible.  be calm and reassuring.  talk to her, but keep the conversation short.  follow the list of "don'ts." 

 The first thing you need to do is give the girl some space. If you start knocking down her door and calling her every five minutes she'll only pull further away from you. The amount of space and time you give her depends on what happened when you tried to date her. If you ended a serious relationship, you'll need to give her more space than you would if you had just dated a few times.   Don't call her, chat with her at parties, or email her just to see how she's doing. If you see her socially, be polite and say hi, but make it clear that you're not going to bother her. Just don't give her too much space. If you leave her alone for a few months, that will give her plenty of time to find someone new.; , Not only should you give her some space, but you should give yourself some space to reflect and think about what went wrong in the relationship. Take the time to sit down and ask what you did to make her not want you; were you too attentive, too moody, or too distant? Whatever you did, you have to make sure never to do it again if you want a moment of her day.   Write down the things that went wrong. Consider what you can do to improve this kind of behavior. Don't date anyone else during the reflection period. Focus on self-improvement and working on not repeating the same mistakes. Don't pursue her until you've figured out what went wrong and know how to change it.  Though you should avoid getting busy in the bedroom while you're trying to win your girl back, you should try to live a busy and active life so you can work on being independent and pursuing your interests. If you're just sitting around waiting for enough time to pass to start trying to hang out with her again, she'll know.   Continue pursuing your hobbies and interests. Don't stop doing all of the things you love because your heart is aching. Spend time with your friends. They'll cheer you up and lend you a fresh perspective. Work out. Your self-esteem will improve if you exercise a few times a week, and all the better if she sees you out running.  Once you've given her some space and have worked on self-improvement, she'll be much closer to wanting you. But now you have to put all the pieces together and let her see what an amazing guy you are and how much fun it is to be around you. Be strategic. Without looking like a stalker, make sure you're hanging out in some of the same places so she can see what a blast it is to be around you.   Laugh it up. If she sees you, try to laugh with your friends as much as you can without being too obvious about it. Be animated. If she's around, be very animated and interested in the conversations you're having, showing that you're a passionate guy who loves to talk to his friends. Don't ignore her when she sees you. Give her a small wave and go back to the great conversation you were having. Dance. That's right. Chances are she was mad that you didn't dance with her more. Let her see you getting down on the dance floor and having a great time. Let her see you being your best self. There was obviously something she liked about you, so use your assets to your advantage.  This is an optional move because it depends on the situation. If your relationship ended because she was so jealous that you were always hanging around with other girls, then you shouldn't make her jealous or she'll just be reminded of the reason why things didn't work out between you. But if your relationship ended because she thought you were just too into her, or that she was bored by you, then making her jealous is a great move. Here's how to do it:   If you're on speaking terms, casually mention other girls. You can mention one girl a few times, leading her to wonder, "Who is this girl?" Or you can just talk about a group of girls, mentioning that you were at a party that was filled with mostly girls but that you were "okay with that." Let her see you with other girls. Chat with her for a few minutes before moving on to flirt with another girl that's nearby. Make sure you're close enough for her to watch it happen. Don't overdo it. If she hears you talking about other girls and sees you flirting with others, she may want you even more, but if you're all over every girl at every party, you may look desperate or sleazy.  If you can't think of what went wrong in the relationship because you smothered her with love, then chances are that this was exactly what went wrong. She must have felt that your love and relationship was too easy, so you should try to make it more of a challenge.Be aloof. You should still give her some attention, but act busy or distracted and like you're not giving all your attention to her for once. This will confuse her and will make her want you more. Be sparing with the compliments. If you did nothing but compliment her 24/7 when you were together, give her just one compliment to show that you're not obsessing over her. Let her come to you. She was probably used to having you come up to her, touch her, and talk to her all the time; now, it's time for some role reversal. If you're at a party, let her approach you instead of stopping everything you're doing to head her way.  If you broke up because she felt that you didn't give her enough affection or time or that you spent too much time flirting with other women, it's time to do the exact opposite and to make yourself available to her and have no other women on your radar.   Show her that your schedule is free and that you're up for hanging out whenever. She'll no longer have to hang out with you during the one hour you're free. Don't make her jealous. In your case, you should stay away from the other ladies as much as possible to show that you only have eyes for her. Take the time to listen. If she thought you didn't care about her feelings before, maintain eye contact and let her talk without interrupting. You can mention something she said in the conversation a day later to show that you really do hang on to her every word. Compliment her. If you never complimented her before, she'll see that you changed.  If you really want her back, you have to be the man and apologize for what went wrong. If she was hurt by you, she'll want to stay away from you for fear of getting hurt again. So man up and tell her you made a mistake.   Make sure to do this in person. It won't do if you just send her a text message or an e-mail; it has to be in person otherwise she will see that you are not very serious about this apology and so she won't take it seriously either. So own up and go apologise for what you did to her. Be sincere. Maintain eye contact when you talk to her and keep a calm, even tone. She won't believe you if it sounds like you're apologizing just because it's what you should do. Be specific. Don't just say, "I'm sorry for everything." Say, "I'm sorry I didn't listen to you when you really wanted to talk. I should have been much more attentive." She will appreciate this, and it will make you seem more self-aware. Don't be disappointed if she doesn't accept your apology right away. If she doesn't accept it, she's probably still working through what happened but still appreciates your effort. Just say, "You can't blame me for trying" instead of arguing her into accepting your apology.  She should be able to see how much you've changed without you having to say it yourself or to convince her that you're completely different. Face it -- many girls are more mature than their male counterparts, so wow her with your ability to be rational and mature.   Don't be moody. Act even-keeled and calm, and she'll be impressed. Be confident. Show her that you're happy who you are and what you do, and she'll be happier with who you are too. Be responsible. Show her that you can manage your finances, hold down a good job, and take care of your dog at the same time. Don't be jealous. Don't ask her about that guy she's been talking to; this will only encourage her to talk to him more, and will make you look insecure for caring.  Once she wants you a bit more and can see that you're a different person, it's time to stop playing games and to tell her how you really feel. How else can you get the ball rolling? If it ended badly, she's not going to ask you to pick things up again, so you need to get your act together and open up.   Tell her at the right place and time. Pick a time when she's not too busy and you can be alone, ideally at night or in a semi-secluded location. Maintain eye contact when you tell her. No looking around, no checking your phone. No more Mr. Tough Guy. It's time to be open and honest and to share your true feelings. First, acknowledge what went wrong, and apologize for it again if you haven't already. Then, tell her how much you've changed and how much you'd love to give it another try. Say, "I can't believe what an idiot I've been. You were the best thing that ever happened to me and I really screwed it up. Let me make it up to you." Don't sound like you're begging and pleading; instead, make it sound like barely a question at all. Let her know that you're going to try again, and hopefully you'll get the answer you were looking for.  If she agrees to go out with you, you better do it right this time. You're lucky enough to be getting a second chance, and third chances are hard to come by. Make the most of your time together and make sure to treat her right. Here's what to do:  Turn up the romance factor. Bring her flowers and take her to a romantic restaurant. Now, you shouldn't overdo it to the point that she feels uncomfortable. Just add a little bit of the romance that was probably missing before.       Compliment her. Let her know she looks nice when you pick her up, and compliment her throughout the date.       Let her know how much you've missed her. Find one or two moments during the date when you tell her how glad you are to have her in your life.       In the end, be yourself. You can become a better listener, a more attentive person, or just learn to understand her needs, but in the end, you're still you, and you should make sure she likes who you really are. Don't try so hard to show that you've changed that there's nothing left of the old you.  If the date went well, and if there are more dates to follow, you need to make sure the relationship doesn't end for the same reason if you really want to stay with this girl. If she's a keeper, you must remind yourself that you have to continue making her feel special.   Remind yourself what happened the last time, and vow not to do it again. Look at it as starting fresh. You don't have to rehash the old relationship, but work on building something completely new and much better. Relax. Just enjoy being with the girl instead of worrying about not screwing up again all the time.  

give her some space.  give yourself some time to reflect.  stay busy.  let her see you having a great time.  make her jealous (optional).  if it was too easy the first time, make her chase you.  if it was too hard the first time, make it easier.  if you hurt her, apologize.  show what a better, more mature person you've become.  tell her how you feel.  take her out.  keep the girl this time. 

 This is disrespectful, and for your soon-to-be ex, it can feel like you're being evasive. Have the decency to do it privately and in person.   You might not realize it, but there are benefits to ending a relationship in person. For one thing, it gives both people a chance to talk and reflect on the situation. And even though it will be harder to do, it will most likely lead to less drama, which is a good thing.; , Things are never that simple. Be prepared to discuss your relationship without pointing your finger.   You can probably find bad things about your relationship that you contributed to, if you really wanted. In an effort to be fair, and to not have your ex-girlfriend feel like she is directly responsible for the end of the relationship, be sure to mention the things that you could have changed to make the relationship better. In some cases, the blame will be solely on the other person. In those situations, it's okay to tell it like it is. If your girlfriend is cheating, abusing drugs, manipulative, or increasingly disrespecting you, you can lay the blame directly on her actions. In most cases, this can cause an argument, so be prepared. The upside is that you're being honest with both yourself and her why the relationship didn't work, leaving you both with a better chance of finding lasting love later on. Isn't that what you both want?    , If you don't want to be friends afterward, don't leave the door open for that possibility. Find a nice way to say it. Instead of "Oh yeah, and I don't want to stay friends afterwards, just so you know," try something like "You know that I care for you. I just don't think it will be healthy for either of us to stay friends immediately after we break up. Hopefully sometime down the road, when we've both figured stuff out, we can get to that place."  , Use discretion when telling mutual friends about your break up. Bragging or gossiping could be very hurtful to someone who may already be in a fragile emotional state. On top of that, it could encourage your ex to sling some nasty rumors your way, and generally cause some immature behavior.   Tell your close friends, but don't publicize your breakup to acquaintances or people you hardly know. It's probably a good idea to tell your close friends what happened between you and your ex. It's probably not such a great idea to start telling your entire social circle via Facebook, or every girl in your school, that you and your ex are history. It just smacks of desperation.  Being "petty" can be hard to define, but it usually includes doing things that you wouldn't want your girlfriend to do with you if she were hypothetically breaking up with you. This is called the golden rule. Do unto others as you would have them do unto you. It's a great rule.   Don't cheat on your ex before you break up with them. If something is simmering between you and another girl, have the decency to wait a bit, really think about your feelings, and break up with your current girlfriend before you do anything with the other girl. It will look better to your ex, and feel better for you. Don't treat them poorly before the relationship has ended. (Better yet, don't treat them poorly at all.) If you're still in a relationship, you owe something to the other person. It's not really okay to check out before things have ended. If you don't feel like being nice to your girlfriend, you owe it to her to give her the opportunity to find someone who can.  There is no way around the fact that this is going to hurt the other person. It's just like ripping off a bandage — if you rip it off all in one go, the pain will be over quickly, but if you do it slowly, it will hurt for longer. You can help minimize the heartbreak in a couple of ways:   Don't be distant. Even if you don't really feel like it, offer hugs and other appropriate signs of affection if your ex looks like she needs it. Be reassuring, not selfish. Find the right time to break up. Obviously, there's never a perfect time. But right before a celebration, test, or vacation is a bad time to do it. Give yourself enough time, and try to do it when she doesn't have anything else significant going on afterward. Resist the urge to argue. When someone is being broken up with, there's a good chance they're going to be angry. Don't feed her anger by provoking, debating, or belittling her. Ex-lovers often say very hurtful things when they argue.  When you finally break up, you have to be prepared for anything. It could be sadness, anger, or even a lack of emotion. It's okay to feel any and all of these emotions during a breakup. If you feel like showing emotion, don't hold back. If the emotion isn't there, for whatever reason, don't force it.  It's the least that she deserves. If you can't come up with a legitimate reason for why you're no longer interested in the relationship, try thinking it over; talk with a friend. It doesn't have to be perfect, but it should be legitimate. You owe it to her.   Show her that you've given it some thought, and offer her some facts to back it up. Don't be aggressive or combative. When explaining the reasons for a breakup, don't talk about other relationships. Your relationship is your own, and breaking up isn't about comparing your relationship to anyone else's. Stay there for as long as she needs an explanation. Don't run out the door as soon as you've said the words "let's break up." Stay with her while she's processing the information, answering any follow-up questions she may have. If you keep returning to the same questions over and over again, tell her that you think that's happening.  If it's appropriate, let her know why you think that she'll make an excellent girlfriend for someone else sometime down the road. Talk about the aspects of her personality that attracted you to her in the beginning, and the traits of hers that stayed strong during the relationship. This way, she won't feel as horrible; it could do something good for her confidence, which will probably be shaken by the breakup.  Unless you've decided that it's absolutely the best to not talk after the breakup, give her the option of discussing things when the situation is a little more calm. This will give you both time to think, and may help her feel like she is also given a chance to get things off her chest.  

don't break up with your partner by text, phone or email.  don't place blame solely on the other person for the breakup.  don't lead your ex on.  don't be a blabbermouth.  don't be petty.  try to minimize the heartache.  be prepared for a range of emotions.  give her a truthful explanation.  be reassuring.  offer to talk with her at a later time if she has any questions. 

 You might be aware of your parents' rule, but not fully aware of the reasons for why your parents have this rule. Understanding why your parents have created this rule will help you explore your feelings, as well as communicate to your guy why you cannot date.Parents create such rules because they are worried about your safety and well-being. They do not want to see you with a broken heart, or they might be worried about you being sexually active. Or, perhaps they think dating will distract you from focusing on your schoolwork.; , Listen to your parents' reasons without interrupting them. Acknowledge their concerns, and tell them that you want to be safe, too.If your parents are worried about you being sexually active, show them that you are informed about safer sex. You can say, “I appreciate your concerns, mom and dad. But, a nurse from Planned Parenthood gave a talk at school about safer sex last month. Here are the pamphlets she gave us. I am well informed about issues of consent and how to practice safer sex.” If you are not sexually active and have no desire be sexually active, tell them this, too. For example, “I know you are concerned, but I am not sexually active, and I do not plan on being sexually active any time soon. I am just interested in getting to know someone better.”  , If your parents are open to the idea, explore compromises that will make them feel more comfortable. You could suggest group dates instead of one-on-one dates, or they may be more open to chaperoned dances. Also, discuss being home at a certain time, or only going on dates with people they have met and know well.If negotiation is not an option, it is ok and common to feel angry and/or frustrated. At this point, you can seek out the advice and help of other adults in your life, for example older family members, teachers, or counselors.  If you cannot, or your parents will not discuss dating with you, seek the help of other adults -- for example, an older relative or sibling. An older adult might have a better understanding of your parent’s perspective, and they might be able to explain it to you. They may even be able to help you talk with your parents about the issue.Make sure you seek out someone you trust.  After you have spoken with your parents or a trusted adult, take time to analyze your feelings. Work out how you feel about the situation, and what your needs are. By understanding your feelings, it will be easier to explain to your guy why you cannot date.For example, you may agree with your parents on some issues, but not on other issues. Or, you might not agree with them at all, or fully agree with them. The point is to take the time to understand where you stand on the issue. It can be difficult sorting out your thoughts and feelings. If you need help, consult your school counselor or another trusted adult.  Before you talk to your guy, come up with various explanations that communicate how you feel and why you cannot date in an effective way. By not planning out what you will say, you might end up saying something you regret or do not mean.Write down different explanations, and practice saying the best one in front of the mirror. Make sure your tone of voice is confident.  When delivering the message, make it clear that the issue is not with him, but with your age or your parents' rules. This way, you can avoid making him feel rejected or at fault. Make your feelings and opinions on the issue clear, as well.You can say, “Hey, John. I want to talk about what you asked me the other night—dating. I spoke with my parents, and they still think I am too young to date. I agree with some of their reasons, but at the same time, I feel that I am mature enough to date. But, I do still live under their roof, and I have to abide by their rules. I hope you understand.”  , When confronting him, make sure it is an appropriate time. You want to choose a time and place that ensures that you are being heard and understood. Try to choose a time when you are both relaxed and not preoccupied with something else.If he is busy with schoolwork, sports, or is hanging out with his friends, choose another time to tell him. Avoid bringing up the issue during an intense moment, like an argument. Also, don’t use your news as a weapon to gain an advantage or to hurt him.  Before he begins to respond to what you have just said, make sure he understands what you said first. Ask him to repeat or summarize what you just said. By doing this, you can avoid any miscommunication.For example, “Before you respond, can you summarize what you heard me say so I can be sure that I communicated clearly and that you understood correctly.” Provide any needed clarification, especially if he feels that he is at fault.  His agreement with your message should not be an issue. At this point, your priority is to ensure that you were heard and understood correctly. Therefore, do not get hooked into apologizing or defending your message., Everyone has a different way of coping with something they do not want to hear. Therefore, he might be confused or angry. If he reacts negatively, such as anger or inappropriate comments, remain calm. Don’t yell back or return inappropriate comments. If he threatens you or makes you feel unsafe, stop the conversation and leave immediately.Try to remember that his reaction might be because he wasn’t prepared for the news. You might need to reiterate and reinforce the idea that the issue is not with him. You can say, “I understand that you’re angry. But it isn’t about you, and the decision is not a reflection of you or your actions. It is about how my parents and I feel. ”  , If he does not have a problem with what you said, and understands your reasons, suggest that you guys remain good friends. Remaining friends will strengthen and add depth to your friendship. If you stay friends long enough, your chance to date him might become a reality.  

ask your parents why.  be respectful.  explore compromises.  seek the help of a trusted adult.  understand your feelings.  think before you speak.  deliver the message.  be aware of timing.  ensure he understands your point of view.  don’t apologize or defend yourself.  remain calm.  suggest that you be friends instead. 

 Revenge might feel good for a moment, but it can have lasting consequences. Feelings of hurt can overtake you, leaving you bitter, angry, and hostile, but this doesn’t mean you should retaliate. Don’t meet him on a low level; be the bigger person and don’t hurt him back., Disengage from this person and don’t allow him back into your life. If you go to the same school, it might be more difficult, but cut as many ties as you can with him. Don’t allow him to continue manipulating or using you. Create as much distance as you can.Delete his number from your phone, cancel connections with him on social media, get rid of his email address, stay away from places he might be, and don't talk to him.  Being used is a painful experience. Remind yourself that you are worthy and valuable and no one has the right to treat you with disrespect. Recognize that not every guy is out to use people, and remember that good guys exist. You can use this experience to recognize your own inner strength and learn from the experience., No, this doesn’t include blaming yourself, but it does mean you can be completely honest with yourself. Taking responsibility is different than taking blame. Taking responsibility means keeping yourself accountable and owning what actions may have contributed to a negative situation, but not assuming all wrongdoing in shame.It may be most natural to feel victimized and that you had nothing to do with being used (and this might be true). But also reflect on if there were any factors that you contributed that made you a target. It’s okay to admit that there were things that contributed to what happened. This allows you to gain insight and learn from your mistakes.Perhaps you were desperate to have a boyfriend, and liked that he gave you attention, even though it wasn’t always positive attention. Maybe you were vulnerable after exiting a previous relationship and wanted to be liked by a boy.  Choose to forgive him, when you feel ready. Holding onto bitterness can affect your next relationships and make you feel untrusting toward other guys. Forgiving him releases you from your hurt and pain. It also releases the role he played in your life and allows you to move on without bitterness.Forgiving him doesn’t mean you find his actions acceptable or that you’re forgetting what happened, but it means you are allowing yourself the opportunity to heal from the experience.Choose to accept what happened between the two of you, then choose to not let him have any more power over you or your emotions. Stop holding on to the hurt and allow yourself to start healing. You may never choose to tell him you forgive him, but remember that forgiving him is for you, not for him.  When you’re ready, let go of him and the pain he caused you. Write down his name and what happened, including all the emotions you feel. Then, get rid of this paper in a way that is meaningful to you. You can flush it down the toilet, (safely) burn it, or tear it up. Writing down the hurt and pain and then disposing of it is a symbolic way of showing you are ready to move on and let go of the pain this caused., It’s okay to feel angry, sad, vengeful, or rageful after a betrayal. Don’t bury your feelings, feel free to express them, even if you don’t like to experience negative emotions. You don’t have to pretend that everything is okay, and you don’t have to jump to forgive him.Talk to your friends or a trusted adult about what happened and how you feel. Use a journal to write your feelings. If words aren’t your thing, do art, dance, or listen to music. Using art can help you express your feelings., When you’ve felt manipulated by someone, remind yourself of your rights and when they are being violated. You have the right to stand up for yourself and to acknowledge when you are being treated disrespectfully.Some basic human rights include the right to:   Be treated with respect. Express your feelings and desires. Say “no” without feeling guilty or explaining yourself. Protect yourself.  There is nothing wrong with you. It’s not fair to take the burden of hurt and blame entirely on your shoulders. Recognize that he has his own issues and unfortunately, they involved you. You may not have done anything wrong, and perhaps your biggest mistake was being unaware of his behavior., It’s easy to find fault in yourself or to blame yourself for what happened. Yet, self-blame can be a form of emotional abuse on yourself.Consider your relationship with him, and ask yourself whether he was treating you with respect. Did you feel good about yourself when you were with him? It’s likely he did not treat you with respect and that you are not the one to fully blame.Maybe you look back and have regrets or feel bad for your decisions. Keep in mind you don’t know what would have happened otherwise, and that you didn’t have the knowledge/experience then that you have now. Remember, blame doesn’t fix a situation. It only makes you feel worse about your decisions. Realize that you cannot change your past decisions, but you are capable of changing your decisions in the future. Accept that absolutely everyone makes mistakes. It's how we learn, so be forgiving of yourself and realize that while it is painful now, you'll know better the next time.  Being resilient means you are able to work through problems — both big and small — and bounce back easily. Build your resilience by getting adequate sleep, exercising, and nourishing your body with good food. Build your tolerance for uncertain situations and for frustration by keeping an open mind and finding positive outcomes in all situations, even if they seem overwhelmingly negative.Keep a positive attitude by filtering negative thoughts (blaming yourself, anticipating the worst, seeing things as either “all good” or “all bad”) and engaging positive thoughts (using humor, putting a positive spin on situations, seeing the positives in every situation).Keeping your mind and body in positive states help you cope with daily struggles as well as large situations.  By using self affirmations, you can begin to change the negative stories you may believe in your head and start being able to handle life’s difficulties more easily.Using self affirmations allows you to expand an aspect of yourself. After a difficult situation like feeling used by a boy, you may feel worthless or that you are not valuable. Challenge these thoughts by focusing on your value and worth as true statements.   First, make a list of your strengths. This will help give you the evidence to counter any negative thoughts about yourself. Include things you're proud of, your accomplishments, things you are good at. Things like being a good friend, creative, kind, and good at math, and so on. If you have trouble, ask your loved ones to contribute. Now when you have the thought, "I am worthless," you can look to all the evidence you have collected that says otherwise — think about all the people who don't feel this way about you and who value you as a friend and family member. Then counter the negative thought with the affirmation: "I am a valuable person, because I have many people in my life who value me." Once you begin to feel stronger and more confident that your affirmations are true, try saying them aloud or writing them down. You can write them in a journal every day, write them on a mirror for when you get ready in the morning, or start your day by saying them out loud to yourself. You may feel silly at first, but stick with it. You may be surprised at how they start to change your perception and your life the longer you keep with it.  Keep supportive friends and family members close, and don’t be afraid to call someone if you need someone to talk to or need a hug. Surround yourself with people that care about you and that you care about back. The people in your life don’t want you to suffer alone. Reach out for support when you need it.Even if you feel like being alone, push yourself and go hang out with friends. Let yourself laugh and feel good and enjoy the company of your friends. Have friends that you can talk to about your problems that will listen and support you. Talk to your parents or a trusted adult when you need a listening ear or you want advice. This can be a teacher, coach, or spiritual leader.  

avoid getting even.  keep your distance.  learn from the experience.  take responsibility for how you may have contributed.  forgive.  let go.  express how you feel.  know your basic human rights.  don’t take it personally.  avoid blaming yourself.  practice resiliency.  use self affirmations.  have a solid support network. 

 Are you going to break up with him because he's not treating you right, because you've lost interest, or because you're both too busy to make it work? Whatever your reason, you have to figure out exactly what you're going to say and how you're going to say it. If it's something like you falling out of love or falling for someone else, then you can find a nice way of ending it that would cause the least damage.   Though honesty is important, you don't have to tell him everything if it would only hurt him. If you've fallen out of love, you may not want to be so blunt about it.; , You don't want him to completely break down if it comes as a shock. Though you shouldn't be too obvious about it, you don't want to throw your man completely off guard with the breakup. That means that he shouldn't think that everything is peachy keen the day before the break up, or even the week before. Once you've made up your mind, you should break up with him as soon as possible, but if you have to wait a few days to do it, then try to act more cold and distant in the meantime.   Don't tell him how much you love him, or kiss him or act affectionate with him.  Don't be a coward and send him a note, email, text, or phone call. Unless you're in a long distance relationship or he has a reputation for being violent when he gets bad news, you owe him the courtesy of meeting him in person one last time. If you don't do it in person, he'll reach out to you anyway, and you'll have to rehash the same painful conversation, but it won't be on your terms as much.   If you don't do it in person, he will hold it against you after the relationship is over.  It's important to break up with the boy as soon as you can after making your decision. That being said, you shouldn't go and break up with him the second you you know it, or you might end up blurting it out in public or at an inopportune moment. Just pick a time when you'll be alone and will have some privacy, but nowhere romantic so he won't get the wrong idea.   Don't go to one of your favorite hangouts, or he will be even more crushed with the bad news because he'll be thinking of all the great memories you've shared. Don't do it the second he gets off work or right before a big test. Pick a time when he'll be reasonably relaxed and won't have anything else to think or worry about.  Tell him the truth (as much as you can). Don't be mean or tell lies—tell him simply that you don't think that the relationship is working out. Try to avoid "let's just be friends" or "it's not you, it's me," as these cliches will make it sound like you haven't put much thought into his feelings. Let him know that it's time to move on, that it just isn't working, and that you hope the two of you can do this maturely.   Look him in the eyes when you're talking. Let him see that this is hurting you, too.  It's likely that he will want a bigger explanation, even if he doesn't say it right away. Be open to talking to him. It will show him you're open to talking, and thus that you'll work to be a good friend when he's ready. It will also give him the closure that he may need to move on.   He may not want to ask questions or talk at all, though he may come to you with questions later. That's fine. If he really doesn't want to talk, don't push it.  There are a number of ways he can react; if he's stunned into silence or just wants to leave right away, then fine. But he might really, really want to know why. And you might just have to tell him -- to the extent that you can without hurting his feelings. If you think he doesn't care about you, give him one or two concrete examples, as long as it doesn't sound accusatory.   Usually, you won't need to go into it that much. If you have an idea that it's not working, then he will probably be on the same page.  Though you may be angry, hurt, or crushed, there's no need to go into it by calling him names, being rude, or making him feel even worse. You should go into it with your head held high, and have him think of you as positively as he can when he looks back on the relationship. No matter how bad things are, things were probably pretty good once, and there's no reason to ruin all that just because you're angry or hurt.   If he really hurt you, of course, then this doesn't mean that you should be super nice to him. Just avoid cursing, slapping him, or being excessively mean.  Once you've said your part and have answered a few of his questions, then it's time to say goodbye. There's really no point in lingering, sitting around crying and holding each other, and generally making yourselves more upset. The more you'll sit there, the more all of those feelings will come rushing back, and the more hurt, sad, confused, disappointed and heartbroken you both will feel.Once there's nothing left to say, say goodbye.  This is not a negotiation, but a notification. Don't let your boyfriend convince you that you should really be together, that you've got it all wrong, or that he'll change completely and be perfect for you. You've made up your mind, and there's no turning back now. You had good reasons for breaking up with him, and you should stick to them, no matter how hard it may be.   It's important to be firm, and to make it clear that you are breaking up, not that you need some time apart. Let him know that it is OVER with a capital O.  Be sure he knows that you want to give him time to get over you, though. Let him know that you're not going to make the first move at the friendship, but that once he feels ready to be friends he should give you a call. This will help give you both time apart to get over the relationship. Follow up on your promise to be friendly when he does call you.  Though you both obviously won't be grinning ear to ear and hugging passionately as you say goodbye, you should try to make things as amicable and polite as possible, even if you feel like screaming your head off. Be kind, don't look like you're dying to get out of there, and tell your boyfriend that you're sorry for how he's feeling. Make it clear that you want things between you to be as positive as they can, even if you need some space in the beginning.   Name-calling, flinging insults, or shouting at each other won't lead to anything but more pain.  This will not work, no matter what good friends you were before the relationship, or how amicably it all ended. There's just no chance you can go from BF/GF to BFF, so spare yourself the heartache of trying. Spend some time apart and even go a week or two without really talking if it's possible with your schedules. Try to avoid places where he'll be so you don't have to have awkward, painful conversations. Take the time to heal before you can decide whether friendship is on the horizon.   If you do see him, there's no need to be rude or to run in the other direction. Be polite but keep things brief.  Though you were the one who broke up with the boy, you will still be feeling confused, sad, and hurt. That's only natural. Both parties in a break-up have hard feelings, no matter who ends it. You may not be prepared for the fact that you might miss your boy and your relationship, but part of you will. So take it easy the next few weeks. Lean on your girlfriends, lay off the booze, and get some much-needed alone time.   Don't jump in to a new relationship or start dating right away. You'll need some time to deal with it.  Just because the two of you are broken up doesn't mean you can go spreading his deepest darkest secrets. You would want him to respect your privacy too, wouldn't you? Even if you're hurt or angry, you shouldn't lash or make yourself look like a gossip just because the relationship is over. If you do, then other guys may not be too excited about being your boyfriend.   When you talk about the relationship to others, remain respectful.  A breakup is not a contest, and you're not going to win by hooking up with more people than your ex. If you can't help but enjoy the single life, keep the publicity to a minimum. Don't post statuses or pictures of it on Facebook, and don't parade around school with a new boy two days after the breakup. This will only make your ex feel worse.   Even if you have jumped in to a new relationship pretty soon after the breakup, you shouldn't make it public right after the break up.  If enough time has passed -- and that could be months, or even a year or two -- and you can hang out with your ex without having any romantic or hurt feelings, then you may try out being friends. Hang out in a group setting, make sure both of you are not feeling romantic, and then try hanging out one on one from time to time if it makes you both happy.   Remember that, unfortunately, this is not the most likely scenario.  

figure out what you're going to say.  drop some hints.  do it face-to-face if you can.  pick the right place and time.  tell him it's over.  after the break up, let him ask questions.  explain further if it's necessary.  avoid being too mean.  keep it short.  stand your ground.  if you want to stay friends, tell him that.  end on a good note.  don't try to be friends right away.  take some time to recover emotionally.  don't talk about him behind his back.  keep the public hooking up with other guys to a minimum.  see if you can be friends eventually. 

 When you're just coming out of a situation that has caused you heartbreak (like the breakup of a relationship) you're going to need to give yourself time to grieve and to deal with all the emotions that are going to plague you in those first months.   Don't immediately throw yourself into work (or something else that consumes all your time) because you'll just keep pushing away the emotions rather than actually dealing with them and that will make it harder on you in the long run. You are going to have lots of emotional ups and downs. Recovering from heartbreak isn't a straight line of progression upward, but rather a spiral. Just remember as you are going through the same emotional circle, that each time around you're better able to deal with the emotions from the heartbreak and that you are getting better.; , It's nearly impossible to get over the heartbreak of a relationship ending, but constantly being bombarded with information about your ex is definitely not going to help anything. This means no stalking on Facebook, no texting, no drunken phone calls.Block your ex on social media so that you won't be tempted to spend hours pouring over their Facebook page and over-analyzing every single thing they post in an attempt to figure out if they regret not being with you and miss you, etc. etc. If you're constantly trying to stay in communication with your ex you're not going to be able to move on, which will make your feelings of heartbreak and unhappiness that much harder and that much harder to bear.  You are going to be devastated when you encounter heartbreak. There's no way to avoid that and if you fight those feelings you're going to make it harder to deal with them in the long run.   Try journaling about how you're feeling. This is an especially good thing to do if you're bad at talking with other people about your feelings. Every day, write down how you're feeling about the heartbreak. Gradually, you'll see that you are getting better. You don't need to pretend you're fine when you're really really not. Accept that you're going to be going through some emotional turbulence for a bit. Your friends (if they're true friends) will understand and support you. Feel free to listen to angsty, angry, sad songs to help get those feelings out, but don't stay there. Make sure that you don't only listen to songs about heartbreak and breakups, otherwise you're going to have an even tougher time getting over it.  While you will need time to wallow in your unhappiness, you also need to remind yourself why life is worth living. At first it will be really hard to make yourself go out and do anything, but trying to do at least one thing a week can be a good place to start.   Start small. Don't try to make yourself go out and host an entire fancy dinner right after the heartbreak. Instead, start by getting coffee or a beer with your best friend, or going to hang out at the library. Do things that you enjoy, especially things that you weren't able to do while being part of a couple. This will remind you why you're better off without the relationship and remind you how to do things on your own.  One of the most important things to do while you're recovering from heartbreak is to take care of yourself. A lot of times you'll be feeling super unmotivated and it can be hard to simple get out of bed, but going that extra mile for yourself can help you from falling into a huge pit of despair.   Reward yourself for things that take extra effort like cleaning your apartment, going grocery shopping, even showering. Exercising can be a good way to take care of yourself and boost your mood. Exercise releases endorphins, which can help make you feel happier and you'll feel better about yourself in general.  Once you've gotten over the initial shock of the heartbreak, you need to make sure that you don't spend too much time wallowing and grieving, otherwise you're never going to let yourself get over the relationship and that's what you need most of all.Set a time each day to reflect on the break-up, usually about 20-30 minutes. Set a timer so that you know when time's up. During the day, as thoughts of the heartbreak come up, remind yourself that you have a specific time set aside and until then, you'll focus on other things. Make sure that you have an activity that requires your attention (preferably something fun) schedule for right after, so your attention is immediately diverted. Get a trusted friend or family member to help you out. Give yourself a certain limit when talking about the heartbreak (say 30 minutes) and when you've gone over it have your friend or family member remind you to put your focus elsewhere.  There's nothing wrong with bolstering your confidence with an easy rebound relationship, as long as both parties know that's all it is. You're going to be in a mire of low self-confidence and vulnerability after a recent split and that's a really bad time to try to start something real with someone else.   If you're going out and partying try to moderate your drinking, both so that you don't end up drunk-calling/texting your ex and so that you don't think it's a really good idea to try to start something with someone because you're feeling down and your self esteem is low. Have your friends help you out. If it looks like you're coming in for a fall, have them remind you about rebounds and just make sure that's really what you want (which it can be, but you'll need to check in with yourself to make sure).  This also refers to texting and calling. You really want to make sure that you don't post tons of angry or upset things about your former relationship and you don't want to invite everyone to witness your mental breakdown over Facebook status updates.   You also want to make sure that you're not just putting things like "can't wait for my hot date tonight" on Facebook in the hopes that your ex or their friends will see. If you're doing that you're still in the throes of the breakup and you're still doing things for their benefit instead your own. The more you text/call your ex the harder it will be for you to move on, especially if they broke up with you. You'll be doing nothing more than boosting their self esteem and lowering your own. Delete them from your phone, block them on social media, and don't ask your friends or their friends how they are.  The heartbreak comes from the trauma of the end of a relationship and once you've moved on from the relationship itself you'll be no longer experiencing the heartbreak. Your goal is to remember that this is something that you are capable of, even when it feels like your world has come to an end.You still have a future, remember. Even though it no longer involves that other person, you still have hopes and dreams and plans for what you'll be doing. You'll be grieving the loss of the dreams you were working for with the other person, but you'll need to remember that you can replace those dreams with new ones. Repeat to yourself "I want to be happy." This mantra will remind you that even though you're in the dumps because of heartbreak, you have no desire to remain there. Remind yourself that you're working towards being happy and getting over your heartbreak is part of that., Sometimes you can't get over something on your own and you need to seek professional assistance. There is nothing wrong with this or with you and you shouldn't feel ashamed about it. Heartbreak is painful and it stirs up a whole bubbling cauldron of feelings and emotions that can be difficult to deal with.   Learn to see the difference between regular sadness over a breakup and true depression. If it's been weeks and you're unable to get out of bed, or take care of yourself, or you simply don't care about anything, you definitely need to see a professional.  

give yourself time.  give yourself space from your ex.  don't fight your feelings.  make plans.  take care of yourself.  impose a daily limit on grieving.  beware of the rebound.  watch how you act online.  remember that your end goal is to move on.  seek help. 

 If someone with whom you are not in a relationship touches you inappropriately, that is completely unacceptable. Confront the offender immediately. Don’t worry about being polite. Loudly say, “Stop touching me!” so that other people around you will hear. Do not be embarrassed. It’s the creep who’s touching you that should be embarrassed!If it is someone young and they say something like, “I was just joking, chill out,” don’t pay any attention to that. A joke is only a joke if both people are laughing. Just say, “It wasn’t funny and I won’t let you treat me like that.” Then walk away.; , If you feel disgusted or angry, don’t be afraid to express that. You have every right to feel that way and communicating that will show the offender that you mean business. Don’t be afraid to yell at the person or to say something like, “Stop it, that’s disgusting!”If you know the person, you might be afraid to confront them because you don't want to make things awkward. But it's the person touching you without your permission who is making things awkward! Don't ever worry about upsetting someone who is disrespecting you. You have every right to be upset and you need to communicate this. You can say something like, "Stop! You have no right to treat me that way!" or "Don't do that!" or "Stop it! I don't like that!"  , If the person keeps his hand on you, push him away and loudly say, “Get off me!” If you are loud, someone nearby will overhear what is happening and hopefully they will intervene. By pushing him away, you should create distance to allow yourself to get away.If the person is a friend, it's time to get new friends! Friends have to respect one another and this person clearly does not! To end a disrespectful friendship, you can say something like, "I don't like the way you treat me and I will not allow you to be a part of my life anymore." Then look for friends who are kind to you.  Get as far away from the creep as possible. If you aren’t able to go very far, for example if you are on public transit, then move to a crowded area. The person will be less likely to continue trying to touch you if you are surrounded by others.If you are at school, go tell a teacher immediately. You could say, "Ms. Anderson, I need to talk to you. Jerad was touching me inappropriately and he wouldn't stop." This isn't tattling; this is defending yourself against someone harming you. If you are near your house, run home and tell your parents or another adult right away. You could say, "Mom, this creepy guy starting touching me in the park."  , If the person continues to harass you, call out for help. Simply yell, “Somebody help me!” and repeat it until someone hears. The yelling will likely alarm the person touching you, causing them to back off, or someone will hear and intervene.You do not need to deal with this alone., If someone has been harassing you and inappropriately touching you, as soon as you get to safety, call 911. Tell them what happened. Tell them where you were and what the person looked like. He needs to be arrested so that he will not continue to harass people. You could tell the police, “I was riding on bus 44 at 2:00pm and this creepy guy kept groping me and wouldn’t stop.” 

tell him to stop immediately.  show your emotions.  push him away.  run away.  call for help.  involve the police. 

 If you're going out with someone currently and a guy asks you out, just politely say "No thank you, I'm already dating someone." .; , If you're not dating someone and a boy asks you out whom you're not interested in, tell him you're very grateful that he asked, but you're just not interested right now.  If he is not your type, be nice and say you don't feel a strong connection with him. Liking someone for looks is a type of connection, so don't flat-out say that you don't want to date him because he's ugly. Even though sometimes it's hard to refrain from being brutally honest.  If a guy gives you a note, talk to him in person or give him your note reply in person. If he calls you on the phone, don't be afraid to speak to him. The worse thing that you can possibly do is send a message through someone else, it may lead him to feel embarrassed, and next thing you know you're having odd run-ins around the neighborhood with unnamed person.  Hopefully he isn't too persistent  

tell the truth.  thank him.  be clear, but not hurtful.  follow his lead.  if he keeps insisting, tell him things aren't going very well at school or work and the last thing you need is a boyfriend on your mind. 

 If there's no question that your guy friend is suddenly getting butterflies in his stomach every time he sees you, it's time to let him know you don't feel the same way before things get out of control. But if you want to deliver the news in the best way possible, you have to pick the right time and place so he's comfortable and receptive, although you don't want it to seem like a date.   Pick a place that is not romantic. If you tell him the news at a nice restaurant, or while the sun is setting on the beach, he'll be thrown off guard. Tell him at a place where you would never go on a date. Tell him in the morning or during the day. The nighttime is more romantic. Pick a place where you'll be relatively alone and away from his friends. You don't want him to be embarrassed if other people hear you deliver the bad news. Pick a time when he's not likely to be busy or stressed-out. Don't tell him the night before a big exam, or when he has an incredibly busy day at work. Don't dawdle. Once you know he likes you, don't wait too long for the perfect moment to say something. The longer he doesn't know how you feel, the more hurt he'll be.; , If you want to tell him in the most effective way possible, then you should prepare what you'll say in advance. If you don't know exactly how you'll explain that you don't like him romantically, you'll be much more likely to make things more awkward or to get caught in a web of excuses that make everything worse.   Prepare to keep it simple. You won't have to go into all of the reasons why you only like him as a friend. Practice your tone. Say everything you plan on saying aloud so you feel more comfortable when the time comes.  Before you tell him, you should predict how he'll react. Will he be shocked into silence, or hurt? If the guy is your friend, you should have some inkling of how he'll react, so you should prepare to react accordingly.   If he's a shy and sensitive guy, then he may not have much to say afterwards. Think of a few reassuring words you can say, or even a few light-hearted comments, that can make it easier. If he's going to be really hurt, prepare to support him. You don't have to apologize for not liking him, but you can be there for him and tell him not to be so upset. He's a great guy, and he'll definitely find someone else.  

pick the right time and place.  prepare what you'll say.  predict his reaction. 

 As long as it feels reasonably safe, say no immediately. Do not smile, apologize, or say maybe. If you don't want someone, don't give them anything. Just say something like "No, I'm not interested."Do not allow anyone you don't like to touch you or stand close to you. Step back if they are too close to you. Turn away if they are taking too long to leave you alone. For instance, if you are at a party, you might say "No, I'm not interested," then turn to your friend and suggest going to another room.; , If you are alone and the person hitting on you threatens you or makes you feel too uncomfortable to say no, tell them a quick lie that will let you escape.   You can say you need to use a bathroom, or that you forgot something in your car, or that you need to make a quick call. Get into a public place and get help. Put walls between yourself and the aggressor as quickly as you can. Unstable or inebriated people sometimes attack even in public.  Don't give them your name, information about your job, where you live, where you're going next, or anything else. If you aren't sure yet if someone is hitting on you or bothering you, just ask "why?" instead of answering the questions, and then decided if you are being advanced upon.Explain that you are not interested instead of answering questions. If you are told, "It was just a compliment, I just want to talk to you. What do you do for work?" resist the urge to answer the question. Instead, say "I am talking with my friends right now" or "I am not interested in continuing this conversation."  , Once someone has made you nervous, put space between yourself and them. If they don't leave you alone, walk away. Leave as long as you can leave safely without being followed. Leave with friends if you can. If you feel relatively safe, you can stick around, but don't agree to sit with or stand near the aggressor.   Try going into another room, leaving a bar or party (with friends), or moving to sit at the bar instead of at a table so that the bartender can watch out for you.  If you yell at them, they may try to hurt you.Be as cool and firm as you can. Take deep breaths if you feel yourself losing your temper or getting frightened. Take special care to stay calm if you are alone, as you are more likely to be violently attacked.   If you are in public, an abuser may try to upset you in order to discredit you. Stay calm and make sure to let other people know what's going on.  Tell somebody so that they can look out for you. If you are at a bar, tell your friends. If someone is making you uncomfortable, tell a bouncer or bartender exactly what happened so that they can keep an eye out for you and eject the person if needed.   If it happens in the street, tell the people you can see what happened. If you were threatened, report the incident to the police.  

say no firmly.  lie if you need to.  don't give them any of your information.  get away.  stay calm.  make a report. 

 It can be uncomfortable to bring up a conversation about what forms of intimacy you are comfortable with, but it is much better to do this early rather than while you are kissing. If you know that you aren’t ready for certain forms of intimacy, find a time to bring it up so that there aren’t any surprises.   Sometime while you’re hanging out, if there isn’t much to do, simply start a conversation by saying, “Hey, could we talk about something?” You could say something like, “I’ve been having a lot of fun with you, but before things move forward in our relationship, I wanted to talk about our physical relationship. There are certain things that I am ready for and certain things that I am uncomfortable with. Do you mind if we talk about it?”It’s ok if you feel a bit awkward bringing this up. It can be difficult to discuss these matters. You could even acknowledge that you feel a little awkward by saying something like, “I’m not really sure how to bring this up, but I wanted to talk to you about our physical relationship.” Or you could say something like, “There’s something I’ve been wanting to talk to you about. It’s a little awkward, but I was hoping we could discuss it anyway.” You could then start the conversation by saying, “There are certain forms of touch that I enjoy, but other kinds make me uncomfortable.” Decide ahead of time what is ok with you. Maybe you are ok with hand holding and cuddling, but aren’t ready for him to touch your breasts. Decide this before talking to him to make sure that you aren’t pushed out of your comfort zone by what he is ready for.  If your boyfriend is touching you in a way you don’t like, you can start by simply moving his hand away. Maybe he just wanted to try something or got a little carried away. By moving his hand, you are giving him a clear signal that you aren’t comfortable. You can simply move his hand from the area that you don’t like him touching and put it somewhere that you are comfortable with. For example, if he is touching your butt and you don’t like this, move his hand to your hip if you are more comfortable with that, or simply hold his hand in yours. He should get the hint and know to slow down.When moving his hand away you can make eye contact with him, shake your head, and say, “Not yet.” This will clearly communicate that you aren’t ready to be touched like that. You should not have to do this more than once. If he keeps trying, you need to tell him to stop. Instead of moving his hand away, you could move yourself away by scooting over. If you're sitting on the couch together and he's touching you in an uncomfortable way, just scoot further away from him. He should get the message that you didn't like being touched.  If moving his hand isn’t enough and he keeps trying, it’s time to tell him to stop. Anytime a boy touches you in a way that you are not comfortable with, tell him to stop right away. It can be as simple as saying something like, “Hey, not now” or “I’m not ready for that.” You could even just say, “Please don’t do that. You’re making me uncomfortable.” Your boyfriend needs to respect you and move at a pace that you are comfortable with. If he cares about you, he will stop right away and wait until you are both ready.Make sure you stay firm when doing this, or else he might think that you were just flirting or being cute. Make it clear that you aren’t playing “hard to get,” but you’re genuinely uncomfortable. You can even tell him, “I don’t like that.”  , You can explain to your boyfriend what you are feeling so that he understands. You could say, “I really like you, but I feel uncomfortable when you touch me because I’m not ready for that yet.” Maybe you would like him to touch you someday, but it’s moving too fast. You could say something like, “I need more time to be comfortable with that. Let’s slow down.” When he hears that you are genuinely uncomfortable, he should immediately stop pushing it and slow down.Explain to him where you’re at so that he knows why he is making you uncomfortable. You could say something like, “This is my first time being in a relationship, so I’m not comfortable being touched yet.” Don’t be afraid to express how you feel. Just because you are uncomfortable being touched, doesn’t mean you don’t care about him. It just means you aren’t ready for that, and that is perfectly acceptable. You can say something like, “I care about you a lot, but I’m not comfortable being touched like that yet.”  , If you don’t like one way that he touches you, but like other forms of touching, clarify that and let him know what you do enjoy. You could say something like, “I enjoy holding hands and I like it when you put your arm around my shoulder because I feel close to you.” It is important to communicate not only what you don’t like, but also what you do like. This will show him what he can do to make you comfortable while building your relationship. 

talk ahead of time.  move his hand away.  tell him to stop.  explain your reasons.  clarify ways that you are comfortable being touched. 

 If your boyfriend won’t stop touching you after you’ve talked to him, this is a serious problem and a huge lack of respect on his part. Any touching in a relationship must be agreed to by both people. At this point, you need to get distance from him. Get up and walk away. If he asks what you are doing, you could say, “I told you to stop and you didn’t listen. I’m out of here!” and walk out the door. Don’t stick around to argue about it. You don’t owe him an explanation. He owes you a huge apology., If your boyfriend has disrespected you and refused to stop touching you, it is time to involve an adult that you trust. You could tell a parent, older sibling, teacher, coach, religious leader, or counselor. If this happened at school, the boy should be suspended.If it happened outside of school, the boy’s parents need to be involved. If he went even further than touching, law enforcement agencies may need to be involved. Make sure to reach out for help. It is not your job to deal with this alone. The fault is solely on the boy who mistreated you; none of it is your fault.If you aren’t sure how to start the conversation, find a time alone with the adult and say, “Could we talk about something? I’ve been having problems in a relationship.” Then tell the adult what happened and ask for help. You could say, “My boyfriend started touching me in a way I was uncomfortable with, and when I asked him to stop, he wouldn’t listen.”  , Any guy who doesn't respect your wishes doesn't deserve you. You don't even need to say anything, just leave him out in the cold! If you want to say something, you could tell him, “This is over because you disrespected me and I won’t stand for that. Bye!” It's his own fault; he had several chances to stop, and you should never be with someone who doesn't listen to you.If you stick with him and don't deal with it now, you will have problems in the relationship later and will continue to be mistreated. Find someone who respects and cherishes you and don’t settle for anyone who doesn’t.  Don’t ever try to rationalize someone else’s inappropriate behavior. If you feel at all uncomfortable, you need to acknowledge that and take immediate actions to stop what is happening. You never need to feel embarrassed or ashamed if someone is making you uncomfortable. Instead, listen to how you feel and confront the person. You can simply say, “You’re making me uncomfortable. Please stop.” 

move away from him.  tell an adult.  leave him.  listen to your gut. 

 Don't waste time beating around the bush. Just tell him that you know he likes you, and that you're just not interested in him in that way. Tell him you wish it was different and know that it puts you in an uncomfortable place, but that you just don't see him as more than a friend.   Tell him that it wasn't easy for you to open up about this, but that it was necessary. He'll appreciate that you valued him enough to tell him the truth. Just because you're being honest doesn't mean that you should get into the top five reasons why you would never date him. If you're not feeling it, that's okay -- but you don't have to make him feel flawed or not good enough for you.  Don't be wishy-washy about it. If you don't like him, you don't like him. Don't say that you're not at the right place in your life to like him right now, or that you'll think about it in a year, once you're done with school. This will only make you look like a flake. The more firm and clear you are, the more he'll get the message and will leave you alone on the romantic front.   Though it sounds harsh, the most important thing is to not give him hope. If he thinks there's even a chance that you'll like him later, he'll keep waiting for it to happen. Remember that being firm doesn't mean that you have to be cruel. You don't have to say that there's a 0% chance that you'll ever get together, or that there's no way you'd ever go out with him. You will essentially be saying this -- but in a nice way. Don't apologize. Though the situation is uncomfortable, and you feel bad for him, you can't help how you feel.  The worst thing you can do is lie about why you won't go out with him instead of being honest and just saying you're not feeling it. Though you may think that a lie or an excuse will make him feel less rejected, the opposite is actually true. He'll be able to tell if you're bluffing from a mile away, and that will only make him feel worse. If he's really your friend, then you should respect him enough to tell him the truth. Here are some excuses you want to avoid:   Don't say, "My life is just so crazy busy right now." No matter how busy you are, you'd be able to make time for someone special. This will only make him feel unimportant, and even more hurt if he sees you with someone else a few weeks later. Don't say, "It's not you, it's me." Don't make up excuses about how you need to work on yourself before being in a relationship, or that you don't know how to commit or that you have low self-esteem. If you really wanted to be with him, you would be. Don't say, "You can do so much better than me." Don't put yourself down as a way to make him feel better. He won't. Don't say, "I like you but I don't want to ruin our friendship." Unless he's your best friend in the world, how many times is that one true?  , This should be absolutely true. Let him know that he really is an important friend to you, and that you're so lucky to have him. Though you shouldn't say you don't want to date him because he's such a good friend, do say that you hope this doesn't get in between your friendship, and tell him that he's been such an amazing friend to you.   Be sincere. Make eye contact and speak slowly to let him know how much he really means to you. You don't have to go overboard. Don't spend twenty minutes extolling his greatest features. He'll begin to think, "If I'm so great, then why won't she date me?"  , Once you've said your piece, it's likely that he'll have something to say back to you. Maybe he'll ask some questions, ask what he could have done differently, or just tell you he's hurt. Or he'll even show that he's a bit mad, and you'll see that his pride is wounded.   Whatever his reaction, take the time to let him talk to you while you nod, listen, and ask questions at the right time. Don't let it feel like a one-way exchange. Don't interrupt him. If he talks, you'll have a better sense of how deep his feelings are, and it can help you see where the friendship stands. You may find out if he has a harmless crush or has been in love with you for years.  

be honest.  be firm.  don't lie or make excuses.  say how much you value his friendship.  take the time to listen to him. 

 After you've told him your news, you should avoid being awkward about it. After your conversation, it's likely that you'll still see each other, so don't avoid him, blush, or try to run away if you see him. Just keep hanging out with your group of friends, and be nice when you see him.   Don't make things more awkward by telling everyone what happened. If you're in the same group of friends, then everyone around you will be making things awkward too.  Though you can eventually resume your friendship, you should take it easy for a little while. Remember that time you liked a guy who didn't like you back? Well, did you love hanging out with him after you found out the truth? Probably not. He may be hurting just by being around you, so try to cool it on the solo-friendship front.   You can still be nice if you see him in groups, but don't invite him out to movies, coffee dates, or whatever it is you used to do all the time every chance you get. Don't ignore him completely. You can invite him somewhere once in a while so he doesn't feel like you're avoiding him. But wait for him to initiate the friendship move.  It may take time for you to go back to being friends with the guy after he revealed his feelings. But in many cases, this is completely doable, as long as there isn't too much water under the bridge. Give it a few weeks, or even a few months, and resume hanging out just like you used to. Who knows -- maybe you'll even be able to laugh about the situation one day, or find out that you're developing a crush on the guy two years down the road.   Unfortunately, there are some cases where it's just not possible for you to return to your former friendship. The guy may feel too hurt or embarrassed, and being around you may only make him feel worse. If this is the case, then accept it and move on.  

don't make it awkward.  take a break.  go back to being friends. 

 You may prefer to let down an acquaintance gently, but be very clear that you are saying no. Say only what is true, and don't feel required to offer them extra details. You can offer reasons, but don't elaborate to make them feel better. They just need to hear that you are turning them down.Say, for instance, "I value your friendship. I'm not interested in pursuing anything else with you." "I'm not interested, and it's not okay that you asked. You know I'm in a monogamous relationship." "I'm flattered, but I'd rather not get involved with a coworker."  , When you say no, be clear about the fact that this is a closed topic. If you need them to treat you differently now that they've come on to you, say this as well."I don't want you to ask me again. If you do, I will not feel comfortable around you, and I will not want to spend time together anymore." "I am going to tell my partner. Don't give me a hard time about that. If you keep harassing me, I'll tell the rest of our friends as well." "We can talk about this eventually, but I'd rather you not bring it up at work. If you do, I will feel violated and I will have to tell someone to protect myself."  , If your acquaintance crosses a line you set, enact the consequences you promised. If you don't, your acquaintance will continue to cross your lines.Refuse to attend gatherings at which this person is present. Do not hang out or offer friendship to someone who harasses you and makes you feel uncomfortable. Report the interactions to HR if they happen at work.  If this is happening repeatedly, and you have made it clear that you want it to stop, you are being harassed. This is unacceptable, and you should do what you need to do to feel safe. Tell mutual friends, and refuse to attend events at which your aggressor is also present. Explain your reasons to the host.   If it's happening at work, report to your supervisor and to HR, and take it higher up if nobody is helping you. If it's happening at school, tell your teacher, the principal, and your friends. Get a restraining order if you are being contacted or visited against your will.  

be unambiguous.  set clear boundaries and consequences.  hold your boundaries.  shut it down if it continues. 

 You may be angry, and you have every right to be. However, especially if you are alone, swearing, yelling, or otherwise venting your anger could provoke an unstable assailant to attack you. Take deep breaths, tell yourself "this person does not matter to me," and get away as soon as you can., Someone who has previously stalked you or crossed your boundaries may claim to have reformed. They may call and write you emails begging for a response or for the chance to see you one last time, just to apologize. Refuse this, as they may be plotting something worse. If they really wanted to make it up to you, they would leave you alone.Do not reply to any correspondence if you are being stalked. Make sure to save the texts or missed calls, as they will be evidence if the situation continues to worsen.  Save any letters, emails, voicemails, or other correspondence you receive from your aggressor. Take notes after any interactions, noting the time, place, and what was said and done. Photograph any alterations to your physical environment, such as roses left on your doorstep, broken windows, or creepy notes. If you need to build an HR case or a case for a restraining order, this will be of great help. , Predators sometimes resort to spiking drinks with drugs to render victims disoriented and amenable. If you are at a bar or other social event and someone offers you an open drink, especially someone who hit on you, refuse it. If you feel unsafe refusing it, take it politely and dispose of it discretely.Watch your glass. If anyone passes a hand over it, don't drink it. If you feel disoriented, can't remember how you got from one point to another, or are otherwise feeling confused while out on the town, get your friends to take you home immediately. Don't let a stranger help you. Ask for help from a bartender, a friend, or a family member.  Go out with people you trust, and make a plan for the evening. Stay in touch throughout the night, and make sure you have a point person in charge of getting everyone safely home.   It can be hard for drunk people, especially those who have been drugged, to communicate what they want or need. Some people might end up in dangerous situations that look consensual. Make sure you or your group's point person checks in with anyone who is going home with a stranger.  

stay calm.  refuse communication.  document harassment.  don't accept open drinks.  stay in touch with friends when you party. 

 Over communicating with a person can be just as destructive to a relationship as failing to communicate with that person. Make yourself appear needy and insecure by constantly check-in with them via phone call, text, or direct message. Further your cause by contacting them at inappropriate times, such as in the middle of class, a meeting, or a family meal. This will demonstrate that you have little respect for boundaries. With each passing day that you blow up their phone, they may fall more and more out of love with you., Partners accepting of each other’s flaws and quirks. Cast yourself in a shallow and unflattering light by nitpicking every action and decision made by the person who loves you. Criticize their hair, clothing, movie selection, career choice, and car. Your incessant negativity may just drive them away., In many relationships, partners are able to retain some degree of autonomy over their own life. Deny the person you wish to drive away the ability to make a decision without consulting you first. Your domineering facade may motivate them to cut ties with you so that they can regain control of their life. 

call, text, and message them constantly.  be critical of them.  be controlling. 

 If a guy tells you he likes you, tell him the straight, honest truth: you don’t like him back. You can say it in a nice way like, “That’s really sweet, but I just don’t have feelings for you like that,” or “I think you’re really cool and funny, but I don’t like you in the same way." Most guys will take the hint and stop pursuing you.Make sure to talk to him right away. Waiting to act will only confuse him or allow him to keep thinking that he has a chance with you.; , Know that his feelings might be hurt, but it’s your right to draw a boundary for what you want and are comfortable with.   Stick with your rejection. Use clear language like “No, thank you” and “No, I’m not interested” rather than “No, maybe some other time” or “No, not really.” Don’t leave room for the possibility that you’d be interested later, or he might get the idea that he has time to change your mind., Tell him any good practical reasons why it wouldn’t make sense for him to date you. He might respond better to reason.   If you already have a boyfriend or someone you’re interested, that’s an easy reason to give him! If you live on the opposite side of town and wouldn’t be able to easily see him outside of school or work, tell him: “We live so far away, we wouldn’t get to see each other.” If you’re going to a different middle school, high school, or college than him next year, point out to him that this wouldn’t work well.  It’s okay to tell a little white lie to make your point if he won’t leave you alone: “I’m interested in someone else,” “I’m already dating someone,” or “I’m not interested in guys” are all reasonable excuses to get him off your tail, whether true or not.  Ask a friend or think of someone else who’s interested in him, and then explain to him why that person might be a better match. Make sure you have permission from whoever you’re setting him up with. 

be straight with him.  say a clear “no.” say no to reject a guy who asks you to do something you don’t want to do, and he will get the message and likely change his feelings.  give him logical reasons.  use an excuse if you have to.  offer to set him up with someone else. 

 Do NOT freak out. What would you do if your crush screamed when you told him you liked him? Relax. Breathe in and out or count to 10 in your head. You need to stay calm.; , This boy probably worked up a lot of courage to ask you out. If you yell at him or rudely scream "NO!!!" it will hurt him. Even if you HATE this guy, you still need to be a little generous of his feelings. Be kind.  Say something like "Wow, Tyler. I'm flattered." By showing you respect him; you're BOTH less likely to get your feelings hurt in the end.  Here is a very good example: "Tyler, you're a really great person. You seem very nice and I'm flattered. But I just don't really see you in that way. I hope that we can remain friends. I'm sorry."  , It will just cause more problems for both of you.  If he seems okay with it, smile and tell him "Good, because I really hoped we could still be friends." Then explain you have to get to class and CALMLY walk to your classroom.  He will think you really do like him if you try to calm him down and you stay with him. 

remain calm.  be polite.  start by offering help on his part.  calmly explain to him your feelings.  if you have a boyfriend, say so, in a nice way so it won't hurt him.  wait for his response.  if he seems really upset and might cry, tell him sorry and get to class.  if he is or may become violent, walk away quickly and tell a trusted adult.  

 Be polite about it, but be equally clear that you aren't going to go on a date with this person. Don't beat around the bush. If you're sure, then be sure. Say exactly what you mean.If you feel bad, say, "I'm sorry, but I don't want to go on a date with you," or "I'm sorry, but I'm not interested." Make yourself absolutely clear. You don't need to apologize for not being interested, but it might make the words go over more easily. If you wan to make a quick excuse, then say, "I already have plans," or "I have a boy/girlfriend." Be careful: if you lie, then you might be found out. If you don't make it clear that you aren't interested, then the person might ask you out again. If the person has asked you out disrespectfully, then you don't need to make any bones about saying no. Just say, "no," or "I'm not interested."; , You don't want this person to believe that he/she has a "chance" with you. If you leave things open, then you may need to decline another date down the line. Make a clean break so that this person can deal with his/her feelings and move on with life.Make sure to actually say the word "no." You might also say, "I don't want to go on a date with you," or "I'm not interested." Be as explicit as possible.  If a person won't leave you alone, then do not hesitate to ask for help. Call a friend or a family member to come help you get out of the situation.   In extreme cases, if you feel very unsafe, then you may need to call the police or get a restraining order. Only do this if someone is threatening you or making you feel otherwise violated.  

say "no.",  don't lead the person on.  ask your friends for backup. 

 In a healthy relationship, couples make time for one another in their busy schedules. If you wish to passively hint that this person is no longer worth your time, limit your interactions with them. Instead of hanging out with your partner or the person crushing on you, pick up a hobby, play video games, hang out with other people, or become highly focused on your career. Eventually, they may decide you aren’t worth their time either.   When you do spend time together, act distracted or leave early., Couples loyally support each other through the highs and the lows of life. If you wish to give this person a reason to stop loving you, revoke your support. Do not attend their sporting events or concerts. Do not ask them about their test or pitch. When they come to you for help or advice, minimize their problems or support the other party. Your inability to provide moral support, may make them search for someone more loyal., Partners rely on words and actions to communicate their feelings with each other. By withholding your ability to be vulnerable, you will successfully create an emotional void in your relationship. Refuse to share your feelings—when you are hurt, refuse to talk about it. Avoid all forms of physical contact. Overtime, they may deem you emotionally unavailable and an undesirous partner. 

stop making your relationship a priority.  do not show any support.  act distant. 

 Do not flippantly decide to terminate a relationship or convince an individual that you are not worth loving. Before you take any actions you may later regret, pause to contemplate your desire to emotionally distance yourself from this person. Furthermore, determine if you can commit to cutting this individual out of your life., It is possible to end a relationship or clarify any misconceptions in a respectful, courteous, and civil manner. Engage this individual in an honest and open dialogue about your decision to terminate the relationship or your lack of romantic feelings towards them. After you have explained yourself, stop talking and allow the person to respond.Avoid pointing the finger at the other person. Use “I-statements” to communicate your feelings. (“I feel ___ when you ___ because ___”).  It is unrealistic to assume that you are capable of or entitled to controlling someone’s emotions. This person is not required to reciprocate your desire to move on or your lack of romantic feelings. Allow them to feel what they feel and give them the time and space they need to process this change. 

consider your decision carefully.  discuss your feelings and decision with the individual.  accept that the other person is entitled to react as they choose. 

 Simply avoiding places where he goes or hangs out, if possible, will send him a message. If he never sees you, he will likely stop thinking about you or trying to pursue you as much.  Get on your social media accounts like Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, and Snapchat, and block him from seeing your posts and photos and interacting with you. All of the major social network sites and apps have easy ways of un-friending and blocking any user you want., Try asking his friends or using what you already know about what he doesn’t like to make yourself less desirable to him. If he hates a certain sports team, start talking to him about only that team. If the sound of chewing gum or humming drives him nuts, start doing those things around him.  An out-there move to try is acting the complete opposite and give him a lot of attention. Be completely overbearing and demanding of his attention, even acting like you’re already in a relationship. Take it to a ridiculous level if you need to. It may be that he just wanted the attention from you and will leave you alone once he gets it, or he will be so turned off by your over-attentiveness that he’ll back off. 

avoid him.  block him on social networks.  find out what he dislikes and start doing it.  use reverse psychology. 

 Ask one of your friends or a friend of the guy who likes you to try talking to him about how you’re not interested and he should give it up. He might listen better when it comes from someone else.   Also ask your friends or his friends to stop making jokes about the two of you getting together, or any other encouragement they try to give him. The guy that likes you might just want the attention or be pursuing you because his friends egg him on.  If you feel really annoyed or threatened by him, it’s a good time to talk to a parent or other adult for more help. Just tell them that there’s a guy who likes you and won’t leave you alone. The adult can offer you more advice, or talk to the guy or his parents.   If you feel uncomfortable talking to a parent or other adult, try writing down what you want to say first before you say it. Also decide what you want from the adult beforehand so you can ask them. Say, “I just want you to help me figure out what to do about something,” or, “I need you to talk to someone’s parents for me.”, If a guy still persists with unwanted attention in any way after you’ve made it clear with your speech and actions that you aren’t interested, talks or sends messages in a way that is threatening, or shows up at your house or somewhere to see you uninvited, speak up and tell the police.  

talk to a friend.  talk to your parents or trusted adults.  talk to the police if things get bad. 

 You absolutely have the right to say no if you aren't interested. That said: you don't need to be cruel in order to decline a date. Try to empathize with the person. Be kind and straightforward.Say, "I know how it feels, and I feel bad to let you down like this." Say, "I hope we can still be friends. I'm not interested in you romantically, but I do truly value you as a human being."Think of a time when you felt rejected. Consider what you can do to make the rejection less harsh.  The more of a connection you make with a person, the harder it can be to brush off his/her offer of a date. Keep your conversation light. Focus on broad and basic topics. That said: you may need to get serious if you are asked out by a friend or someone that you already know well.  If it feels right, mention someone you know that you think would adore the person that you declined. Offer to introduce this person to someone that you think he/she would like. Be aware that this is only appropriate in situations where a person is asking you out casually.   If a friend or acquaintance is absolutely in love with you and asks you out, then it may not be kind to immediately suggest an alternative. Be compassionate and respectful. If a stranger strikes up a conversation in the supermarket and asks you on a date, then this might be the perfect opportunity to set him/her up with a friend of yours. Make sure that you're suggesting a match that might actually work – not just making an excuse to escape.  

be compassionate.  try not to go too deep.  suggest someone else. 

 Do this in private to avoid embarrassing him. Explain that you're only interested in being friends and that you don't want to hurt his feelings. Talking to him will help him realize the truth. Don't give any hope of a romantic relationship in the future.Say something like, “You're really sweet, but I don't want to ruin our friendship. Let's keep it platonic.” Talk to him in person. Don't hide behind a text message or computer screen. Tell him yourself. Asking your friends to relay the message only will make everyone feel awkward.; , Avoid being rude or hurtful, even if he repulses you. If you have to work with him or go to school with him, that could make things worse for you. Simply say, “Hi” when you pass each other and keep walking. Limit your facial expressions to a slight smile. If you have to talk to him for a group project, focus on the task at hand., This will totally defeat your goal of letting him know you don't like him. Don't play with your hair or make too much eye contact. These actions draw too much attention to yourself. Avoid standing or sitting too close or playfully stroking his hand. This could send the wrong message. 

talk to him about the situation.  treat him with civility.  don't flirt with him. 

 This step may be the only one you need. Dropping hints won't always work for some guys, and this will confirm that you do not have any feelings for him. That way, he won't have to keep guessing, and you can clear the problem before it gets worse.; , If he stares at you, act like you can't see him. In other words, completely ignore him. If he tries to talk to you, act as if you didn't hear him while turning to the nearest person and beginning to talk to them. That way, he won't dare interrupt your conversation, unless if he is determined enough to.   If he does interrupt your conversation, shoot him a warning look while politely but firmly saying, "Please don't interrupt this conversation." It helps if your close friends know about this situation. That way, they can help you avoid him and start talking to you if he tries to approach you.  This way, he'll be unable to take any part in your social life outside of school, and you won't have to constantly ignore his calls or persistent messaging.  If he tries to stand next to you, keep moving away from him. However, if you want to be safer, go to the restroom, where he can't possibly follow you unless he is a stalker.  Pretend you're looking at him - this will rouse his interest and excitement. However, pretend to spot someone/something behind him. This will make him disappointed as he will think you don't even know he exists, which will mean that he will stop thinking that you like him. This is harsh; therefore, only do this if absolutely necessary.   Keep in mind that if this trick is performed incorrectly (ex: your pretending to spot someone/something behind him isn't strong enough for him to catch it), it could worsen your situation and make the guy think you do like him.  If you have a class with him, sit far away and make sure all seats near you are taken. If you are forced to be with him for a project or extracurricular activity with a lot of other people, pretend he doesn't exist. If you cannot possibly avoid him, tell him to leave you alone. You could also tell whoever is in charge about your "problem" and ask them to steer him away from you in partner projects. You could have them inform him that you aren't comfortable. This is embarrassing, but almost always works for most teachers are understanding.  You could say something along the lines of: "Remember when John fell and couldn't get up? I think he needs life alert" or "Remember when Danny got the math question wrong? He started crying like a baby! Wimp!" If he overhears, he might back off a bit, for this may make him think you are joking with one of your friends who likes him. He'll think he had it all wrong. Unfortunately, he might fall for one of your friends.  He needs to know when enough is enough, and he will back off if he respects you. He will also start to think that you are getting annoyed with him.  This has a powerful impact. However, as much as you want to get rid of him, don't be too mean or cruel. Otherwise, you might harm your reputation, and he might want to get back at you in some horrible way.  

tell him you don't like him.  pretend that he doesn't exist.  forbid your friends to give him your personal info, including your telephone number, msn address, email address, etc.  one way guys try to get a girl's attention is to hover around her or try to have physical contact with her (ex: brushing past).  although this can be risky, this trick will put him down if you do this correctly.  stay away from him as much as possible.  whenever your friends talk about him, make fun of him a little bit, but be careful not to get carried away.  if he keeps on flirting with you like hitting you in the head or messing with your hair, simply turn around and firmly tell him to stop.  smile when he is upset about you not liking him. 

 Everything you accomplish in life should always start with a good long deep breath. Just to get you ready. Or for the sake of it!; , You are just trying to live your life, one day after another and he/she got in the way! He/She is not necessarily bad but today, you just have some other business to attend to. You do not need him/her as an admirer. Period.  Just look as neutral as possible. You are not fake, but you are not cruel either. You are just you, delivering an unpleasant message.  

take a deep breath.  remember that, even if you feel like you are doing something wrong, it is not your fault!,  stop smiling, stop frowning, stop wearing masks. 

 Does the guy seem to appear out of nowhere with flowers, or just wanting to talk? Maybe it’s because he knows you get to school at the same time every morning. Switch up your routine and see if that helps to avoid him a little better.   If you do have classes together, arrive at the very last minute -- just make sure you have a friend save a seat for you (one that’s not anywhere near him). Don’t try to change your classes altogether. That could hurt your grades and is not the best solution in the long run.; , If you do have to arrive at school early or stay late, make sure you keep busy so you’re not alone for long periods of time. He’ll be less likely to approach you if you’re working with a teacher, especially.   See if you can help out around the school. Your librarian could probably use some assistance shelving or sorting books (and that’s the kind of thing that looks good on your college resume, too!).  Not only will picking up a different hobby help you surround yourself with new people and avoid the guy, but you may also find you’re so busy with a new passion you don’t really care about the situation anymore.Do your research first and make sure it’s not a group the guy is already part of. If it’s not a good time to join a new club, see if there are any volunteer opportunities in your community you could be part of.  A good way to change your schedule and your surroundings is to add new people to the mix. Have you noticed someone eating alone at lunch? Join them. Or is there someone who seems to understand concepts in algebra that you just don't get? Ask for help. Making new friends puts you in situations away from your admirer, and you might make long-lasting bonds in the process.   A new friend may also have good advice for how to avoid the guy.  Popping up in the places where you know he usually hangs out sends the wrong message. Try to stay away from areas where you can usually find him.   Sometimes it’s unavoidable, like if you both play the same sport or have similar schedules. Don't skip school or give up your passions in an effort to avoid him. If you must be in the same vicinity as each other, stay focused on the task at hand.  No matter how brave or persistent the guy seems, your admirer is probably too shy to approach you when you’re in a big group of friends. Try to avoid being alone.   Always eat lunch with a group, and try to go to the bathroom with a friend, too. Your friends may get tired of having to accompany you everywhere if they don’t know why you’re asking them to do it. Be sure to let them know about the situation.  

time your day accordingly.  find ways to occupy yourself.  join (or start) a new club.  make a new friend.  stay away from his usual hangouts.  surround yourself with a group. 

 A guy who likes you is looking for reasons to believe that you like him back. Hang out with your other friends. Find another place to sit at lunch. If you share friends with this guy, don't pay so much attention to him when you do hang out. After about 15 minutes or so, excuse yourself and say you need to be alone or be somewhere else., Physical contact is often a form of intimacy. Limit it to a friendly handshake, a high five, or a fist bump. Don't hug him, hold hands, or dance with him. Definitely don't kiss him. Treat him the same way you treat other friends and acquaintances., Cut back on the “likes” you give to his posts. He might interpret too many likes as an interest in him. Retweet or share only what you think is really important. Turn off your chat function to avoid lengthy conversations., Sometimes, guys misinterpret civility for attraction or flirtation. If this happens, avoid him to the fullest extent. Unfollow him on social media. Block his phone number. Casually turn in the opposite direction if you see him coming your way. This should give him a clear message.  If he refuses to leave you alone, tell someone. This could be your parents, a trusted teacher or guidance counselor, a school security guard, or a police officer. Don't let him make you feel unsafe for feelings you have no control over. 

don't hang out with him too often.  limit physical contact.  limit online contact.  ignore him, if necessary. 

 This could send him mixed messages. If you feel like you're going to cry, think of something that makes you laugh to counter the tears. If that doesn't work, make an excuse that you have to be somewhere else and walk away., It's okay to confide in your best friend, but don't tell everyone that you think he's creepy or needy. Less considerate friends might taunt him and make things awkward. If anyone mentions that he thinks you like him, say something like, “Well, he's nice and all, but I only like him as a friend.”, Don't worry if your friends think he's cute or sweet. If he just doesn't do it for you, that doesn't make you a bad person. You can't force yourself to like him. Celebrate this as something that makes you unique., He might try to make you feel guilty for rejecting him. Deep breathing will allow you to control your guilt and not dwell so much on his behavior. Inhale slowly through your nose. Exhale slowly through your mouth. Focus on staying calm and doing what's best for you. 

don't show sadness in front of him.  avoid badmouthing him.  accept that you can't be attracted to everyone.  take deep breaths. 

 Even if it is loud around you, even if you feel like he/she might not be as sober as you are, just make sure that your message will be said and understood. Once in for all.  You are not making fun of anyone here, just being honest and as straight forward as possible. Forget about this "it's not you, it's me" crap. No one likes a liar, and everybody hates fake people. However, only refer to facts and try not to attack him/her with emotions. Don't say that his/her conversation is boring. On the contrary, say that it is interesting, but that it is just not something you want to talk about.  Don't say all these things and then apologize (because, remember, it is not your fault). Admit that you like the attention but make it clear that you don't want to go further and wish he/she let you alone. Try to make it sound definitive without creating a cruel "doomsday" atmosphere.  

look at him/her in the eye and talk as clearly as you can.  go straight to the point and admit that you are just not interested.  don't go back and forth. 

 But be careful, almost over does not mean completely over! Indeed, you just delivered a very unpleasant message and you need to make sure that it has been perfectly understood.Try to ask simple yes/no questions such as "Are you OK?" or "Do you understand what I am telling you?". You should avoid questions such as "What do you think?". What you said is not open to discussion and he/she does not have a say in it. It is your decision and there is nothing else to say about it.  People tend to misinterpret this kind of meaningless move. You do not want him/her to secretly think "OK i got your message but your body language clearly indicates that you actually want more of me".  Your mission here has been accomplished and you need to move on. Do not look back. There is nothing to feel bad about. You had to do it and you mastered it. This is how nice people handle adult situations!  

breath out, it is almost over.  if you feel comfortable enough with the person, try a nice gesture such as a gentle stroke on the shoulder but do not hug!,  just go. 

 Your not-so-secret admirer needs to know how you feel, but you don’t necessarily have to talk in person. Confrontation may be too uncomfortable for both of you, and it’s often easier to express your feelings when you have time to think about what you want to say. Send him an email or write an old-fashioned letter if it makes you more comfortable.   A text message can work, too. Just make sure that you take some time to explain what you’re feeling rather than just sending off a quick text. Don’t show all your friends your messages or notes (especially his responses). That could hurt the guy’s feelings. If you really need feedback on your wording, consult one or two trusted friends.  Inconsistency is a surefire way to let the crush linger on, so don’t talk to him sometimes and then shut him out at other times. Avoid sending mixed signals and make sure you stick to your plan to really get the guy out of the picture.Be cordial, but not rude, when you do see him. For example: don’t go out of your way to talk to him, but respond if he talks to you in a group.  If you have done your best to avoid the guy and he still won’t leave you alone, it’s time to confront the situation head on. Tell him kindly that you just really don’t have feelings for him. Remember that if you’re nice to him, he’s likely to be nice to you, too.Saying “I think you are really nice, but I just don’t have feelings for you,” is a good way to let him down gently. Don’t make excuses for why you don’t like him. It’s perfectly fine to admit you just don’t feel the same way. Honesty is (usually) the best policy.You don’t have to tell him the thought of dating him makes you cringe, but don’t tell him you don’t want to date anyone right now if you plan on finding a boyfriend soon.  

write to him.  stick to it.  talk to him. 

 If the dude keeps messaging you on Instagram or sending you romantic Snapchats that you don’t really want, fix the problem at the source by removing him from your friends’ lists.   Check your privacy settings to make sure he can’t see any of your activity or send you messages after you block him. Be prepared that removing him from your social media accounts may hurt his feelings. Use this as a last resort., If a guy just won’t leave you alone, it’s time to talk to someone. First of all, consider talking to him directly. If the problem doesn’t subside after a while, you should probably reach out to an adult.   Stalking is a serious offense, and it's more common in high school than you'd think. Your high school counselor or a trusted teacher can help you handle the guy and keep you safe.  It’s easy to dwell on a situation like this, especially if you’re afraid you’ve hurt the guy’s feelings. But try your best not to. After he’s finally gotten the hint, rejoice in your freedom! Then let go, for the good of your mental health.Try not to talk negatively about the guy during the situation or after. That won’t make you feel any better, and it’s a drain on everyone else.  

block him on social media.  talk to an adult about the situation.  let it go. 

 Tell her that you're flattered that she seems to to like you but that you're not in a place to date anyone right now. Help her to understand that this means you're busy and emotionally unavailable. Some good excuses include:   "I'm really focused in work/sport's try outs, etc., right now" "School comes first".; , Hopefully she'll leave you alone. If she does not, continue with the remaining steps.  Whenever she tries to come near you, pretend like you cannot see her there and talk right through her to your buddies. This might break her heart, but that's what you want right?  , A smile will always be interpreted as encouragement.  Never answer her messages, not even to say you're not interested; that's an acknowledgment of reading it and that gives her too big an angle.  This will increase her hope and it will be too easy to put a false slant on your enthusiasm.  If she persists and seems nice enough, match her with someone else!  

talk to her.  give her a few days to let this information sink in.  avoid making eye contact.  nod whenever you pass casually in the hallway and don't smile, so that it's not a greeting, but an acknowledgment.  don't pick up that phone if she calls you!,  resist having any conversations with her.  find someone for her to hook up with. 

 Is he really flirting? Try to see if he flirts with several others-maybe it is juts in his nature to flirt and he isn't planning on approaching you personally for a relationship. In this case, just be polite to him but don't flirt back and give him short answers.; , It may mean that he's going to ask you out, and you must be prepared. Take hints from the conversations. Does he excessively compliment you, especially on looks, voice, etc? Do these comments seem to be those which may appear between two people in love?  , Don't be too brash about it at first. If you are unsure about whether or not he is pursuing you for friendship or a relationship, it may help to casually mention how strict your parents are regarding relationships. Don't directly indicate him. Just mention it-say something like, "Yeah, my education and career really matter to me. I'm probably only going to start dating once I'm in medical school. I have no relationships with guys like that."  , In school, walk with a friend at all times if possible. If you are alone, appear busy or rushed. If you are friends on Facebook, put him on a special "list" and appear offline more and more so he can't message you. If he posts on your wall or messages/e-mails you, give him short answers to show you are not interested.  Sometimes, it may just be that he's a desperate boy out there for a girlfriend. While this may seem creepy, it is important to appear confident. You are your own person and no one has the right to own you.  The boy might ask you out right up front, or he'll begin a conversation with you to ask you out. You should normally be able to tell. When boys seek to ask out girls, they'll start it with a very flirtatious conversation and compliment you more than they normally do. They might mention how you are a good team and meant for each other (in their opinion). If this happens, go on to the next step.  You should ideally have a response ready in your mind beforehand. Be firm and tell him you are not interested in him, and you never were, "I've never been interested in you. I was just being friendly because I didn't want to be rude. I don't like how you kept pursuing me. Leave me alone, I mean it."  , If online, pause, think over what you must say, and type it in. If you are on the phone, put the phone down to think over what to say. Then, text message him your message or tell him on Facebook/email.  You might feel creeped out by him, and won't want to talk to him anymore. This is a good idea-it will stop him from pursuing you more. Block him off your Facebook, email, etc. Stop accepting his phone calls and ignore him in school.  

be calm at first and assess the situation.  if this boy is a flirt but is flirting more excessively with you than anyone else, be on the cautious side.  if you don't want to have a relationship, you should try to make it clear first off.  try not to be caught alone when he may bother you.  keep in mind that while the above mentioned steps will help, they are not guaranteed to stop him.  the worst just may happen.  if you are meeting in person, you have no choice but to immediately respond.  if the encounter happens on facebook/email or over the phone, you have time and are lucky.  it's most likely that after this, you and the boy will avoid each other. 

 The best way to avoid him is to avoid certain areas you know he’ll be at certain times. If you tend to bump into him on a daily basis, try walking a different way to class, or to wherever it is you are going. If you see him at your locker, try changing the time you go to drop off and pick up books.; , If he’s in your class and sits in the front, try sitting in the back. If you eat lunch at a table he sits at, try switching it up and sit with a different friend group. Changing where you sit every day can also be a good way to change your routine and meet new people while avoiding the boy., The easiest way to avoid a person is to avoid people that he hangs out with. If you have mutual friends, you’ll want to think about who he will be with on what days. If you have multiple friend groups, you can just bop around between the ones that aren’t friends with him while you sort out your feelings.   If you have a good friend he hangs out with, confide in that person that you are trying to avoid him. They’ll be able to help you out by telling you where he is if they’re hanging out with him.  Just as important as avoiding him in person is avoiding him online. Don’t read messages or updates from him, and definitely avoid responding to posts he makes. You can hide his updates from your Facebook feed while still staying friends. Out of sight, out of mind!, If he has your number and calls you or texts you, keep your messages short and to the point. If he texts you and asks what you’re up to, just tell him “not much” and don’t ask what he’s up to.   Keep in mind, if you are just trying to avoid him for a short time period, you don’t want to give him signals that you don’t like him. You just want to avoid carrying on a long conversation that will put you in an awkward situation.  If the situation is dire and you can’t stop thinking about him, try picking up a new hobby. This way you can avoid putting yourself in a situation where you’ll see him, and you can give yourself a distraction to keep from thinking about him.Do something that will take your total concentration, like doing a puzzle. You can also find something to do outdoors, like identifying plants or insects.  

change your schedule.  change seats.  avoid hanging out with his friends.  avoid online contact.  keep texts or calls short.  pick up a new hobby. 

 Be absolutely certain that you aren't interested in trying to pursue a dating relationship with this person; it isn't a good idea to cast this person aside only to realize you did so because of nerves, fears or because your friend felt jealous. The reason to help a crush realize that you're just not interested must be because you truly aren't interested, period, ever.; , Any normal person will be worried about inflicting emotional pain on another––be reassured that this confirms you're emotionally attuned. However, it is important to realize that it's far kinder to let someone down early on than to play games, lead them on and then toss them away when it all gets "too serious", just because you were terrified of telling the truth initially.   Feeling embarrassed is normal but not a reason to be callous or to withhold your own true feelings. Don't ignore the issue. Ignored issues turn into big problems that are much harder to deal with.  This may feel like a way of diffusing the discomfort of the situation but laughing about it will likely be hurtful for your crush. Remember that telling someone how you feel about him or her is a huge step, a giant risk, and being laughed back at is very alarming. Stifle the desire to make a joke or laugh. Instead:   Try saying something like: "I really appreciate you telling me that you like me. I'm really flattered, Jane." Explain the way in which you're flattered according to the context of the conversation with your admirer.  This could also be stated as: "Don't beat around the bush." In other words, tell your crush politely and kindly that you don't feel the same way. After explaining that you're flattered that he or she feels this way from the previous step, it's important to go straight to this honesty.   Say something simple like: "As I said, I'm really flattered John, but I'm sorry––I just don't feel the same level of connection with you. I love our friendship and I'm keen to stay good friends." Avoid going into heavy details as to why you're not able/ready/wanting to get involved, such as getting over someone still or focusing on your career right now. Sometimes too many details can give hooks for the listener to grasp onto, leaving open a possibility that "if X happens, then I am in with a chance." Don't leave yourself open to this––it is just too risky.  Just because someone you once shared good times with, had a friendship with or had a good working relationship with has since declared his or her feelings for you doesn't mean the two of you need to maintain distance from now on or pretend that nothing happened. Not only did something momentous happen between you, for those of you still staying in regular contact through friends, work or social relationships, it is important to stay honest and open with each other. Accept that things will feel a little awkward for a time but as time passes, you'll both be able to acknowledge this occurrence with friendly hindsight and you may even develop a stronger friendship for it.   If you don't want to preserve the relationship with this person, it's fairly easy to do––avoid him or her, don't spend time around him or her in the company of mutual friends and ask to be reassigned so that you don't have to work together. But that's an awful lot of trouble to go to rather than simply acknowledging each other and being prepared to talk respectfully to each other.  This goes back to the feelings of discomfort you may have felt initially, when you were mulling over what to say in return to your unwanted crush. The reality is that the feelings of this person belong to him or her––you didn't make this person feel a certain way and you cannot carry the blame for how he or she continues to feel. At some point in your own life, you will feel strongly about someone who won't feel the same way back. Realize that while you will be hurt by this person's lack of returning the feelings, you also realize that you're fully responsible for your own feelings in the matter.   See the episode compassionately. Provided you've done your best to let down your unwanted crush politely and kindly, you can move on with integrity.  

make sure there really are no chances.  acknowledge your own sense of embarrassment or discomfort about the situation but don't let this deflect you from your mission of telling it like it is.  once you've tackled your own feelings, quell any desire to laugh off your crush.  be concrete about how you feel.  stay open with one another.  avoid the guilt trip. 

 Even if it is your absolute favorite movie or TV show, give it a wide berth for a while. If you get to the stage where you feel guilty about not watching it, this is when you know your obsession is out of hand! Hide their films away at least for a while.   If you see this actor in theater, stop going to the theater shows until you're over this actor.; , This can be hard, especially if you spent all that time gathering pictures of the actors to use as your wallpaper. However, it's best to delete them, as this will stop that connection and you won't see the actor's face every time you turn on your phone.  You do not have to take them down for good, just until you stop obsessing over them, that way when you put it back up you can appreciate them as an actor not your 'future husband'.  Okay, so the advantage of a crush on an actor is that you can find out lots about this person by just a click of a button. It might help therefore to read a bad film critic or some bad comments about this actor, then use this negativity to get over him/her!  , Or, avoid Twitter for a while. If you are at the obsessing stage and have tried to make contact with them, it's now time to stop. It is likely the actor will not reply and if they do, it will be out of sympathy or a routine message sent from their minders or their book of "fan messages".  So sure you may have seen their interviews, read all about them, seen all their tweets, watched all their movies, but this does not mean you know everything about them. The only things you know about them are the public things you do not truly know them. What you are doing is fantasizing and filling int the gaps to suit yourself, imaging up the ideal person without knowing the reality. That is super unhealthy and can cause you to do the same thing to real people you do know if you don't take care.  It may sound harsh but the majority of the time they have wives/husbands, families or boyfriends/girlfriends. So, no matter what you tell yourself, they are not going to up sticks and leave that behind because of a tweet you sent them.  For example, if you fancied Johnny Depp, you need to avoid writing Mrs Depp everywhere!  , If you are too busy obsessing over an actor, it may affect your real life. Wondering why you haven't got a boyfriend/girlfriend? Perhaps its because you are too busy crushing over your actor crush to open your eyes to the real world. Maybe nobody can measure up to this fantasy image of a person you've created in your head––if that's the case, it really is time to come back down to earth.  

stop watching films or tv shows that this actor is in.  delete photos of this actor from your phone.  take down posters of the actor.  look up bad critics of the actor.  if you follow the actor on twitter, unfollow now!,  understand that you cannot love somebody you do not know.  keep telling yourself that you don't have a chance with the actor.  avoid substituting the actor's last name as your last name.  be aware of how this obsession is eating into your real life. 

 If you can’t physically avoid him, the next best thing to do is to ignore him. If you sit across the room from him in class and he is looking your way, don’t get caught looking at him when he’s looking at you.Of course, if he is talking directly to you, you don’t want to run away or pretend like he’s not there! Just play it cool and be polite.  If he makes a funny joke, avoid laughing at it. You like him, so you’ll want to smile, but try to go easy on it for a while. You don’t want to make it totally obvious and bring more attention to yourself., If you can’t avoid passing him in your daily routine, make the exposure time minimal. This way you can remove any opportunity for an awkward conversation or smiling at him. If you’re on your way to class, you can pretend like you are running late. Just keep your head down and walk faster!  , If you can’t walk away from the situation, use your body language to deflect his attention. If he approaches you at the bus stop, give him signs that you are not interested in starting a conversation. Keep your arms crossed. Don’t face his direction -- turn your back if you can.Stay busy with a task, even if it is silly, such as rearranging some papers, so that you appear unavailable and uninterested in what he’s doing.  

avoid eye contact.  avoid laughing or smiling at him.  walk quickly.  use body language to make yourself look unavailable. 

 While you’re avoiding him or ignoring him, you need to consider ways to resolve the situation because he isn’t going to suddenly disappear. How do you feel about him? What do you want your relationship to look like? Think about what you specifically want out of a relationship, whether it is friendship or something more.  If it’s someone you know well and see a lot, he’s probably unavoidable and hard to ignore. If you find yourself getting worked up over seeing him, try some relaxation methods, such as stretching out and taking a deep breath. Remind yourself it is all a passing thing., Some situations might take a lot of time to work out. This might mean that you confess your feelings openly to find that he feels the same way. Or it might mean that he doesn’t feel the same way. Or that you both feel the same way but still want to be friends and take it easy. 

sort out your feelings.  play it cool.  be patient. 

 If you're having trouble getting over this person because of their good looks, try to think of some of their other flaws. For example, think of a time when this person behaved in a mean way toward you or your friends. You can't get anywhere in life just by sitting there and looking pretty.; 

switch fantasy for flaws. 

 Healthy self-confidence is great, but there's a difference between being confident and being cocky. If you think this guy seems a little too confident in his efforts to win you over, it could be because he's had plenty of practice.   Most people become at least a little nervous around people they're attracted to. A confident guy isn't necessarily a player, but if he doesn't break a sweat while asking you out or seems rather aloof about the whole deal, he might not be that serious about you.; , If the man is old enough to be your father, it could be a bad sign. Older players who are set in their ways frequently target younger, less experienced women who are easier to trick.   Not every older man is a player, of course, but if there's a huge age gap and he exhibits other signs of being a player, that age gap may work against him. Similarly, not every player is an older man. There are plenty of young players out in the world, too.  When he's texting someone, lean in his direction and peek at his phone. You don't even need to see the screen; in fact, you'll learn more by keeping your eyes on him. If the guy's a player, he'll probably yank his phone away faster than you can blink.   Moreover, if he's always on his phone or looks at it more than he looks at you, that could be another bad sign. This piece of advice isn't an invitation to swipe his phone and look at his call log, though. Many people view that as an invasion of privacy, and even guys who aren't players might get upset at the breach of trust. You usually won't need his text or call history as evidence, anyway, since being overprotective of his phone is a bad enough sign on its own.  If he still visits the same spots he went to when he was single and picking up women, there's a good chance that he's still in the habit of charming the ladies there.   This does not mean that you should stalk him. A healthier way to find out where he's going is ask around and find out who might've seen him and where he was when it happened. You could also try visiting the spot you met him on an evening he might be there.  Honest compliments are sweet, but you probably shouldn't trust someone who's quick to flatter you to an excessive degree. Players often rely on this sort of “sweet talk” to win over women.   Pay attention to the types of compliments he gives you. If they're general, overused compliments that could apply to nearly any woman—beautiful hair, gorgeous smile, etc.—it could be a sign that he isn't putting much thought into who you are and what makes you special. You should also be cautious around men who specifically compliment your insecurities. Similarly, most players are quick to address you with one or more pet names, like “honey,” “sugar,” and “baby.” Pet names that develop after an extended relationship are usually okay, but be wary around guys who use pet names from day one.  Players are also liars. Catching him in the middle of a lie can be difficult, but when you do, you shouldn't shrug it off. This is especially true if he's lied to you more than once.   Lies about his past, where he spent time recently, or who he's been with are some of the most common ones to watch out for. If you're suspicious about something and confront him about it, watch his reaction. Players will generally try to laugh it off and change the topic. When that doesn't work, they may admit to the truth but somehow blame you for their lie.  Most players are egotistical, so they'll start talking about themselves before you even have the chance to ask. If a guy hasn't shared much about his own life, though, ask him about it and watch for inconsistencies.   Everyone wants to look good in front of someone they're attracted to, but the player will usually look a little too good. If his life story seems scripted and too good to be true, it probably is. Pay attention to the details. If some of the details don't match up, it could be an indication that he's lying about who he is.  Since most players are overly concerned with themselves, they don't have much time to be concerned with other people. A guy who is genuinely interested in you will want to know about your life and your passions, but a player won't take the time to find out.   Skilled players may know well enough to ask about your life, but won't be interested enough to remember what you say. Bring up things you've talked about in past conversations. It's probably fine if he occasionally forgets about small details, but it's usually a bad sign if he makes a habit of forgetting.  Ask about his past relationships and talk about yours. These conversations provide the player with opportunities to manipulate your feelings.   He may ask about your past relationships and fixate on the insecurities you felt during those times. By knowing what makes you insecure, he can figure out how to work that to his advantage. When talking about his own past relationships, he may leave out many of the details but stress that he's been hurt in the past. A quick mention of past hurts may not be bad, but if he plays it up to evoke pity from you, it may be another manipulation tactic.  Players will often accuse the women they're seeing of cheating on them. Usually, this is done in an attempt to steer the attention away from their own guilt and their own cheating ways.  Pay attention to how the guy asks you out and how he responds when you invite him. Good guys will value your time, but a player won't.   Players usually ask you out on short notice. Since they aren't genuinely looking forward to seeing you, they turn you into a backup plan and ask you out only when they don't have anything “better” lined up for an evening. If you always get a “maybe” from the guy when you ask him out, it could mean that he doesn't want to commit in case another, more preferable offer comes up. A man who frequently cancels last-minute might do so for similar reasons.  Players are inconsistent in their affections and may sway from one extreme to the other. You may not hear from him in weeks, and then suddenly, he'll start bombarding you with more attention than you can handle.   During “cold” periods, there's a good chance that he's spending his time with other women and is too busy with them to bother with you. During his “hot” periods, he's either lost his other options or lost interest in them. As a result, he returns to you in an effort to fill the void.  If the two of you always meet at night, try asking him for a daytime date. Most players will strongly resist and reject the idea, and the excuses they give for doing so are usually pretty lame.   If you can't change the time of the date, try changing the nature of it. Instead of spending time alone or going out for drinks, go somewhere with plenty of people and very little alcohol. The guy's odds of getting you into bed will decrease when you do this, so if he's a player, he won't be willing to make the change.  Try to maintain eye contact when you're together in a public venue. Your eyes don't need to be locked the entire time, but his eyes should be directed your way for most of the date.   Note that the occasional wandering eye may not be a terrible sign, but if his eyes are constantly wandering toward other people, there's a problem. Similarly, a wandering eye that remains stuck on another woman is also a bad sign.  A player only cares about your body—and, more precisely, whether or not he gets to enjoy it. One of the best ways to weed out the players is to take things slow with every guy you meet. Players won't have the patience to stick around.  If you're in a relationship with a player, you're probably not the only woman he's seeing. Making your relationship public will make it easier for his lies to be exposed to both you and the other women, and for that reason, he'll usually reject the idea of being public about it.   The way he treats you in public will be one good indication. If he refuses to treat you with any special affection or treats you just as affectionately as other women, it might be his way of keeping your relationship a secret. To that end, he might also avoid spending time with you in certain places if he thinks there's a better chance of being caught there. Check social media accounts, too. If he refuses to be “friends” or “followers” with you, or if he never responds to any public comments you make toward him, it could be a sign that he's trying to hide your relationship. Refusing to update his “relationship status” might be another social media clue.  Most players won't want you anywhere near their friends, and it won't be because they're afraid of another man stealing you away.   If he lets you meet his friends, he takes the risk that someone within the group will slip and reveal information about his true self. If you do meet his friends, watch his behavior around them. Some players will drop their guard and show their true colors when they're hanging around their buddies.  Invite him to meet your friends and family. Since a player isn't serious about you, he will usually refuse such offers or make excuses to get out of them at the last minute.   Moreover, friends and relatives with a keen eye might be able to spot a player when they see one. A player who agrees to meet your loved ones would have to take the risk of being discovered by someone like that.  Ask around about the guy and find out if there are any rumors about him. People in his own social circle might cover for him, but anyone who isn't attached to him won't have a need to do so.   Ask your close friends to do their own investigating on your behalf, as well. They probably have a few connections you don't have, and one of those connections might have helpful information. You could even consider talking with the guy's ex-girlfriends, but do so with caution. Some exes will intentionally paint a bad picture as an act of revenge. Additionally, an ex-girlfriend who believes that you “stole” the guy away from her may take out her negative feelings on you.  Players lack respect for you, but that's because they lack respect for everyone. It can be difficult to tell when a guy is disrespecting you, but it'll probably be easier to detect disrespect he shows toward others.   Pay particular attention to the way he treats and talks about other women. Even disrespect he shows toward female relatives can indicate an overall sense of disrespect toward women in general. Watch how he treats workers at the places you visit, too. Players may relish in the authority they have over these staff members.  

watch out for over-confidence.  calculate the age gap.  glance at the phone.  track him down.pay attention to the places he frequents when you're not around.  beware of flattery.  don't dismiss dishonesty.  consider the player's life story.  share your own story.  talk about past relationships.  defend your own innocence.  value your own time.  avoid hot-and-cold behavior.  change up your meeting place.  maintain eye contact.  move slowly.  take it public.  get to know the friends.try to spend time with his friends.  introduce your own family and friends.  ask for opinions.  watch how others are treated. 

 It's more than likely you will never meet your celebrity crush, and even if you do, it's also likely he (or she) won't take an interest in as you are just another fan to them. But, why would you set yourself on someone who doesn't value fans as real human beings? Don't you want to be with someone who wants to get to know you intimately?; , Are you applying characteristics to your crush without knowing whether or not they actually have them? Though a person's career may be interesting, that doesn't necessarily make the person interesting. It's likely that, besides their work, your crush is just like anyone else walking down the street. They may be polite and funny, but they may also be boring, a snob or slob, greedy, or have many other faults that they just don't show in public.  Take down all posters, don't see a movie they are in or listen to a song they sing, and don't daydream or talk about them with others. Immerse yourself in something else that is pleasurable but healthy. Until you either get over your crush or appreciate their work but not be obsessed with them, take them out of your life.  You may think that you could never get sick of your crush, but you're more than likely wrong. Once you see the same movie, listen to the same song, or watch the same interview so many times, you'll just be tired of it. Soon, you'll realize how silly it was to have obsessed over a trivial person. This doesn't mean you can't appreciate their work or talent, but you certainly don't have to make them the center of your attention at all times.  See how much more you admire someone who you already know or are getting to know closely then a celebrity who is constantly traveling, working, and doesn't have much time to chit-chat. If someone who is in your immediate life wants to spend time with you, take the opportunity to distance yourself from your celebrity crush.  Of course you can comment on how handsome or beautiful a celebrity is, but once you start disliking or even hating their girl(boy)friend or spouse or want to have a relationship with them while they're taken, don't take it too far. It's obviously inappropriate - how do you know that it would benefit you or your celebrity crush more if you were in a relationship with them? If your celebrity is taken, know that they probably found someone right for them, and be happy that your celebrity crush is happy in their relationship.  Hope that they may find some peace and happiness, but don't jump in thinking that it's now your turn to snatch them.  

face it.  look at your admiration for this celebrity logically.  distance yourself from your crush.  spend a lot of time watching or listening or whatever at them.  find a friend or special someone you enjoy spending time with.  you should know to back off if your celebrity crush is taken.  if you're cheering on a celebrity who is separating/divorcing from their significant other, know that this celebrity is probably feeling pain right now, and you shouldn't be reveling. 

 Let it all out on paper. You don't need to keep what you've written (unless you want to). The act of writing can help you to sort out your feelings and face facts about how wrong this person was for you.  Plan a birthday party, think about visiting a cousin or getting a new pet. Find things to distract you from obsessing about this person and their behavior.   Take the dog for lots of walks. Use the time to enjoy nature and keeping fit. , If it's a little too embarrassing to talk about it to your mom or dad, tell your older sister, your grandparent, or even your school guidance counselor  

write down your feelings.  think about other things.  don't think of yourself as a loser just because the person said they didn't like you or that you're too smart, too nice, etc.  ,  try talking to a parent, sibling or a friend about what's happened. 

 Especially if it pains you to even think about them. They're not worth a quick thought.  If you do something like go to the beach with your best friends, or have a barbecue with your family, you'll be too busy having fun to think about the person.   Go shopping with your BFF or siblings.  This is something I had a lot of trouble doing. Don't yell at yourself if you still like the person, over time the crush will fade.  Don't worry, you'll find that perfect person one day. This person was a lesson to be learned from, so watch for the signs of what to avoid in future!  

completely rid yourself of that person.  get out more.  give yourself time.  keep looking. 

 This prevents one or both parties from becoming hurt throughout the process of trying to make your ex jealous. A healthy approach to jealousy is when your goal is to deepen or rekindle your relationship with your ex, while an unhealthy approach is when you want to seek revenge or intentionally hurt your ex for breaking it off in the first place., Ending all contact with your ex can make her wonder what you’re up to, and why you’re no longer talking to her. She may suspect that you’re seeing someone new, or keeping busy with fun activities that don’t involve her. If you don’t feel comfortable ceasing all contact, at least wait two or three weeks before contacting her again.  An old Spanish proverb says “Living well is the best revenge,” which is great to keep in mind when making your ex-girlfriend jealous. Improving yourself as a person is healthy, and boosts your self-esteem when you’re going through a breakup. Exercise more often, devote more time to friends and family, read books, and make other positive changes that will have your ex questioning whether your life is better without her.  This indirectly keeps your ex in the loop with what’s going on with you, even if you’re not staying in touch with your ex. Your friends may even mention to your ex that they’ve seen you, and that you’re doing well without her. For example, inform your friends that you recently got a job promotion, lost weight, or have plans to run the next 5K marathon. The news may circulate back to your ex and make her feel jealous about your accomplishments., Your ex may browse your social media profiles out of curiosity to see how you’re getting on without her, and to see if you’re spending time with someone new. Keep all social media posts positive in nature, and try to be mysterious without posting explicit details. For example, share photos of yourself having fun with friends on a Friday night without explaining where you are, or what you’re celebrating.Share photos of yourself spending time with other women, especially those you consider attractive. Seeing you having fun with other women can make your ex feel jealous and confused about her true feelings for you.  If meeting your ex in person is inevitable due to seeing her at work or spending time with mutual friends, smile and say hello, then move on with your day. This positive behavior can make your ex wonder why you’re not unhappy without her, and also shows that you’re confident and have moved on.  If your ex tries to call or text you, don’t reply right away. This makes it look like you’re busy, and will make your ex feel curious about what you’re up to. This also helps you avoid looking desperate to hear from her. Depending on the nature of your ex’s phone call, put off returning her call for several hours or several days., Though you may still have feelings for your ex and want to win her back, re-entering the dating scene is a natural way to make your ex jealous because it makes it look as if you’ve already gotten over the breakup and moved on. Plus, you may end up meeting someone you enjoy spending time with more than your ex.  

understand the differences between healthy jealousy, and unhealthy jealousy.  stop contacting your ex-girlfriend.  make improvements to your current lifestyle.  stay in touch with friends you share with your ex-girlfriend.  stay active on social media.  act confident and nonchalant when you run into your ex in public.  don’t make yourself available for your ex-girlfriend.  allow yourself to start dating again. 

 Pointing out your distaste for your child’s date when they are around can be a recipe for disaster. What’s more, saying “I don’t like him/her” in someone’s face is just plain rude. Your child is more likely to consider your point of view if you pull them aside and have the conversation in private. Also, be sure to do this early on, and not spring this on your child at an awkward moment like right before they head out to prom.   You might start by asking about the state of the relationship: “So, you and David have been dating for a few weeks now. How are things going?” Getting a feel for your child’s opinion of the relationship can help you frame your discussion. Plus, depending on their response (“Umm, things aren’t going so well. I think we’ll probably break things off”), you might no longer find a conversation necessary. Another option is to ask what your teen finds appealing about their date. This can help you to see their perspective and you may see positive qualities in the person that you did not notice before.; , Once you have gauged your child’s impression of their date, gently share your concerns. Offer clear examples as to what rubs you the wrong way about their date.   Be thorough by providing details to support your apprehension. You might say, “I don’t like the way he talks to you. I heard him say the other day that you better not do this or that. He comes off like you are a piece of property or someone who has to obey him.”If you are direct about your concerns, then in the future your teen might start to notice them on their own.  It's easy for parents to come off as living vicariously through their children, or sheltering their children from situations they went through. Your concern is with your teen and their date, so try to maintain focus on the issue at hand rather than digressing into a lecture about your own teen romance drama.   For example, avoid saying something personal and judgmental like “I’ve seen that type before.” Make the discussion about your child by saying things like "You don't seem happy" or "You've stopped hanging with your friends since you started dating them.", It can be harsh to hear that your parent doesn't like your significant other. Teens often get totally wrapped up in their love lives. Showing any sort of disapproval could start a war between the two of you.   Take the time to remind your teen that you are doing this out of love for them. Add in “I love you and I want the best for you. I want you to be with someone who appreciates how amazing you are.”, Once you’ve said your piece, sit back and listen. Show that you are willing to hear your child out and get their take on the matter. A give and take discussion is especially important with teens who often feel like their parents value their opinions.Show you’re engaged and listening by waiting until your child has finished talking before replying. Nod, shake your head, or gesture to indicate that you’re paying attention. If you don’t understand, paraphrase by saying something like “So, you’re saying the way he talks to you is just a form of affection?”  

talk in private.  be direct about your concerns.  avoid making it about you.  reiterate your love for your child.  listen to their opinion. 

 As the old saying goes, “Don’t judge a book by its cover.” If you decide you don’t like your teen’s date shortly after introductions, your opinion could be misguided. Don’t jump to conclusions by judging their date prematurely. Instead take the time to actually get to know who they are dating.   Then, you can decide if the date is a positive partner for your teen. Plus, trying to get to know them shows your teen that you are making an effort. Invite your teen’s new date over for a family game night or intimate barbecue. Make a point to assess their interactions with your teen and the rest of the family.However, keep in mind that one interaction is not enough to get a good idea of who the person is. It may take several interactions before you have a good sense of their character.  As an adult, you still want to be a positive role model. Even though you may not like your teen’s date, act appropriately by treating the person with kindness and respect. Keep in mind that how you treat the person reflects on your child and your family as whole. Greet them and ask about their well-being when you are in their presence.   Furthermore, some teens choose unsavory dates to push their parent’s buttons. If you are civil with the date and refuse to act inappropriately, this may diminish the power of any acting out behaviors.  It’s perfectly fine to get to know your teen’s date on a personal level, but draw the line at full-on grilling. Plus, your child will be humiliated if you initiate an interrogation of their date.   If you intimidate the date or your teen, they are more likely to keep their relationship on the down-low in the future, which is something you don’t want to happen. Stick to the basics like “Who are your parents?” or “Where are you from?” You can gradually get more information about a new date during future visits.  Despite your instincts signaling that this person is a bad choice for your teen, try to get some perspective. Your initial instinct could be wrong, and you could be harshly judging a decent person.   Take a step back and try to see from your teen’s point of view. What is it that you think they like about this person? Do they have any redeeming qualities?You might even discuss this with your child by saying something like, “You know I can see what you like about Jessica. She has a great sense of humor.”  

get to know them first.  be courteous.  resist the temptation to grill the date.  look for positives. 

 So your teen’s date demonstrates questionable behavior or has a disappointing reputation. Keep in mind that you don’t have to trust the date when you trust your child. If you have instilled good values into your child and they know their self-worth, you can depend on them to choose a partner who has similar values.Being able to trust your child comes down to knowing who you raised. Have you had any reason to question your teen’s judgment before? If not, give them the benefit of the doubt., Odds are, if you have warned your child about a dubious character, others may have, too. In fact, they may get the sense deep down that their date is bad news, but they may need time to come to terms with it.   Your child is bound to encounter undesirable friends and partners. Giving them the room to experience the relationship can help them learn how to successfully navigate these types of situations.Be sure that your child knows what they should expect from a healthy relationship. Discuss this with them often so that they understand what they deserve., If your instinct tells you to be on alert for your child’s new date, try your best to monitor the relationship. You may not be able to altogether keep them from spending time together, but you can enforce rules that restrict their visits.Set age-appropriate guidelines and sit down to discuss them with your teen. You might limit phone calls, social media use, dates, or house visits. Setting these limits gives you an opportunity to closely observe the relationship to determine whether it is harmless or toxic.  If you have evidence that your teen is being mistreated or abused, put your foot down. Obsessive communication with the date, unexplained marks or bruises, and marked changes in your child’s attitude or behavior may clue you in to an unhealthy or abusive relationship.Beware that forcing your child to end the relationship will probably affect your relationship with your child for a while. However, you must do this in order to keep your child out of danger. Say something like, “I’ve seen the marks on your arms. I know he’s hitting you. I forbid you from seeing or talking to him again. I will also be talking to his parents.”  

trust your child to make good decisions.  give your child the opportunity to learn.  respect your child’s boundaries, but set limits on the relationship.  intervene if you believe your child is being abused. 

 It's hard to see the light at the end of the tunnel when you're in the middle of a crush, but plenty of other people have been down this path before you. Finding out how they got through it can kick-start your own inspiration to move on.   Ask a friend or family member for help. Most people can sympathize with love on some level, and they might be able to tell you about their own experiences overcoming a crush. Even if they don't have personal experience with this problem, they can still give you some level-headed advice. Keep your eyes peeled for examples. Once you start looking for it, you'll see countless examples of other people struggling. Books, movies, songs and even news stories often center on someone grappling with an impossible crush. Pay extra attention to the ones where someone gets over it, and note what you can learn.; , Before you can get over a problem, you have to acknowledge that it exists. Allow yourself to say you have a crush, and to experience all the complicated emotions that go with it.   Consider writing down a few pages about how you feel. Taking some time to express your emotional turmoil can help you feel like you're putting it behind you. List the reasons why you developed feelings for the other person, and why it's not going to work. Write it in a private journal, or on a password-protected word processing document. Or, write it on a few loose pieces of paper and burn them later. State your feelings out loud. You don't have to tell anyone else how you feel, but verbalizing your problem out loud — even if you're the only person in the room — can help it seem real and approachable. It can be as simple as saying "I have a crush on Steve, and I hate that I feel this way."  , If you're certain they're mature and capable of understanding what you're going through, find a time when you can talk to them about it. One of the most difficult parts of getting over a crush is letting go of your hopes for romance. If your best friend is dating him, then you just need to back off. If you just give up, you'll likely be tormented by "What if" thoughts. Telling the person gives the small chance that maybe they really do like you back, but even in the eventuality that they don't, you finally can just move on to accepting that. You won't feel like you wasted a chance for happiness.   Don't be demanding or creepy, try to avoid talking about the physical side of your feelings, as that's not relevant to what you really want to know. Simply tell them how much you care about them, and that you just want to know if they feel the same. Make it clear you still want to be friends with them (although you may need time apart to get over your feelings), and that you want them to be honest. Writing your crush a letter may be better for several reasons. It makes it easier for you to explain how you feel without getting stuck, and it also puts less pressure on them. Give your crush a letter explaining your feelings, and ask them to read it later when they're alone. Don't contact them for a day, just to allow them time to think about what you've told them. Try talking to them the next day when you have time alone. If they avoid you, understand they're probably just a little intimidated and confused, just give your crush space and try again in a while.  Maybe the person you're crushing on is already in another relationship, or you're separated by thousands of miles of distance. Maybe the other person doesn't even know how you feel, and you're unable to say. Whatever the reason, accept that there's an obstacle in your path, and that you're choosing to walk away from it.   Don't confuse this with personal failure. The fact that you can't be with your crush has nothing to do with your inherent self-worth. Relationships don't work out for a multitude of reasons, and most of them are problems that can't be changed or improved. Some things are beyond your control. Accept the things about yourself that prevented them from having feelings for you. Heartbreak typically begins with denial, try to skip that stage. Accept that perhaps you just weren't compatible. Be open to correcting flaws in yourself if you want to improve your chances next time, but make sure not to confuse flaws with differences. Bad hygiene is a flaw, and something you can fix. Liking a different kind of music, or being a more introverted person are not, and you shouldn't try to force yourself to change them. It may seem like you'd do anything to be with the person, but deep down, what you desire more than anything is for them to love you as you are. Even if changing for them possibly resulted in them falling in love with the new you, the relationship would likely quickly fall apart after the initial novelty. Avoid becoming embarrassingly stubborn. It might go deeply against your grain to admit that you can't do something, and in most situations perseverance is an admirable trait. There are times, though, when perseverance morphs into desperation and stupidity. Chasing an impossible crush is one of those times. Let it go.  If you can, try to give yourself some breathing room away from the object of your affection. A lot of crushes are born of proximity, or simply being around someone who happens to be remotely likable. If you're not around this person as often, the crush might peter out on its own.   If you're crushing on a close friend: Make yourself less available. If you want to try to preserve the friendship, aim to spend as little time as possible with the other person right now without hurting his or her feelings. Or, if you trust your friend to respond compassionately, explain your problem and state that you just need a little space right now. If you're crushing on a mutual friend: If the friend of a friend is the problem, try to bow out of group social events gracefully. If you have to, explain the issue to your first friend so that he or she won't take it personally. If you're crushing on someone at school: Take this opportunity to work harder on your studies, and distract yourself from your crush. Every time you're tempted to think about him or her, open a book or drill flashcards instead. Take different routes to class or sit elsewhere at lunch if you have to. If you're crushing on a co-worker: Focus more on your work. For the time being, avoid group lunches, casual mid-day conversations, and events like happy hour. If you're crushing on someone you can't physically avoid: Mentally distance yourself instead. Being in the same room as someone doesn't mean you have to think about them, too. Think about whatever task you're doing, or daydream about all the awesome things you'll do someday — without your crush.  If your crush is always hanging out in your current group of friends, try broadening your social horizons. Making new friends will distract you from your current misery, boost your confidence, and might even lead you to someone who's a better match for you. Here are some places to start:   Find people who share your hobbies. Love trivia? Swing by a few local pubs and ask about the next trivia night. Into writing? Look around online or inquire at local colleges to find a new critique group. Play sports? Search online for intramural leagues, or look up the local chapters of leagues like the World Adult Kickball Association. The possibilities are endless! Get involved in service. Volunteer at a local shelter, or contact an organization that champions a cause you care about, like humane treatment of animals or environmental clean-up. Attend a few service events and strike up some conversations with like-minded helpers. Take advantage of school or church groups. If you're already attending a school or church that offers extracurricular activities, get involved! Party-planning committees (like for Prom or church dances), choir, service groups, or sports leagues are all possibilities.  Use this time to step back and re-evaluate ways you can improve your own life, instead of devoting all that mental capital to your crush. You'll find a few distracting tasks to take care of, and you'll be bettering your own situation at the same time.   Give yourself a mini-makeover (even if you're a guy!): Is your wardrobe feeling a little stale? Have you had the same hairstyle for too long? Pick up a few new, confidence-boosting pieces for your closet, or investigate a new haircut or color. If you're not sure how to navigate your options, ask a particularly stylish friend or family member for help. Get organized. If it's been awhile since you've cleaned out your closet/car/garage/basement, get on it! Sorting through old junk can be a meditative process, and you'll probably feel relaxed and accomplished when you're done. Work out. Exercise clears the mind — when you're so focused on pushing your body, you can't afford to worry about much else besides breathing and moving. Take up running, swimming, biking, or another activity that can both improve your body and de-junk your mind. Practice positive self-talk. It sounds silly, but it really works. Look at yourself in the mirror a few times a day, and say whatever it is that you need to hear. It might be "You'll find someone better" or "No one is worth all this moping." Repeat it until you believe it.  Getting over a crush is hard work, and if it took you several months to become infatuated, it might take long to dig yourself back out. Accept that it's a process, and plan ahead so you won't be derailed by a sudden relapse. Here's how to deal with one:   Realize that you don't see this person realistically. Limerence, or the overwhelming feeling of infatuation that you feel around your crush, can throw you out of logical thinking patterns and make you idealize your crush. Repeat to yourself that no matter how you feel, no one is perfect, not even your crush, and recognize that you are intentionally overlooking his or her flaws. Treat it like a substance addiction. You wouldn't point a recovering alcoholic toward a bar, so don't put yourself in situations where you're tempted to fuss over your crush. Steer clear of intimate situations and avoid frequent contact, even if it's over text or chat and not in-person. Don't just transfer your feelings to a new target. Finding a new person to attach all your feelings to is another form of relapsing — you might not be crushing on the same person, but you're feeling the same emotions. Making someone your substitute isn't fair to them, because you're not seeing them for who they are, and it's not fair to you, because you're allowing yourself to fall back into the same cycle.  Demonizing your crush might help you get over it in a short-term way, but it's not a long-term solution. Here's the problem: thinking about how much you hate someone is still a way of obsessing over him or her, so you're functionally stuck at square one.   Don't make someone else responsible for your happiness. Sure, maybe your crush didn't respond to your affections like you had hoped. Maybe he or she even made it worse by teasing you or flirting incessantly, knowing full well how you felt. But whatever happened, the only person charged with making you happy is you. You're responsible for taking yourself out of a bad situation and moving forward, so don't hold your crush accountable for making you miserable. Try to wish him or her all the best. If you truly care about someone, you want to see that person find happiness — even if it's not with you. Resist the urge to become angry or start making comparisons if your crush starts dating someone else. Try to cultivate a spirit of being happy when the people you like are happy.  This is quite tricky but very effective when done and understood in the right way. Your crush caught your eyes for all the good qualities you saw on him/her. Now you have to reverse it. You may think at first that your crush is "so perfect" but no, everyone has their share of flaws and that is what you have to keep in your mind. Time to stop dreaming.   Think deeply about your crush and find as many ugly characteristics as you can find. List it down on a piece of paper and read it repeatedly. When you see him around, do not look at the good. Remember everything you wrote and don't lose focus.  

find people who know what you're feeling.  admit you have a crush.  tell your crush.  acknowledge defeat.  separate yourself from your crush.  meet some new people.  take care of yourself.  be wary of relapsing.  avoid becoming bitter.  make a list of bad things about your crush. 

 Letting your friend know how you feel might set you free from emotional pressure and pain. You won't have as many questions about how they feel, whether they reciprocate your feeling, or how to read into moments with them. You won't have to deal with "what-ifs" or what could have been because you'll have your closure.  Closure is especially important if you want to move on from this crush. With so many unanswered questions, you might not feel ready to date other people.If you don't tell your friend you care for them, they might never know the extent of your feelings. Letting them know can help them fully understand your friendship and give you support, if needed.; , If feelings are left unsaid, you might distance yourself from your friend or act differently around them without noticing. In response, your friend might be unsure what's happened. They might worry that they did something wrong or that you don't care for them anymore. Opening up about your feelings can get rid of miscommunication.  Being vulnerable about tough feelings is important in friendships. If you can't express your emotions, you and your friend may not feel connected or safe around each other., When your friend is dating another person, it's usually best not to tell them about your feelings. Telling them you like them could bring conflicting emotions into the friendship and introduce distance. Instead, wait until they are out of a relationship or until you do not feel obliged to act on the feelings., If you're nervous, you might be tempted to reveal your feelings over text or online messaging. But having serious conversations happen much better in-person. Being able to see and hear the other person will leave less room for miscommunication. You'll see each other's body language and be able to respond immediately.Try a few deep breathing exercises before you have the conversation to get rid of nerves.Write out your feelings before you tell them, if you feel overwhelmed. This will give you an outlet and help you express your emotions in a healthy way., Sometimes when people reveal romantic feelings, the recipient may worry that you're only interested in dating. If they don't reciprocate the feeling, they might wonder if you're still interested in a friendship. Make it clear that you appreciate your relationship with them regardless of their response., If they say they reciprocate your feelings, you might feel anxious and unsure what to do next. If they say they don't, you might feel crushed. Their emotions are as valid as yours, and it is important for you to respect them. Don't argue with them or react angrily if their response isn't what you hoped for. Thank them for being honest, and distance yourself if you need time alone.  Hurt, grief, and pain are all normal reactions to have when grieving. Don't suppress your emotions or feel ashamed about them. Feeling is part of the healing process.If you find yourself unable to move on from an unwanted answer, you may be dealing with depression. Talk to a professional like a psychologist or therapist if your feelings cause significant distress. 

tell your friend you have a crush if you need closure.  reveal how you feel if the friendship has changed.  don't tell your friend if they are in a relationship.  talk about your feelings in-person.  let them know how deeply you care about them.  accept their reaction, no matter what. 

 Only for people who have minimum contact with their crush.; , You must be prepared to get over them and move on. Or else do not read this anymore.  Examples: Deleting or blocking from social networking websites; avoiding going to similar places unless you have to. By doing this you're giving less of a chance to watch them and get obsessive and start finding reasons to like them even more.  Only when it is important that you do so, you want to do everything in your power to stop liking them and by getting to know them you could find more good things to like.  After doing this, keep it somewhere you can look at it, always think of their bad points rather than the good so you have a reason to dislike them.  Keep this moment of time in your mind, if they could do that, why are they worthy of your time.  They don't like you or want to get to know you, it's their loss and never forget that.  Being with your family and friends is a great way to get over anything or anyone. By spending more time with them, your time will be more occupied and you would have those things ruling your mind rather than the thought of them. Keep socializing.  By having an emotional connection with this person in your mind, you will never be able to let go, your mind is the strongest and most powerful thing and if you can convince your mind into not liking him then you can do anything really.  There are so many different people out there and if you don't want someone different, there's someone the same but better. Look around, once you find yourself letting go of this person there's a greater chance that you'll meet someone that actually likes you.  Find something different to do. Maybe help around with something, get a job, make a blog, make new friends, start a sport, join a club. Anything you might never have done before or you've always wanted to do.  Focus on being a better person or working on your appearance, or meeting new people. Just keep yourself as a huge priority right now.  

all this information will be if you are not particularly close or friends with the person.  decide first if you want to get rid of them for good.  cut off any contact you may have with him/her.  do not try to talk to them when unnecessary.  write a list of all their bad points.  try to remember a time that they were not particularly nice to you or annoyed you.  remember, if they were not willing to make an effort with you; why should you too?,  spend more time with friends and family.  if you have imaginations/fantasies of this person in your mind then replace them with someone else.  check out other guys/girls.  find new interests or be more involved in activities.  look after yourself, you are more important than some person you barely know. 

 Your crush might linger if you daydream about what could be, but holding onto your fantasies will only lead to more pain. Accept the reality of the situation and your feelings of attraction equally. Gradually avoid thinking about what your relationship would be like if it could only work out.Don't dwell on the past or worry about the future. Instead, ground yourself in the present.Instead of building up a fantasy life, work on improving what you have. Set goals in your work or hobbies, spend time with loved ones, and work on self-improvement to love the life you have.  Your friendship with this person can still be meaningful, even if you can't pursue a romantic relationship with them. Think about all the good times you've had with this person and the positive qualities they have. Have gratitude that this person is in your life and that you've had the opportunity to know them.You don't have to give up your friendship with your best friend: that relationship can still be important. But spending time with just this person can cause you to dwell endlessly on your feelings., You might need some time away from this person to work through your feelings. Tell your friend that you need space for a while: if you're comfortable, you can tell them about your feelings. If you're not ready to tell them, however, just let them know you're going through a painful experience and need time alone.Sometimes, rebuilding the friendship can take weeks or months. You may not feel completely "over" your crush until you've found someone knew. Take as much time as you need to process your emotions. Your friend may feel confused or hurt if you're suddenly avoiding them. Let them know that this isn't their fault and that you still care about them. When you're ready to resume the friendship, you can do so without miscommunication., If you want to fall out of love with your crush, set boundaries for yourself and your friend to avoid sparking old flames. You might avoid extended physical contact with your friend, stop flirting with them, or steer away from intimate conversations for a while. Share the boundaries with your friend (if you're comfortable) so they know to avoid those situations. 

separate fantasy from what actually is.  appreciate your friendship for what you have.  spend some time apart for a while.  set boundaries. 

 Don't bottle up your emotions. Trying to repress feelings often leads to more pain. Rather than ignoring the pain, open yourself up to the full spectrum of emotions. Grieve for what could have been. Express gratitude that this friend has been in your life. Think of the good and bad times. Whatever emotions come, accept them.If the emotions are too overwhelming, take a break from thinking about your friend.Relax, recharge, and approach the situation again when you're ready.Sometimes a good cry can be cathartic. If you need to cry, find somewhere you're comfortable and let it out., In the midst of these strong feelings for your friend, you may neglect taking care of yourself. But practicing self-care in this time will help you regain confidence and maintain supportive relationships as you process your emotions. Do activities that strengthen your physical and emotional well-being, and take care of your personal hygiene.Emotional self-care might include: Reading a book, spending time with a friend, listening to music, getting a massage, or learning something new.Physical self-care might include: Going for a walk, exercising, getting enough sleep, staying hydrated, or scheduling a medical check-up., Humor really can be the best medicine. Comic relief can help you de-stress and keep a light perspective in life. Watch a silly movie, read humorous novels, or visit a local comedy club. At the very least, laughter can distract you when you need time away from your thoughts.Sometimes people use humor as a coping mechanism in hard times. Make sure that you're not using jokes to repress painful feelings., Getting your feelings out (whether in words, art, or song) will help you collect your thoughts and process all the emotions you might be feeling. You can share your work with others, or you can just keep it for yourself. The important part is expressing yourself fully.If you're not the creative type, start a journal. Seeing your emotions on paper will help you work through them., While getting over a crush on your friend, your self-esteem may plummet. You may worry that nobody will ever love you like you wish your friend did. Believing in yourself again can help you cope with the pain and cultivate hope in the future. Write down your strengths on a piece of paper to remember when you're feeling low, and set reachable goals every day to remind yourself that you can do hard things.Sometimes low self-esteem is a symptom of depression, which is not as easily cured on your own. If you think you may be depressed, consider telling a loved one or seeing a counselor. 

allow yourself to feel without restrictions.  practice self-care.  let yourself laugh.  express your feelings creatively.  regain your confidence. 

 Before you get back into the dating scene, spend some time on self-understanding. Get to know yourself on a deeper level: think about your goals in life and what's important to you. Explore your strengths and weaknesses as a human being. Knowing yourself better will help you define what you're seeking in a relationship.Falling in love with someone can cause you to forget yourself. Re-discover who you are apart from your friend and learn to love yourself., Getting out and learning something new will give you something else to think about besides your friend. You'll also be able to learn new skills and regain some self-confidence. Join a cooking class, volunteer at a local shelter, buy an instrument to learn, or try out an activity you've always wanted to do.Pick a hobby that requires a lot of time and concentration. You can then use it to escape your mind for a while and focus on something productive. Now is the time to revisit an activity you used to do but for whatever reason let go. Doing something you love again will help you reconnect with your inner self.  Having a crush on your best friend can cause you to neglect other friendships. As you develop meaningful relationships with other friends, you'll gain emotional support outside of your best friend. Invite a friend over to chat, see a movie with them, or even send them a text to let them know you care.  Don't distract yourself constantly with friends. Spending time alone is important, too. If you need some space from others for a while, let yourself have that time., Once you're ready to fall in love again, re-enter the dating scene. You don't have to fall into a serious relationship right away: date a few different people for a while and have fun just getting to know them.The best way to fall in love again is by meeting new people. Join a club, volunteer somewhere new, chat with a classmate or co-worker, or visit your local bar.Think about what qualities your friend has that you want in a partner and look for those in another person. You can't expect to find someone "just like" your friend because everyone is different, but through your friend you can learn what you value in a partner.  Getting over a crush takes time as your heart heals. In a way, you might always love and care for this person. What matters is moving past the pain and opening yourself up to loving again, even if not for a while. Don't beat yourself up if you're still pining for this person. You can find new love in the future.  If you're not careful, you may become bitter from the pain and start to hate your friend. Don't let yourself fill with negative emotions. 

"date yourself" for a while.  take up a new hobby.  spend time with your other friends.  go out with other people, when you're ready.  accept that falling out of love takes time. 

 If you notice anyone else you might like, go for it. Try to broaden your horizons and not obsess over him.This can help you to realize that he's probably not as great as you thought.; , Even if it's not just the three of you alone. He'll think you're weird and could figure out you like him.  That way you'll be more relaxed around her and him when all of you are together.  It'll matter even more to you what he thinks about you because you're friends, and you've probably already accepted advice and opinions from him.Just ask someone else some of the things you'd usually ask him.This will help you to get a fresh, new perspective on things.  You never know, she could have some experience in your dilemma. Nothing beats another girl's advice, just make sure you're asking the right person.  Don't make him out to be a terrible person, just think of a little thing that kind of annoys you or turns you off whenever you think this about him.  You probably have something else to think about besides your guy friend 24/7. If he's in your classes,activities,office, maybe even a team, you can still do other things without him. Do something with a friend or friends, try new things, get involved in something.  Although it's hard to think of him as just a friend, you can still do things together. You are friends, right?You have to remember that you were and still are friends with him even if you do like him.  

stop only thinking about him.  don't cling to him whenever you, your friend, and his crush are together.  if the girl he likes is nice, try to make friends with her.  try not to care so much about what he thinks.  if you have a close enough friend that's a girl, try seeking her advice.  try to focus on one of his flaws.  don't let this ruin your life!,  do not let this crush ruin your friendship. 

 Giving up on something you want can be frightening, but actually doing so can be a relief. Unconsciously, you've been motivated to pursue him—he's been your goal.Make a conscious decision to no longer pursue him. It may help to write this down, to tell a friend, or even to hold a small ceremony for yourself.   Consider gathering things you have that make you think of him and putting them in a box, throwing them away, or giving them away. Once your private space is cleared of reminders, consider holding a small cleansing ceremony. Burn some sage incense and walk through your room or your home.When a wish for him comes up, don't suppress it and don't cling to it. Acknowledge how you feel, but remind yourself that you are choosing to move on.; , Don't push away feelings of sadness when they come. It's totally natural and healthy to be sad when you have feelings for someone and it doesn't work out. Take a week or a few weeks to grieve. Cry if you can: if your feelings are hurt, you are actually hurt, and you will do better to acknowledge it. Crying can be extremely therapeutic.Listen to music that lets you feel your feelings. Exercise. It helps to clear your mind and you will be healthier. Write in a diary if you have one. Write a letter to him if you want. Keep it for a week or two before you give it to him, or don't give it to him at all. The point is to get your feelings out. Go on some long walks by yourself. You'll have time to think, and you'll feel better for the exercise. Know when to stop. If you're dropping the people and projects that matter to you, you're grieving too much. Consult a therapist if you can't get back into your normal life., Did he lead you on, acting like he liked you for attention? Did you pursue him relentlessly even after he let you know that it wasn't going to work? Was everyone honest and considerate, or was bad behavior involved? If you feel like you misbehaved, apologize.   If you feel like he did something wrong, and you're friends, consider letting him know that you feel hurt. You can write a brief letter or email if it's too painful to talk to him in person. If you aren't friends, it might feel better to not communicate. Ask yourself what would feel better, and follow that path.  Maybe he was totally unadventurous, or maybe he was too much of a risk taker. Maybe he constantly interrupted you. Maybe you were in love with the fantasy of this guy and not the guy himself. It can be hard to see the real person when you're infatuated.   You don't have to demonize him, of course. Just take your image of him with a grain of salt. Remember, he was never perfect: you just had some perfect feelings about him.  You were your own unique and interesting person long before this guy’s opinion ever meant a thing to you; the more you remember and act on that, the stronger and more attractive you’ll feel. Realize that just because he doesn't like you doesn't necessarily have anything to do with you. It could be just his problem! Attraction between two people is influenced by factors of timing, of nature, of nurture, and of factors beyond our control.One person's feelings about you are not a way to measure your character.   Make a list of things you like about yourself. Include big things and small things. Group accomplishments, personality traits, and talents. Make a list of what you really care for in a relationship, and see if he fulfilled those expectations. He probably won't, and that's okay! Ask yourself, what can you count on yourself to do? What difficulties have you overcome?  , Now is a great time to make a change. Redecorate your house, or just move the furniture around in your room.Pursue a new hobby, sign up for some volunteer hours, get a different haircut. Master a new skill: take a class, cook a new dish, or make yourself something you've been wanting, like shelf. If you have some extra cash, buy a new outfit.Ask friends to do things with you, but also try things that will get you out of your comfort zone. Talking to new people will be restorative.  Feeling bad about yourself after a crush doesn't work out is normal, but it's not a great way to feel. Taking care of yourself is a way to show yourself that you do matter, and it will also make you feel a lot better.Get regular exercise, meals, and sleep. Get therapy if you are feeling depressed or anxious.   Stick to a healthy routine every day. Clean up and dress yourself nicely, even when you feel like sludge—it will make you feel better.  If you think you tend to like a certain kind of guy, try dating someone different: you might be making your romantic choices based on a pattern that doesn't actually work for you. If you always like boisterous overachievers, give a quiet introvert a chance.   Remember that there is always someone for you. You will find a guy who adores you soon enough. Don’t rush to rebound, or you might end up breaking someone else's heart. It will hurt you and it could hurt them. It's okay to get out and flirt. Don't get seriously involved with someone right away, but do flirt a little or even go on casual dates if that's fun for you.  Once you've let go of hoping for someone, you just need time to pass. The more time passes, the better you'll feel. Meanwhile, limit your exposure to him. Don't hang out, and try not to bump into him too much. This doesn't mean you should hide out—absolutely not—just that you should avoid interacting while you're still in pain.   Bring a friend when you know you'll run into him. We can't always avoid people who like—if you know you'll have to be around him sometimes, bring friends who know what's going on with you to back you up. Keep it positive. You don't have to glare at him or treat him rudely. When you feel normal again, you might end up being real friends with this guy. Just be polite and try to avoid him discretely.  Of course, you may need some alone time at first, but turning into a full-time hermit is just going to make you feel like he’s the only person in the world. Go out with your pals, have a buddy night, and socialize as much as feels good. The more you meet your emotional needs elsewhere, the less impact his absence will have on you.   If he's a good friend and all your friends are mutual, try organizing smaller outings—just two or three at a time—so that his absence doesn't feel conspicuous.  Keeping heartbreak private can make it hurt more. It can be a relief to tell your nearest and dearest what you're going through.You don't have to tell everyone, and it's probably better if you don't—but if you have a few good friends and relatives who can keep your business private, it might help to let them know that you're going through an emotionally rocky moment.   Be sure to tell them if what you're saying is private. Ask them not to treat the guy you had a crush on any differently—unless he was a jerk, of course.  If people talk, they talk. If unsubstantiated rumors are flying around, know that they'll die down soon. Don't add fuel to the rumors by getting angry or defensive. Instead, when confronted by nosy people, say it is your personal life, raise your eyebrows, and change the subject.Whatever you say won´t change their minds, just always be the bigger person, smile and be polite.  

release your hope for him.  grieve.  evaluate his behavior and your own.  remind yourself of things you didn't like about him.  remember that you're loveable.  renew yourself.  be healthy and take care of yourself.  date when you're ready.there's no need to rush it, but when dating sounds appealing to you, try it out.  take some distance if you can.  spend more time with your friends.  confide in your friends.  dismiss gossip. 

 For some people, staying in touch can be a nice way to keep a friend who you've got a little crush on. For others, it can be like torture. Decide if you're likely to ever see this person in real life again, or if staying in touch will only make it worse.   If you can't be together and don't live in the same area, consider cutting all ties. Dump the phone number, texts, pictures, and memories. The quicker you forget this person, the better. Social media makes it pretty easy to keep in touch, which can be a blessing or a curse. It's easy to chat regularly and keep up to date with their life, but that can be painful. Consider blocking them on social media, as well.; , Sometimes, it's ok to have a sad, lonely night on the couch, watching romantic Netflix movies. Have some ice cream and get the tissues out. Sometimes, this is just the thing you need to mope around a bit and move on.   Try to put a limit on it. If this wasn't an actual relationship, there's no reason to mope around for more than a day or two, lamenting your lost crush. You'll find someone new.  Allow yourself to think about the person you liked, but not for more than a certain amount of time each day. Set aside 20 or 30 minutes to think about the person so that you can process your feelings of grief and start to accept the fact that your crush is gone.   When the allotted time is up for the day, tell yourself that you can think about the person again tomorrow and immediately start engaging in an activity that is productive, such as homework or doing something fun.  While you don't want to constantly dwell on the sad feelings that you have, it's not healthy to completely ignore them either. Write down the feelings you are experiencing through poetry, songwriting, short stories or in a journal.   You can also write letters to the crush that you don't actually intend to send. Writing about your feelings or composing a never-to-be-sent letter to the person can help you process and release your feelings in a healthy and constructive way.  While it hurts a lot, getting over a crush is going to eventually happen. Try not to spend too much money on chocolate and tissues. It'll take time, but eventually the hole in your heart will get filled. Who knows, maybe at the new area you go to, you'll find a new crush.   While your crush might seem like a person of your dreams, they're really not as perfect as you may think. If you're quite young, you're going to meet hundreds, if not thousands, of new people in the coming years. It won't be long before this little crush seems like a distant memory.  Find new people to occupy your attention span. If you've switched to a new school, try your best to make as many new friends as possible. Consider making different kinds of friends, or finding other types of kids to hang out with. You might even find a good crush.   Consider telling them about your situation. Not only will it make you new friends, but they might try to set you up with someone, which would also distract you from the fact that your crush is so far away.  If you've just moved, you've got a great opportunity to not only get over a crush, but to turn over a whole new page in your life. Nobody knows about your past here. Nobody knows what you used to be like. You can be anybody. Consider making a big style change, or switching things up at your new school.   Just because you never used to dye your hair purple or listen to punk rock doesn't mean that people at your new school know that. They didn't see your kindergarten pictures. They'll never be the wiser.  Go to that new cafe that just opened up down the street, join a club, get some hobbies. The more things you do the more people you'll meet. Eventually you're bound to meet someone who catches your interest.   Try to mix your life up a bit in little ways. Take a different route to school each day, or have something different for breakfast every day of the week. Keep looking for new ways to spice it up.  It's important to get plenty of sleep, eat healthy, and exercise any time you're feeling depressed. Lack of sleep is known to affect mood and to make people more emotional, while long-term sleep deprivation is commonly linked to depression. Getting a good night's sleep will help you feel refreshed and give you the energy you need to deal with your emotions and to move on with your life.   Engage in rigorous exercise for at least a half hour approximately five days a week. According to the Mayo Clinic, exercising for a half hour or more causes the brain to emit chemicals that cause you to feel happier and more relaxed. Exercising will not only leave you feeling better physically, but it will help you forget.  You shouldn't stay stuck on this crush for very long. As soon as you get to your new town, start letting your eye wander. Check out the other cuties at your school and on your block. Find someone new to crush on, and your old crush will fade quickly away.   If you do meet someone, try not to compare them to your crush. People hold their crushes in higher regard than they do other people, so comparisons will fall short. Each person is a unique individual, so its pointless to try to find some one just like your crush.  

decide whether or not you want to stay in touch.  let yourself be sad for a while.  spend some time thinking about your crush, but limit it.  write it out.  give it some time.  make new friends.  start with a clean slate.  try new things.  stay healthy.  find a new crush. 

 Your crush won’t be the one providing your happiness, so it’s time to find something else that will. Spend time with people who put a smile on your face. Watch a funny tv show. Do an activity that you enjoy. Spend time with an animal that makes you happy. Make deliberate choices to put yourself in a happy environment rather than wallowing over what you can’t have.   When your crush doesn’t like you, it’s easy to feel powerless and like a victim of their rejection. But ultimately, your happiness and your emotions are your responsibility and not anyone else’s. If you have placed your potential happiness in the hands of your crush, it’s time to take it back and be responsible for yourself. Take ownership of your feelings and make the choice to find happiness for yourself.Change your thoughts about what happened. Instead of seeing this as a terrible tragedy, look at it as an opportunity for growth and exploration. One person didn’t like you back, but lots of other people will. Now that you know there isn’t a future with this person, you can find the right people.  Even if it’s hard, make sure to respect your crush even when you find out they don’t like you. If you run into them, you can still say hello. There's no need to badmouth them or respond defensively. You don't need to be best friends, but you can still help them if they need it sometime. It’s ok that they don’t feel the same way. There are lots of people that you don’t feel that way about. Sometimes it just doesn’t work out, and that’s to be expected. It doesn’t mean your crush is a bad person and it doesn’t mean you are. Two great people just didn’t happen to feel the same way.   Control what you can. You can’t control your crush’s feelings, but you can control your response to them. You are far from a passive observer in this. You have full control over how you will respond and how you will move forward. Choose to think good thoughts, to adjust your expectations, and to respond in healthy ways.Don’t let your crush’s rejection change you. Your crush doesn’t need to have that kind of power over you. If you feel hurt, that’s ok, but that doesn’t need to make you an angry, bitter person. Keep making good decisions for yourself and make sure that you like who you are regardless of who else does. After all, you’re the one who has to live with you!  , Negative feelings can be scary and intimidating. It might help you to name them. Instead of just sitting there feeling like it’s the end of the world, try to put it into words. You could write it down, tell someone that you trust, spend some time thinking about it, or talk to a counselor if you are feeling overwhelmed.   Maybe you feel sad, disappointed, and alone. If that’s the case, you can help yourself to feel differently. You could do a fun activity that makes you feel happy, fulfilled, and connected to someone, such as playing a fun game with a group of close friends. You have the power to influence your emotions. When your crush doesn’t like you, this is a form of loss. No, it’s not the same as losing a loved one, but you are still missing someone who mattered to you. It’s okay to acknowledge that and to feel sad about that and to admit that you are hurt by this. It’s only natural to feel this way. Spend a bit of time feeling these negative emotions so that you can process them and move past them. You don’t need to pretend to be perfectly fine when you’re not. No one feels great all the time!, When someone isn’t able to give you what you need, it’s time to move on. It isn’t healthy to keeping longing for someone who isn’t interested. You will only set yourself up for heartbreak. To get past this, you need to say goodbye to the high hopes you had for you and your crush. Admit to yourself that it didn’t work out this time and don’t let your crush occupy your heart and mind anymore. This probably means keeping your distance for a while. It is hard to let go of someone if you are constantly with them.You might want to consider not following them on social media anymore or taking a break from social media. It is difficult to get over someone if you are constantly being informed of every detail in their life.  To help yourself feel better, distract your mind so that you aren't thinking about your crush's rejection. You could play games, read books, draw, play an instrument, or watch TV. Anything that takes your mind off your crush will help put you at ease while you move forward.  Even in a negative and sad situation, there are always positives that you can find. If you train yourself to look for these instead of dwelling on the negatives, you will be much happier and able to handle any of life’s storms. When your crush doesn’t like you, it means you won’t have a future with that person, but it also opens you up to other opportunities and experiences. A lot of good can come from a difficult situation.For example, you now have more time to pursue other interests. You have more time to spend with friends. You have a chance to look around and see what other people you might be interested in instead of being so focused on one person. You can take time to invest in yourself. You don’t need to worry about the struggles and difficulties inevitably present in any romantic relationship. You can learn about yourself from this experience.  

find a hobby or activity that makes you happy.  treat your crush kindly.  name your negative feelings.  create distance between you and your crush.  distract yourself.  look for the positives. 

 Writing down your thoughts and feelings can be a vital tool for moving on. It can help to provide clarity about what you’re feeling and why you’re feeling it so that you can move past it. Also, since only a sheet of paper will see what you’re writing, it’s a great way to process your true feelings without worrying what anyone else thinks. It’s just you, a pen, and paper taking some time to sort things out.You can journal about anything! If you don’t want to write about what happened with your crush, try writing down a list of ten things that make you happy. This will help you to refocus and improve your mood. You can also use journaling as a learning tool. Maybe this experience with your crush has taught you something about yourself. Maybe you would approach things differently next time. Writing these ideas down can be a powerful tool to help you to remember.  Even though one person didn’t have feelings for you, there are likely at least a handful of people who greatly value you. Spend time with them and lean on them during this time. Your close friends and family can support you when you cry and make you laugh when you need it. When you are surrounded by loved ones, the one person who didn’t like you won’t seem so important anymore.If you wish to grow your inner circle, make an effort to include new people. Maybe there’s an acquaintance whom you’d like to get to know better. Invite them for lunch sometime. Making new friends is a great way to move past your crush because you will open yourself up to new relationships. Maybe you’re hesitant to open up with your friends and family about your disappointment. But it’s likely that they’ve gone through the exact same thing! Being honest about your negative feelings can help build intimacy with people and strengthen relationships. Make sure to find someone trustworthy to confide in. If they spend a lot of time talking and gossiping about people, then your secrets probably aren’t safe with them. As a general rule, how someone treats anyone is how they treat everyone.  This is not only about distracting yourself, but also building yourself up. Remind yourself of the things in life that you love. Maybe you are passionate about art or environmentalism. Maybe you’ve always wanted to go camping but never had enough time to do it. This is a great opportunity to pursue other areas of life that bring you happiness. This will help you to have a well-rounded life so that no one person has the key to your happiness.If you want to try something new, consider signing up for a class. For example, you could take a drawing class. This will surround you with other people who are participating in a similar area of interest. You can meet new people and grow your hobbies. Presumably, to have strong feelings for your crush, they likely inspired you in some way. Find other things in life that inspire you. If you are moved by music, listen to your favorite song. If you love nature, take time to watch a sunset. If you are religious, spend time worshipping God. There are lots of other areas in life where you can find inspiration and passion.  Especially when dealing with disappointment, it is important to maintain your health. As you continue to respect yourself, you will facilitate the healing process. Make sure to get a good night’s sleep and take time to exercise. This will help clear your mind and release endorphins. Be sure to eat well and hydrate and you will be well on your way to moving forward.Since you are going through a hard time, why not do something extra special for yourself? You could go get a massage or buy tickets to a concert. This will help soothe and distract you while you get over your crush.  For all you know, the right person is just around the corner! By not getting too hung up on the one person who doesn’t like you, you can open yourself up to a great person who does. You don't want to miss someone right in front of you by fixating on the one who rejected you. Now that you aren’t so focused on your crush, pay attention to the other people around you. You might find that someone else is interested and you hadn't even noticed!If you aren’t sure whether someone likes you or not, there are some signals you can look for. For example, if they make physical contact like touching your arm while talking, this can be a signal of interest. Smiling and making eye contact can also signal interest, as can flirting.If you are struggling to find the right person, try joining a new activity that will introduce you to more people. For example, if you join a sports team, you will make new friends and maybe even meet a new crush.  Online dating is also an option if you struggle to meet people. If you are shy, you might have an easier time connecting over a computer than in person. Make sure to be honest on your profile and to be safe. Don’t give out specific information like your address and if you plan to meet the person, do so in public and consider bringing a friend.  

journal about it.  spend time with family and friends.  purse other interests.  take care of yourself.  look for someone who does appreciate you. 

 Talk to your friend and try to appreciate his or her position. Your friend may have genuine feelings for your crush that seem to be reciprocated. If they really are your friend, you should want to see things work out for them one way or another.If your friend really cares about your crush, the right thing to do may be to see how things go. If your friend doesn’t seem to feel too seriously about your crush, he or she may understand if you tell them about how you feel. If your friend has strong feelings for your crush and you interfere, you risk ending your friendship.; , Your crush’s feelings should be paramount to you if you really care about him or her, so take a step back and consider the situation. Does your crush seem to truly care about your friend? Are there any signs that he or she may have been interested in you?   It may be difficult to accept that your crush may not have an interest in you romantically, but understand that it doesn’t mean you are any less valuable or attractive as a person. Maybe you two simply aren’t right for each other. If your crush seems like he or she is interested in you and doesn’t care too deeply about your friend, you may want to consider being honest with each of them about your feelings.  There are many different kinds of crushes one can have on another person. How deep are your feelings for your crush? How well do you know him or her? If you have strong feelings you fear you may not be able to push aside, you may want to tell them the truth.If you don’t know your crush very well, it may not be worth the damage honesty could cause to your friendship. If you are uncertain about your feelings, take a step back and give yourself some time. There’s no reason to make any rash decisions. Infatuation and love are different emotions that feel very similar. Infatuation often occurs when you are caught up in the excitement of meeting a person you like, but the feelings often lack longevity.  After considering your feelings, the feelings of your friend and the feelings of your crush, you’ll have to determine what you think the best course of action is. You may feel the right thing to do is to tell them both the truth about your feelings, or you may think it best that you keep them to yourself.   If you decide to tell them how you feel, consider talking to your friend about it first. Depending on the situation, your friend may understand and step aside. Prepare yourself for things to go poorly if you choose to be honest. While everything may work out, you also run the risk of losing a friend and still not being able to date your crush. Remember to be sensitive to their feelings as well as your own in your decision.  

think about your friend’s feelings.  consider what’s best for your crush.  be honest with yourself about your feelings for your crush.  decide whether to tell them. 

 You were your own unique and perfectly content person long before this guy’s opinion ever meant a thing to you; the more you remember and act on that, the stronger and more attractive you’ll feel. In fact, it may help to think back on all the other ways that this guy demonstrated his poor judgment. Are his actions idiotic? Was he a Geologist? Did he always wear socks with sandals? Maybe the signs were there all along…; , Not only will you be doing yourself a favor by emotionally disengaging, but, since nothing is more unpleasant than unwelcome attention, you might be able to recover a few shards of a friendship with him. If you simply cannot function around him, or you think you would start to like him more once near, find (inconspicuous) ways to avoid him until you feel more centered.  He could’ve pretended to like you in order to manipulate you more. Then where’d you be? You might feel heartbroken now, but at least be relieved that he didn’t actively deceive you, leading to more intense heartbreak.  Maybe he exploited your feelings for him and advised others to do the same. Maybe he constantly interrupted you and dreamed of being a pet taxidermist. Maybe you were in love with the fantasy of this guy and not the guy himself. Dredging all the ugly details will help you realize that, just maybe, he’s doing you a big favor by being such a jerk. That way, you didn’t realize these flaws until you were at the altar.  Following step 2 and becoming a full-time hermit is just going to make you feel like he’s the only person in the world. Go out with your pals, have a girls’ night, and socialize as much as possible. The more you meet your emotional needs elsewhere, the more you won’t pay that lost cause any attention.  

realize that just because he doesn't like you doesn't mean you're unlikable.  back off for a bit, don’t interact with him just for the sake of being around him.  be glad he didn’t lead you on.  think about all the things you didn't like about him.  spend more time with your friends. 

 If you want to forget your crush, then the first thing you have to do is to admit that you have strong feelings for this person. If you’re in denial about how much your crush means to you, then you’ll just keep all of those intense feelings inside instead of letting them go. Take the time to cry, to talk to a close friend about it, to admit how much you’ve been hurt, and to acknowledge your feelings.   Write down what you’re feeling, if that helps. If you don’t want to open up to a friend, opening up to a journal can make you feel better, too. If you’re going to be upset for a little while because things didn’t work out with your crush, that’s okay. Let your friends know that you’re going to lie low for a little while and don’t force yourself to be super social if you’re just not feeling it. That being said, after a few weeks or so, it’s time to stop wallowing and to start having some form of social interaction. If you spent too much time being alone with your feelings, you may only feel worse.; , You may have many reasons for feeling angry or bitter. Maybe your crush really hurt you. Maybe you were so sure things would work out and they didn’t. Maybe your crush ended up dating one of your friends and you’re feeling mad at both of them. These feelings will naturally accompany the situation you’re in, but that doesn’t mean that they are healthy or that they can help you move on.   Write down all of the reasons why you’re feeling angry and bitter. Acknowledging your pain is crucial to forgetting it. Once you’ve figured out where all of your negative feelings are coming from, you can begin to tackle them, one by one. If you come in contact with your crush, don’t let them see how angry or bitter you may be feeling. The best thing you can do is act completely indifferent, like you could care less about what your crush is up to. If you keep faking indifference, you’ll be surprised by how quickly you’ll really start to feel it.  Stop thinking about how good-looking, funny, or sweet your crush is whenever they pop in your mind. Instead, focus on all of the bad parts about your crush, from their weird fashion sense or their ability to be mean to perfect strangers. Make a list of all of these qualities if it helps. When your crush comes to mind, conjure up all of these negative thoughts instead of the positive ones. This will help you remember that your crush isn’t really such a great person, after all.   If you think that your crush is perfect and that you really can’t think of one bad thing about them, then guess what? You don’t really know that person all that well. There is no such thing as a perfect person and everyone has flaws. The more you think about all of the bad aspects of your crush, the sooner you’ll see that you two aren’t right for each other after all.  You may think that you and your crush would be the world’s most perfect couple, but that’s just not the case. If you really belonged together, then it would happen, wouldn’t it? For whatever reason, it didn’t work out between you and your crush, and it’s likely that it’s because you’re simply just too good for them. Your crush is not your soul mate, and once you realize that, you’ll be able to find someone who you do deserve.   Sure, you may have heard all of your friends telling you that you deserve better than your crush over and over again, but this won’t sink in until you realize it for yourself.  If you’re feeling down in the dumps about things not working out with your crush, then it’s likely that you need to pump yourself up. You probably are feeling down on yourself, and like you’re unworthy in some way because you’re not dating your crush, but that’s the farthest thing from the truth. Remember your most amazing qualities, focus on all of the great friends and opportunities in your life, and remember your favorite personality traits. Keep telling yourself that you are an amazing person who only deserves the best – and “the best” simply does not refer to your crush!   Staying positive is key here. If you focus on all of the good things in your life and in your character instead of the things you don’t have, then you’ll be able to move on much faster than you would if you only saw the worst in every situation.  It may sound obvious that you should stop talking to your crush if you want to forget them, but chances are that you may still be talking to your crush even if you know it’s not good for you. You don’t have to be downright rude, but you should make a point of avoiding your crush and not talking to them as much as you can. Stop texting, calling, or just stopping and saying hi to your crush. The sooner you stop seeing your crush and hearing their voice, the sooner you’ll be able to really get your crush out of your life.   If you have to be in the same place as your crush, like a class, for example, then you should be nice and polite without making an effort. There’s no need to be mean and it won’t make you feel better.  Though talking to a close friend about forgetting your crush can help you move on, if you talk about your crush to every single person you come across or every mutual friend you have, then you won’t be feeling better any time soon. You don’t have to be denial about your feelings, but if you keep mentioning your crush, you’ll only be opening up old wounds and reminding yourself of the very thing that hurt you.   If you do have mutual friends, avoid asking about how your crush is doing. How will that make you feel better?  , If you’re only going on Facebook, Instagram, or any other social networking sites to stalk your crush and to see if they've been dating anyone else or hanging out with that cute person in your chem class, then you should take a social media break. If you really do love Facebook, then avoid the temptation to click on their profile and use it to stay in touch with the people who actually make you feel good. Seeing pictures of your crush is guaranteed to make you feel worse, so stop torturing yourself.   Give yourself a time limit – say you’ll only spend 15 minutes a day on Facebook. If you want to spend that time stalking your crush, then you won’t get to see what the people who actually care about you are up to.  Though you don’t have to change your schedule completely, if you really want to forget your crush, then you should try to avoid all of the places where you know you’ll see them. Don’t go to their favorite restaurant or movie theatre if you’re pretty sure they'll be there on a Friday night. If you know they’ll be going to a certain party and you’re still feeling really hurt, then find something else to do.   This does not mean that your crush “won” and that you can’t do anything fun anymore; it just means you have to avoid them for a little while until you feel better.  If you want to get your crush out of your life, then it’s time to switch things up. Have something different for breakfast. Meet a new friend for lunch instead of the same old friends. Pick up a new hobby. Drive to school or work by a different route. Though these changes may not be directly related to your crush, just making an effort to get out of the mindset that got you hung up on your crush in the first place can help you start to look at the world differently and to stop thinking the same thoughts that revolve around your crush.   Think about it: are there certain times of day when you think about your crush the most? If so, can you do something differently during those times so you will be more likely to forget about them instead? For example, if you always stare out the window on the bus ride home and think sad thoughts about your crush, find a new pump up album and listen to that during your ride home so it becomes a positive experience, instead of a time when you think about your crush.  One great way to forget about your crush is to spend as much time as possible with the people who mean the most to you. Your friends and family have been there for you through thick and thin and they will make you feel better about your romantic situation just by being there for you. Though your social routine doesn’t have to be so jam packed that you don’t have a minute to yourself, you should make an effort to spend more time with your loved ones, so you can be grateful for all of the positive relationships in your life – instead of obsessing over the one relationship that didn’t pan out.   Don’t spend your Friday or Saturday nights alone or you’ll wish you were with your crush. Hang out with your girl or guy friends instead, and you’ll be having so much fun that you’ll forget all about your crush.  Spending time doing something that means a lot to you is a sure fire way to banish any thoughts about your crush from your mind. You should spend more time pursuing your favorite hobby, whether it’s running or painting, exercising, reading, or just doing whatever makes you happy. Maybe you think you’re too busy to make time for the things you care about. If that’s the case, then make the time by cutting something else out of your life; if you’re committed to pursuing your passion, then all thoughts of your crush will slowly drift away.   Maybe you’re feeling so down in the dumps about your crush because you don’t have a lot of things that you really care about. It could be time to find out what your passion really is by taking a class out of your comfort zone, signing up for a photography, ballroom dancing, acting, or singing class, or just trying something completely new that you have a feeling might make you happy.  Though spending time with your friends and family and doing your favorite activities can make you forget your crush, if you really want to find peace on your own, then you have to be comfortable with spending some time with your favorite person – you. If you’re really sad and upset the second you’re not keeping busy, then you haven’t really gotten over your crush yet. Make weekly “me dates” and spend that time doing something you really love – or just relaxing and watching your favorite TV show or taking a long hot bath. It doesn’t matter what you do – what matters is that you really enjoy doing it alone.   Don’t let last-minute plans with friends get in the way of your “me time.” You should treasure your “me time” like it’s a hot date with your favorite celebrity.  Don’t hole up in your dark sad cave thinking about all the reasons why it didn’t work out with your crush; get outside and breathe some fresh air instead. Just being out in the sun and breathing fresh air instead of hanging out at home will make you feel more alive, alert, energetic, and happier. If you have to do some work, then don’t hole up in your room and go to a coffee shop or park instead. Just being around other people, even if you’re not talking to them, will make you feel happier and will make you less likely to dwell on your crush.   Make sure to get out of the house at least once a day, even if it’s just to take a half hour walk. Staying inside for an entire day is guaranteed to make anyone feel unhappy, whether they’re trying to get over someone or not.  If you want to really get over your crush, then you can’t just be miserable by yourself and wait for someone new to come along. You have to be truly content with being on your own, doing your own thing, hanging out with your friends, and doing some casual flirting that won’t lead anywhere. You should appreciate the freedom that singledom can bring and know that, while dating someone can be fun and fulfilling, it should not determine whether you’re happy or sad.   Give it time. It can take weeks, or even months, to appreciate being single, but once you do, you’ll see that you never really needed your crush after all – what you needed was an idea of your crush that you thought would lead you to happiness, but it wasn’t the answer you were looking for, in the end.  Once you’ve done all the right things – adjusted your perspective, gotten rid of thoughts of your crush, and moved forward to do the things that make you happy – then you can really congratulate yourself for forgetting your crush. You have seen how great your life is without your crush, how amazing you are, and how lucky you are for the life you have. If you’re really over your crush, then you can slowly start to open up your heart and start crushing on someone new.   If you’ve really moved on, then celebrate your victory and get excited about all of the love that will come your way.  

let your emotions out.  forget your anger and bitterness.  focus on your crush’s worst qualities.  know that you deserve better.  remember how amazing you are.  stop talking to your crush.  stop talking about your crush, too.  avoid your crush on social media.  avoid places where your crush is likely to be.  mix up your routine.  lean on your friends and family.  do what you love.  enjoy your solo time.  get out of the house.  love the single life.  get ready for a new crush. 

 If you choose not to tell your crush about your feelings, or if you do but he or she doesn’t reciprocate them, you may find yourself feeling pretty down. These feelings are perfectly normal, but don’t allow them to skew your sense of self value.Make a list of the traits you have that a dating prospect would find valuable or attractive to remind you of your romantic strengths. Remember that not being right for one person doesn’t mean you aren’t a great catch!  , It’s important that you not just bottle up your negative emotions. Find an outlet that you can use to safely express your feelings without any social fallout or embarrassment.Try writing in a journal on your laptop. Get your feelings out in words to help you better understand and cope with them. If you feel like you need to cry, you should. Letting it out can make you feel much better and release tension that has built up throughout your interactions with your friend and crush. Dancing, exercising, drawing or any number of other things can serve as a creative way to express your emotions. Keep trying until you find one that fits you.  Sometimes when we’re upset we make bad decisions; that’s part of being human, but don’t allow your bad feelings to lead you to make choices you know are harmful or destructive.Drinking and drugs may seem like they’ll help, but they often just make you feel worse in the long run. They can also lead to addiction and serious health issues. It’s okay to spend some time lying on the couch and stress-eating, but don’t allow yourself to stay there for too long. Eating fattening foods and not getting any exercise can make you feel worse instead of better.  When you’re hurting, sometimes the best thing you can do is reach out to a friend or family member. Having a shoulder to cry on or a friendly ear to vent to can make a huge difference in how you feel when going through a difficult romantic situation.Focus on you and how you feel instead of discussing your friend or crush. Don’t put mutual friends in a difficult position by making them feel as though they need to choose sides. You may feel embarrassed about the situation, but speaking to others can help you appreciate that heartache affects us all and there’s nothing to be ashamed of.  

remember that you have value.  find an outlet for your feelings.  don’t give in to self-destructive urges.  look to other friends for support. 

 There is nothing wrong with spending some time wallowing in your unhappiness, in fact, it’s part of the process, but eventually it will be time to get up, dust yourself off and start moving on. You may not feel like you want to, but when you’re ready, you may need to force yourself to get started.Focus on thinking positive thoughts and emphasize the parts of your life that are going well. Make the conscious decision to start working on being happy again and take your happiness seriously. Don’t ruminate on negative thoughts. When you feel yourself starting to get down, force yourself to think about something different.  One of the hardest parts about rejection or not being with the person we care about is the feeling of helplessness it can create. No matter how strong your feelings are, they can’t change how others feel. Take control back from that feeling of helplessness by taking charge of your life and your actions.Make conscious decisions before you act. Don’t just get through the day, choose what you are going to do and then go after it. Make healthy choices to double up on the positivity gained through taking charge of your life. Choose to eat better, go for a run or something else that benefits you.  Once you are feeling more like yourself again, it may be time to get back on the dating scene. Try to meet some new people and even go on some dates. While you may not find the right person right away, you may find that you enjoy the process and the opportunities it presents.If you get into a relationship, take it slow and allow your feelings to develop naturally. Don’t put pressure on yourself to date if you’re not ready. Making some new friends could do just fine.  If things didn’t work out the way you’d hoped, that doesn’t make your friend or the crush that you’ve gotten over bad people. Just like with you, not being right for someone isn’t a gauge of their character. Don’t hold a grudge and try to remain friends if you’re comfortable with doing so.   If you don’t feel ready to be friends with either of them again, that’s okay. Take your time. Remember that friendships are valuable. Treat each of them with kindness and there may come a day when things can go back to how they once were for each of you. Remember that holding on to negative feelings hurts you more than anyone else.  

decide when it’s time to move forward.  take control of your life.  open yourself up to new romantic opportunities.  be kind to your friend and old crush. 

 Even if it really seems like it, this is not his/her fault. Also, if you don't know - or barely know - the person you run the risk of freaking him/her out, and it's possible you could also feel extremely embarrassed/ashamed of yourself for losing control afterwards. You don't want to make things any harder on yourself by letting - what is already a tough situation - lead to further negative emotions and problems. Instead, wait until you can be by yourself to let out your emotions.; , But don't take it out on yourself even if it is very tempting to do so. Spend as much time as you need releasing your feelings. Eventually you will feel better, even if this takes some time.  Especially not if you don't like who the crush really is as a person; This does not include how you thought that this person was.  Think about exactly what it was about your crush that disappointed you, and how this would have affected you if you'd gone on to have a relationship with them. It's likely that if anything about them especially put you off them romantically - then the thing/things would have made you highly unsatisfied or unhappy in some way. If this is the case, count this experience as being a lucky escape - and remember that there are other fish in the sea. Just because you happened to have a strong crush on one person, does not mean that this will never happen to you again with someone else. It's even possible that the next time the crush will turn out not to be the disappointment this one has.  Avoiding is really tempting and we all do it, but in the long run, it really makes most situations worse. It'll also make it harder to get what has happened out of your mind. If you are in any kind of regular contact with them, just try your best to treat them as you would any other casual acquaintance or friend. Not only does it make things less awkward for them, but it'll make getting back to normal much easier for you.  Unless of course there is a very good reason for this (i.e. they treated you badly in some way). Even if you feel turned off by them romantically, that does not mean that you can't try this - if in general you get along with them reasonably well or feel there's a good chance you might. You might gain a really great friendship out of this experience.  Regardless of how disappointed this person made you feel, remember that caring for yourself and your needs is far more important than dwelling on this other person.  

try to not let yourself break down right in front of him/her.  when you are by yourself, allow yourself to cry if you need to.  don't let this person bring you down because he/she is not even worth it.  consider the positives of the situation.  if you see this person a lot, try not to avoid them.  don't totally discount the idea of being friends in the future.  the most important thing to remember is continue to love yourself. 

 Don’t feel like you have to respond right away. Take a few seconds to collect your thoughts and take a deep breath. If the question is really awkward and strange, you want some time to respond appropriately. It can be awkward if you say something that doesn’t make sense!, If you like this person, you should give them the benefit of the doubt that their question wasn’t supposed to make you uncomfortable. Don’t become cold or angry immediately. Smile and indicate that you still like this person and want to work out this awkwardness., If you want to buy even more time, ask your crush for clarification on what they asked you and why they asked. Here are some example questions:   What did you say? What do you mean by that? Why are you asking?  

pause.  smile.  ask for clarification. 

 Asking it directly might be too awkward. Just start a relevant conversation like "Hey! You know, *name* already has a *girlfriend/ boyfriend*. How nice, I wish I could have one." Then, if that person responds then keep going. Sooner or later, you will ask " Hey, who do you like by the way?"; , Play truth or dare first. If that person chooses "truth" ask them the question. But if they choose "dare", just ask that person to do something like "shout aloud the name of your crush"  , If they are telling the truth, that means they are available. If that person just says "nobody" confidently and with no hesitation, then that person is telling the truth. (That is good)  , Don't worry, you will find the time to comfort them. Just don't get overprotective or "lay claims." often times, looking down at the floor may mean they like somebody out of their league, and is just working up the courage to talk to them. Interfering out of your own self interest can bring you guys from friends to acquaintances in no time. If you really like that person, it is better to remain friends were you can learn more about them than having them push you away because it is too awkward for them.  Or they are just shy to tell their secret crush. Don't put to much stock in this, and it is best to say immediately, "it's O.K. you don't have to tell," and to laugh it off, and then try to get it some other way.  Again, unless the person feels like telling the truth, it is very easy to say either nobody or the name of the hottest person in the class to throw you off track.  They might just confess to you!  , Good luck! And remember, don't get obsessive, or they will figure it out really fast. Truth or dare is the best way, but if you are there, it might discourage them from being truthful. and if you are reasonably sure they like you, just ask them out. It is easier and less of a strain to get it over with, no matter how awkward it will be. We have all been there.  

don't be straightforward!,  play truth or dare.  if they say "nobody" there's a 50% chance they might be lying.  if they look down on the floor with sad eyes, they might be shy or they are heartbroken.  if they are startled or froze, their crush might be you!,  if they say out another people's name, then there is a 50% chance that they are making it up.  there is a 1% chance that this would happen unless that person is straightforward.  start with step 1 or 2 then follow 3 onwards. 

 Remember to express your opinion in front of him. Some girls change who they are to match their crush, but no matter how tempting this may seem, be yourself 100% of the time.; , Always seem friendly and open to everyone you meet. Work this to YOUR advantage, so if he asks you for a favour, or your opinion, be obliged to reply. Then you'll seem more trustworthy, and he'll love you for it.  Whenever you have something to say to him, say it. Take every opportunity you get to socialize.  Whenever you want to call/talk/text/email him, make sure you have a reason (true or not) as to why you did it. Don't tell this to your crush, feel free to type freely. The reason why you need this is to rescue yourself if some other kid asks you why you called/texted/emailed/talked to him. Plus, if you're not sure that this guy likes you back, you can have an excuse to talk to him. Or ask for his number/email address. , But don't repeat or laugh at your own jokes. You may seem full of yourself if you repeat it, or laugh loads, but a smile or giggle is fine.  Once things have started to spark a little, start hinting (quite subtly) that you like him. Eventually, when you feel brave, tell him you like spending time with him and ask him out. As I said before, make sure there's an excuse to do so if anyone asks.  Don't restrict your every move - make sure you enjoy his company. Let loose when you feel the time is right, and be yourself whenever he's near. Spending time with him should be fun, not a lesson!  , Don't change your entirely self just to look "cool". The personality is the main thing for guys to look in a girl, and of course, NOT the look. But taking care of your looks means keep hygiene, brush your hair, don't be messy etc... Now, how to act yourself? Simple ----- HAVE FUN! Enjoy every seconds of your life, have fun with your friends, smile, laugh, be natural. AND, while you're doing it, take a glance at your crush (make sure he's around!) and maybe smile at him. He will see the cute side of yours. :)  

be confident!,  work to his advantage.  talk to him when you get the chance, but don't seem desperate.  have a reason to.  make his friends your friends.  ,  show your humour!,  be confident (2).  enjoy yourself!,  be yourself! 

 Throw yourself into the things you enjoy doing to keep your mind off your crush. If you used to spend a lot of time thinking about the object of your affections, reclaim that time by putting it towards a new project, a good book, or a series on Netflix that you’ve been meaning to watch.If you previously dropped some of your hobbies because you were distracted by your crush, picking them up again is a great way to move on.; , Instead of pining over someone who isn’t interested in you, mix it up with some new people who will appreciate how great you are. You don’t have to go looking for another crush just yet, but don’t be shy about reaching out to all kinds of people and making new friends.School, extracurricular activities, community clubs, and volunteer work are all good ways to meet people.  Expand your horizons and take your mind off the past by challenging yourself. If you’ve always wanted to do something but never worked up the nerve, there’s no better time than right now to give it a try.For example, you could audition for a play, take a solo trip, or apply for a new job.  

spend time on your hobbies.  meet new people.  try something completely different. 

 Assume that your crush is making a weird, not funny joke. Give them a chuckle and then move on. Smile at the person and laugh a little bit in a natural way.   This strategy works especially well for questions that seem to be teasing and/or not really serious. If your crush asks you if you have ten kittens in your backpack, they’re probably not being serious. Questions like this seem strange but might just be bad jokes.  Take a second and ask yourself if your crush could have been joking. Could they want you to say something strange back? Have they done this before? Try to find a way that their statement could be a joke and then respond accordingly.   If your crush asks you, “Have you ever been to the Moon?”, say, “Yes, I have. Just got back this morning!”  , If your crush asks you something too personal, tell them that you don’t want to answer that.   Say, “I don’t really want to answer that question.” You could also try, “I’m not going to answer that.” Be firm but not mean.  If it’s a personal question, saying “I don’t know” indicates that you don’t want to answer it. If it’s not a personal question about you, just say you don’t know the answer. It’s truthful and ends the conversation quickly.   For example, if your crush asks you, “How loudly do you snore at night?”, tell them that you don’t know because you are asleep.Or, if your crush asks you what the capital of a faraway country is, say you don’t know (if you actually don’t know).  If your crush asks you something really rude or disrespectful, you should tell them that their question made you uncomfortable. If the person is worth dating, they will respect you and try to understand your point of view.   You can say, “That question makes me uncomfortable, and I don’t want to answer it. Please don’t ask me questions like this again.”  , Change the subject quickly. Do not feel the need to continue having this strange conversation. Ask your crush about a common interest of yours, their school or workplace, the weather, current events, or anything else that interests either you or your crush.You can also say that you have to go. Make up an excuse to get out of the situation. You do not have to stay if you feel disrespected or uncomfortable.  

laugh it off.  joke around.  tell the person that you don’t want to answer that question.  say you don’t know.  tell them that the question made you uncomfortable, if this is applicable.  ask them about something else. 

 Maybe your crush asked an awkward question in an effort to talk to you or get to know you, but they didn’t know exactly what to say. Initiate a new conversation with your crush where you talk about something that you actually do want to talk about. Initiating conversations show people that you’re interested in them and want to get to know them more.Here are some sample questions you could ask your crush:   What did you do this weekend? What are your plans this upcoming weekend? Do you have any pets? What’s your favorite subject in school? Why? If you could have any superpower, what would it be? Why? What’s your favorite food?  , Your body language says a lot about you in social situations. If you want to make your crush feel more comfortable, you should make an effort to ensure that your body language is welcoming. Here are some tips to do this:   Smile. Maintain good eye contact with the person. Uncross your arms if they are crossed. Turn towards the person. Nod while the person speaks., Compliments make people feel appreciated. While your crush is talking, think about what you like about them. Give them an unusual, thoughtful compliment.Here are some examples:   “I really like the way you tell stories. You always make them funny and have great timing.” “I loved what you said in class about psychology! You brought a really unique perspective to the conversation.” “Those socks are great! Did you buy them because you like avocados?”  

initiate a different conversation.  use positive, open body language.  give your crush a compliment. 

 Before walking right up like a bundle of nerves, take a moment to collect yourself. Breathe slow and deep to the count of ten to help yourself relax. Remind yourself of your best qualities and make those the ones you display to your crush. What’s the worst that could happen? If you don’t talk to him or her, you’ll regret it, and that first spark could just be the start of something fantastic.Which of your characteristics are you most proud of? Can you get along with anyone? Are you athletic? Do you have a good sense of humor? Keep these traits in mind when working up your nerve to talk to your crush, and give them the chance to get to know the good things about you.It’s possible that you feel intimidated by your crush if they’re extremely attractive or popular, but for all you know they may feel the same way about you.; , Seeing your crush surrounded by his or her friends might make you even more nervous. Try to find a time when they’re alone and nearby when you can start a conversation without having to worry about being interrupted or met with other judging eyes.Look for your crush between classes or another time when they’re less likely to be with a big group.  Create a scenario that will give you an opportunity to make the introduction. If your crush drops something you might return it to them, for instance, or if you see him or her talking to a mutual friend you could use the connection as an icebreaker. Taking advantage of little openings will keep you from appearing desperate or having to walk up and start talking out of the blue.Be enthusiastic, but keep your cool. Don’t let yourself appear overly excited. If you have a class with your crush, ask them to clarify the details of a homework assignment as way of opening communication., Chances are, that anxious feeling you get before talking to your crush is never going to disappear entirely, so at some point you’ll have to just take a deep breath and go for it. Seize your opening when it presents itself. Start by introducing yourself if you haven’t met, or by asking a question to get them engaged if you’re already acquainted. Getting the conversation started is usually the scariest part, so once that’s out of the way you can carry on the interaction at ease.Boldness often pays off. You won’t know if the person you have a crush on is also interested in you unless you talk to them. Make peace with the idea of rejection. Your crush will probably be happy to talk to you once you get the ball rolling, but in the event that things don’t go as you hoped, just shrug it off. It’s always better to try and strike out than live with never knowing with what might have happened.  

give yourself a pep talk.  wait until the right time.  act natural.  just do it. 

 Don’t try to change your crush’s mind or prove to them how great you are. This might get on their nerves, and worse, it will make you feel a little pathetic. Save your energy for someone who likes you, and leave your crush alone.Remember that there are many reasons your crush might not be interested in you. Maybe they’ve liked someone else for a long time, or maybe they like you as a friend but don’t think you’d be a compatible couple. It doesn’t mean there’s anything wrong with you.  If you are friends with your crush, it’s normal to feel a little awkward around them after getting rejected. Let them know that you need some time away from them to get over your feelings. If they are a good friend, they’ll understand and respect your wishes.   If you aren’t really friends with your crush, you don’t need to explain to them that you’re taking some time away from them. In fact, it’s probably better if you don’t.  Resist the urge to stalk your crush online by unfriending or unfollowing them on the social media platforms you use. If you’re worried about caving in and re-following them later, block them.You can always re-add them in the future, once you’re over your feelings.  Don’t try to get a glimpse of your crush in the hallway at school or in the break room at work, no matter how tempting the idea may be. Put as much distance as you can between yourself and them. If you have to see your crush every day, try to sit far away from them and avoid conversation.Be polite. It’s okay to say hello if you happen to see your crush, but don’t linger or try to start a conversation.  If you and your crush have mutual friends, let them know that you’re trying to get over some feelings, and ask them not to talk about your crush around you for a while. Don’t ask what your crush is up to or whether they’re dating anybody, since this might re-ignite your old emotions.  Music, movies, and books can all be helpful in getting over an unrequited flame, but stay away from entertainment that helps you wallow in your feelings. If certain media makes you think about your crush, cut it out for a while and replace it with something that isn’t so emotionally loaded.   Try indulging in escapism for a while. Look for novels and TV shows that transport you to worlds very different from your everyday life.  

respect your crush’s boundaries.  explain that you need some time to recover.  unfollow or block your crush on social media.  stay away from places you think your crush may be.  avoid asking your friends about your crush.  avoid entertainment that reminds you of your crush. 

 Admit to yourself that you’re feeling bad about getting turned down. There’s nothing wrong with liking someone, and rejection is something almost everyone has experienced at some point. The sooner you come to terms with your feelings, the sooner you can heal from them and move on., Seek out the company of people who value you, like your friends and family. It’s okay to cry or talk your problems through with them, especially at first, but try to have some fun with your loved ones too. A day out with your pals or a visit with extended family can do wonders for your mood and self-esteem., Sit down with pen and paper, and spend a few minutes brainstorming all the reasons someone would be lucky to be with you. Include overall positive traits like kindness, as well as little quirks like always remembering someone’s favorite foods. Save your list so you can look at it when you feel down about yourself., Nobody’s perfect, and your previously rosy view of your crush might have hidden their bad qualities. Now that you have a bit more distance from them, think of everything that bothers you about your crush, from their weird laugh to their inability to remember your name. You’ll be feeling less love-struck in no time., Channel your feelings into your writing, drawing, music, or any other kind of art you like to make. You can show other people your finished work, or keep it private – it’s up to you., Your heart and ego are probably feeling a little bruised, so be gentle with yourself as you recover. Cut yourself a bit of slack at school or work. Instead of burying your sadness with endless movie-and-takeout sessions, do your best to eat well and get some exercise, and treat yourself to things that make you feel good about yourself.For instance, you could spend an afternoon at your favorite coffee shop or get a new haircut that you love.  

accept your feelings.  find support.  make a list of your good qualities.  think about your crush’s negative traits.  express yourself creatively.  practice good self-care. 

 Think about what you should say to your crush before you get them talking. Have a certain topic in mind that you’d like to discuss, and be prepared to answer any question he or she might ask about you. That way, you’ll be primed and ready to make a good impression during your first interaction, and you’ll have less chance of being caught off guard.Be ready for whatever turns your first meeting may take. Your crush might be tired, busy, distracted or nervous, and these moods can affect the way he or she comes off.  One surefire tactic for keeping someone that you’re talking to for the first time interested is focusing the conversation on them. Typically, it’s easier for people to talk about themselves because they already know what to say. Show an interest in your crush and let them talk about themselves, relating to them when you can. This will also give you a chance to get to know a little more about them.Ask questions. It’ll make your crush feel like you have a genuine interest in them, and it can also take some of the pressure of thinking of things to say about yourself.You should talk about yourself, of course, but don't steal the floor entirely. Try to keep things even, or let him or her take over and guide the conversation.  Listen when your crush talks about his or her hobbies, interests and preferences and see where they overlap with your own. The more things you discover you have in common, the more the two of you will have to talk about. Finding common ground could even help create an opportunity for a date or more casual hangout later on.Some good topics for finding out what you have in common are what classes you’re taking, movies, music, sports, family and your plans for the weekend.  Keep track of how long you’ve been talking to your crush to make sure you’re not holding them up, and pay attention to when they seem to be losing interest. Unless you really hit it off, your first couple of interactions might not last too long, and it’s better if you can lend yourself a sense of mystique and leave them wanting more. Excuse yourself with a phrase like “talk to you later” or “text me sometime” (you'll want to make sure they have your number first) to let your crush know that you want to talk to them again.Get a feel for natural lulls in the dialogue and look for an opportunity to make a smooth exit when things start to slow down, just as you made a smooth entrance.Don’t ramble on and on. The last thing you want to do is bore your love interest.  

do some mental preparation.  talk about them.  highlight your common interests.  know when to break away. 

 You won’t get anywhere if you don’t have faith in yourself. Stand tall. Let your crush see the things that make you interesting and unique. You should prepare to approach him or her with the attitude that you’ll love and respect yourself no matter the outcome. Confidence is contagious—your crush will pick up on your self-assured manner and know that you’re someone worth being around.Sometimes you just have to fake it until you make it. If you’re having trouble mustering the gumption to walk up and say hello, tell yourself that you’ve done this kind of thing a thousand times. It may just make you a little cooler under pressure.There’s a difference between being confident and being arrogant. Stick with the former. Try not to boast or act like you’ve got an over-inflated opinion of yourself. This can be just as off-putting as being shy, if not more so.  Don’t forget to smile, even if you’re a nervous wreck. Smiling can help put you at ease and make you more comfortable, and a friendly face will make you more approachable to others. Keep in mind that your crush may be just as apprehensive about talking to you as you are about talking to them, so greeting them with a smile will break the tension right away.Smiling can be tricky when you’re especially nervous. Try a light smirk with your eyes open slightly wider than normal to signal enthusiasm, and grin bigger to show a little bit of teeth if your crush does something cute or amusing., Aside from your demeanor, you appearance will also be one of the first things your crush notices. For this reason, it’s a good idea to make sure you’re presentable before making your move. Bad breath, unkempt hair and messy clothes can all be deal-breakers if you want to make a good impression. Give yourself a look over in the mirror before you enter your crush’s personal space.Tick off a short mental checklist to make sure that your teeth are brushed, you’re wearing deodorant and your clothes and hair are clean and well-groomed.  The most important thing to remember about approaching your crush is that it’s the effort that counts most, not the result. Rejection is a fact of a life, something that everybody has to deal with at one time or another. The excitement and satisfaction of finally talking to that special someone should be bigger than the fear of being turned down.It’s not the end of the world if the guy or girl you’ve got your eye on doesn’t return your interest. It may sting a little at first, but don’t let yourself become discouraged.Even if you get turned away while trying to strike up a conversation with your crush, you may still reach a breakthrough in building the confidence you need to try again next time.  

be confident.  smile.  freshen up.  keep a positive attitude. 

 Urban Dictionary defines a crush as “a burning desire to be with someone who you find very attractive and extremely special.”Crushes make you feel crazy emotions--like feeling shy and uncontrollably giddy at the same time. You can’t always choose who you have a crush on, but you can choose how you react once you figure out that you have a crush on someone.; , The term ‘crush’ gets thrown around a lot. It can mean that you simply have a passing infatuation with someone, or that you really like him or her.    The Friendly Crush (sometimes called a "squish"): It is important to remember that not all strong feelings are romantic. Letting yourself trust someone and become really close to someone, without necessarily having romantic feelings for them, is a really special thing. Wanting to be around a person all the time may just mean that you have gone from friends to best friends. Its totally normal to have a friend crush--you should want to hang out with your BFF as much as possible.  The Admiration Crush: When you idolize a person (like a celebrity, teacher, or classmate who has done something really cool) you may realize that you have really intense feelings about that person and what they have done. These feelings might be mistaken for romantic feelings simply because they are so intense. Feeling slightly awed in the presence of someone who has done something amazing or can teach you great things is natural. Often, its best to let a bit of time pass before really thinking too hard about these feelings. Generally once you have spent a lot of time with this person, you will have learned a lot from them and may begin to feel like you can stand on equal ground. You may find that your crush-like feelings simmer down once the initial awe of being in their presence wears off.  The Passing Crush: It is human nature to be attracted to other people. Even if you are in a great relationship, you still might find that you feel attracted to someone other than your romantic partner. This attraction is what we call a passing crush-- this new person may seem new and exciting, and they probably are, but that doesn’t mean you should reconsider the relationship you are in or, if you’re single, drop everything to try to be with him/her. Often times, passing crushes are spiked by being attracted--most often physically--to someone.  The Romantic Crush: Sometimes having a crush on someone really does mean you really, really like them--and in a romantic way at that. Having a romantic crush means that you want to be with that person in more than just a friendly way--you want to be their romantic partner. If you fantasize about kissing, holding hands with, or cuddling with that person, you probably have a romantic crush.  By doing this, you can figure out how best to proceed--whether you should keep your feelings to yourself or share how you feel with your crush. Read the next sections to help you figure out just how strong you are crushing on that special someone.  

know what a crush is.  know that there are different kinds of crushes.  figure out how serious your crush is. 

 The important thing is to show the person you are crushing on that you are not ready to give into them right away. Have a few supplies with you, to occupy yourself, for when you see your crush like:   A book or a magazine A pen and a sketchbook A cell phone; , A large part of having a crush involves some degree of ignoring someone. Don't go out of your way. If you appear to be unaffected by this person's presence, you'll appear to look normal. This can be a difficult step if you're head over heels.   Do not make it too apparent that you are trying to ignore them. It could be obvious if you're trying too hard. Stay calm and collected.  When you see them do not gaze at them too directly. Play with the circumstance by giving them sly looks and then appear distracted by looking around the room. Try to give off a slight smile on your face and in your eyes if they catch your eye contact., This is a great calming method that hits at the core of why you don't feel normal. The worst possible outcome from appearing awkward and nervous around your crush is not life threatening. By accepting the larger picture of the world, you may be able to relax about your feelings towards your crush.A lot of people feel like the social microscope is fixed on them, but the reality is that most people are concerned about themselves. People are not watching you and looking for an opportunity to scrutinize you., You don't want to ask your crush if they want to hang out. If they're nearby, talk with you're friends about your plans for the weekend. If you're in a situation where you're talking to them about your plans, don't ask them to join you. They'll seek it out if they're interested.You could even talk about how you and your friends are "trying to get a big group together" for yada yada. Then make it obvious that they could come if they ask.  It is normal to acknowledge people. Nothing detrimental will happen if you give them a casual hello, or even just a wave or smile. Saying "hi!" or "hey!" with a smile can potentially stir their world. It is the most casual thing you can do if you meet eye contact. You'll seem collected and the pressure is now in their court.  Making friends with your crush's friends might alleviate your nervous feelings by closing the distance between you and them. Talk to your crush's friends like a buddy. They'll remember you as being 'cool' and might speak highly of you to your crush.   Don't flirt with any of them. You don't want them to think you're interested or they might develop a crush on you.  Don't be afraid to call a little attention to yourself. This can improve your confidence level, if you choose to wear something that makes you feel good and attractive. This is one way that might spark their attention.   If you go over the top, they could become intimidated, but if this is the case, then rethink this crush. Don't be afraid to be yourself! Honesty is the best policy.  It is common to project what you want to see in your crush, as opposed to who they really are. Nobody's perfect, but it could help you get a better grip of yourself by knowing some of their flaws.   Don't get too nosy or they could find out and become alarmed.  

act moderately occupied.you could do this in many ways.  pretend the person is not there.  appear slightly amused by the person.  ask yourself, what's the worst that can happen?,  announce what you're doing.  say hello to your crush.  be friends with their friends.  be yourself with a pinch of wild.  separate your idea of them with reality. 

 Paying attention to your physical behavior means noticing how you react instinctively when your crush is around. Different people will react differently, and generally it will be a subconscious reaction. Generally, when you have a crush you will react in one of two ways--either by becoming really shy and tongue-tied, or by becoming really outgoing.    The Shy Reaction: Do you suddenly feel like you might like to curl up into a ball when your crush is around? Do you blush incessantly and can’t seem to raise your eyes up from that suddenly very interesting speck of dirt on the ground? Do you suddenly feel like you don’t have anything witty or interesting to say? All of these reactions point towards having a crush.  The Outgoing Reaction: Do you suddenly feel the urge to tease your potential crush? When they are around, do you get the sudden urge to talk a lot because you want their attention? These are all symptoms of a crush as well. Just make sure that you don’t make your crush uncomfortable if you act this way--try not to tease them too much or they might not want to hang out with you.  The Flirty Reaction: Do you feel like you want your crush to notice what you are wearing or how your hair is done that day? Do you feel like giggling and joking around? Maybe you suddenly feel the urge to make sure you look as good as possible so that your crush will notice you. Batting your eyes, flipping your hair over your shoulder, and playing with your hair are all signs that you have a crush.  The most common sign of having a crush is the feeling that you have a million butterflies flying around inside you when that special someone is around. It can also feel like your heart does a leap when you see your crush and you feel warm and giddy.   Do you suddenly feel nervous but excited at the same time? Maybe you feel like you want to hug that person or be with them all the time. These are all normal reactions to having a crush. Do you feel like you would give up anything to be near that person?  , Having a crush can cause you to suddenly want to be the star of the conversation, or not talk at all when your crush is around. If you are talking with a group of friends and the person you think you might have a crush on walks up do you do the following things, what do you do?If so you have a crush, you will probably do one of the following:   Do you: suddenly feel like you need to be the center of attention? You might find yourself directing the conversation so that you can talk about something cool you did in an attempt to impress your crush. You may even talk over one of your friends so that your story can be heard. You might also try to make as much contact with your crush as possible, keeping their attention on you. Do you: suddenly feel like you’re tongue-tied? Having a crush can sometimes make people feel embarrassed and like they don’t have anything to say. If you are normally talkative but suddenly clam up when that special person is around, you most likely have a crush. Do you: feel like your friends sort of disappear when your crush walks up? You may be surrounded by people but suddenly all you can see is your crush. You might smile a lot, even if what your friends are talking about isn’t funny. If your friends asked you something, would you have a hard time paying attention to the question because you’re focused on that special person? These are all signs that you have a crush.  A major sign of having a crush on someone is wanting to look nice around that person. Do you spend more time getting dressed in the morning? Have you bought new clothes you thought your crush might like? Do you spend an extra amount of time getting your hair or makeup just right, just in case you see your crush that day? If so, you most definitely have a crush.  

consider your behavior around the person you think you might have a crush on.  consider how you feel around your potential crush.  notice how you act around your friends and your crush.  decide whether or not you’re putting more effort into your appearance. 

 If you find yourself, thinking about that special person more than you think about anything else, you most likely have a crush.   Perhaps you are at dinner with your family but you aren’t paying attention to the conversation because you are wondering what your crush is doing. Maybe you’re hanging out with your friends but secretly you wish that you were hanging out with your crush. When you are going to sleep at night, do you think about what it would be like to kiss your crush goodnight?  , Do you find yourself bringing that person up in conversation with your friends all the time? A major sign that you have a crush is when your friends tell you that you talk about that specific person all the time. If you feel comfortable doing so, it would be a good idea to talk to your best friends about thinking that you might have a crush on someone. They can help you figure your feelings out and might have some ideas about how to get to know your crush better.   Be careful who you talk to about having a crush. Don’t just go blabbing to any random friend about your crush. If you do that, someone might tell your crush and then you might get embarrassed. Only tell your best friends--the friends you can trust the most.  Do you have any habits or patterns you have gotten rid of or changed in the hopes of getting your crush’s attention?   Do you walk by their locker a million times in the hopes of seeing your crush? Have you changed the path you take to class because you know he/she walks that way? You have taken a new and deep interest in a subject that you know your crush is interested in, like photography or rock climbing.  Often, when you have a crush, you will feel excited when your crush gets brought up in conversation. If someone mentions your crush in passing do you:   Feel excited? Suddenly get that feeling like a bunch of butterflies are flying around your stomach? Feel like your heart might leap out of your chest? Blush and giggle? Get tongue-tied and flustered? If any of these things happen, you have a crush on someone.  There is a difference between thinking about someone and daydreaming about someone. Thinking about someone means you wonder what that person is doing, or how he/she is feeling. Daydreaming is when you fantasize about things that you want to happen. People who have crushes on other people tend to daydream about their crushes a lot.   If you daydream about that certain someone and imagine you two going on adventures together, holding hands, kissing, or anything romantic like that, you most likely have a crush on that person.  Being reminded of that special someone when listing to a song, watching a movie, or reading book is a definite sign that you have a crush.If you listen to a romantic song and think, ‘Hey, that’s how I feel!’ you have a crush. If you watch a movie like Titanic and envision you and your special someone as Jack and Rose, you have a crush. If you read Romeo and Juliet and immediately identify with the hopelessly deep love of the main characters, you have a crush.  While reading this, has there been one specific person on your mind while reading this article? If you answer yes, it means you have a crush on that person.  

consider whether or not your crush is all you think about.  notice whether or not you talk about your crush a lot.  consider whether or not you’ve changed anything about your life with your crush in mind.  pay attention to your internal reaction when someone brings your crush up in conversation.  pay attention to your daydreams.  notice if things remind you of your potential crush.  consider your thoughts while reading this article. 

 You should always wear what you feel comfortable in, don't just wear something to impress you crush or fit in. Wear clean clothes that make you look your best if you know you're going to be around your crush.   Just dress naturally. Some people might get intimidated if you try getting really dressed up around your crush. You want to act naturally and be yourself, not like you're something you're not. Focus more on clothes that help you feel confident. If you want to impress your crush, you'll do it with your personality, not with your shirt. Make sure your clothes fit well, are clean, and make you feel good.; , If you're going to be around your crush, bad breath could be a turn off. Make sure you that you brush regularly, especially after meals, and keep some mints, gum, or other little fresheners around in case you need them.   Breath strips act quickly and are easy to carry around in your pocket, so you don't have to be chewing gum constantly while you're trying to flirt. Check in the mirror after meals to make sure you don't have anything stuck in your teeth. That could be embarrassing after the fact.  Again, you don't need to be a movie star to attract your crush, or to act naturally around them, but it's a whole lot easier to be relaxed and confident around someone if you're not worried about the smell you're putting off. Shower regularly and take care of basic body stuff so you can feel confident.   If you have acne problems, talk to your parents and your doctor about prescription solutions. There are lots of stronger medicated facial soaps out there to try. Don't suffer in silence. Put some thought into your hair and basic grooming. You don't need to be glammed up all the time, but don't look like you just rolled out of bed.  Hanging around someone you're attracted to can be hard if you don't know much about them. You might want to impress them, or come off like an attractive and interesting person, but what do they think is attractive? What do they think is interesting? The more you know the answers to these questions, the more comfortable you can be.   Get to know them on social networking first. Reach out on Facebook or Twitter and become friends, or start following them on Instagram to get some sense of their sense of humor and style. Talk to mutual friends to find out things like whether or not your crush has a partner already, or whether or not your crush might be interested. It's a lot easier to chat up someone who you think might like you.  One-on-one hangouts can be challenging. If you're trying to hang out with someone, do it in a group, so your crush can see how you act naturally around your friends, instead of trying to do it all at once.   Invite your crush to hang out with your friends, or just to sit with your friends at lunch. There doesn't need to be a reason. Alternatively, you might feel more comfortable hanging out one-on-one. If you do, try to find reasons to hang out with your crush solo, even in a non-date type of situation. Just try sitting together on the bus, or working on homework together, or sitting together at lunch.  Lots of people make the mistake of thinking that you need to talk a lot and make a big show if you want to attract someone's attention. Not necessarily the case. Hang back a little and make your contributions magnetic and more meaningful when you do talk.Talk more quietly, so everyone else needs to quiet down when you speak. Turn to your crush and lean in when you have something to say. Make it meaningful. It'll be mysterious and personal. Your crush might be attracted to more flamboyant, loud, or chatty people, and that's ok. That doesn't mean you need to change who you are to attract them, or get to know them better.  It's important to let your crush know that you exist, and that you like talking to them. When you see your crush walking down the hallway at school, or passing them in public, smile brightly, wave your hand, and say hi. Use their name out loud. This little gesture goes a long way in making someone feel valuable and wanted.   This isn't a sign that you're crushing on someone, it's just a sign that you're nice. If you see someone you like, say hello.  When you like someone, making eye contact can do more than a couple thousand words and a bunch of love letters. When you're hanging out, or having a conversation, make eye contact and use gentle body language to seem more approachable.   Use open body language around your crush, keeping your shoulders back and your arms uncrossed. Don't stare at someone you like. Catching someone's eye and smiling is one thing, but gawking at someone you think is attractive during class will just come across as creepy.  When you're first getting to know your crush a little better, try to keep your interactions brief to avoid any awkwardness or difficulty in talking. Just chat up someone about the class you just had, or have a brief talk about your weekend plans, then say, "Well, nice talking. See you later."   Don't worry too much about having really deep or interesting conversations. It'll happen as you get to know someone better, which takes time. Nobody has great conversations at first. Give them a chance.  Don't know what to talk about? try to figure out something that you have in common and can share together. Talk about a class you've got together, or an assignment, or talk about an upcoming sports event at your school. Find something you can shoot the breeze about.   Don't think too hard. If you live in the same town, or go to the same school, you've automatically got a little in common. Talk about your neighborhood. Gossip about common friends. Complain about teachers.Online is a great way to find out simple things like this. If you know your crush watches a certain show that you like, talk about the last episode, or your favorite characters, or what you think is going to happen next.  One good short-cut to starting a conversation is to ask your crush if they'll help you do something. Ask for a hand with some homework assignment you're working on, or ask for some help setting something up in gym class. Even if you're fine on your own, it'll be a chance to have some time to talk.   Go with a little white lie if you need to: "Have you seen my math book over here? I just had it, and I can't find it. Will you help me look?" Then chat while you try to find it. When you never can, say, "That's ok, you're so sweet for helping. I like talking to you!"  , If you want to get to know someone better, and maybe even get them to like you, it's a good idea to let your sense of humor out as much as possible. Laughter is infectious, and people like being around people who are funny. Even if you're not a class clown, you can still have funny conversations with your crush.   Don't say, "Hey, how's it going?" That's a boring conversation to start. Instead, say, "I'm thinking of busting out of this prison. So far all I've got is a calculator and half a Snickers. What do you think? Can I count on you? You're not going to tell the cops right?" If your crush says something like, "You're weird," then you know they're a boring or stuck-up person. Don't waste your time getting to know people who don't share your sense of humor.  Some studies show that gentle teasing can cause magnetic reactions in people, causing our brains to attract where we might naturally reject.People don't want to be put on pedestals and complimented all the time. This is boring.This is also while lots of "nice" people are rejected by crushes who are looking for something more interesting. That doesn't mean you should be a jerk, just that you should learn to let your sense of humor out in gentle ways.   If you see your crush put up a bunch of selfies on Facebook, tease them about them. "Ok, there are a lot of these, so I'm going to help you rate them one by one, in terms of what it looks like you're thinking. This one says, Oh wow my room smells like corn-dogs."  , People like for conversation to be easy. If you want to put your crush at ease and get them talking, asking creative, engaging, or even silly questions is the way to go. Treat it like a fun conversation game.   "Say this is your last day on earth. Where do you go first? What do you eat? What do you do? Who do you hang out with? What's on the iPod?" It's important to avoid prying or coming off like you're insensitive. Don't ask questions that are none of your business, like, "Your dad doesn't look like he makes a lot of money, how is your family doing?"  , Not sure what to talk about? Follow up on something that you already talked about. If your crush mentioned a big event one weekend, follow up and ask how it went the next time you see them. try to remember the things you talk about, so you'll have a store of new conversations to pick up on.   If your crush mentioned a book, show, or movie last time that you were unfamiliar with, check it out and talk about it the next time you see each other. Be honest and offer your opinions.  If you want to get to know your crush even better, it's important to engage with their group of friends. Treat your crush as a close friend, and try to hang out in your crush's circle of friends as much as possible.   Invite your crush to hang out with you on group events as well. try to get your crush to hang out in a group with your friends, so it'll be more comfortable and fun. Get to know your crush in a group. Find out what your crush likes, what your crush thinks is funny, and what your crush is like to be around. This can help make your conversations a lot more natural and fun. Lots of people talk about the "friend zone" being a bad idea for a potential date or relationship. If you like someone, it's good to get to know them, every time. Don't worry about befriending someone for a while before you get closer.  

dress in flattering clothes that make you feel comfortable.  check your breath.  groom yourself regularly.  try to learn as much as you can about your crush.  hang out in a group at first.  talk less to keep some mystery about yourself.  start slow by saying hello regularly.  make eye contact.  keep your conversations short, at first.  find something you have in common.  ask for help with something.  let your sense of humor shine through.  be a tease.  ask interesting questions.  recall a previous conversation.  get to know your crush's friends. 

 This can be a difficult realization because typically crushes are linked to romantic feelings. This is not always the case. An identity crush is someone you come to view as a leader. This causes you to want to identify your attributes to theirs., This type of crush opens more doors for developing a friendship. You don't need to act uninterested or half-amused. Simply ask them to do something you know they like to do like:   Play music Go bowling Play golf See a movie Play laser-tag Go tubing  , Sometimes identity crushes can be for the wrong reasons. Lots of time people aspire to be the popular kids in high school, but sometimes the popular kids aren't good people. If you're ever faced with hanging out with a new clique and can't invite you're old friends, then weigh your options.  This is a great opportunity to hang out with them when you are in your best element. Make sure your crush and friends are both okay with this plan. This will give your crush the chance to see how you normally act with your friends.  

recognize you are crushing.  ask them to hang out.  evaluate their character.  invite them to hang out with your friends. 

 You don't have to wait around for the perfect chance to say something to your crush. You could always ask a random person that you find cute for a stick of gum. Talking to people you're attracted to will improve your comfort level when talking to someone you really have a crush on., Being at home can be a hard time when you're heels deep in a crush's spell. Your parents can offer valuable advice because they went through what you're going through. If you're not comfortable talking to your folks about it then ask a cool uncle or a sibling you're open with. Sharing what you are going through help elevate pressure you feel when you're near your crush.  Writing out your feelings and ideas can be a great therapy. Whether you write memories, letters, or your personal thoughts, you are practicing an expressive process that strengthens your physiological growth and health.It is important to face your emotions by yourself. It is a good time to reflect on how this crush is only a person. Write whatever feels right. Don't concern yourself with typos or grammar, this is for you.   If you have friends or a younger sibling around, you might consider keeping this in a private location.  Staying after school for clubs or sports could be a great way of distancing yourself from your crush. Playing sports will especially help by pushing yourself both mentally and physically. Staying too stagnant will not help you act normally around a crush. Think of exerting yourself as a way of releasing your frustrations.   This is a good way of dealing with nervousness on a larger scope. Physical activity improves your mental state in your everyday life. 

practice talking to other people.  talk to a family member.  keep a journal.  do extracurricular activities. 

 The adrenaline rush you experience when doing something novel or challenging gets your heart racing and is similar to how you feel when you get a crush on someone.The best part about this is, she will associate the feeling of excitement with you and it may help create a heightened sense of romantic interest in you .   Not only are couples who engage in exciting activities significantly happier in their long-term relationships , but being in an excited state of mind also increases sexual arousal in the short-term as well.Go on some rides together before you are alone together. Ski, hike, dance or to a concert—anything that will get the adrenalin flowing for both of you.; , Evening often works the best because dim lights and darkness has been found to increase attraction, communication and connection, physical contact and sexual arousal.Plus, special or new surroundings are sure to make the kiss more memorable.   The location might be outside under the stars, in a candle-lit restaurant or a dark gym during lunch, but make sure the two of you have some privacy. She may not want an audience.  While you will want to dress in clean clothes, brush your hair and look good for your date, don’t forget to pay special attention to your oral hygiene. Brush your teeth, and don’t eat anything strong or stinky like garlic before and during your date. You can also bring along breath mints or gum just in case.   You’ll want your lips to be soft, so bring along some lip balm or chap-stick as well. Wear red. It makes men seem more attractive and sexually desirable., Your goal is to become friends, so you’ll want to find things to laugh about together and discover things that you have in common. Read up on some funny jokes or make up your own and tell her. Laughing is a good way to break the anxiety and awkwardness of first dates.   Start with small talk about the weather or a teacher you have in common. Compliment her on her hair, clothes or smile. Get to know her personal preferences by discussing movie scenes or songs to get an idea of what kind of things she likes and how she feels about romantic encounters. Keep your face tilted up when you talk to her as this makes you seem more masculine and attractive., You want her to feel comfortable and connected to you—more so than her other guy friends. Sharing emotional and personal information can really create a very strong and lasting connection.Women often use kissing to bond and reinforce that bond.Some questions or prompts to ask in order to enhance bonding are: Describe a perfect day. What do you feel most grateful for in your life? What is the greatest thing that you have accomplishment in your life? What memory do you treasure the most? What is your worst memory? If your house caught on fire and you only had time to save one item (family and pets are already safe), what would it be? Show her that you like her by smiling and looking into her eyes.Let her know how you feel. She may not know that you want to be more than friends, so the best thing you can do to avoid being stuck in the “friend zone” is to tell her you want more., You’ll want to pay special attention to how she reacts to you to decide if/when you should go for the kiss. Positive body language tells you that she likes what you are doing, while negative body language tells you that she dislikes it. Look for combinations of either positive or negative behaviors that let you know how she feels.   Positive body language can be shown when she moves towards you, points her feet toward you, uncrosses her legs, keeps her arms open and palms up, playfully fondles her jewelry or hair, smiles or maintains eye contact.Negative body language may mean she moves away from you, points her feet away from you, keeps her legs and arms crossed, palms down, hands closed, fidgets, frowns or turns her eyes to the side.If you are getting a lot of negative body language, then you should probably change your approach or try again at a better time or when she is in a better mood. If she make a lot of body contact with you, such as touching your hand, rubbing against your knee, gently bumping up against you, tapping you on the shoulder or holding your hand, then she’s probably into you., To get close enough for a kiss, you have to enter her personal space and see how she feels about it. It takes trust or expectation to allow you to get closer, and if she’s ok with it, you know you have a good chance of getting that kiss.Additionally, touch reinforces that you are interested in her and that you enjoy making contact with her.   Be a gentleman. Pull out her chair at a restaurant and push it back in after she sits down. This gives you the opportunity to gently touch her on the shoulder, arm or upper back.Hold her hand. If she doesn’t pull away from you, then you know she likes what you are doing. Adjust her hair. Touching her hair is intimate without being as personal as a kiss and will allow you to see how she feels about you. If she flinches or moves away, then she’s probably not ready or interested in a kiss. If she seems to like it, then you can take the next step toward that first kiss.Try a kiss on the cheek first. Lean in and give her a peck on the cheek to see whether she offers positive or negative feedback. Then you can decide when it’s time to try a real mouth-to-mouth kiss.  You will want to build up to the moment and find the right time to break the tension with a kiss. Don’t wait too long, though, or she may think you aren’t interested.When you are both close, touching regularly, maintaining extended eye contact, showing positive body language, and you are not being distracted, take your chance.   The right time for the two of you may be toward the end of the first or second date, but it’s better to do it sometime before the end of the night so you’re not sitting in the car or standing in the doorway awkwardly.Be spontaneous. An incredible kiss happens when everything falls into place. It does not have to be at any specific point during your time together. It could happen before you enter a restaurant early in the evening, across a dinner table, in a theater, or just while taking a stroll under a full moon.Try not to ask first. Asking permission shows a lack of confidence and can ruin the moment. Her body language should tell you when she’s ready, but if you really aren’t sure, you can ask., When kissing, assertiveness is attractive, so commit and go through with it.Look at her lips, wet your lips for lubrication, turn your head slightly to the rightand lean in for a closed-mouth kiss. Wait for a moment so your partner can meet you half-way.Use touch to make the kiss more interesting, such as holding her cheek or head, brushing her hair back, touching her neck or cuddling. Though you may maintain eye contact until she returns the kiss, it’s best to close your eyes once your lips touch., The initial kiss is best closed-mouth without a lot of saliva exchange, and keep your tongue in your mouth.Kiss for a few moments, and pull away when she does. You can still maintain physical touch and eye contact, though.Now’s the time to follow her lead and match her movements and passion.Listen to her breathing to see if she is enjoying the kiss and to ensure you are letting her get enough air., Sometimes the girl you want to kiss is just not interested, and you will have to move on. Recognize that it’s probably not your fault she doesn’t want to kiss—maybe she has a lot on her mind, is already in a committed relationship or just ate garlic for lunch.   Don’t make over generalizations about the fact that this girl didn’t want a kiss. Realize that being rejected in this one particular situation with this person does not mean that it will happen again with someone else or that there is anything wrong with you. It’s important to know that what happened does not say anything about your self-worth or value as a person.Give yourself some time to “get over” your feelings for this girl and try again with someone else that you like.  

plan to do something exciting together.  pick a time and place that sets the mood.  pay attention to your grooming.  talk to her.  bond with her on a deeper level.  learn to read body language.  make physical contact.  time it right.  take the lead.  be sensual and not overly aggressive or sloppy.  learn to deal with rejection. 

 You should try to get your boyfriend in a romantic mood first, and lower the pressure with a few slower, warm up kisses first. Make these a few soft pecks after it's clear he's in the mood to kiss.Perhaps your boyfriend will start French kissing you without being asked if you seem receptive enough during the first kisses. The best approach is to wait a bit and see if it happens on its own. You will know he wants to kiss you when you make eye contact, and one or both of you moves closer to the other. Tilt your head to the side, and part your lips. Gently draw one of your boyfriend’s lips between your own as you kiss so your lips interlock a bit. Don’t be afraid to tilt your head a bit as this will signal renewed interest. You could say, "Let's go slow" to be clearer to your boyfriend, especially if he is inexperienced at kissing or you are. You could also acknowledge your nervousness by saying something like, "Hey, I'm a little nervous. Are you too?" He may appreciate your honesty. Remember, he might be just as nervous as you are. If he's a more experienced kisser, telling him something like, "I love kissing slowly at first" can help set the mood.; , Because French kissing involves kissing with tongues, if you rub your tongue over your partner’s lips, it will give him the signal that you’re OK with French kissing.Do this lightly because it will be romantic to your partner and a bit teasing. That’s good. Sometimes your boyfriend might feel insecure and is looking to see if you’re all right with it. You could say something like, "You have really nice lips" as you rub your tongue over them, looking him briefly in the eye. Feel free then to gently push the tip of your tongue into your partner’s mouth. If your partner has any experience, he will probably then move his tongue deeper into your mouth.  You could just come out and ask! Remember that he's probably nervous too.   If you're kissing slowly and gently at first, more nibbling than French kissing, you could take a small step back, look him deeply in the eyes, and say, "I'd love to French kiss you right now, but I'm nervous because I've never done it before. Could you show me how?" Or you could say something like, "Want to try French kissing? I would love to try that with you." If you're worried about bad breath, just make sure you pop a mint or brush your teeth or spray mouth freshener into your mouth before the kissing starts!  , If you’re really nervous because you’ve never French kissed before, it’s OK for you to tell him that. Find the right place and time, which is when you are both alone and comfortable with each other.   It might feel embarrassing at first, but he will probably appreciate your honesty, and it might excite him to think that he will be the first person to French kiss you. It's a good idea to have this conversation before you actually are kissing. Find a casual way to say it. For example, while you're driving in a car or eating dinner together, you could say, "This is hard for me to say, but I've never French kissed before! Maybe you can show me how later." Don't make it overly serious. You could also start the conversation with a question by asking him if he knows how to French kiss. This might entice him to show you how to French kiss. Remember that the best relationships are built upon a foundation of strong communication anyway. It's best to wait until you've been dating for a little bit before you have this conversation, though.  What if your boyfriend is not ready for French kissing? That's OK. Everyone needs to go at his or her own pace.   Your boyfriend might just be nervous, so don't read too much into it if your boyfriend hasn't French kissed you unless you've been going out for months. In that case, you could ask why your boyfriend feels that way. If the relationship is new, you could just let the French kissing happen naturally. Let your boyfriend take the lead on it, and if he's not ready work on building your bond and connection by sharing time together and great conversations, rather than forcing the kissing.  

start slowly.  rub your tongue over your partner’s lips.  ask him to french kiss you while you are kissing.  let him know if it's the first time.  be patient. 

 If you're looking for specific traits in someone, ask a friend or even take the time yourself to see what this boy is all about. You don't want to waste your time on someone who isn't who you think he is. What's the point of that?; , Spend some time talking to him: make your goal at least once every other day. You don't want to seem obsessive, but you don't want to appear too afraid to talk to him either.  Do you both love rock music? What about basketball? It's always helpful to know what this guy is interested in, and even if you can't find anything you two have in common, try to get interested in what he likes. Who knows? He might not end up liking you, but you could find a new hobby.  Make him laugh and feel comfortable around you. However, make sure you avoid using any jokes that could offend him; you never know what could happen.  You don't have to go overboard, but the occasional sitting next to him or complimenting him can have a huge impact.  The best thing to do in a moment of awkward silence. You can also start a conversation like this, especially if you want to get off of a topic other than yourself. This is also a great way to get to know him a bit better.  Consider inviting a few other people with you to avoid an awkward first "date" night. Go to the movies or an arcade, or go and get some pizza.  You should get him a birthday gift/Christmas presents. Nothing too big, though.  When you guys have been talking for a while (about 2 to 3 weeks) start flirting with him a little bit more. Touch his shoulder during conversation or look him right in the eyes when you two are talking. (But don't look into his eyes in a weird or obsessive gaze or he will flip.)  , Once you guys start hanging out more often, ask more personal questions about him, and reply honestly when he asks you about your life, unless it's something personal you don't want to spill, and be open to him. Let him get to know you, but make sure not to take it too fast. Don't tell him everything he needs to know about you in your conversations. Let him nibble off the cheese and show him little tidbits of yourself. That way, you'll have new conversations every time, and you won't be boring. Boring topics are the free way to the check out list! And avoid lying too. The truth will always find it's way back to him, and it could end up embarrassing you.  If it's just you two, strike up a conversation casually, let him know that he can be comfortable with you in any situation. That's a great way to land him as your boyfriend. And always be there when he needs you. That's not just if you want to be bf/gf, that's for friends in general. But it's still a good tip.  The first thing you've got to find out if whether or not he's still got a fire for his ex. If that's the case, you don't want him as a boyfriend. To find out, casually ask him. Get him to talk about any feelings he has about her, whether they're good or bad. Get him to spit out about whether or not he's seen her recently, if they still keep in touch, etc. If you find that he's over her, then move on to step two.  Let him know in no vague terms that you are 100% over that "person" who broke your heart. Guys are very easily deterred by women who are still hung up on an ex. Don't come off like one of those women. That's the quickest way to make sure this guy that you like stays just your friend.  Let your guy friend know how much you highly think of him and how much you think he would make a great boyfriend for someone one day. He's probably so used to being nagged, debased and mothered by his ex that it will be refreshing to hear that you think he would actually make a fabulous boyfriend.  But don't call it a date. In its place, invite him out to the movies one night as friends. If he asks you out the following weekend and you ask him about again, the next thing you know, you both will find yourself dating.  Send him comical text messages and e-mails. It's a fantastic way to build your friendship and future relationship. Guys want women they can be themselves with them. By letting all hang out, you're letting him know that you're fun and cool at the same time.  Do this when you two are alone someplace, you won't know if his answer is true otherwise. A lot of guys say "no" if they're around their friends because, they don't want to attract attention from everyone else. They feel like they're pressured to say yes, because, well, their friends will rag on them and drive him to "no".  He means, "You're great as a friend, I just don't want to be bf/gf right now." Respect his choice, and then stay friends. Don't act let down, because that will create an oddness between you two, which will set you back to almost strangers. And if one day, he says, "Hey, do you want to catch a movie with me? You know, as a date?" then smile(you know you've been waiting!) and say, "I thought you'd never ask." and bite your lip. Biting your lip gives you a look of excitement and anxiety which is a good look, because then the guy knows you're nervous too.  Do the same "bite the lip" routine. And, if he goes in for the kiss, enjoy every steamy moment of it. You can't say you haven't known him for long enough, because you have, as a friend. That automatically gives you the right to kiss him right when he asks you out. But don't kiss him first, let him do the honors, and then, after a few dates, you can make the first moves all you want.  There are more fish out there in the sea. You'll find that one guy someday!  

try to make sure you really like this guy, and if he's even worth your time.  start getting to know him better.  find common interests.  joke around and carry a sense of humor.  flirt!,  ask questions.  ask him if he's busy during the weekend.  give him gifts.  ramp up your flirtatious behaviour.  ask personal questions.  get him to be comfortable around you.  if he had an ex, find out if he's over her.  tell him about your ex.  hint to him that you're interested.  ask him out on a date.  text and e-mail him.  and once you guys have hung out and finally gotten to know a lot(but not everything) about each other, pop the question, "have you ever pictured us, you know, "together"?",  if the guy says "i don't feel like i want to take us to next level right now.",  and if the guy says yes the first time, be cool about it.  if he doesn't like you, don't take it personally. 

 Not only will these tips help you feel more confident when you go in for a liplock, they'll also send subtle hints that you're ready to be kissed.   Wear lipstick or chapstick. Skip the sticky lip gloss. Keep your breath fresh. Pop a mint beforehand instead of chewing minty gum, which you'll have to find a way to spit out. Smell amazing. Before you meet up with your guy, shower off and use scented moisturizer or a few spritzes of perfume.; , Lean your head on your guy's shoulder as if you are about to fall asleep. Look up at him - if his arm goes around to let you in, go for the kiss. If not, or if he doesn't seem to be taking things the same way you are, he might not be ready yet. Just relax for now.  There are a few things to do to plant the idea of kissing you like he thought of it. Try these:   Look at his lips. Drop your gaze and your eyelids to half mast, then slowly, look back up at him and give him a little welcoming smile. Reach up to twine your arms around his neck, or lightly play with the hair at his neckline. This will let him know you are ready to get up close and personal. Slowly lean your face closer to his. Moving in communicates that you're ready for more contact.  Some guys are very shy, and even those who aren't have been drilled over and over about unwelcome touching. Consider lightly kissing him on the cheek to show him that you're okay with touch, a lot of boys worry about going too far.  Yep, some guys really do need an engraved invitation. Let's say you've tried to show him you're ready, and he looks interested, but you just can't get him to kiss you. Say something like, "Couldn't we just be kissing right now?" If he doesn't kiss you then, he isn't going to.  Don't bring out the tongue, teeth or strong embraces on the first few kisses. Instead, keep your lips soft and slightly parted, and avoid puckering.   For more technique tips, see How to Kiss.  

make yourself kissable.  lean in and make eye contact.  hint that you want a kiss.  consider taking the lead.  invite him to kiss you.  keep it gentle at first. 

 In order to obtain a kiss, you must appear attractive to the boy. Although you want to look your best, be sure that you still look like yourself. Otherwise, the boy may not like you for who you truly are.Dress nicely. Find clothes that suit your body and skin tone. Select the colors that best complement you. Although you should dress nicely, be sure that you appear modest and not over the top.; , You want your lips to look irresistible, not dry or cracked. Start by regularly applying lip balm to keep your lips smooth and hydrated. Try avoiding bright lipsticks or sticky glosses as it can get messy and ruin your kiss.Another way to get soft lips is to gently exfoliate them with a wet washcloth and sugar. Always keep a good lip balm on you just in case you need it.  Before seeing the boy you want to kiss, be sure to brush your teeth and rinse with mouthwash, especially after you eat. Always keep breath mints or gum on you in case you need to freshen your breath if things look promising.Try offering a mint to him, as he may take it as a hint that you want him to kiss you. Don't eat strong smelling food like garlic or onions right before you see him.  

prepare your appearance.  make your lips kissable.  freshen your breath. 

 Fresh breath is important for kissing because you want to give the boy as many excuses as possible to keep on kissing you. Try using lifesavers or mints and always brush your teeth before you meet up with him. Remember, bad breath isn't the end of the world but avoid it if you can.   Try not to eat strong, spicy, or garlicky food before you see him. Again, if you can't avoid it, it's not a huge deal but it's better to avoid it altogether.; , You can't always plan when and where you'll kiss a boy, but you can try to be prepared. If you're dressed pretty and in a way you feel comfortable, you'll have a spring in your step. That means you will be more confident. More confidence means that there's a bigger chance the boy comes back to kiss you again.   Don't necessarily wear lip-gloss, and don't wear heavy lipstick. Lip-gloss and lipstick, especially, will rub off on your partner, making him look sparkly or sloppy, depending on the situation. Stick with lip balm instead. Don't wear a bunch of accessories like hats, or wear your hair so that it gets in the way. Boys like natural beauty anyway. You may want to try kissing the boy when you have your hair up, so that he focuses only on you and the kiss, not the hair tickling his face.  Public places are generally not so good for the first kiss, as you can get people staring at you or even heckling you. Try to find a place that's public, but still intimate, for you to share your first kiss.  This will not only make him understand that you like him, but will also give him some time to adjust to you, so that you're not going from 0 to 60 in a second.   Hold his hand or put your arms over his shoulders. Start moving your body so that he's much closer to you; it'll be awkward if you have to move a long way to kiss him. Touch his hair or face to make him know that you are interested. Gently touch his nose with your pointer finger and smile at him. You can even try hugging him first, and while you're still hugging him, lean back and go in for the kiss. This creates a connection from the very moment you hug.  This means both physically and emotionally. Kissing says "I like you more than just a friend," and it's sometimes hard to save a friendship after you have a relationship. If you're not sure whether you're doing the right thing, wait until you absolutely know.   Look at him in the eye. While he's watching you, look slowly towards his lips and back again. If he does the same to you, then he's ready. If he looks a bit uncomfortable and looks away, it's best to leave it for a while.  You need to be able to see so that you can aim for his lips, but you don't want to keep your eyes open while you kiss, so close them right before your lips lock.   Keep your eyes closed during the whole kiss. When the kiss ends, you can open your eyes and you gently pull away. Move into the kiss at an angle. That means if his face is straight up and down, you probably want yours tilted a bit to the left or right — whichever is more comfortable. This helps keep you from bumping noses together when you kiss.  Don't pucker up your lips like you've just had a bunch of Sour Patch Kids, or like you're kissing grandma. Keeps your lips loose and try to relax.   Give him one long kiss. You don't have to do anything fancy to get his attention the first time. Your big goal is to get him to come back for seconds. Give him just enough so that he's interested, not so much that he's bored. Try to keep the first kiss to under 20 seconds if you can. Breathe in and out gently through your nose. Try not to breathe into his throat or onto his lips. Don't French kiss on the first kiss. The French kiss is an advanced kiss, so save it for when you really want to blow his mind.  This just means opening your lips a bit and maybe kissing his lower lip with both of your lips. Don't make it last too long — about 5 seconds — and be prepared to pull away soon.  That way, you can get double the bargain! If he puts his hands around your back or waist, it means he's very protective of you and you could be onto a winner!   If he plays with your hair or gently strokes your cheek, it's a sign that he's very in-touch with his feeling, and he definitely likes you. Remember to try to keep your eyes closed the whole time. No peeking! Your attention should be entirely on his lips and the kiss.  Now would be the time to take a look at the boy you've just shared a kiss with. If you did a good job, he'll be flushed, heavy-eyed, and smiling.   Smile back at him. He may be nervous about how he kissed, so you'll probably want to convince him that he did a good job. You can do this by smiling. If you arms are still around him, leave them there for a few seconds before taking them away. It might feel weird if you suddenly take your hands away as soon as the kiss is done.  Sometimes, the kiss itself is enough of a statement. Sometimes, you'll want to say a little something after the kiss, like:   "You're a good kisser." "I've been wanting to do that for a long time."  , So, you've finally kissed the boy that you've been dying to kiss for the last six months. What now? You have several options:   Wait for him to make the next move. If you went in for the first kiss, maybe you think it's his turn to initiate the next kiss. Be yourself, do what you normally do, but be friendly and encouraging around him. He should try to kiss you again. Kiss him whenever you want to. Maybe you don't care that much about who kisses whom, as long as there's kissing. That's fine, just make sure that he's into it, too. Kissing him often is likely to lead to a relationship. Break off the kissing. Maybe he wasn't that good of a kisser, or he touched you in the wrong place, or you just get a bad feel from him. That's OK. Try to still be friendly around him, but don't put yourself in situations (i.e. one-on-one, private setting) where he could kiss you again.  There are some unspoken rules that you should know about kissing. Pay attention and try to follow them if you can and they make sense to you.   Don't kiss and tell. We know — it's very easy to do. That doesn't mean it's right. What goes on between you and your crush is between you and your crush. Try not to gossip too much about it. Don't kiss when you are sick and likely to spread germs. Kissing is a very intimate thing, but that doesn't mean that your kissing partner wants every single part of you, including your cold. Try not to kiss when you are feeling under the weather. Kiss one person, not everyone. Kissing may be fun, but that doesn't mean that it sends the right message to go out and kiss everyone you want. Focus on one person you really like, try things out, and then move onto someone else if that doesn't work out. You'll be appreciated a lot more, and you'll probably be happier.  

make sure you have a fresh breath.  make sure you're looking good.  find a nice place to kiss.  try doing something to break the touch the jitters away by flirting physically.  make sure that you both are ready for the kiss.  move your lips towards him slowly, closing your eyes at the last second.  use mostly your lower lip for kissing.  while you're kissing, try to go for a gentle open-lip kiss.  during the kiss, put your hands around his back and lean towards him.  as you move away from the kiss, open your eyes.  say something nice about him, if you feel like it.  listen to what your heart tells you.  remember kissing etiquette. 

 Lick your lips so that they aren’t too dry. It will make him more likely to want to French kiss you if your lips look moist. Use chap stick or lip balm. It’s probably best if you close your eyes for most of the kiss. It’s a little unnerving to most people if the person they are kissing is staring at them all of the time. Open your lips while French kissing.Angle your head to one side so that your noses don’t bump into each other. It’s usually a good idea to start with other kisses rather than immediately French kissing him., Never forget that you’re not the only one who’s nervous or a little insecure. He probably is too! So if he’s not taking the hint but seems into kissing you, you can initiative the French kiss yourself.   Start by gently pushing the tip of your tongue into your partner’s mouth in order to assess his interest. If he doesn’t pull away, that’s your signal. Now find the tip of his tongue with your tongue. Gently brush against it with your tongue. That’s it! You’re French kissing!  , Once you’ve started the French kiss by touching each other’s tongues, if both are receptive, you can deepen the kiss.   French kissing is very intimate and a way to bond with your boyfriend. Simply move your tongue deeper into your partner’s mouth to make more contact. A good kiss is a long one in which both tongues are touching.Thrust your tongue into his mouth with a little bit more forcefulness. If he’s as passionate about you as you are with him, he will likely move his tongue deeper into your mouth too, touching your tongue with his.  

moisten your lips.  start french kissing him first.  deepen the kiss. 

 You don’t want to only French kiss endlessly. Break it up now and then with a little sensual kissing in other ways.   For example, some men or boys have very sensitive ear lobes. Try kissing his ear lobe, his jawline, and his neck, and see how he responds. Embrace him. If your boyfriend seems to like this, you can move back and forth between such sensual kissing and French kissing. He will likely find it very tantalizing!  , There are a few key tips to making yourself a better kisser. For one, no one wants to kiss someone who doesn’t take care of his or her breath. So make sure your breath is fresh and your mouth is clean.   Pop a mint, brush your teeth, use mouthwash, or buy those little mouth freshener strips that dissolve in your mouth or mouth freshener you spray into your mouth if you’re looking for something portable. Go slowly. Don’t think you have to pummel his mouth like a jack hammer. The best kissing usually lets the intensity build and then dissipates before building again. Be sensual. Go slow.  One mistake that beginning kissers make is they think they have to shove their entire tongue down their partner's throat.   You don’t. You can just push your tongue into his mouth a little bit and let it dance around. Then thrust it in, but not so far that it feels like you are gagging your partner. Breathe through your nose when kissing. Try not to get saliva all over him. When you’re done with kissing him, wind it down back to the little warm up kisses rather than just suddenly stopping.  

kiss sensitive areas on his face.  become a great kisser.  try not to use too much tongue. 

 You've got this! So act like it. Don't slouch, shy away from her, mumble, or refuse to meet her gaze. Instead, show her that you're comfortable with yourself and she can be comfortable with you, too. Make eye contact, speak clearly, and generally act like you're confident.  If you look as appealing as possible, you won't have to work quite so hard to convince her you're worth a kiss.   Shave. Or don't. Most girls prefer a guy with a smooth face, but some like their guy's face rough. Get to know what your girl likes. Keep some mints handy. Pop one whenever you feel your breath getting stale. Try to be as generally clean as possible. Take a shower, put on some clean clothes, and wear deodorant and if you want, a bit of cologne.  Many girls and women will not want to make out in front of others, especially if this is her first kiss. Find the right time when you can be alone. Privacy is key.  Watch carefully, because sometimes the signals can be confusing - she may flirt with you, then smack you on the head. These may just be coy games, or she may really be conflicted.   Ask yourself these questions: Did you and your date seem to have a cozy, warm, close time together? Has she been flirting with you through body language? Has she licked her lips, or bit her lower lip while looking at you? Has she found excuses to touch you often? If you feel confident of these things, prepare to kiss!  , If she is comfortable and doesn't look away, then she is ready. Lock eyes when you're talking to her, when she's talking, and during moments of silence.  Starting with small physical contact tells her what's coming and gives her the chance to back out if she's uncomfortable. Try these if you're not sure what to do:   Put your arm around her shoulders Hold her hand Sweep her hair away from her face.  Reach around her waist with one or both arms, and gently draw her toward you. If she's interested, she'll get the hint and move in; if you feel her resist, though, back off.   Do not squish her up against you and then grind your pelvis against her. Do not use a first kiss as your personal excuse to grope, grab, or get too familiar. Be a gentleman.  Once she's close and you're pretty sure she wants to be kissed, it's time to seal the deal!   Look into her eyes. Notice how we mention eye contact twice? Very important. Let her know that you are really seeing her.  Look at her lips. Aim, dude. Make sure you know where you're going. Lean in slowly, and gently brush your lips over hers. Don't worry about fancy technique or going quickly on the first few kisses — you can deal with that later.  Your mouth should not be overly opened or closed, and it shouldn't be mushy or too tight (relax). Don't let it go too long (more than, say, 20 seconds) or let it be too short (3 seconds is not enough) - think around 10 seconds or so. A tiny hint of tongue is nice if she seems willing, but make it flirtatious and not insistent. Check out How to Kiss for more technique tips.  Just remain silent and hug her, ending the first kiss in a lovely, intimate moment.  

get confident.  clean up and look kissable.  respect her privacy.  watch for signals.  make eye contact.  break the touch barrier.  draw her in slowly.  go in for the kiss.  walk that fine line and make it a really excellent kiss, one that is romantic, tender and memorable.  end it gently. 

 The first step to getting a boy to kiss you is to be friendly and welcoming. If you are not already friends with him, introduce yourself and try to regularly communicate. This will create a closer relationship between you and him, and allow him to develop physical feelings for you.Try to keep conversation light and fun. You want to be a desirable person to spend time with so that he wants to get closer to you.  Sometimes, when a boy wants to kiss you, he might be too uncertain of your feelings to make the move. Giving him hints that you want a kiss from him may be just what he needs to do it. Laugh at his jokes, ask him to spend time with you, and let him know you think he is cute.Here are a few things you can say:   "You are so funny. It is so fun spending time with you." "I really like your shirt today. You look so good in it."  , Whenever you see him, or he tells you a joke, be sure to show him your best, "come hither" smile. Try grinning, and look at him flirtatiously at the same time. This will help to boost his confidence to kiss you., Show him you are interested by playfully touching his hand, shoulder, or face. When you touch him, it will signal to him that you want to get closer. When you greet or part ways, give him a long, tight hug., By giving him deep eye contact, and then looking at his lips, it will alert him that you may have kissing on your mind and are looking for a kiss from him. You don't have to look at his lips the whole time, but keep moving your eye contact from his eyes, down to his lips, and back up to his eyes when you talk. 

spend time with him.  drop hints.  smile at him.  initiate closer contact.  stare at his lips and eyes when you talk. 

 The location helps to set the right mood for intimate encounters. Don't choose places like loud parties that may make you feel under pressure, or places in public that would be awkward. Instead, find a secluded area in order to create a good setting for you to make your move. Whether you're taking a stroll in the park or heading off somewhere, be sure that you both are away from people. He will be less likely to kiss you if there are others watching him.Wherever you choose to be, make sure you can talk and see one another easily so that you he can gauge your "kiss-me" vibes. If you are having trouble getting him alone, tell him, "I want some fresh air. Would you like to come with me?"  , For a positive conversation, open yourself up to a variety of subjects in order to keep him interested. Be sure that you have a list of topics or questions to discuss with the boy. While it's important to listen to him, you must also talk in order to have a successful, fascinating conversation.  When you're talking, initiate light contact by touching his arm. Make eye contact in order to appear interested in what he is saying. Smile at him once in a while to assure him that you are comfortable around him. Don't hesitate to tease him lightly or laugh at his jokes.   Keep your flirting subtle to avoid scaring him away.  Half the battle of kissing someone is getting close to their face. If you keep a close proximity to his face, then he can more easily gather the courage to kiss you., If he is not being forward enough, you may have to initiate the kiss. Be sure that the mood is light and happy. Smile at him before moving closer to him in order to show that you are open to him. Look up into his eyes for a moment, smile, and glance down at his lips. If he doesn't move forward, lean forward and lightly press your lips to his. 

pick a good location.  find a good topic to talk about.  flirt with him to show you want to kiss.  lean in close to his face.  make your move and kiss him. 

 The best way to be more comfortable and better at kissing is to practice first. It seems like obvious advice but it really does help. You can practice on your hand, with another object, or with another person.   Keep in mind, you might not want to kiss another person because if you are already attached to girl you want to kiss or kiss her really soon after and she finds out, she might be upset.; , The girl doesn't want to taste garlic or other icky flavors after the kiss, as this can be a major turn off. Before the date or when you see her, brush your teeth and tongue and use mouth wash! To maintain good breath try drinking water on the date instead of soft drinks. You can also suck on a mint or chew minty gum for a few minutes mid-way through the date.   If you are at a restaurant, bring along your favorite breath freshener. Excuse yourself after dinner and go to the bathroom. Freshen your breath and then, to make sure your breath smells good, hold your hand up to your face, breathe, and smell.  This can help set the mood. Tell her that what she is wearing looks pretty; she will appreciate it! If she playfully punches you a lot or teases you in a friendly manner, then she wants you to touch her. Stay in safe territory like quickly grabbing her hand when you want to go show her something; she will appreciate not having to do the whole awkward looking at each other and blushing thing.   If you are brave you could put your arm around her waist when you two are laughing and say something playful like "You're so cute!" Offer to give her a piggyback ride, or tickle her a little if she likes it. Don't do this constantly, and when you do it, do it respectfully. Don't grab her breasts or butt. Flirting will make her more open to kissing you. Think of kissing as reaching the top of a mountain. You have to hike a little to get to the top.  Getting good timing will make it a lot easier. A good time for a kiss is at the end of a date, when you're generally saying goodbye, when you're out for a walk, or after you've just finished watching a movie. You'll notice that all of these times are pretty private and should pretty much just be the two of you. This is important! You should choose a private time for a first kiss.   The kiss should stay private too. Don't kiss and tell. This is rude.  It seems weird because we're only used to seeing the super charming people in movies kissing, but asking a girl if you can kiss her is a great way to show her that you respect her and care about her feelings. She'll appreciate it!   You can say something like: "I really want to kiss you right now. Is that okay?" or "Do you want me to kiss you now?"  , This is a universal signal that you're moving in for a kiss. This gives her the option to let you know that she's uncomfortable and will help keep you from getting slapped. Don't close your eyes until you are just about to kiss her.  Don't use tongue the first time you kiss a girl. Make sure you close your eyes right before you start the kiss.  Move in sideways a little. If your head is just as upright as her, you'll bump your nose into her nose instead of your lips into her lips.  If she's a deep, passionate kisser, she'll hold your lips in hers for a long while; you won't need to move your lips much.  If you want, cup her face with your hand and slowly stroke her cheek with your thumb. Make sure you still have one arm firm around her waist or lower back.  Kissing is like a silent conversation: You want to be kind, gentle, forgiving, and you want the other person to keep coming back for more!  , You'd be surprised how many people forget to breathe when they aren't used to kissing! If you want to keep kissing her but you're having trouble finding a break to breathe, try moving away from kissing her mouth to kiss her cheek or forehead.  Slowly pull away after a few seconds (or minutes!) and open your eyes. Congratulations! Each kiss after the first one is so much easier. You've reached the top of the mountain.  This is the next big skill for kissers to learn. It's not as hard as it seems and, with practice, it can be a killer addition to you kissing arsenal.  Making out seems tough at first, especially if you both have trouble finding your rhythm, but it will get way easier with time. Just make sure to not overdo it and always keep things interesting.  Once you've got those basic techniques in your repertoire, you'll want to get really good at kissing, and that mostly comes down to being passionate. This is easy to do if you let yourself relax and let your feelings come out.  Chances are, the longer you're with your girl, the more likely it will be that you might find yourselves kissing around other people (such as on a double or very public date). This is okay, but you want to be sure to do so politely!  , If this is your first kiss, then there's a good chance you also have braces. Don't worry! Despite all the jokes in movies and TV shows, it's not all that tough to kiss with braces.  

practice!,  make sure you have good breath!,  flirt a little!,  time it right.  ask!,  move your face slowly toward hers.  try a simple close-mouthed kiss.  tilt your head.  move slowly and follow her lead.  use your hands.  be tender and loving.  breathe.  stop when you're ready.  learn to french kiss.  learn to make out.  learn to kiss passionately.  learn to kiss around other people.  learn to kiss with braces. 

 It can be hard to catch a girl’s attention if she thinks you have other commitments. Don’t spend a lot of time hanging out with other girls in a one-on-one setting. Consider mentioning that you’re single around her, but don’t force it into conversation or say it in a way that is self-pitying. Mention how you wish you had something fun to do on a night you’re free.; , Your friend isn’t going to make the move while you’re out with your friends getting fast food. Figure out something that the two of you can do together alone. Don’t do something dramatic like taking her to a fancy restaurant. Something as simple as going to the park together is fine.  Let her know that you are interested. Flirt with her a little bit. If you aren’t sure how to do this, just smiling and laughing a lot while you have a conversation is a good place to start. Don’t do it too much or it will seem forced, but doing it more than usual will let her know you are really enjoying talking to her.  Playing hard to get isn’t going to work. Be open and honest with her. Give your honest opinion if she asks you what you think about something. You don’t have to wear your heart on your sleeve, but you should be willing to talk about your feelings to a certain extent.  If she’s flirting with you, flirt back. Gently tease her. Mirror her body language the best you can to make her comfortable.She’s never going to make a move if she doesn’t think you want her to.  Ultimately, there’s nothing that you can do that will force the girl to make the first move. You can only hope that she likes you and try to set up the right situation. If it seems like things are going well, relax and go with the flow. There will be a moment when it’s clear she’s going to make a move where she slides close to you or makes eye contact for a long time while smiling.  If you’re already friends, it could change the dynamic of your relationship forever, even to the point that you no longer talk to one another. If you aren’t willing to take this risk, then it is best to move on and not pursue this relationship.   It can be difficult to have feelings for someone and not show them, but they will eventually subside. If you can’t pursue the relationship and are having trouble getting over her, try a new activity or go someplace you’ve never been before. It will help distract you from your friend, and you may even meet someone new you like while you’re out.  People say that you should be yourself when it comes to dating. This is true, but you should strive to be the best version of yourself you can be. Make sure you practice good hygiene and wear clothes that fit well. Keep your hair well-maintained. Start exercising if you don’t already, as muscularity is something that almost everyone sees as attractive. , Just because she is single doesn’t mean she is interested in dating, or interested in dating you. People are attracted to others for different reasons, and many times the feeling is not mutual. Keep this in mind at all times so you don’t disrespect her and do something immoral or unkind.   Don’t get upset if she’s interested in someone else. You probably could not have done anything to stop or change this. There’s plenty of fish in the sea and you’ll find someone that makes you happy soon enough. Above all, don’t try to split them up.  You shouldn’t stop being a good friend because you have a romantic interest in them. In fact, being a good friend will help your case more than changing your how you interact with them would. It should be an authentic friendship that you maintain because you like them, not just because you want to hook up with them.   If you’re serious about this, you should also try to become friends with her group of friends. Remember that these should be authentic friendships. People will quickly notice if you are just pretending to like them to get in their good graces. You don’t have to be best friends, but you should at least try to be friendly.  If you have already been friends with this person for a while, they may not know that you are romantically interested in them. Try flirting a little bit by doing things like playfully teasing them while smiling and making eye contact. Low-pressure physical contact like shoulder taps and touching their forearm is also appropriate, but remember to not take it too far. These things will let the person know you want to be more than just friends., If she’s interested in you, she’ll do things to let you know it. She may start obviously flirting with you, but she may be a little subtler about it as well. Look for signs like her smiling and tilting her head slightly upwards or her offering to share food off her plate with you. These are all signals that she is attracted to you. Look for signs that she is not interested as well. If you see these, it’s time to stop, otherwise you are harassing your friend. She may not come out and say outright that she is not interested, but she may say something like “I’m really happy with our friendship” or turn away when you try flirting with her. If you suspect things aren’t going well, you’re probably right.  

make yourself available.  set up an "accidental" romantic situation.  drop hints.  be open.  encourage her.  let things happen.  think about whether you really want to have a romantic relationship with the person you are interested in.  be the best version of yourself you can be.  respect her as a person with unique and independent thoughts.  be a good friend.  display your interest.  look for signs that she is interested. 

 Are they compatible? You've likely seen your best friend in a relationship with someone else before. Is she flirty with other men even when they're not single or does she become all-consumed in a relationship with someone? Examine her (and your own) common traits when dating someone and see if you can handle this step-up in relation with her.; , Does she do things which completely irritate you (and vice versa)? If so, the chances of lasting in a long-term relationship will be affected. Annoying habits are easy to brush over for a few months before they become all you notice.  There's way more give-and-take in a relationship than there is in a friendship. Can you truly accommodate each others wants and needs? Can you do so maturely?  , If you're already best friends, you already knew each others secrets and some very personal information about one another. Can you trust your friend not to fall in love with someone else again or use that information against you if you break up?  , If the attraction is mostly physical, a fling may not be worth damaging such a close friendship over. If you don't want to risk the mental component of your relationship, look at finding a casual sex partner elsewhere.  Remember, she might look at you as a brother-figure and then be shocked when you tell her how you feel about her. This could ruin everything, but it could also make the relationship better. Weigh the risks against the possibilities. Be careful about coming out too suddenly or openly. No matter what you have to say, there's always a gentle way to say it.  Don't tell her right away. Drop subtle comments like, "You know, we've been friends for a long time," or "What would I do without you?" These are essentially harmless displays of affection toward her. However, don't drop them too often because you will risk being too obvious.  Enjoy the same activities you always have as best friends. Show her that you're fun to be around.  If you both have a sense of humor, tell each other jokes you like. It serves to entertain you both (and if you're lucky, you may get emotionally little closer before you even properly realize). If you have an inside joke, use it when it fits the situation.  It's important to understand what she needs. If she wants a shoulder to cry on, offer one. If she's cold, lend your jacket. Over time, she's bound to notice how great you are. You need to make sure she sees what a great boyfriend you would make and starts thinking about the idea herself. Remember to be there for her because you care about her, not because you expect anything in return.  If you're lucky and compatible, things will work out. Most relationships are made long in advance and are just waiting to happen.  This is often easier for a guy than a girl because most girls are pretty considerate of feelings. Give her a chance to understand you and when you think the time is right, tell her what you think. Of course, you may risk ruining and/or losing your friendship, or at least changing it even if you don´t want to. But if it turns out lucky, then she will be even more considerate of you and your feelings.  If she doesn't end up liking you back, stay cool. Be casual and try not to let the friendship get awkward. Try to get things back to the way they were before.  

assess your personalities.  look at your habits.  understand your abilities to compromise.  assess your abilities to trust.  understand the attraction.  observe if she has the same feelings for you.  take your time.  spend some time together.  use humor.  be there for her.  be patient.  tell her how you feel.  be prepared for rejection. 

 You are about to take a big risk. However close you may be, and however compatible you are as platonic friends, going from friend to boyfriend or girlfriend is a huge change in any relationship – so huge that it will be changed forever. You should therefore carefully consider whether the risk is worth it. Can you get over a rejection? Are you willing to risk harming your friendship, even ending it, for the chance at love? You, and your friend, might not want that.  Try to find out if the feeling is mutual. Does your friend seem to drop verbal or physical hints that she sees you as a potential partner? Does she flirt with you? Or, does she treat you as a sibling or talk about her attraction to others? If the latter, then she may be signalling that she isn't interested in you.  You may be perfectly compatible as friends. You may get along famously, spending hours together one-on-one or in larger groups of friends, laughing together, and sharing all of your thoughts. But this does not guarantee you will be compatible as lovers. Do you share the same values? Beliefs? Passions? Will you have good chemistry? If you cannot determine this, can you honestly imagine that the two of you would work as a couple?  , Are you sure that your feelings are more than just lust or passing fancy? Sometimes major life events push people together and cloud our judgement. Are you on the rebound? Are you lonely? Are you both dealing with personal loss, like a death in the family? If the catalyst is one of these, you may want to wait and see how you feel in one or two months. Make certain that your interest is motivated by legitimate desire, longing, or love.  It may be that she doesn't see you as anything more than a friend. You have to be prepared for that possibility. You also have to understand that your relationship won't be quite the same once you've come clean with your feelings. It may be awkward, or it may end entirely. If you have decided to risk your friendship, you have to be able to accept the consequences.  One way to begin your move is to signal that you are indeed interested. Your friend may not realize it, and she may share your feelings and have no idea that you feel the same way. Talk openly about your dating life. Perhaps even ask your friend about hers. You will have to change the way that she sees you, and to show her that you are looking for a relationship.  If you have known each other for a while, you should already have some idea of what your friend likes, dislikes, does for fun, and looks for in others. Deepen your interest in her. Ask her about her activities. Does she like tennis? Didn't she know that you do too? Perhaps you could play a match together sometime? Focus on activities that you share with an eye to demonstrating your compatibility.  Scientific studies show that flirting – signalling interest and availability – often trumps physical attractiveness.Start slowly. Smile, make eye contact, joke, perhaps even lightly touch your friend on the arm. But don't come out too strong or too physically. After all, your aim is to signal your interest and at the same time put your friend at ease.  Even if you are flirting, always keep your friend's level of comfort in mind. The worst possible thing you can do is to put her off by coming on too strongly. Laughter is usually a good social lubricant; make her laugh and show by your behavior and demeanor that you are a fun person, and that you enjoy her company. Try to be your old lighthearted self - the one that she knows so well - and not let the pressures of the situation make you too serious.  After you have weighed the decision, signaled your interest, and tested the waters, it is at last time to take the leap: ask your friend out. Keep in mind that you will have to be upfront about what you are asking so that there is no ambiguity. This is a date, not just a friendly get-together. The best way is to ask her in person. This will let you see her body language and reaction and help you to modify your behavior in turn. You may be more comfortable asking over the phone, by message, or through a third person, and these are all valid options. But keep in mind that face to face contact, however scary, is more personal and friendly.  Your friend said yes. What took you so long to ask! In arranging the first date it is important to keep the situation low key. You've never been together in this way before, and both of you may feel stressed. Go for a walk together, play a tennis match, go for coffee. It does not need to be a major event or even last long. The key thing is to see each other in a new dynamic.  If the first date was a success, start to see each other more regularly. You will both need time to make a mental and physical transition from “friends” to “couple.” Don't press the issue. On the other hand, make an effort to treat your new beau as a beau, not just your friend. Start to plan proper dates and make it clear that the relationship has changed.  There is no need to rush this. You may already be used to greeting each other with a hug. Start there. After one or two dates, try holding her hand. Be as confident and relaxed as possible, finding new but still comfortable ways to add touch to the relationship. In time, and with chemistry, you can start thinking about the first kiss and cuddling.  You and your beau should be clear with each other about your expectations. If one of you wants a serious relationship and the other does not, things will probably not work out. Let your friends in on your changed status, as well, especially if they are mutual friends. Keeping them in the dark may make it seem as though you hiding something, or make for added complications.  Your friend may say no. She may feel that the first date didn't work or that you didn't share enough chemistry. Or, you may date for a time before deciding that you were both better off as friends. Whatever the case, you will have to come to terms with this outcome and move on in time. With luck you and your friend can still be on good terms, or even friends as in the past.  A failed romance does not necessarily doom a friendship. But it can be problematic. If you decide to stay friends, try to stay lighthearted about your failed efforts -- a bit of humor can go along way. That said, set clear emotional and physical boundaries: no kissing, no flirting, no hanky-panky. If you need time to mourn, put some distance between yourselves. Date other people, as well. Don't maintain the friendship in the sheer hope that she'll somehow come around again and date you again. While the worst case scenario is having to cut off all contact, at the very least you will have closure and know that you gave it a valiant effort.  

consider the risks.  look for hints.  think compatibility.  be sure of your motives.  prepare for a rejection.  plant the seed.  deepen your interest.  flirt.  make her feel comfortable.  ask for a date.  arrange a first date.  go slowly at first.  get physical when the time is right.  be open about the relationship.  accept rejection gracefully.  try to salvage the friendship. 

 Boys can get lonely or alienated easily especially if their friends begin to mock them. By making friends with his friends you show that you are part of his network and can be trusted. Learn about their dynamic and find out how you would fit into their circle., Whether it’s a book club, microbrew club, or movie club, share an interest with him. Invite others to join your club or keep it just the two of you. Be careful not to make it seem like a date if you’re just beginning your friendship..Your club can meet once a week or once a month. You basically want to share an activity together to strengthen your friendship bond but you don’t want him to feel suffocated.  Keep yourself occupied. You don’t want your life to revolve around your friendship with him. Plus, whether he shares your interest or not, a new hobby will give you something to talk about.Take a class. Study something that you’ve always been interested in so that you won’t become bored.  Giving back to your community will give you a sense of well-being. It’s attractive to know that someone is selfless and looking to do some good. He may also want to participate or be inspired to find his own volunteer opportunities., It’s fairly obvious that boys enjoy watching and playing sports. You don’t necessarily have to enjoy the same teams or sports as he does. Enjoying your own team or sport would also be interesting to him.Guys enjoy arguing over their favourite players or watching a game together. Find something about the sport that you enjoy and focus on that. You don’t need to know every detail but you do need to actually enjoy the sport.  Guys think that bodily noises are hilarious. It may be fun for you to see how far you can push your own gross boundaries. Don’t be self-conscious just follow the standards set by the rest of the boys.Challenge him to a belching contest and crack the same type of jokes that his male friends do. The tired myth that girls don't have bodily functions, or can't be funny or gross or clever, is outdated and even harmful when it comes to relationships between men and women.Show him that you're not a strange, weird being — you're a person, just like him, and you can be comfortable around each other and simply be yourselves.  If you are of age, this is a good opportunity to get to know him in a social setting. Invite your friends and tell him to invite his. It’s a cheap and fun social gathering that is a far cry from a date., Don’t assume that guys and girls can’t be just friends. It’s easy to think about gender stereotypes but view him as an individual with his own ideals about friendship. You should be able to have different perspectives about things while still enjoying each other’s company., Studies have shown that guys do think about having a romantic relationship with their female friends if they were given a chance. It may seem discouraging at first not to get the romantic attention but time may be on your side.A guy may not find a girl attractive at first but as time passes and he gets to know how smart, funny, and relatable she is, that girl becomes more attractive., Studies show that both girls and boys get teased by peers to turn a platonic friendship into a romantic relationship. Don’t feel obligated to do something you’re uncomfortable doing. Be open with your friends and let them know that their teasing and pressure is hurtful.Boys may get mocked more by their friends for having female friends who aren’t prospective girlfriends. Friendship is not seen as masculine because it means that a boy must make himself vulnerable and confide in you.  If he tells you about his latest crush or what’s going on in his relationship, be supportive. You are a friend first and foremost. Focus on your hope for a romantic relationship. The worst that can happen is that you have a really close friend who you can happy for., Having desire is fine but acting on your emotions may lead to trouble. Make sure you have a firm grasp of how he feels before you put yourself out there or you may lose a good friend. , A lot of TV shows and movies portray romance between friends as being an embarrassing mistake or an awkward situation. If you don’t make the transition correctly, that very well might be the case. Keep positive that your friendship will survive any fling. If there are romantic feelings, awkwardness will be inevitable unless one of you addresses how you feel about the other person., You don’t want anyone to get the wrong idea. People may ask if you’re a couple when they see you alone together. Limit the time you spend alone in public together. Try to include other people when you can.Movies are fine but eating together may be questionable and get people talking.  Boys can be brutally honest so be prepared for blunt opinions and harsh comments. For example, if you ask a boy how you look you may not appreciate his true opinion.Don’t make this a one way street. If he is brutally honest with you, you may be brutally honest with him. Put him at ease and let him know he can trust you like any of his male friends.  Don’t give in to temptation and give him a hug or rest your head on his shoulder. If you get too touchy-feely you may give yourself away. Don’t blur the lines between boyfriend and friend. Wait until you’re ready and sure of yourself or you may make him defensive., Boys don’t talk about the details of their romantic lives the way girls do so don’t expect him to open up. Don’t talk about your own romantic relationship because if he does have feelings for you he will become confused. Keep the conversations platonic.If you tell him about your romantic life he may think that you only see him as a friend. If he’s seeing someone you may automatically judge her and bad-mouth her. Don’t deny him a chance at romance. Don’t make him choose between her or you.  Avoid doting on him or flirting. Let him know when he’s being a jerk or acting inappropriately. Compliment him when he’s being a friend and scold him when he’s not., If he’s going through a crisis in his life like a breakup or death in the family, don’t try to leverage his emotions into a romantic relationship. He will feel taken advantage of and angry.Unlike girls, boys may be flattered to learn that a female friend likes them. Girls may be upset and sad because trust has been lost., Don’t compare yourself to another girl that he likes or his current girlfriend. This will lead to a lot of anxiety and frustration. Don’t act like a jealous girlfriend when you are only friends.Don’t change who you are because you think that will win him over. You can’t make him fall in love with you. Save your dignity and be yourself.  Don’t try to convince yourself of something that isn’t there. He may tell you that he loves you but only as a friend. He may also say that he can see himself with you but only as a remote possibility and not at this second. Save yourself from embarrassment.If he already has ambiguous relationships than he may “want to have his cake and eat it too”. Be certain that he doesn’t have another romantic interest or a serious girlfriend.  Has he introduced you to all his friends and stopped talking about other girls around you? Does he want to spend more alone time with you and plan out activities that resemble dates? There are a number of signs that he may be giving off so pay attention.Does he continually make it clear that he’s single and often give scenarios where the two of you are dating? His body language may change and he may be more touchy feely than usual. He may also start acting like your boyfriend or ask questions to probe about how you’re feeling about him., What may seem obvious to you may seem vague and confusing to him. You need to have a crystal clear idea of your friendship and whether romance is the next logical step.It’s okay if you discover that this isn’t a good idea. You don’t want to lose a friendship by trying to force a relationship.  If you don’t want him to think of you as one of the boys or just a temporary fling, let him know how you feel. Be direct and completely honest. Open communication is key.Be honest because any type of relationship that you want to preserve won’t last if the truth is ever found out. Being honest with yourself can also help you manage expectations.  You can’t protect his feelings or your own. Letting him know that you have a romantic life might get him to clue about his feelings for you. Don’t be vague and don’t allow him to be vague about any intimate encounters.You need to be truthful about your current sexual activities because if you move from friendship to something physical, you want to make sure that you’re safe from any STDs., Laugh it off if he doesn’t return your feelings. The longer you hold in your feelings, the harder it will be to continue being a true friend. You don’t want to begin a friendship or a romance with a lie., If you plan to cross from friendship into something more, anticipate the possibilities. Depending on the dynamics of your friendship, you may receive a variety of possible reactions. He may feel flattered,embarrassed, angry, or amused., If you put yourself out there and are initially rejected, let time take its course. If he is a true friend he will support you, listen to what you have to say, and will have your best interest in mind. He won’t hurt you and if he does, you’ve dodged a bullet because he wasn’t worth being your boyfriend or having you as a friend. 

talk to his friends.  start a club.  find a new hobby.  volunteer when you can.  enjoy sports.  burp when you want.  go to happy hour.  reassess your view of guys.  understand that guys do see the potential for romance.  avoid applying pressure.  hide your true emotions.  don’t lose your self control.  prepare for awkwardness.  go out in groups.  prepare for honesty.  avoid affection.  don’t ask or give dating advice.  avoid acting like his girlfriend if you’re not.  don’t take advantage of his vulnerability.  avoid comparison.  never assume.  read the signs.  make sure you both know what you want.  tell him how you feel.  tell him if you’re going to pursue someone else.  be honest.  prepare for the aftermath.  be patient. 

 How do you really feel about your friend? Perhaps you’re just interested in getting to know them a little better, or maybe you’ve found that you’re attracted to them and want to get to know them from a different perspective. Feelings are often confusing things. Make sure you’ve sorted out exactly how you feel and what you want before you try taking things to the next level.Even if you’re attracted to your friend, you may decide that it’s advisable to take things slowly and cautiously if the two of you are already close.; , Think about the kind of “vibes” you get from your friend. Are the two of you close, or do you just hang out with the same group of people? Do they laugh at your jokes and show an interest in what you have to say when you’re talking? Try to gauge your friend’s feeling as accurately as you can. If it’s obvious that there’s no real attraction being reciprocated, it might be best to hold off on asking them out. If they act warmly towards you, however, they may have similar feelings, and might have even hoped you’d ask., If you have another friend that knows the friend in question and you feel comfortable talking to them about the situation, ask their thoughts on how you should proceed. They probably know something you don’t one way or the other, or have unique insights into the matter that might not have occurred to you. Your other friends will eventually find out if you're dating, so don’t make it look like you were keeping it a secret from them.   If your other friends learn how you feel, they may subtly talk to the friend you like, facilitating the process. Keep in mind that your other friends are affected by whether or not you start dating. While this shouldn’t necessarily prevent you from asking a friend out, show enough respect to be conscientious about your evolving relationship with that friend and what consequences it might have.  The next time your group of friends is hanging out, look for opportunities to pair up or spend some time alone with the friend that you like. This could be playing a game of pool together, having a thoughtful one-on-one conversation at a party or standing next to each other at a concert. Get comfortable with the idea of being alone with your friend and try to also get a sense of how they feel about it in these moments. If your friend gravitates to you during future hangouts, it’s probably a good sign.Don’t dole out your attention to your friends unfairly. Take an opportunity to spend time alone with your friend if one arises, but don’t make them feel forced to split off and ignore the rest of your company.  Don’t expect too much to happen too soon, if at all. Even if your friend likes you back, they may be reluctant to do anything that might jeopardize the relationship that the two of you currently have. Whatever your friend decides, you should be okay with it. If you get too set on the idea of dating, it may come as a disappointment if your friend declines, which could create distance between the two of you as friends.Learn to take “no” for an answer. If your friend agrees to spend time with you one-on-one but makes it known that they’re uneasy with the dating label, accept their position graciously and plan to find something casual to do. Put whatever misgivings they have about endangering your friendship to rest by assuring them that you’ll remain friends regardless of how things turn out.  You should be taking your friend’s feelings into consideration as well as your own. If they’ve been giving you flirtatious signals, it might be a clue that they’re interested in you and will agree to a date. If they seem disinterested or you’re having trouble reading their feelings, they may be uncomfortable with the idea. Recognizing the appropriate point to ask a friend on a date will most often come down to personal judgment.It’s probably better not to ask your friend out in a group setting where they may feel pressure to respond in a certain way.  The best way to ask someone on a date in most circumstances is face-to-face. However, since you and your friend already have an established platonic relationship, asking them out directly may be awkward or make them feel pressured. Weigh your options. A friendly phone call might do it, or you could drop the proposition during a text conversation. Your friend will probably be most amenable to the idea of going on a date if it doesn’t feel like a big deal, so don’t make it one.Think about how your friend does most of their communicating and go with their preferred mode. That way nothing feels off when it comes time to broach the subject.  Once you’ve determined how you’re going to ask, work the offer naturally into a conversation with your friend, or be collected and up-front about it. The two of you are already friends, so there should be a mutual degree of respect and comfort in place. Frame the question in a way that reinforces that the decision is theirs, and that you want to remain friends either way.It might be easiest to suggest that just the two of you do something together as friends sometime, since this will cause no initial concern of changing the nature of the relationship. If your desire is to continue dating as more than friends, though, make sure you’re displaying your intentions honestly. If your friend declines your offer, smile and carry on in an amiable manner. He or she will likely be worried about straining the friendship if they turn you down. Make sure that they know you’re still happy to be their friend. It’s possible that the time just wasn’t right, but now that your friend is aware of your feelings they may in time discover that they’re attracted to you as well.  No matter how things progress between you, your friendship is the foundation of your relationship and the most important thing. This thought should feel like a safety net for you when you’re mustering the nerve to ask your friend out. If it’s not what your friend wants or they’re not yet open to the possibility, you’ll have your friendship to fall back on, and you should: a true friend will understand and be there to make sure everything is okay. Even if you start dating and things are going well, don’t forget that they were your friend first. The comfort of that bond will make your connection even stronger.   Try to think of your new relationship as a branching outgrowth of your friendship, not a replacement for it. All of your interactions should come from a place of caring and acceptance. There’s no reason for the friendship to suffer simply because you’re trying to build on it.  Dating a friend can sometimes cause complications if you tend to hang around the same people. Be upfront with your other friends about the situation and let them know that it won’t alter the friendship of the group. Take particular care not to isolate yourselves when you’re with your mutual friends: this can be easy to do when you first begin to date someone, but it might give the rest of your friends the impression that you’re disinterested in them. Since you began as friends, work on cultivating an environment where you can still spend time together even when you’re involved with someone.Make some time each week for all of your friends to get together. During this time, involve yourself in the group’s activities and discussions, and don’t make it feel like you and the friend you like are separating yourselves from the rest of your friends., If your dating efforts aren’t met with success, don’t let it come between you and your friend. You knew to keep your expectations out of the picture, so there’s no need to take it too hard. Not wanting to date may just mean that he or she values you very highly as a friend, which is a good thing. There’s no harm in liking someone, and you shouldn’t feel awkward or guilty if you tried and things didn’t work out. In the worst case scenario, you can simply go back to being friends. It’s a win-win!You shouldn’t be embarrassed or feel the need to “punish” your friend if things don’t work. Withdrawing from your friend group will make you appear sulky and may send the message that you were only looking to date the person from the beginning. Allowing resentment to build up will take its toll on your friendship, which is precisely what you don’t want to happen.  Whether you hit it off on your date or you don’t, take pleasure in being around one another. Starting off as friends means you already know you have common interests, can communicate openly and like spending time together. Look at it as a chance to spend some quality time with the person with no thought to the outcome. Do things that you both enjoy and relish the occasion to make new experiences and memories with the friendship at the heart of your relationship.For a first date, keep things from feeling too serious by suggesting a short hike or picnic outside, a casual dinner at one of your favorite restaurants followed by coffee, or a movie.  

take a minute to appraise your own feelings.  consider whether your friend feels the same way.  talk to your other friends about it.  spend some alone time together.  keep your expectations in check.  make sure the time is right.  determine the best way to ask.  ask in a friendly, relaxed way.  remember that you’re friends.  try not to neglect your mutual friends.  don’t despair if it doesn’t work out.  enjoy each other’s company. 

 It may seem like a cliché, but finding a smear of lip gloss in a shade you don’t wear on his shirt is a good sign that he’s cheating. Smelling another woman’s perfume on his hair or clothing is another warning sign.If you notice a lipstick stain or strange perfume on your boyfriend once, it may just be from a friend or relative, so you shouldn’t necessarily worry. However, if it happens more than once, you may have cause for concern.; , When a guy starts seeing a new woman, he often starts to take more pride in his appearance, so he may starting working out more, using self-tanner, or whitening his teeth. If his grooming routine begins to change, it may mean that he’s seeing someone else.A guy who’s cheating may shower more often because he’s trying to wash away another woman’s perfume, so if your boyfriend is suddenly showering two or more times a day, you may have reason to be concerned.  Most of us have our phones with us at all times, so there’s nothing suspicious if that’s the case with your boyfriend. However, if he never lets it out of his sight so he even takes it to the bathroom with him, that may be a sign that he’s hiding something like another girl.Even people who are in a relationship deserve privacy, so it’s never a good idea to go through your boyfriend’s phone to look at the call log, text messages, or emails. That’s true even if you suspect that he’s cheating.  There’s nothing wrong with having a Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, and/or other social media account. However, if your boyfriend is constantly scrolling through his Twitter or Instagram feed, it may be a sign that he’s no longer committed to your relationship.If your boyfriend is a social media addict, he may be using the apps to communicate with other girls or even meet new people. Just as with his phone, you should respect your boyfriend’s privacy even when you’re suspicious. Don’t try to figure out his social media passwords, so you can go through his accounts.  That’s a classic sign that he has something to hide, particularly if he always used to leave them open before. He may be calling or texting another girl and trying to prevent you from finding out.Even if your boyfriend isn’t closing doors in order to communicate with other people, it can still be a sign of a problem in your relationship because it signifies emotional distance., If friends and family members that you trust start dropping hints that your boyfriend may be seeing someone on the side, you may want to evaluate your relationship and see if there may be truth to their suspicions.Always consider the source when it comes to accusations that your boyfriend is cheating. Some friends and family members may be genuinely concerned about you, but others may be letting their own baggage affect their perception. For example, if you have a friend who’s recently had a significant other cheat on her, she may be more likely to accuse your guy, even if he’s done nothing wrong.  

look for obvious evidence of another woman.  take note of changes to his physical appearance.  notice if he is obsessed with his phone.  watch out if he’s always on social media.  notice if he’s constantly closing doors behind him.  listen to warnings from your friends. 

 If he’s happy and upbeat when he’s saying goodbye to you but quiet and withdrawn when you’re together, it may be a sign that he’s seeing another girl. Balancing more than one relationship is difficult, so it may start to take its toll on your boyfriend.Problems in one relationship can carry over to the other, so if your boyfriend is fighting with his other girlfriend, you may deal with the fallout in your relationship.  That’s because he may no longer have much emotion to invest in your relationship if he’s putting all of his feelings into another relationship.See how he reacts when you say “I love you.” If he’s reluctant to even say “Me too,” that’s a big red flag.  If he’s no longer as affectionate as he used to be, it can be a sign that he’s seeing someone else and saving his affection for her. A noticeable decrease in kisses, hugs and other physical displays of affection can be a sign that he’s cheating.All affection doesn’t have to be physical. If he stops using his favorite nickname for you or doesn’t use your special emojis in texts, you should also pay attention.  Sometimes, guilt can cause a guy to overcompensate so if he’s cheating, he may try to make up for it by being overly nice. Showering you with gifts, taking you to your favorite restaurant, or allowing you to choose what you watch on TV can all be signs that he’s trying to ease a guilty conscience.Guys are usually plagued by guilt and become overly affectionate in the early stages of cheating. As the relationship with the other woman continues, the guilt -- and the increased attention -- may diminish., He may try to start arguments with you, so he has an excuse to leave and go see another girl. If your boyfriend suddenly starts picking fights every time that you’re together and you didn’t use to fight that often, it’s probably a cause for concern., If your boyfriend starts accusing you of cheating even though there’s no credible evidence, it may be a sign that he’s seeing someone else. That’s because he may be projecting his own behavior onto you -- he knows that he’s cheating, so he assumes you must be too -- or he may simply be trying to deflect the guilt that he feels.  

take notice if he’s prone to mood swings.  pay attention if he stops saying “i love you.” it’s probably obvious, but if your boyfriend used to tell you how he felt all the time and now no longer communicates his feelings, it can be a significant warning sign.  observe how affectionate he is with you.  notice if he’s more attentive than usual.  pay attention to how often he picks fights.  take note if he’s suddenly suspicious of you. 

 You don’t necessarily have to accuse your boyfriend of cheating, but tell him that you feel like something is off with him. Being unable to communicate with your partner can cause significant problems in a relationship, so it’s best to just confront the issue directly.  Make sure to choose a time to talk with your boyfriend when you know you won’t be interrupted. If you want to have a serious, honest conversation, neither of you should be taking phone calls or answering texts.Try to stay as calm as possible. If you immediately put your boyfriend on the defensive, you’re probably not going to get any real answers. Remember that your goal is a conversation, not a confrontation., You don’t want to come across as irrational or paranoid, so it helps to cite the specific evidence that’s led you to suspect him, even if it’s just the fact that he’s stopped calling you pet names or always takes his phone into the bathroom.For the best results, you should be as non-judgemental as possible when you’re laying out the reasons that you’ve come to suspect your boyfriend of cheating, so try to start your sentences with “I” and not “you.” For example, you might say, “I feel like we’re growing apart and I’m upset about it.” That can make your boyfriend more likely to listen to what you have to say., If explaining the changes in your boyfriend's behavior that concern you doesn't lead to the topic coming up, you may want to just ask him directly if he's cheating. You're probably going to be angry and upset, but don't resort to name calling or physical violence. The calmer you stay, the more likely you are to get a straight answer from your boyfriend.Give you boyfriend a chance to answer your questions. Don't yell at him or assume you know what he's going to say. He may have an explanation for his actions that will relieve your fears.  Unless you have ironclad proof that he’s cheating, your boyfriend is most likely going to deny whatever accusations you level at him. In that situation, you have to listen to your instincts. If you really feel like you can’t believe what he’s telling you, then the trust is already broken in your relationship, and that can be difficult to bounce back from. 

ask if something’s wrong.  point out changes in his behavior.  ask point blank.  trust your gut. 

 Your man's appearance can say a lot about whether or not he's cheating. If he didn't care much about his appearance before, but now spends more time grooming than you do, then something is up. He may be improving or changing his looks to please his side piece. Here are some signs that he's grooming for someone else:   If he used to be scruffy before, but he's always shaving. If he gets routine haircuts now, but let his hair grow shaggy before. If his clothes have improved significantly. If you catch him starting in the mirror to study his looks. If he always looks nice, even when he's supposed to be studying or working overtime. A big red flag is if he smells different. Whether his body chemistry has changed slightly from being with another woman, or if he outright smells like perfume, this is a big sign that he's been spending time with someone else. If there are stray hairs on his body and clothes that do not belong to you.; , If your man suddenly cares a lot more about his body than he did before, then he may not be doing it just for you. Unless he's suddenly determined to run a marathon, it's more likely that he's improving his body for another lady. Here are some signs:   If he's suddenly working out all the time and cares a great deal about his appearance. Remember that going to the gym could also just be another excuse for seeing his lady. If he's dramatically changed his diet to be healthier. He could be doing this to impress someone else. If he's weirdly shy with his body around you and doesn't want you to see him with his shirt off, and only wants to have sex in the dark. This could mean that he feels he's being disloyal to his other woman.  Your man's body language can go a long way in telling you how he feels about you, and if he's really thinking about someone else instead of you. Here are a few signs that he may be cheating on you:   If he doesn't make eye contact when you talk. If he used to be Mr. Eye Contact, but now he always looks away or at the floor when you speak, then he may be doing it out of guilt. If he doesn't give you affection. If he used to shower you with affection but rarely touches you, this is a red flag. If he shows you affection in private, but not in public. Though some guys are just shy about showing affection in public, if he's all over you when you're home, or even when you're home and hanging out with a few friends, but stands a foot away from you when you're at a restaurant, he may be worried that his other lady will spot you two together.  

see if his looks have changed.  pay attention to how he treats his body.  pay attention to his body language. 

 Attempting to transform your friendship into a dating relationship could have unintended repercussions. If things don’t work out, the friendship might suffer or come to an end as a result. If you truly care about the person you’ve fallen for, think about whether you’re willing to take that chance. It may be that you decide that you’re better off as friends and adjust your expectations accordingly.Think about your history with the other person and how they act towards you. Do you detect any interest or affection? How have things between the two of you progressed since you became friends?If the person you like tends to emphasize what a good friend you are, or compares you to a brother or sister, it may be their way of telling you that they’re satisfied with your established roles.; , Analyze the nature of your desires. Do you have real feelings for your friend, or is it simply a physical attraction? It’s normal to be physically drawn to people of the opposite sex that you get along well with, and this can sometimes extend to your own friends. This doesn’t necessarily mean, however, that the two of you would be able to fulfill each other’s needs in a dating relationship.Be certain about what you’re after before you make a move. An unsuccessful attempt at courting could mean the end of the friendship.Hooking up does not necessarily mean leaving the friend zone. If anything, it could just make things more confusing for both of you.  Find out how the person you’re interested in feels by talking to the friends you have in common. They can usually provide valuable insight into the mind state of your interest. They’ll also be able to tell you whether trying to pursue a romantic relationship is a good idea, or whether you’re putting your friendship in jeopardy.If your mutual friends think there’s a chance of the two of you getting together, have them put in a good word on your behalf or drop subtle clues to your interest. Hearing someone close to them say "you guys look so cute together" or "you two would make the perfect couple" might make all the difference in changing the way your friend sees you. While you should do what’s right for you, it’s also worth considering how you and your friend becoming romantically involved could impact the rest of your friends. You may not feel as comfortable discussing the details of your relationship to someone who is also friends with your partner. A breakup could also leave your mutual friends conflicted over the best way to stay on good terms with both of you.  Even if you decide to take the direct approach, don’t spill your guts out of the blue. Wait until the two of you are alone and can talk openly without distraction or embarrassment. Consider other situational details, as well—if your friend is going through a stressful time in their life or just got out of a longterm relationship, it may not be the right time to share your feelings with them.The best time to work your way out of the friend zone is when you and your interest get along well, spend a lot of time with each other and express your desires and frustrations about dating. You’ll already be armed with the resources and information you need to be able to meet their needs., Offer to do things with your friend more often and change the nature of your time together. Rather than interacting like casual friends the way you always have, show more of an interest in them, mentally and physically. Getting out of the friend zone is often as simple as shifting the way your friend views you and your dynamic together. The more time you spend one-on-one, the more of your true feelings you’ll be able to show them.A good way to get more face time with the person you’re interested in is to single them out. The next time you’re hanging out with your friends, engage him or her in a private one-on-one conversation, or diverge from the group so that just the two of you can do some activity together. Invite your friend to do things you know they enjoy, like attending a concert, going on a hike or playing a sport together.  Don’t expect a lengthy friendship to turn into a passionate romance overnight. Give the other person time to relax and update their perspective. Go on a few casual non-dates at first, then ask for a more formal date when the time is right. Let your gestures gradually become more flirty and playful, and escalate to more obvious affection later on. If you push too much right away, you might just end up scaring them off.It can be hard to find a good way to start flirting that isn’t awkward. Try paying the friend you’re interested in genuine compliments from time to time, dropping hints about the things you like about their appearance and personality. Eventually, they’ll begin to see your comments in a new light. Learn to interpret your friend’s behavior. If they respond well to lighthearted flirting, it could be a good sign. If they tend to shut down or change the subject when you show affection, they probably aren’t interested in you in that way.  If there is someone else who you also like, then you might consider pursuing this person instead. Doing this may give you a chance to process your feelings about a friend while also allowing you to have a romantic relationship. Try to identify someone who is not a friend and who you think might be a good match for you. Look for someone who shares your interests and someone to whom you are genuinely attracted.   Don’t pretend to like someone else just to make your friend jealous. If you do start showing an interest in someone else, make sure that it is authentic. Keep in mind that if your friend is interested in you, then your new relationship might cause them to act jealous. Just make sure that this is not your goal in pursuing someone else.  Small, physical gestures are a building block of deeper intimacy. Try being more hands-on with your interest. Grab his arm suddenly while telling an exciting story, or place your hand on the small of her back when she’s walking through the door ahead of you. This kind of subtle contact can awaken arousing feelings in your interest and may create a desire for more.Increase physical contact with your friend slowly, and be respectful. Not everyone likes being touched, and you may end up sending the wrong message if you act presumptuously or put your hands somewhere they shouldn’t be. One of the major differences between friends and lovers is that lovers tend to touch each other in more flirtatious, suggestive ways. When you introduce a more intimate level of contact with your friend, it will naturally influence the way they view you and your relationship., Whether you’ve grown tired of biding your time or you’re just not one to beat around the bush, you may prefer to announce your feelings directly to your friend. This isn’t always a bad idea. Find a time when you can sit down with your friend one-on-one and talk things out. Be heartfelt as you explain yourself, but try not to make them feel uncomfortable. Let them know that you don't expect them to change the nature of your friendship, but that you had to get your feelings off your chest. Getting it out in the open will put to rest any doubt in their mind, and give you a clear answer about whether or not there’s a chance of being together as something more than friends.Try saying something like, "I'm nervous about telling you this but I feel..." or "We've spent so much time together and I like being around you. I have feelings for you and ..." Your friend might be experiencing a similar dilemma but be hesitant to act on it because they don’t sense that you’re interested. If you can work up the nerve to be honest, you have a better chance of receiving a straightforward answer, which can save you from having to agonize about the situation for weeks and weeks.  If your friend also has feelings for you, congrats! You’ve successfully escaped the friend zone. The two of you can now begin moving your relationship forward. Taking things to the next level with a friend can be a wonderfully rewarding experience because it’s a given that your personalities are compatible. You’re already comfortable around your friend and know that they’ll accept you for who you are, and this can make maintaining the relationship much easier.Since you already know your partner’s character, habits and insecurities, you can skip the sometimes awkward first stages of getting to know each other and cut right to showering each other with love and affection. It’s okay to pace yourselves. Dating a good friend might feel a little strange at first, so give yourself time to adjust as you grow closer., As great as dating one of your best friends can be, it also changes your dynamic. You need to be ready to respect the new boundaries and expectations that arise as your feelings develop. Show your partner that you care for them as more than a friend, and that you take your new relationship roles seriously. Make an effort to put them first rather than treating them like any other friend.You may feel quite comfortable with a close friend becoming your new boyfriend or girlfriend, but that doesn’t mean that you shouldn’t still treat them with the same consideration that you would in any other relationship. The behavior that you displayed toward each other as friends might need to be altered in order for your relationship to be successful. For example, your partner might expect you to text them when you wake up or before you go to bed. If you’ve historically been bad at texting, it may make you look insensitive once you’ve started dating., As a couple, you can keep doing the same kinds of things you used to do together as friends. Go see bands you both like, hang out with mutual friends or agree on a favorite spot to meet for dinner. Your history together as friends will have prepared you for a romance full of fun and excitement and allow you to connect on a much deeper level. You’ll be familiar with your partner’s likes and dislikes right off the bat. Best of all, the two of you will never run out of things to talk about.One of the best things about transitioning from friendship to dating is that there’s a guarantee that the two of you have lots of things in common. This takes the difficulty out of planning dates and thinking of ways to spend time together.  Communicate with one another openly and be able to positively resolve issues when they pop up. It can be tempting to vent to your other friends when you get upset, but this can complicate things and put them in an awkward position, as they’re so close to both of you. There needs to be a degree of privacy in your new relationship so you can keep your interactions with friends separate from your life as a couple.Sharing too many details about your relationship with your friends could change the way they look at the other person, which is tricky if they’re also friends. Fortunately, even arguing will be easier if you’ve started off as friends, as you’ll already know what sets the other person off and how to talk to them when they’re upset.  Be prepared to be turned down once you invite your friend to go on a date or make your feelings known. They may not feel the same way about you, and that’s okay. Smile and go back to acting in a way that you know they’re comfortable with to reassure them that you still want to be their friend. It’s not the end of the world, and you’ll feel better knowing once and for all that you gave it the shot it deserved.Be able to take “no” for an answer. There’s something to be said for determination, but when a guy or girl makes up their mind, you should be able to accept it.Chances are, your friend will feel just as bad about turning you down as you do. Keep your spirits high so that they won’t worry about damaging your friendship. The better you’re able to handle it, the more confident they’ll feel in your desire to remain friends.  Soothe the discouragement of unrequited love by spending time with your friends and family. The more you’re able to laugh and distract yourself, the better and more in control of your circumstance you’ll feel. It will serve as a reminder that you still have people who care about you, even when things don’t go as you hoped.Talking over your problems with someone close to you can often help put things in perspective.  Rejection can sting, and kind words don’t always help. Occasionally, it’s just easier to be alone. Put your social obligations on hold for a while to reconnect with yourself and take inventory of the good things in your life. Devote time to developing a skill or enjoying your hobbies. Having the ability to comfort yourself in difficult times means that you’ll never have to worry about trying and failing.Don’t make it seem like you’re pouting or trying to punish your friend for not feeling the same way. Explain the time you take for yourself as a form of emotional healing and refinement. Your nagging need to be in a relationship will disappear once you’re able to find happiness in being alone., In the best case scenario, you share your feelings with the guy or girl you’re interested in and they suggest that you work better as friends. Consider this a stroke of good fortune. It may not be exactly what you wanted, but it’s a clear-cut answer and will let you know exactly where you stand and what aspects of your friendship to work on. Think of it as an opportunity to get a fresh start in your relationship and become closer friends than ever.There’s no guarantee that you friend won’t change their mind in the future. Let yourself be content with simply being friends for the time being, but don’t feel like all is lost if you’re sure of your feelings for them.  Your interest may not feel like they can remain friends with you after finding out how you truly feel about them. If this happens, understand that you've done nothing wrong. It's important that you be honest with yourself and your friend, as ignoring your desires can cause the relationship to become frustrating for both of you. Sometimes, however, things just may not work out in your favor. Move on and take comfort in the fact that you gave it the chance it deserved.Find productive ways of easing the pain, like writing out your thoughts in a journal or turning to your other friends for emotional support.If someone is willing to stop being your friend because they've been put in a difficult position, chances are they didn't value your friendship that much to begin with.  

decide whether it’s worth it.  ask yourself what you want.  talk to your mutual friends.  make sure your timing is right.  spend more time with your friend.  start small and work your way up.  pursue someone else for a while.  break the touch barrier.  be upfront about your feelings.  enjoy the comfort of dating a friend.  be ready to live up to new expectations.  indulge your common interests together.  don’t involve your friends in your problems.  accept rejection gracefully.  find support from your loved ones.  take some time for yourself.  focus on your friendship.  don't blame yourself if the friendship ends. 

 Once the signs have added up and you feel like you've already found out that he's cheating, it's time to make him confess. The easiest way is just to have a conversation about it. Then you can avoid snooping through his stuff, getting hurt when you see something you don't like, and spare yourself the extra pain and humiliation. Here's how to do it:   Catch him off guard. You should still pick the right time and place to do it, but you should ask him when he's not expecting it so he'll be less likely to come up with a brilliant lie. Tell him you'd prefer honesty over more lies. Make it sound like he's doing you a favor by confessing---which he really is doing. Say, "I think we'll both feel better once this is out in the open." Make it sound like he would be very relieved to stop lying to you. He probably will. Living a double life is exhausting. Make eye contact. Be really sincere. Show him that he's really hurting you. If you're afraid to ask yourself but don't want to take the extreme route of following him or looking through his things, ask one of your friends, or even one of his friends who you really like. Chances are, if his friend knows about his shady behavior, he may not feel good about it, either.  If you're afraid to have a conversation or feel like you don't have enough evidence, follow him to see what he's really up to. You have to be sneaky about it or he'll know, lose trust in you, and won't give you any evidence. Here's what to do:   Follow him in a friend's car. If he says he's hanging out with the boys and you really want to see what he's doing, follow him in a friend's car so he doesn't notice it's you. "Pop in" on him when he's not expecting it. Come over at random times, like when he says he's cleaning for you or not feeling well. If he's not feeling well, bring over some soup and act like you're trying to be sweet. Whether he's with another girl or not, see how he acts. Is he happy to see you, or angry that you showed up without warning? See if he's really working overtime. That's easy. Just drop by his work to give him coffee or a late-night snack to see if he's there. Or just drive by to see if his car is there.  Snooping through your man's things is the quickest way to break trust and put your relationship in jeopardy, but if you're really sure he's cheating and just want to put the nail in the coffin, then go for it. Here's what you do:   Look through his phone. If he's a good cheater, he'll make it impossible for you to look through his phone, but try anyway. Go through it when he's sleeping, or see if he drops it when he's getting out of the car and pick it up. Check his computer. If he's dumb enough to leave his computer open, check out his email and his Facebook messages. This will let you know if he's cheating pretty soon. Also notice if he meticulously deletes all of his emails. That's a little fishy too. Look through his stuff. If he's sleeping or not home, go through his desk, his bag, or even his wallet for any signs of affection from another lady. Check his bank statements. Do you not remember him spending $200 on you at a romantic Italian place? Then he must have been shelling out cash for another lady.  

ask if he's cheating.  follow him.  snoop through his things. 

 If he has another girlfriend, he may stop spending as much time in the bedroom with you, but it could also make him want to have more sex. Here are some things to look:   If you're having a really long dry spell. If he never wants to have sex anymore, he may be getting it somewhere else. If he suddenly has a voracious sexual appetite. If he wants to have sex all the time all of a sudden, it may be because his sex drive has gone up from sleeping with another lady. If he tries a ton of new moves in bed. He could be picking these up from another girl.  Your boyfriend may have some serious guilt because he's cheating on you, and this will actually make him much nicer to you. If you find that suddenly he's helping out around the house a lot more or doing a ton of favors for you, he may be doing it to compensate.   If he cleans your apartment, fixes your car, or buys your groceries and has never done those things before, there may be a reason for it. If he's always asking if there's any way he can help. If he's suddenly Mr. Romance and brings you candy and flowers, especially after a long period where he was distant.  If your boyfriend never cared about the state of his car or apartment but now he's taking hours to clean it, he may be doing it to clean up for another lady or to hide evidence of her.   If his car used to be messy and is now spotless, he may be keeping it fresh for another lady. If his apartment is much cleaner than it used to be, and if he always says he needs some time to clean up, he may be cleaning it to get rid of evidence of his other girl. If you really want to find out if he's cheating on you, come over when he says he is "cleaning his apartment" and see what he's really up to. If he uses air freshener in his car or home. He may be using it to hide the smell of his lead lady.  Whether he seems to always be in a good mood, or is just moody all the time instead of his usual even-keeled self, then something is up. Pay attention to his mood to see if something is up:   If he's sometimes in a ridiculously good mood, like he's walking on sunshine, for no apparent reason. If he's grinning ear to ear and looking off into the distance like he's remembering a fond memory with another girl, then chances are his good mood has nothing to do with you. If he's suddenly in a terrible mood. If everything seems fine and he's suddenly furious or very upset, especially after a phone call or text message, then another girl may have had something to do with it.  Shady behavior is pretty easy to spot, and if he's doing at least a few shady things, then it can only add up to him sneaking around to spend time with another girl. Here are some signs:   If he's spending a lot of time texting and on the phone. If he stops texting or ends his phone call as soon as you leave the room. If he's suddenly spending a lot of time online. This could be a sign that he's chatting it up with another girl. If he slams his computer shut when you walk into a room, that is a bad sign. If he disappears for hours, and is just incommunicado for a day, a night, or even a weekend. If he can't take the time to answer your call or just send you a quick message, then he may be with another girl. If he shuts his phone off for hours on end. Why else would he do that?  

see if there's a change in your sex life.  see if he's much nicer or more helpful.  see if he's meticulously clean all of a sudden.  see if his mood changes.  see if he engages in generally shady behavior. 

 Before, he always seemed ready to hang out, and now, his reasons for not being able to see you are piling up. At first, you believed him when he said he had a stomach ache or was too tired to go out, but you're starting to wonder if he's really trying to tell you that he doesn't want to spend time with you because he's busy hanging out with some other girl. Here are some signs that he may be cheating:   If he used to save all of his free time for you, but now he's always going out for "boy's night." This is especially suspicious if he doesn't have that many male friends, or never showed much of an interest in hanging out with his bros before. If he's suddenly working overtime all the time. Though he's worked overtime occasionally in the past, suddenly things are really busy at work, and he seems to always be there instead of hanging out with you. Of course, many professions have a busy season, and he could be working on a more time-consuming project, but it's more likely that he's using overtime to mean "time with my other girlfriend." If he's always too tired to stay out late or hang out and was never tired before, this may be a sign that he's using his energy on someone else. If you made a routine of having lunch or dinner together often and now he's never in the mood, or just doesn't feel well or isn't hungry. None of these signs alone means that your boyfriend is cheating on you. But if all of these things come up repeatedly, then it either means that he's spending a lot of quality time with someone else, or that he doesn't want to spend time with you anymore. If he's always making excuses for why he doesn't want to hang out with you, then you should ask yourself why you're still in the relationship.  Even when he's not making excuses, your boyfriend could start saying things that make him sound like another person all together. If there's suddenly a change in how he talks to you and how he talks in general, then he may be thinking of another lady. Here are some signs that the things he says may show that he's cheating:   If he stops complementing you. Did he compliment you all the time before, and now he suddenly stopped any flattery? If he never tells you you're beautiful, or mentions your best features and how awesome you generally are, then maybe he's saving all of his flattery for someone else. If he compliments you more often. If he wasn't a big complimenter, but suddenly he's always telling you how amazing you are, he may be doing it out of guilt. If he does this after a long and unexplained absence, then this is particularly suspicious. If he just sounds different. If he's saying things he's never said before, using words he's never used before, or even laughing in a new way, then maybe he picked up these words from a special lady. If he doesn't return your texts for hours in the middle of a conversation. If you were having a long texting exchange and he's suddenly MIA, it may mean that his new lady just showed up.  

notice his excuses.  notice the things he says. 

 Your boyfriend chose to be with you for many reasons. Don’t let your philandering friend get in your head and make you forget that. Showing you are confident in yourself may make them back off. It will also show your boyfriend that you know that you are a catch and that he’s crazy if he lets your friend get between the two of you.   Tell yourself just how smart, kind, attractive, and funny you are if you ever get down on yourself because of this situation.; , Laying on a few subtle, and not so subtle, hints to your friend reaffirms to them that he is yours. Doing so may also make them feel guilty about their plans and help them decide to back off.   For instance, if your friend asks if your boyfriend is joining when the two of you make plans, you could say in a joking manner, “Why? Am I not fun enough for you?” This lets the friend now that you are aware of their constant desire to be around your boyfriend. You could also make your friend know to back off by showing affection to your boyfriend, particularly if they are flirting with him right in front of you. You could smile at your friend and then plant a kiss on your man’s cheek. This will definitely send the friend a message., Walk up to the conversation with a smile on your face if your friend and boyfriend are having a talk. You could place your hand on your boyfriend’s back and say, “What are we talking about?” Acting in this way shows your boyfriend and friend that you expect to be a part of this conversation.You may want to be concerned if they stop talking or they move their bodies away from you.  Bring the attention towards your relationship if you find your friend and boyfriend having a talk. You can use subtle tricks to remind your friend that you and your boyfriend are a couple.   For instance, remember to say “we” a lot when talking. Instead of saying something like, “I really like that restaurant, say “We really like that restaurant.” Talking about what you do together can remind your friend that you and your boyfriend are united. 

exude confidence.  remind your friend that he is your boyfriend, not theirs.  stay friendly during the interaction.  use hints in conversation. 

 Sometimes the best way to get the information you want is to be blunt. Being this way doesn’t leave any wiggle room for misinterpretation and gets you a straight answer.   For example, invite your friend out to coffee and say, “I’m just wondering if you have feelings for my boyfriend. Some of the things you do and ways you behave make me suspicious.” Your friend may get their feelings hurt, but it’s better to know., You will have to become more direct if they don’t get the hint or they continue their behavior. Your friendship is compromised anyways because of their flirting, so telling them to stop talking to your man won’t do additional harm.   For example, you can say, “I’m not sure if you’re trying to be funny or if you don’t realize you’re flirting, but it’s making me uncomfortable and I want you to stop.” Try to say this to them when you are alone. Making a scene in front of people will only make the situation worse., Stop bringing your friend around your boyfriend or end the relationship with them all together if the flirting doesn’t stop. It’s clearly not a good friendship in the first place if your friend doesn’t respect you or your relationship enough to back off. 

ask them if they like your boyfriend.  tell them to back off.  avoid putting yourself in the situation again. 

 It’s easy to think that others are after your man, even if you’re not the jealous type. Consulting with him gives you a second opinion, as yours could be a little skewed.   You could say, “Do you think my friend has feelings for you? I feel like I am seeing signs of it, but I’m not sure. What do you think?” Take what he says to heart. However, look for signs that he may also be into your friend and is hiding it. These signs could include lots of eye contact, text messaging, finding excuses to be alone with your friend, and acting differently when around them., Your man may give you subtle signs that he’s picking up romantic vibes from your friend. Pay attention to what he does when he’s around them. You may see signals that he feels uncomfortable or is looking to you for help.   For example, your boyfriend may look at you with widened eyes when your friend talks to him or acts inappropriately. He may also turn his body away from them and towards you when the suspected flirting occurs., Are your boyfriend and friend texting each other? Do they share inside jokes? Do they often leave you out of the conversation? If so, you have every right to speak up about it, if you don’t like the way they behave. This is particularly so if you believe they may be having an affair.For instance, you could say, “I love that you and my friend get along so well. However, I’m not comfortable with how you two act when you’re around each other. It makes me concerned that something else may be going on.” He will likely change his behavior if he truly cares about you and wants to make you feel more comfortable. It may be a sign that he enjoys the attention and likes your friend if he isn’t willing to stop.  Try not to take your frustrations towards your friend out on your boyfriend. They are to blame, not him. Getting mad at him may make him pull away from you and create the opposite result of what you want. 

ask if he suspects your friend likes him.  look at him when he’s around your friend.  tell him you are not comfortable with the situation.  understand your boyfriend may not be to blame. 

; , It's their fault, not yours, and if it's not your fault, try confronting them alone and see what's up with how they treat you, and if there is a way to solve this problem. But keep a friend close by if something goes wrong. ), try to avoid those specific situations.    If you're young, like in middle school, get a parent to talk to them.       If you're an adult and you are in a relationship, you may want to consider breaking up. Choose the right time to do it.  If it's teasing or sarcasm, just let him know you don't appreciate it and to stop. But if it's really verbal abuse tell someone. It doesn't matter who, just tell someone.  

talk to a friend or close female family member about the situation.  don't blame yourself.  if you're in a situation where you'll see them a lot (work, school, extra things, etc.  face the person and let them know that their behavior is wrong.  decide if it's sarcasm, teasing or abuse. 

 If someone has started calling you by a mean nickname, or something that you don’t like, the first step is not to respond. He might be calling you by this nickname to try and get a rise from you, so try to ignore it, or just raise an eyebrow and walk on., If it’s your friends who are calling you by the nickname, they might not realise that you don’t like it. Calmly explain to them that it makes you feel bad, and you’d like it if they would stop calling you by the nickname. Good friends will understand and won’t want to hurt your feelings.You could say “Guys, I know you think it’s funny to call me "Zack Attack." But I really don’t like that nickname. Just call me Zachary, my real name, okay?”  , There may be occasions when a friend introduces you to somebody by your nickname. This is a good opportunity to challenge the nickname and assert what you want to be called. If your friend introduces you by saying “Hi, this is my friend Bobby.” You can calmly just say, “Hi! Actually, it’s just Bob.”   This will help ensure that the person you are meeting knows not to you use your nickname, while also showing your friend that you prefer to be called by your chosen name. If you are in any group situation and somebody uses your nickname, you can correct him like this. Over time, people will stop using your nickname if you correct them., If the person calling you by a nickname is a bully, it will be harder to confront him. You should try to just ignore him, and not let him see that he has upset you or got to you. Try to look confident and give off the impression that the name-calling is too stupid to think about. Bullies want to take power away from you and make you scared. If you can demonstrate that it's not working, they might lose interest.If bullies call you a name, you can show that you're not intimidated or scared by looking them in the eyes, laughing, and then just walking away without looking back. You could say something like "Here we go again. This is boring," or "Why are you talking to me?" You could say "I don't know why you keep calling me that, but it's boring and I don't care." Don’t get angry or upset. That could encourage a bully to just use your mean nickname more often., Mean name-calling is bullying and you don’t have to put up with it. If you have tried ignoring and then challenging the name-calling, but it continues to happen, talk to an authority figure. Reporting the name-calling will alert your school to what’s going on, and they can keep an eye on the situation.   If it’s upsetting you, stick close to your friends for support. A good network of friends can be really helpful if you are being bullied., An important part of getting rid of a nickname, and making sure it doesn’t come back, is reaffirming your chosen name. One of the ways you can do this is by signing off messages with this name. For example, make the effort to sign off an email or text with your name.   Just writing, “Ok, see you later. Jill” at the end of an email will get your friends more used to seeing this name. If you are leaving a voicemail message, use your name at the start. You could say “Hi, Jan, it’s Jill here.”  , Drop your chosen name into conversation to try and fix it in the minds of your friends. Soon they will associate you with your chosen name and not the nickname. You have to be a little bit subtle with this, and avoid referring to yourself in the third person. For instance, when telling a story about what you did at the weekend don’t say “Jill went shopping.”   You can drop your name into conversation by reporting a conversation, or what someone said to you. For example, you could say “And then Jan said to me, Jill, what happened to the pizza?”, You can affirm your chosen name by being positive when you meet people or are in a group situation. If you show initiative, and introduce yourself before somebody else introduces you, you get to choose what name is used. Get in there first to fix your chosen name in people’s minds.   Just introduce yourself casually by saying “Hey, everyone. I’m Jill.”  , If you having a hard time getting people to stop calling you by a nickname, you can take some comfort in remembering that nicknames don’t last forever. As you get older people will use nicknames less and less. As you meet new people and have new experiences things like nicknames change too.If your friends continue to use a nickname you don’t like even after you have explained how it upsets you, consider if they are really good friends. Often people use nicknames as a sign of affection, and this changes as you get older and more mature.A nickname is only a name and does not represent who you are.  

don’t answer to a nickname you don’t like.  ask friends to stop using a nickname.  correct an introduction.  deal with a bully calling you by a nickname.  talk to an authority figure.  sign off messages with your name.  use your chosen name in conversation.  introduce yourself at the start.  remember that nicknames don’t last forever. 

 Instead of focusing on all of the reasons you are drawn to your crush, you need to change your focus and consider all of the reasons why the crush can lead to no good and is not worth pursuing. There are many different reasons why any crush can be inappropriate, and it's important to know exactly what you'd be getting yourself into in order to avoid it. You should think about why the crush is a bad idea, and consider potential reasons that you may be feeling what you're feeling (other than the initial attraction, of course). Here are some potential reasons you may be dealing with:   If he/she's a lot younger than you are or he/she's a lot older than you are, why are you interested in a young or old partner whose interests and priorities will be very different from your own? If you are into a guy who works for you, are you more into the idea that you can call the shots than the actual person? If you have a crush on your brother's girlfriend, is it more about getting one over on your brother than actual interest in the girl? It might be that for a series of circumstances you are feeling needy and vulnerable, making it a bad time to take any action.; ,   If one or both parents had extra-marital affairs when you were growing up or if you have a history of infidelity you may have some underlying issues that need to be addressed to successfully enjoy a committed relationship.  For example, if you have a crush on a guy but are already in a relationship, then you have to ask yourself if the crush is really meaningful, or if this is your way of telling yourself that it's not really working out with you and your boyfriend. If you and your boyfriend were really happy together, then would you have "room" to develop strong feelings for another person?   Of course, everyone, even the happiest couples, can get harmless little crushes from time to time, but if your crush turns more serious, then you should question your current relationship. This is your chance to exit without serious consequences if there is a problem. You should especially question the status of your current relationship if this kind of thing keeps happening. If you occasionally really click with someone outside of your relationship and feel a harmless crush on him or her while knowing it won't lead to anything, that's one thing, but if you feel frequently embroiled in a one-sided love affair, then you have to wonder about the real reason behind your feelings.  If you were to get involved with this person, how would the fallout affect you? Her/Him? Your friends, family, co-workers? Think as if it were a chess game and visualize the next several moves: "If I do this, then s/he will do that; then my brother will hate me; then the first time we argue I will lose my job..." and so on. Thinking about the worst that could happen if you and your crush were united can make you realize that it would be a huge mistake.   Ask yourself, is the potential relationship with this person worth all the trouble you will endure, and what are the chances the relationship would survive all of the chaos that will ensue?  , What will other people think — will they think more, or less of you? Though we often say that it doesn't matter what people think and that love conquers all, in some cases, the fact of the matter is that what other people think does matter, because their disapproval, or even their scorn, may make it very difficult for you to carry out your potential inappropriate relationship. It's important to step back and look at the big picture, to consider how other people would react to your relationship. If you're already certain it's inappropriate, then considering how others would react will further dissuade you. Here are some scenarios to consider:   It's not cool to try to steal your buddy's girl. You might end up with her, but you will lose your friend. If you're older, and the boy is a minor, you will be considered a cradle-robber —and on top of that, if you actually pursue that relationship into a sexual situation, you could be looking at jail. Sex with a minor is worse than inappropriate — it's a crime. Sure, you may have a crush on your wife's sister. But imagine what would happen if you did anything about it — would your wife ever be able to look you in the eye? Would her family ever forgive you?  , If you get involved with someone inappropriate, you will not just be dealing with problems now. You will be dealing with the fallout far — maybe years — into the future. It's one thing to think about the exciting adventures you'll have with your inappropriate crush if he or she returns you feelings, but it's another try to imagine what your relationship will really look like in a few years. Will it really be possible to sustain it? Will your feelings really last? It's important to think about whether you can really have a future with this person, or if you would just be sacrificing everything for a few fleeting moments of joy.   For instance, the person you are crazy about may not be a very nice person. You start ditching your friends and family to spend time with her. She's super flaky, and you become flaky, too — going back on your word because she wasn't willing to do whatever it was you promised you'd do — and won't let you do it, either. Even after you break up with her, everyone you know will still view you with distrust. They will question your judgment for ever getting involved with someone like that in the first place.  Almost by definition, a crush involves an idealized picture of someone else. But everyone is human, and even your crush has characteristics that are probably not pleasant. Perhaps he says mean things to people, or maybe she listens to music that you think is dumb. Or perhaps he or she merely ignores you. Try to work up some negative energy about the person that you can focus on in order to weaken the crush.   Write down a list of all of the negative qualities of your crush. If you really think your crush is perfect and you can't think of a single thing that is wrong with him or her, then this means that you don't know the person well enough. If you can't think of a single thing wrong with your crush, then you have him or her up on a pedestal. One of the reasons your crush may be inappropriate is simply because the person is "bad" for you. Writing down the reasons why, such as the fact that the person abuses alcohol or is a known player, can help you see that, while you may get butterflies in your stomach when you see him, he's no good for you in the long run.  Now that you've analyzed, considered, and really meditated upon how terrible this idea is, you need to stop obsessing over this person. No matter how tempting it is to think about him/her, fantasize, and get yourself all tingly doing it, stop it. Think about and do something else. In loose psychological terms, it's called redirecting behaviors and thought patterns. You have to find ways to stay busy and to stop thinking about your inappropriate crush. If all you do is sit around the house all day, then your inappropriate crush will be a lot harder to forget than if you throw yourself into your work and studies and have an active social life.   At first, not thinking about your crush will be even harder because you'll be so busy thinking about nothing thinking about him or her. But have faith — soon enough, you'll be on your way to moving forward. Learn to redirect your thoughts. Train yourself to think about something else every time you start thinking about him/her — think about how much you love the person you're with instead. Think about how much work you have to get done. If you're at home, turn on the radio or TV, and get some other thoughts running through your head. If you still feel yourself reverting to thoughts of your forbidden crush, find someone to talk to; call a friend. Ask that friend if he or she wants to hang out — you can get out of the house and stop thinking about your crush! Throw yourself into a new hobby or an activity. Try tennis, yoga, writing short stories, or training for a 5K. Though these activities alone won't make you forget your crush, they will bring more richness to your life and will help you think of other things.  If you can remove yourself from that person as much as possible, the crush will weaken. In order to sustain our adoration for someone, we generally need to reinforce it by seeing the person. (Absence usually doesn't make the heart grow fonder, actually.) Of course, this isn't always practical, but do what you can to minimize contact with the other person. Try to avoid doing anything dramatic while finding a way to limit the time you spend with your crush.   Unfortunately, there are some cases where it would be quite hard to limit contact with the person entirely. If you have a crush on your married boss and it won't go away, for example, you may have to consider looking for another job. If you have a crush on your professor and it won't go away, see if you can switch into another class. If you do have to be in the same room as the person, try to minimize eye contact and conversation. You shouldn't make things extra awkward by avoiding or ignoring the person entirely, but you should limit how much time you spend interacting.  All crushes fade with time. If you can avoid doing something regrettable and keep your feelings in check, eventually those powerful emotions will run their course. You may feel like you're trapped and that you are bound to have these feelings forever, but that won't be the case. One day, you'll be looking back on this moment, wondering how you could have harbored such feelings. If you have faith that you won't always feel this way, you'll be on the way to getting over it.   Unfortunately, there's no timeline for how long it takes to get over a crush. But if you go about living a busy and fulfilling life instead of spending all your time moping and pining, you'll be guaranteed to get over it faster.  If you're single, then you should begin to put yourself out there when you're starting to get over your crush. You don't have to feel 100% cured, but you should feel like you're ready to start a meaningful relationship with someone else — if you're still completely lovesick, then it won't be fair to the other person to start dating just to distract yourself. But once you're ready, ask a friend to set you up or be open to meeting new people. You'll soon find that your crush is far from your thoughts.   It doesn't matter if that person does not measure up to your "wrong crush." What does matter is that you spend some time in the pleasant company of someone other than that person. Start dating others, and keep an open mind. That person is off limits to you, and you have to start re-wiring your brain to think about being with someone else.  Let's face it: sometimes, you can't convince yourself that you don't feel the way you feel. If you've tried to fight it, all to no avail, and you still find yourself sighing over him/her, then make it right. There are ways to make an inappropriate crush totally appropriate — the most important thing to remember is to make it right first — and then, and only then —get involved. And then, true love wins the day!   If she's your brother's girl, then you have to behave as a gallant gentleman, and never hit on her. If your brother breaks up with her, you can ask your brother if he'd mind you asking her out. Maybe he wouldn't mind, and there certainly is precedent for it. If he doesn't break up with her, or if he won't give you permission, you're out of luck unless you are prepared to accept the consequences — your brother may not speak to you. If you're interested in someone much younger, wait for him/her. Don't get involved with anyone. Bide your time, remain friendly, but don't get too close. Love him or her from afar until it is appropriate. For example, if you're a high school senior and have been yearning for your early-twenties math teacher for years, wait until you graduate and get some more life experience before you decide whether or not you want to pursue the relationship. If you are falling for your subordinate, then you must decide what measures you should take at work before you pursue the relationship. You can transfer to another department or take on a different position, or do whatever you have to do at work so that your relationship would not be viewed as inappropriate or a power play.  

consider all the reasons why the crush is a bad idea.  if your crush is inappropriate because you're already in a relationship, consider your background and whether your new crush could be undermining your relationships.  if your crush is inappropriate because you're already in a casual relationship with no children who can be affected by leaving it, ask yourself about the current state of your relationship.  project the potential fallout.  consider your reputation.  think about your future.  focus on your crush's negative qualities.  distract yourself as much as you can.  avoid the person as much as you can.  give it time.  start dating other people when you're ready.  if you can't fight it, find a way to make it right first. 

 The most important thing about a dolphin stranding is keeping everyone—people and dolphin—safe. The best way to do this is to report the dolphin’s presence to the local police. They will know what experts to contact to get proper care for the dolphin.   The police may come to the scene to barricade the animal in order to prevent it from spreading disease. The dolphin may not have stranded itself because it’s sick, but if it is, the disease could pass to humans through contact.; , Although the police will probably do this for you, it’s a good idea to report what you see directly. Do an internet search for “marine animal rescue service” or “regional stranding network” with your location to find one.   Every coastal region of the United States has a volunteer stranding network. The National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA) connects with these networks to saved stranded mammals of all kinds, as well as turtles.Make note of the dolphin’s physical characteristics so that the marine rescue agency you contact can bring the right equipment., Even if the mammal is dead, the body needs to be removed from the beach to protect swimmers and other beach-goers. Calling the authorities is the right thing to do whether it’s alive or dead.   Watch the blowhole. Dolphins breathe out of this hole, not their mouths, so keep an eye on the blowhole for exhalation. You can do this without touching the dolphin. Most dolphins can hold their breath for a long time, so wait about 20 minutes for breathing or movement. If there isn't any, the dolphin is probably dead.If the dolphin is dead, protocols like staying quiet do not apply, but staying back and not touching the dolphin become even more important in order to prevent the spread of disease.  If you are the first responder to a stranded dolphin, it’s your job to coordinate the safety of both those near the dolphin and the dolphin itself. The most important thing for the safety of both is no contact. Keep people, dogs, and anything else at least 50 feet away from the dolphin.Ask them to keep quiet so the dolphin doesn’t get upset.   Tell any crowd that has gathered what you're doing in a calm, low voice. Explain that the dolphin is probably scared and to please keep their voices down. If you don’t feel comfortable taking charge, quickly find someone who will step in.  Once people have moved away from the dolphin, recruit others to assist you. The more people are in the crowd, the more help you will need, especially if there are young children and pets present.  Trying to move a dolphin will make its current injuries worse, or injure it in a new way. The best thing for the dolphin is to let it lie still until professionals arrive with proper equipment.  Marine animals carry diseases. Although scientists are not completely sure why dolphins strand themselves, one theory is that it is most likely due to disease.Such diseases can easily pass to humans, so the best thing to do is not touch the dolphin.   Illness in wild animals is especially a concern for young children, whose immune systems are not as strong as those of adults. Take special care that kids do not touch the dolphin. If you do come in contact with a dolphin, immediately wash your hands and skin.  A stranded dolphin is a wild animal. It may feel threatened by your presence and choose to attack those near it.   Although dolphins usually defend themselves by swimming in packs of about 12 dolphins (called pods), they can do some damage on their own with their strong beaks and tails.  Dolphins are strong, muscular creatures. Make sure that if you are standing near, or working with, a stranded dolphin, be far from the face and tail.   A dolphin’s most powerful feature is its tail. Do not hold or even touch the tail. By shaking its head from side to side, a dolphin can strike anyone within range. Make sure anyone who is authorized to help the dolphin stands clear of the face and the range of its snout.  It may take some time for the authorities to arrive. While you wait, use your volunteers and keep the crowd at least 50 feet away from the dolphin. Remember to have people keep their volume down so the dolphin is kept as calm as possible.   Explain to everyone that the dolphin can both hurt people standing too close and spread disease if touched. This explanation will more than likely keep people from ignoring you. If you do see someone touch the dolphin, make sure they wash their skin immediately. If the dolphin hurts someone, call 911 again to get an ambulance ready.  A dolphin’s blowhole is located on the top of its head. Any debris or blockage of this hole—even from water—can cause suffocation.   Never get water or sand anywhere near a dolphin's blowhole. Just like a human can drown if too much water comes into our mouths, dolphins can drown from water blocking their blowholes.  If the dolphin is lying on its side or back, this means the blowhole is at risk of being blocked or is blocked entirely, whether by sand or water. Since this will cause suffocation, there is an immediate need for someone to roll the dolphin onto its stomach.   Only proceed with this step if you have assistance and are confident you know what you’re doing!Do not pull on the fins or tail, or try to push the dolphin back into the water.  Soak towels in water and lay them over the dolphin. If someone has a bucket, they can pour water over the dolphin’s back, making sure not to get water near the blowhole.   You can cover the dolphin with a wet towel below its blow hole if you cut a slit for the dorsal fin, which is the fin on the dolphin’s back. Fit the towel very carefully over the dorsal fin.  If the dolphin is in direct sunlight, create shade for it with a beach umbrella or other device, making sure it doesn’t come in contact with the dolphin at any time.  This will make the dolphin more comfortable as it is not used to being on land. The pectoral fins, also known as flippers, are not made for flat surfaces.   You can also dig a hole under the chest and fill it with water. This will not only keep the dolphin wet, but it will support its chest while relieving pressure on the lungs and flippers., When the authorities arrive, get out of their way, and help the crowd stay out of the way too. The professional marine mammal rescuers that have arrived know how to take care of the dolphin better than you do, so making sure no one interferes is the best thing you can do for the dolphin.  Even with your best efforts, if a live stranded dolphin is already injured, dehydrated, or very sick, it may not survive its rescue. This may be especially difficult for children who are observing the rescue to cope with.  

call the authorities.  look up the nearest marine animal rescue service.  make sure it’s alive.  keep people back.  recruit others to help protect the dolphin.  leave the dolphin where it is.  understand the danger of illness.  use extreme caution.  stand away from the tail and face.  continue to keep people back.  check the location of the blowhole.  roll the dolphin onto its belly if needed.  douse the dolphin in water.  get shade for the dolphin.  dig holes under the pectoral fins.  get out of the way of professionals.  prepare for death. 

 If you have the time and money this is perhaps the best option. In many warm weather locales there are guides who, for a fee, will take you to a local group of dolphins and help you interact with them. Often such tours are led by scientific experts who can teach you or your children about our dolphin friends and their habitat.   Examples of such programs include: Discovery Cove in Orlando; Dolphin Quest in Hawaii; Dolphinaris in Cancun; Dolphin Cay in the Bahamas; and the Dolphin Research Center in Marathon, Florida.If you did go on a guided dolphin tour, verify that it is legitimate and has a good safety record.; , Sometimes you can pet dolphins without making a long hike to the ocean by visiting the local aquarium. The National Aquarium offers special packages for those who want to get close to a dolphin under professional supervision.The same is true for some theme parks, like SeaWorld., Dolphins can be found in oceans throughout the world. Some places, however, are better than others for finding wild dolphins. The Azores has the greatest variety of dolphin species and dolphins there frequently come close to shore. New Zealand and the Bahamas should also be on the top of the list for any tourist hoping to see dolphins in their natural habitat.While visiting a beach alone, keep your distance from dolphins. You can appreciate them from afar, but will put yourself at risk if you approach too close.  While it might seem like more fun to swim with the dolphins, the best way to interact with a dolphin is to protect them from danger. Some species of dolphin are endangered due to overfishing, global warming, and human encroachments on their habitat.Through a conservationist group you can adopt a dolphin, get updates on dolphin issues or lobby government to protect endangered species.  In some places, humans try to interact with dolphins so frequently that it disrupts their natural behavior. As a result, it is illegal to feed or approach a wild dolphin in many countries, including the United States. Dolphins are large, powerful creates who can and occasionally do hurt humans. Restrictions on human-dolphin interaction, therefore, are typically in the interest of both parties., If you are visiting dolphins in their natural habitat, get into the water no less than fifty feet from them. You should never attempt to approach a dolphin alone. Better yet, do this with someone who is properly trained to interact with wild dolphins and knows how to read dolphin reactions.  Let the dolphin approach you. Dolphins are easily scared and may get defensive and territorial. They will view you swimming up to them as aggressive behavior. While you might feel the urge to approach them, they are more likely to be friendly if they find you to be non-threatening.  If the dolphins are smacking the water with their tail, leaping and spinning or exhaling loudly in quick bursts, they are probably agitated. Back away and consider leaving the area. Dolphins can be dangerous if aggravated.Leave immediately if you see a mother with small babies. Such an interaction can cause considerable distress.Also pay attention to swimming patterns. If the dolphins are diving for an extended period of time or if they are making abrupt changes in the speed or direction of their swimming that are probably upset., When touching dolphins in captivity, be aware that they are sensitive. Their skin is delicate and can easily be hurt by our fingernails. Areas that are particularly sensitive include the blowhole, eyes, snout, lower jaw, and melon.Petting a dolphin in the wild is not recommended. While watching a dolphin from a distance might be alright, any invasive activity might scare the dolphin away from its natural habitat. Stay at least fifty feet away and leave within thirty minutes, Unless you are in a controlled setting with a guide who says otherwise, you should keep your distance and watch the dolphins in their natural habitat. You should feel free to do this, either snorkeling or in a boat. As long as you do no see any of the aforementioned signs of agitation and do not stay in their space for more than thirty minutes, the interaction should be safe for all parties.  

find a guided tour.  visit an aquarium.  go to the beach.  support dolphin life.  research the law.  get into the water with dolphins and a qualified guide.  do not approach the dolphin.  watch for signs of distress.  be careful not to hurt the dolphin.  watch from a distance. 

 One of the easiest ways you can help to keep dolphins safe? Leave them be! You should never attempt to feed dolphins, pet dolphins, or interrupt their way of life if you should see them in the ocean or in some freshwater rivers.   Avoid taking commercial cruise liners through endangered areas where you'll likely encounter dolphin populations and coral reefs. It's estimated that these ships destroy hundreds of yards of delicate coral every year, which provide habitat and shelter for dolphins and other marine life.Even if you're a big fan of dolphins and would like to see them up close, sea-themed parks and aquatic swim-with-dolphins programs serve to keep dolphins in captivity, where they experience significantly shorter life spans. Improper physical contact with dolphins can transfer diseases, making dolphins susceptible to fungal infections and a host of other problems. It's much safer to leave them alone where they can live peacefully and happily.; , One of the most dangerous threats to dolphin populations is commercial fishing, and the nets the fishermen use. If you eat seafood, it's important to make careful and intelligent seafood purchases. There are only so many fish in the sea, and many commercial fishing operations do more harm than good, while others harvest fish responsibly and sustainably. So how can you be sure you know where your salmon, tuna, or shrimp are coming from? Seafood Watch publishes a free annual watch list, tracking the practices and the fishing statistics in the given you, allowing you to make up-to-date decisions and buy the safest seafood.   The tuna fishing industry is the culprit most often blamed for dolphin deaths, and "dolphin-safe" tuna is a label you can often find at grocery stores. That's an easy way to make a simple change, but the problem is much larger than just tuna. Make sure you stay informed and learn everything you can about the operation.  Human waste is the number one contributing factor to the degradation of life in the oceans, with 80% of marine pollution originating on land.The impact is enormous, and even something as simple as releasing a helium balloon into the sky can end up contributing the garbage that chokes the dolphin population out. Take steps now to reduce your non-biodegradable garbage.   It doesn't need to be complicated. Take little steps by avoiding plastic coffee cups when you go to the coffee shop, bringing your own reusable thermos instead. Avoid packaged food and products with excessive plastic packaging, choosing instead to purchase bulk groceries, or used goods. Reuse plastic bags and avoid getting new ones at the store. The "trash vortex" is a patch of garbage that floats in the North Pacific ocean, made up primarily of plastics, Styrofoam, and other garbage carried by the current into a single place where it swirls constantly. It's the size of Texas and it's full of dead ocean-life, birds, and other creatures that became ensnared in the waste. If you want to save dolphins, the impact of human waste on the ocean must be reduced immediately., It's not just physical waste that interrupts the flow of life in the oceans. Just as significant is air pollution, which resettles into fresh water and flows back into the oceans, making up about a third of contaminants in coastal areas.   Our use of fossil fuels is directly related to the health of the oceans, meaning that any steps you can take to reduce your carbon footprint from transportation will be directly linked to the safety of dolphins. Start taking steps to drive less, switch to more fuel-efficient vehicles, or seek alternate methods of transportation, like walking, riding your bicycle, and sharing rides. There are somewhere in the neighborhood of 65,000 chemicals approved for use in commercial and industrial cleaners, as well as automotive products, and only about 300 of them have been tested for toxic properties. We have no idea about the impact seemingly "safe" products have on the environment.Oil tanker spills get a lot of airplay, but sewage runoff sends twice as much oil into coastal waters every year. Non-source point pollution is extremely difficult to control or trace, since it comes from the air, though we can be sure that most of it is directly related to commercial pollutants and industrial waste.  As the temperatures of the ocean change, even by a few degrees, the whole delicate balance of the sea habitat will be thrown off, affecting the way dolphins and other sea creatures survive. As populations dwindle, it'll become more and more difficult for dolphins to compete with other species for a reduced amount of food. If the temperatures don't stabilize, it'll be very difficult for dolphins to survive.   Reduce your energy consumption, focus on reducing physical waste, and make more informed purchases with commercial cleaners, soaps, and other household products to reduce your own impact. Avoid anything with parabens, phosphates, and Styrofoam. Aside from temperatures, oxygen depletion is a major problem associated with global climate change. Nitrogen and phosphorus are elements found in fertilizer, commercial toxins, and sewage, which enter coastal waters and deplete the oxygen in the water. Think of it as sucking the air out of a room the dolphins breathe in. A single gram of nitrogen or phosphorus can deplete between 10 and 100 grams of oxygen in seawater., While it's fun to go see dolphins up close doing tricks, these parks separate baby dolphins from their mothers, keep them enclosed in tanks, feed them drugs, and force them to breed at exceptionally young ages.They've also been accused of unsafe work environments for humans and dolphins alike, making parks like SeaWorld dangerous and unethical. Don't support them.  The biggest thing you can contribute to the cause of dolphins is your voice. If you care about keeping dolphins safe, shout it from the rooftops and learn everything you can about the dangers that face the dolphin population in your area.   Subscribe to dolphin watch organizations to keep up-to-date on current efforts and legislation that you could contribute to and encourage others to participate in. BlueVoice is an ocean conservation organization that works to save dolphins and whales, specifically by tracking and fighting dolphin hunts in Japan and Peru. You can join BlueVoice by signing up here. Devote a considerable amount of your social media presence to dolphin causes and making others aware of what's going on in the oceans. The more people know what to avoid and are aware of the threat that dolphins face, the more changes can be made.  In the 1970s, the government passed a bill designed to keep dolphins and other marine mammals safe, but it wasn't until the mid-80s that stronger guidelines were put in place, specifically related to tuna fishing. The impact of these regulations made a huge difference then, in the short term, but little has been done in the decades since. It's time to revisit the issue, so you should let your representative know you mean business. Get in touch immediately.   Most communications happen online, so you can usually visit your senatorial or congressional representative's website to learn more about how to get in touch directly. Draft a letter laying out a specific plan of action and demand results, or deny your vote during the next election cycle. Changes specifically need to take into account the commercial and industrial pollutants and the way these contribute to the deaths of marine mammals.  Lots of organizations are already in place, fighting the good fight against pollution and ocean injustice. They're often in dire financial straights, however, making any assistance you can offer extremely valuable. This is an especially great way to contribute if you're busy to participate directly, but feel passionately about the cause.   Organizations like the International Fund for Animal Welfare (IFAW), Greenpeace, BlueVoice, and other groups are all devoted to saving the lives of dolphins and they all would appreciate financial help to continue the cause.  Avoiding products and making smart purchases is a good step for you to take along–every single person makes a difference–but if you can rally the troops and make a more significant impact with larger numbers, your contribution will be much greater.   Try to work on changing your own household first, getting everyone you live with to contribute to the proper consumer choices, then start holding open meetings at a community center or church to share what you know and get others on board. Getting in touch and spreading the word with letters to your local paper, sharing links on social media, and even making up posters can do a lot to share your message and let people know how they can make a difference.  If you've got a growing group of like-minded people concerned about the plight of the dolphins, consider starting your own activist group to organize protests, boycotts, and stage information-disseminating meetings so that more and more people will become aware of the issues. The more people involved, the more the government will have to listen and make the changes necessary to take action. Media is the strongest source of defense for fighting against the threats that harm dolphins.   Declare your organization with the IRS and apply for non-profit status if you grow large enough to have significant operating costs and want to start collecting donations from visitors to the site.  If you want to take the next step from dolphin-lover to professional defender of the dolphins, going into marine biology is the biggest likely career choice. This will not only allow you to be around the animals you love and hope to protect, but will allow you to study the ways in which the environment of dolphins is affected by the human footprint, and how to improve that environment.   In school, work hard in biology and take as many natural science classes as you can. You won't start out by learning to scuba dive and swim with dolphins, but you'll be building the necessary foundation to possibly do something like that for a living. When you get to college, there probably won't be a "marine biology" major, unless you're at certain coastal universities, but getting a general biology degree will allow you to specialize at the graduate level. Take your education one step at a time.  For some people, it's not enough to donate some money and sit back to wait for changes passively. If you're frustrated with the slow process that justice usually takes, you might consider getting involved more directly with an activist group that works to disrupt the forces that endanger dolphins and other marine life.   The Sea Shepherd Conservation Society The Animal Liberation Front (ALF) The Taiji Action Group People for the Ethical Treatment of Animals (PETA) Greenpeace  , Many activist organizations, Greenpeace especially, organize user-friendly activism and signature-gathering operations to disrupt corporate attempts to maintain the status-quo. These groups draw attention to the ways that corporations shirk their environmental responsibility to maximize profits and attempt to hold them to it. It usually benefits industry to work unregulated and unimpeded by things like carbon caps and environmental restrictions, which keeps the oceans polluted and dolphins in danger. Work to change that.   Much of the dubious decision making happens at the legislative level, where corporate lobbyists work to change environmental legislation to indirectly benefit the entities that are destroying it. It can be awfully confusing for the layman, making your contributions to more professional organizations a lot easier than trying to go it alone.  Get your organization to post up outside of heavy polluters and try to get as much media coverage as you possibly can, spreading the word about how their pollution is affecting the dolphin population. Greenpeace consistently organizes rallies and protests of major polluters, which you can subscribe to even if you're not a contributing member.Be tenacious and be loud. You probably won't get an oil company to start cleaning up their act just by waving some signs around, but you can draw attention to what's happening, get on television, and make people start paying attention. Throw the ball into their court. Numbers are important, but even small protests register if the cause is important enough and if you've got controversy on your side.  Depending on the group you join, you might end up cutting fishing nets in international waters or riding around on anti-whaling ships to get in the face of illegal whalers like a pirate, or you might be mostly collecting signatures and combing through paperwork. How deep you dive into the dolphin-saving waters will be up to you, but direct action will ensure results. Get involved and fight the good fight.   While it may seem glamorous, hardcore radical activism can be dangerous and often illegal. If you're willing to get arrested to serve the cause, you need to do so as part of an organized effort, not by going rogue and getting yourself into trouble without any support.  

leave dolphins alone.  make informed seafood purchases.  boycott styrofoam products and non-biodegradable consumer goods.  reduce your carbon footprint.  fight global climate change.  boycott marine theme parks that keep dolphins in captivity.  get the word out and make it loud.  encourage your congressional leader to strengthen the marine mammal protection act.  donate to marine wildlife foundations.  organize more significant boycotts in your area.  start your own activist group.  study marine biology.  join a radical marine justice organization.  take action against corporate polluters.  attend rallies and stage your own protests.  disrupt the fishing industry directly. 

 It’s possible that your girlfriend is mad at you, but it’s also possible that she’s going through something tough that has nothing to do with you. Either way, if you are getting negative feelings from her, don’t push her to talk right away. Give her some time to cool down. This will also give you time to think through your own feelings.; , Has your girlfriend’s behaviour actually changed toward you? Is it possible that you’re feeling depressed or anxious about something, and that you’re imagining that her behaviour is worse than normal?   It’s possible that she has always been a bit cold toward you, but that as the relationship gets older, you are realizing that you don’t like the way she behaves. Have you been through anything difficult recently? Maybe you’ve been demanding more attention from her lately, and she’s having a hard time meeting your needs, which has resulted in her pulling away.  She may be ignoring you, but if she’s struggling with depression, she might not even realize it.   Signs of depression include difficulties concentrating and making decisions; fatigue; feelings of helplessness, hopelessness, and/or worthlessness; insomnia or excessive sleeping; irritability; loss of interest in pleasurable activities such as sex or date nights; overeating or loss of appetite; anxiety; suicidal thoughts and/or destructive behaviour.If you think your girlfriend might be depressed, there are things that you can do to help.  As tempting as it may be to ignore her back or try to make her jealous, it’s not healthy or productive to do so. In addition, if your girlfriend is depressed or struggling with some other difficult personal problem, ignoring her back will only make things harder for her, and could really damage your relationship.   The “Elastic Band Theory” suggests that you can make someone want you by pulling away from them. It may work for some people in the short term, but it is not the type of behaviour that you can build a healthy relationship on.One piece of positive advice that you can take from the “Elastic Band Theory” is that people in relationships need space to do their own thing, otherwise they will tire of one another or begin to take one another for granted. You can take time for yourself and still be kind and respectful to your girlfriend. Don’t ignore her, but do make sure that you have a life outside of her.  Try not to dwell on how hurt/upset your girlfriend’s behaviour is making you feel. Remind yourself that she can’t actually “make” you feel anything, and that you have a choice: you can choose to acknowledge that you’re upset, but to not let it hold you back from enjoying life.   Do things that make you feel good: visit with friends, go to the gym, pick up hobbies (for example, playing guitar, making movies, or hiking).  If your girlfriend is completely ignoring you, you might not be able to get in touch with her via phone or in person. If you know she is still getting your texts, you might try sending her a message that expresses your concern and asks her to meet up and talk.   Example: “You haven’t been responding to my texts lately. When that happens, I feel hurt and wonder if you’re still happy in our relationship. Can we meet up and talk?”  If you know her schedule, you might even suggest a day and time when she is usually free, which could make it easier to get her to commit to meeting up.  Skip this step if your girlfriend responds to you via text or phone. If you can’t get in touch with her via text or phone, but you know that she is still okay (i.e. hanging out with friends, posting to social media), you might try sending her a message that lays out your feelings and concerns via her Facebook inbox or an email address.   If you choose to send an email/private message, be sensitive to your tone. Write a draft, then re-read it after you’ve had a good night’s sleep. Make sure that it isn't mean or disrespectful. Be specific. Provide concrete examples of what she does and how you feel. Be sure to word it in a way that isn’t accusatory:  “When we were at that party on Saturday, you spent the whole night talking to other people. We didn't get a chance to talk at all, and you left without saying goodbye, even though we were sitting across from each other in the same room. When you did that, I felt hurt. I wasn’t sure if I had done something wrong. I am worried about you, and I am worried about us. I would like to get together in person and talk this through. Or, if you’re uncomfortable with that, I am also open to communicating via email for now.”   Before sending your email, try to put yourself in her shoes as you give it a final read. Think about how it might sound to her, and how she might react, and edit it to ensure that you are sharing your thoughts and feelings in the most effective way possible. If she understands your side and doesn’t feel threatened, she’s more likely to respond.  If you manage to meet up with her in person to talk, use empathetic body language. This will show her that you’re committed to understanding her side of the story, and it should encourage her to open up.   Empathetic body language includes facing the person in an open position (i.e. not crossing your arms or hunching over or turning away), nodding and using eye contact to signal that you hear what she’s saying, and making reassuring sounds to show understanding without interrupting., In nonviolent communication, you focus on your own thoughts and feelings rather than accusing the other person of doing something wrong.   Organize what you say in the following order: observations, feelings, needs, and requests.Example: “For the past week you’ve not answered my calls and you’ve cancelled our plans twice. I’m starting to worry that you’re not interested in having a relationship with me any more.”  , After you’ve expressed how you feel, let her know that you are open to communication, and encourage her to share her feelings.   Example: “For the past week you’ve not answered my calls and you’ve cancelled our plans twice. I’m starting to worry that you’re not interested in having a relationship with me any more. I would like it if we could have a conversation about our relationship. If it’s not our relationship that’s the problem, then I would like it if you could open up to me about what else is going on.”  , If she admits that she’s unhappy in some way, ask her what she needs/what you can do. She might need space, or maybe she wants you to do something you’re not doing — it might even be something simple like hugging her more often or telling her she’s beautiful.   If she asks for space, don’t panic. Again, this could be completely about her and really have nothing to do with you.  Ask her if she knows how long she might need. If she says she doesn't know, suggest a time that feels okay to you — perhaps a week. Be supportive. Ask her if there’s anything you can do — for example, call at the end of the week to check in. If you decide to give each other space, ensure that you are both clear on what that means. For some, space might just mean only talking on the phone twice a week instead of every night, or, it might mean an entire week without any communication whatsoever. Clarifying what “space” means to you will help make that time easier.   Know that you don’t HAVE to give her what she says she needs. If you aren’t comfortable with something that she requests, it’s okay to tell her that. The two of you might be able to make a compromise. Ultimately the two of you need to respect one another’s needs and boundaries.  When it’s her turn to speak, actively listen to her. This involves empathetic body language (open stance, nodding, reassuring sounds) as well as showing your understanding by repeating what she has said and/or asking for clarification.If you are hurt by something that she says, it’s okay to let her know that, but try to let her know in a non-confrontational way.   Example: “Thank you for opening up to me. When you said that I’m too clingy, I felt sad and a bit confused. I enjoy spending time with you, but I’m also happy to do my own thing. I would like to know some of the specific things I do that lead you to think that I’m clingy. Maybe I’ll be able to change some of those things.”  If she can give you some specific examples, even if you don’t agree with them, it will help you get a better sense of what she wants from the relationship. Knowing what she wants will give you a clearer idea of whether you’re able or willing to give it to her.   Don’t roll your eyes or interrupt her while she is talking. Let her get it all out before you respond. What she has to say might be upsetting for you to hear; you might not agree, but just let her get it all out before you respond.  Once you’ve worked out what some of the problems may be, work together to figure out how you can resolve them.   If she’s said that she’s ignoring you because she feels overwhelmed by how much attention you pay to her, ask her to give you some specific examples of the things that you do that make her feel that way.  Perhaps she doesn’t like that you call her three times a day: at breakfast, lunch, and dinner. Maybe you can agree to a “good morning” text and a short phone call after dinner every day.  Sometimes it’s better to take a break when emotions are heated, and to return to an argument later, especially if you’ve already been arguing for several hours.If you find that you’re going in circles and solving nothing, it’s probably a good time to take a break. Perhaps you can’t meet up again for two days, and you would rather get it all sorted now. That desire is totally normal, but it really won’t help either of you when you’re both too exhausted from arguing to even think clearly.  Chances are, if you’re worried about your girlfriend ignoring you, you want to keep the relationship. If it’s not a problem with your perception and it’s not something personal that she’s struggling with, and if she’s really just ignoring you because she’s mad at you, you need to consider whether you want to be in a relationship with someone who would rather hurt you than tell you why they’re upset.  

give her space.  ask yourself if she’s actually ignoring you.  consider that your girlfriend may be depressed.  avoid the temptation to ignore her back.  take care of yourself.  set a date to speak in person.  send an email or private message.  use empathetic body language.  express your thoughts and feelings using nonviolent communication.  ask her about herself.  ask her what she needs.  be an active listener.  come up with some possible solutions together.  don’t force a resolution.  understand that one of the resolutions might be to break up. 

 University and government websites often contain information about animal protection laws.   Michigan State University provides an excellent website that discusses United States marine law. This includes information on special animal protection acts such as the Marine Mammal Protection Act and Endangered Species Act. The National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration has a fantastic website containing a wealth of knowledge on maritime law. This organization works toward sustainable aquaculture. They are very active in research and reaching out to the community. The U.S. Fish and Wildlife Services (FWS) focuses on the protection of our environment. Their website provides insights into US laws and customs that are specifically designed to protect animals. They provide clearly-written overviews of laws as well as helpful educational materials like handouts. ; , Some countries have already put a stop to whaling. In 1986, the International Whaling Committee tried to conserve whaling species by passing specific laws and sanctions. Even U.S. President Obama passed sanctions on marine conservation in 2010. Know laws that are in progress. While certain laws have already been passed, you should be aware of what laws are in progress of being passed. You need to be aware of this situation so that you can better articulate your argument. This can help you focus how you might be able to help stop whaling. Whaling is part of a world-wide conversation. In 2014, the U.N. ordered Japan to stop whaling near Antarctica. As the whaling debate continues, more and more countries are taking action and passing laws to protect our marine mammals. , Unfortunately, not all websites on the internet are created equally. While you are searching for facts, look at reputable websites that have fact-based information. These types of websites include non-profit organizations and government sites. They frequently end with the URL .org or .gov.  

research whaling laws by reading government websites.  brush up current laws.  read reputable websites. 

,, Their backs are black; chests and lower jaw are white, along with a white patch positioned above and behind the eye. There are variable gray to white-colored saddle patches behind the dorsal fin. Residents have a variety of saddle patch pigmentations and five different patterns have been noticed. Transients have only two patterns that have been noticed. Dorsal Fin:Resident whales have long dorsal fins that are curved at the tip. Transient adult males' are elongated and very straight at the tip. Male dorsal fins can reach 6 feet (1.8 m) and are more elongated than females.The dorsal fin on females can reach 3–4 feet (0.9–1.2 m) long and are more curved than the male's fin, similar to the juvenile Orca.Size: (know the size of your boat beforehand to compare with whale size)        Males-The average length is 26–32 feet (7.9–9.8 m) and can weigh nearly 22,000 lbs.Females-The average length is up to 28 feet (8.5 m) and they can weigh up to 16,500 lbs.Tail: Orcas have lobes on their two-lobed tail that are called flukes. Take note to the shape of the tail and if any unique patterns or marks are visible. Here's a great site to help with tail identification.  Take notice to any scars or nicks you may see in their fins or unique markings. All of these things can help properly identify which whale it is.  Offshore: dorsal fins slightly rounded but tip differs slightly from Residents Atlantic (type A, B, C)  , Be careful not to confuse your Orca with a False Killer Whale  ,       http://www.nmfs.noaa.gov/pr/species/mammals/cetaceans/killerwhale.htm   Please report your sightings to the below sources. Some questions they may ask:       Number of animals seen? Where did you see them (latitude and longitude if possible)? When did you see them (date and time of day)? What were they doing? Playing? Feeding, on what? Were there any males (very large fin on their back)? Any unusual markings? Scars? Have you see killer whales in this area during winter months in previous years? Did you get pictures of any killer whales?    ,, 

take pictures of...  dorsal fin     saddle patch tail  ;  ,  take notes in journal or sketchbook  if you can't get a picture, sketch or note things like approximate size, behaviors, and markings, nicks, or scars on the dorsal fin or tail.  ,  use information for identification  colors and markings:orcas have very bold black-and-white coloring.  behaviors or unique markings:besides having one blowhole, they are also known for coming out of the water in a certain way that is called breaching or spyhopping.  look at orca types  five known types exist (depending upon geographical location)  resident: dorsal fins more rounded at tip, larger pods  transient: dorsal fins more erect and elongated, smaller pods.  caution!!,  identify an orca  there are several sites to help identify a specific whale using the information you've collected.  report sightings  bc cetacean sightings network http://wildwhales.org/sightings/  cascadia research http://www.cascadiaresearch.org/reporting_marine_mammal_sighting.htm  ,  have fun and enjoy the experience!  

 Get your message heard by writing to people of power. This includes your local government representatives. If you are US citizen, you can write to your state representative or even people in the national government. You may also contact organizations that are known for whaling. You can also write to organizations aimed at protecting whales to find out how you can help.  Your voice and signature can be a powerful tool to help pass laws. Check whale-saving organizations to see if they have active petitions to save whales. Singing a petition can help bring about the change of laws or the creation of new laws. If you are a US citizen, check out our national government’s page of open petitions. , There are fantastic and reputable whale-saving organizations that are constantly looking for active members. Organizations like World Wildlife Federation and Pacific Whale Foundation are active supporters always looking for new participants. They have membership opportunities so that you may directly or indirectly join. , To become directly involved, you can adopt a whale through the World Wildlife Federation (WWF). Your donation will go directly to help organizations protect the species. , If you want to help indirectly, you can donate money directly to organizations designed to stop whaling. Be careful and do your research before you give or send money. You want to make sure that you are not going to be scammed and your money is going to honest research.  If you are geographically in a place to do so, consider volunteering your time. You can help spread the word through events. You can pass out information flyers. You can even lead your own event! Get involved with a cause you care about.  Boycotting is a great way to show companies that you are serious about your protest. By not purchasing products, you are halting supply and demand. This is a great way to protest as it hurts the companies main motivation -- its revenue. You can also boycott companies that do not take a stand against whaling. For example, in 2008, a popular Japanese camera company was boycotted because of its public stance on whaling.  

write letters.  sign petitions.  join organizations.  adopt a whale.  donate money.  volunteer your time.  boycott products from companies involved in whaling. 

 If you feel strongly about this issue, a great way to help spread awareness is to get your loved ones involved. If your friends and family see how passionate you are about this topic, perhaps they will join you in your efforts.  There are often marches or active protests against whaling. If you are in an area where you can do so, consider joining a march or picket to demonstrate what you have learned about whaling.   , Go online or write about your concerns to a magazine or newspaper. The more you talk about this topic, the more your opinion will be heard. Start a conversation about stopping whaling, and get more involved.  

tell your friends.  join protests.  start or join a conversation. 

 Although Capuchins do make some vocalizations, they communicate largely through their body language. Learning their body language can be a great way to understand what your monkey is saying, allowing you to work with them to meet their needs. Looking for signs of distress can help avoid any serious issues such as an attack or aggression. Smiling is not a sign of happiness. Monkeys smile or show their teeth when they are scared. Jumping up and down or banging objects together can be a show of strength and intimidation. Your monkey will likely have it's own methods of expressing itself using body language. You will need to pay careful attention and learn what your monkey is trying to tell you.; , While body language is the main method that your Capuchin will use to communicate, your monkey will also use vocalizations. Learning what these vocalizations mean can help you to understand and work with your monkey to keep them happy and manage their behavior.Loud screams can indicate a bad mood. A kind of purring is used when Capuchins meet and are comfortable with each other. Your monkey may seek to make contact with you if you are out of sight with a “ik” or “fueh” sound. If your monkey feels alarmed they may make an "ik-a" or "i-tsch-g-k" sound. A sharp whistling can also indicate your monkey feels threatened. Your monkey may make sounds that are unique. You will need to pay careful attention to what your monkey might be trying to say when making noises.  Although Capuchins are highly intelligent they lack impulse control and can also become upset or scared easily. Learning the common causes of inappropriate behavior in your Capuchin can help you and your monkey avoid these situations and improve your relationship. Review some of the most common triggers for poor or dangerous behavior when working with a Capuchin monkey:Social status. Your monkey may feel insecure in their social standing or try to challenge your rank as “alpha”. Territory. Capuchin's may claim items or spaces as their own and will defend them. Fear. Monkeys can easily become frightened by loud noises or fast movements. Unfulfilled life. Monkeys need a large amount of space and lots of social interaction to be happy.  Although you may offer your monkey a good home, excellent care, and training they may still never behave as you want them to. Each monkey will have its own personality and it is impossible to predict or fully control the behavior of your monkey.You may need to build a permanent large shelter or cage for a monkey that is unsafe to be around. As monkeys age their behavior will also change. This is most obvious during puberty. While you can provide a great environment and care for your monkey, this is no guarantee that they will be safe to be around.  If you monkey is acting aggressive or fearful you should not demonstrate any fear yourself. If you show fear to your monkey it may cause them to get even more aggressive and agitated. Remain calm and resist any feelings of fear or discomfort that can result from your Capuchin's behavior.Always move slowly and confidently. If bitten or scratched, try to remain calm. Never react with quick or jerky movements even if your monkey is acting aggressively towards you.  If your monkey is behaving in a way that is dangerous or unacceptable you must work quickly to let them know that you don't approve of that behavior. The best way to let your monkey know that you are in charge is to issue a stern command that they stop any aggressive behavior.Issuing a simple command such as “No” or “Stop” is enough. Say your command quickly and clearly, speaking loudly without screaming the command.  If you monkey is unable to calm down or is not responding to your verbal commands it's time to put them in a time out. Placing them in their cage will keep both of you safe and can also help send a message that their behavior was unacceptable. Give your monkey a time out to manage poor or dangerous behavior.Place your monkey back in their cage if they are misbehaving. A time out will allow your monkey time to calm down or escape whatever was making them nervous or aggressive. A cage for your monkey should be around 7'x7'x4' to provide plenty of space for them.  Hitting or violently handling your Capuchin in an effort to get them to stop aggressive behavior will only destroy trust between you both. Your monkey will come to view you as a threat instead of a friend and may still continue to act in a dangerous fashion regardless. Use only verbal commands or temporary separation to train your monkey and maintain trust.Other options such as surgically removing the finger tips or canine teeth will not calm your monkey down or build trust. Hitting your monkey will only cause it to become more aggressive or fearful. Shock collars, confinement in a small cage, or other restraint won't help with behavioral issues.  With proper care and a good home your Capuchin monkey can live for up to 45 years. During this time your monkey will require constant care and attention. While a Capuchin monkey can be a great pet and companion you will need to be fully committed to caring for it over the course of its long life.Many Capuchin monkeys live for around thirty years. Your monkey will require a great deal of care and attention. Getting a Capuchin monkey as a pet will be a long term commitment.  Capuchin monkeys are social and intelligent animals. In the wild they normally live with a group of other monkeys and enjoy a complex social life. You will need to provide as much social interaction as possible for your monkey in order to give them a happy and fulfilling life in your care.Young monkeys will need almost constant contact with you. As monkeys age they will require less contact. However, you will still not be able to leave them alone for more than eight hours a day.  It was once thought that pet monkeys needed to be given a simple "pellet" based diet. Today it is understood that monkey's diets should be as varied and nutritious as our own. Try to feed you monkey a balanced and nutritious diet to keep them happy and healthy.Fruits such as mangos, pineapples, apples, pears, and grapes can be great parts of your monkey's diet. Carrots, cucumbers, and sweet corn are examples of some vegetables you can include in your monkey's diet. Boiled poultry and fish can be good sources of protein for your monkey. Trying to recreate the natural act of food scavenging can be a good way to make your monkey feel at home and get some activity. Hide some treats or put them in simple puzzles for your Capuchin to solve.  

learn your capuchin's body language.  learn what your capuchin's vocalizations mean.  discover what upsets your capuchin.  understand that your monkey may never “behave”.  don't show fear.  issue stern commands.  give your monkey time out.  do not hit your monkey.  prepare for a commitment.  provide plenty of attention.  feed your capuchin a proper diet. 

 Write a letter to your country’s representative on the International Whaling Commission (IWC). Visit the Humane Society International website. Then click the link to tell your IWC representative that you care about the fate of the world’s whales.Tell your IWC representative that you want the commission to close loopholes that allow Japan, Iceland, and Norway to continue killing whales.; , Sonar and seismic testing threaten whale populations in coastal areas. Much of this testing is done by oil and gas companies or by federal agencies, like the United States Navy. Urge your government to stop sonar and seismic testing.Try writing a letter to the National Marine Fisheries Service and urge them to protect whales from seismic and sonar testing.  One way to take direct action is by signing a petition to stop whaling in countries like Japan, Iceland, or Norway. You can add your name to a growing list of global citizens who oppose the continuation of whaling practices.You can find global and local petitions on websites like change.org.  One letter is powerful, but ten, twenty, or even a hundred letters can have a larger impact. Get together a group of friends, family, colleagues, or classmates and ask them to all write letters to governments representatives on a particular issue concerning whales.Try having a group of people work with the organization Save the Whales to send a flurry of letters to the Norwegian Embassy asking the Norwegian government to stop supporting the whaling industry.  It is important to inform others in your community about the threats faced by whale populations around the globe. Consider organizing a community event where attendees can learn about threats to whales like Japan’s black-market whale meat trade, the effects of climate change on whales, and government loopholes that allow whaling to continue.Try screening a movie, hosting a dance party, or facilitating a round table community conversation about whales. Consider taking donations at the event and giving them to an organization with an active anti-whaling campaign, like Greenpeace.  Warming oceans and diminishing sea ice are affecting whale habitats around the globe. Contact your government representatives and tell them to support international, national, and local efforts to curb carbon emissions and fight global warming., Japan is free to ignore the statutes of the International Whaling Commission, and thereby sets its own quotas and standards for whaling. Meat from Japan’s so-called “research whaling” is then packaged and sold on international markets. Avoid consuming whale meat or buying products made from whales. 

contact the international whaling commission.  speak out against seismic and sonar testing.  sign a petition to stop whaling.  organize a letter writing campaign.  host a community event.  support efforts to curb climate change.  avoid products that contain whale meat. 

 Capuchin monkeys originate from the jungles of Central and South America, where the climate tends to be warm. They live the majority of their lives in treetops, descending to the ground only for water.Think about the environment you can provide, and how closely it mimics their natural environment.; , Capuchins exhibit a 35-45 year lifespan in captivity.If you are adopting a Capuchin as a baby, be sure you can commit to caring for the monkey for the entirety of his lifespan. Your Capuchin can outlive you, so enact a care plan if that should occur.  Capuchin monkeys live in social groups of 10-30 other Capuchins. Within each social group is one dominant male, who acts as the leader.   Social class exists within Capuchin monkeys and affects everyday functioning of how the monkeys interact together. Class structure influences if monkeys will race to defend another or leave him be.Your Capuchin may become aggressive toward you or begin throwing feces. This may be a way he is testing social boundaries with you.  Capuchin monkeys reach sexual maturity by age 4 or 5. Full grown Capuchin monkeys weigh between 4-15 pounds, with larger males than females. Female menstrual cycles occur every 14 to 20 days. With sexual maturity, behavior or personality changes may occur. Adolescents that were docile and cuddly may become aggressive., Mothers give birth to one baby, with a gestation of 160 days. The baby will cling to the mother for about three months, at which point he may start to explore the environment on his own. After about 3 months, babies will start to take solid food, and are typically weaned by about 1 year of age.If receiving a baby Capuchin, do as much as you can to imitate the mothering. Capuchin babies rely heavily on their mothers for the beginning of their lives, never leaving their side. Let them cling to you and observe their surroundings while close to you. If the monkey seems scared or apprehensive, cuddle it. Introduce objects (and people) slowly and show that you are ok with them.  Especially if you have an infant, you will need to spend much time with your monkey, serving as her caretaker. Nothing can replace time and attention for your monkey, as Capuchins are highly social. Interact with your Capuchin, provide cuddles, and play with toys. Make all interactions highly enjoyable for your monkey. Stop immediately and redirect to another activity if your monkey is unhappy.  The bigger the enclosure, the better. It is best to provide an entire bedroom plus an outdoor section. The indoor section should be heated. You want your monkey to stay interested in the environment and not get bored.Be sure to include some shade when building an outdoor section.  Monkeys are inherently curious. Don't let monkey boredom lead to a missing monkey. Be extra cautious to secure doors or any openings which your Capuchin can use to escape. It is not overkill to create a double door structure.  Fill the habitat with items your monkey finds interesting. Include items such as branches, trees and bushes, platforms, swings, ponds, tires, ladders, unbreakable mirrors, baby toys and dog toys.   Use non-toxic plants and trees such as bamboo, rubber tree, willow, palm or hibiscus. Avoid American oak, cedar, mistletoe, and pencil trees as these can poison your monkey.  To avoid boredom, change the layout of the enclosure. Add new items or move items around. Buy new toys or rotate toys as to keep your monkey always interested and playing.  The floor should clean easily, such as a drop tray, peat, straw, or wood chips in smaller cages. Larger cages can have cement or linoleum floors.  Monkeys are known to throw their food, rip things up, and even fling their feces. They are not clean animals. Clean the monkey enclosure at least once each week.  While they may look goofy, many monkey parents use diapers to eliminate large messes with bodily fluids. Some monkeys will throw feces if they are annoyed, bored, or upset, so using diapers can reduce these messes. Some monkey parents choose to use baby diapers (with a hole cut for the tail), while others use rags or other at-home methods.Be aware that older monkeys may start refusing to wear diapers or take them off and smear feces. There is no sure-fire way to eliminate messes.  Many monkey parents allow the monkeys to run around their house, but make sure the house is completely secure first. Cover outlets and remove appliance cords. If your monkey contacts an electric current, it could kill your monkey. Look around and determine whether your monkey can damage any of your belongings. If so, remove them.   Lock all doors that the monkey is not allowed to enter. While monkeys are often fascinated with lamps, they can be dangerous. Remove any standing lamps that can fall over. Monkeys like to place items on top of the bulbs, which can start a fire. Your monkey is capable of unscrewing lightbulbs.  Your monkey can burn herself on the stove or injure herself with the knives. Lots of accidents can occur in the kitchen, and it's best to keep it off limits.  You don't want a confrontation, so move any dogs, cats, birds, or other pets while your monkey plays. Place them in a secured, locked room.  Specialized monkey food exists, which you can purchase from a specialty store or on-line. These foods provide proper nutrition to your monkey. Both wet and dry food is available for purchase. Use as directed.  Monkeys need to eat additional food outside of feed, such as fruits, nuts, and vegetables. Add mangos, carrots, and sweet potatoes every day at night. All foods should be cut up so that it can fit into your monkey's hands.Do not overfeed. Monkeys will tend to throw food or create a mess when provided too much food. Avoid feeding dairy, sweets, candies, or cereals as these are bad for Capuchins.  Treats do not have to be given every day. Consider a treat like raisins. Do not feed in excess of 1 teaspoon., Monkeys will need fresh water throughout the day. Especially if your monkey splashes or creates a mess, you will need to refill the water several times each day.  

note their natural environment.  understand the lifespan of a capuchin.  be clear on social behavior.  observe sexual maturity.  observe infant behavior.  prepare to spend a lot of time with your capuchin.  provide indoor and outdoor housing.  be cautious with habitat openings.  create a stimulating environment.  change the environment.  choose an indoor floor.  clean your monkey enclosure.  consider using diapers.  secure acceptable areas.  ensure the kitchen is completely off limits.  remove all other pets.  provide a commercial food.  supplement feed with fruits and vegetables.  provide occasional treats.  give fresh water every day. 

 Look up dolphin adoption to get a better idea of how your contribution can help. Adoption is generally conducted through wildlife organizations who use the donations to conduct research and fund programs to protect animals.Adoption usually includes updates about your dolphin, by mail or email. You can also adopt a dolphin as a gift for a friend or loved one.; , It is important to choose a reputable organization to go through to adopt a dolphin; try researching wildlife organizations to get a sense of what some of the more well-established groups are. Credible conservation groups and fundraising organizations will have a clear mission statement, state exactly how your contribution will be used, and offer proof that your contribution is tax deductible.Be sure to avoid any websites that seems suspicious or have multiple pop-up windows; these are not likely to belong to legitimate organizations.Some trusted organizations offering dolphin adoption include:  The World Wildlife FundThe Pacific Whale foundationThe Oceanic SocietyWhale and Dolphin Conservation (WDC)Dolphin Communication Project, Some organizations offer electronic kits when you adopt a dolphin, as opposed to print version kits. These packages may include material sent to you via email, video links, and photobook PDF downloads. You may also be provided with biographical information about your adopted dolphin in electronic format.Updates on your dolphin may be available via online field reports or social media., Most organizations offer print format adoption kits, which will be mailed to you. These packages may include an adoption certificate, a book or pamphlet with information about your dolphin, photographs of your dolphin, maps, or magazines.Some organizations also offer plush toys, tote bags, bumper stickers, or collector cards with the adoption. 

research adoption to see what it entails.  choose an organization for your adoption.  choose an electronic adoption kit.  choose a print format adoption kit. 

; ,   Blunt headed and only around 1.38m long, these guys stand out from other Cetacea. They are patterned with black, pale grey and white. The dorsal fin is small and round and bellies outward, uniquely to this NZ dolphin. Males and females are the same in appearance to all intents and purposes. Hector's Dolphins are rarely seen more than 10km from shore.  If you're in this kind of area and see a dolphin, you may have spotted a Hector's. , They are often curious and will check out stationary boats to see what's going on on-board. The Maori word for Hector's dolphin is Tupoupou.  

spot these dolphins virtually anywhere off the coast of the south island and off the west coast of the north island.  identify the major characteristics of hector's dolphins.  look for them in muddy, turbid waters such as can be found around estuaries.  realize that these dolphins aren't that acrobatic, they rarely leap out of the water, usually coming up to breath in a pretty calm, un-showy fashion.  ,  try spotting one near a boat. 

 You can run a Google search on different zoos and aquariums - not necessarily in your city but anywhere in the world - to see which have a clean record and treat their animals with care and respect, as much as a zoo or aquarium environment allows. If you feel that the dolphins at a zoo or aquarium are not being cared for properly, look for other options or adopt from a recognized wildlife organization instead.   If you live near a zoo or aquarium that offers dolphin adoption, you can also ask employees at the zoo or aquarium whether:  the dolphins are healthy the water condition is good the dolphins are being fed well the tanks are large enough to keep the dolphins happy and active    , Many zoos and aquariums offer adoption of their animals as a way to offset the costs of food and veterinary bills.Some packages may include an adoption certificate, photo, and/or a plush toy.Prices for these packages range widely and are generally tax-deductible.   Animals at zoos or aquariums might have more than one adoptive "parent" due to the popularity of the species., You can do this by visiting the zoo in person or by looking at the establishment's website. Usually, you'll be asked to choose the dolphin you like the most out of several, select a package, and then make a payment.  If you adopt a dolphin from a local zoo or aquarium, you have the bonus of being able to visit them in person whenever you want to check up on them. Seeing the subject of your donation up close can be rewarding; people tend to respond more to charitable causes that have one, clearly identifiable recipient.You can also introduce family and friends to your sponsored dolphin this way.  There is ample research to suggest that being in captivity is detrimental for dolphins and other cetaceans. Dolphins are highly intelligent, emotional creatures who live in complex societies in the wild, and travel and move regularly;in theory, no tank is big enough to accommodate dolphins, who swim up to 100 miles a day in the wild.Keep in mind that when adopting a dolphin from a zoo or aquarium, you may be inadvertently supporting animal captivity. Be comfortable with what your donation will be used for, be it research, education, or maintenance, and don't forget to check that the zoo or aquarium you're adopting from is legitimate, well-established, and treats its animals with as much dignity as possible.  

research various establishments.  look at dolphin adoption packages.  sign up for an adoption package.  visit your animal periodically to check in after adoption.  read up on dolphins in captivity before adopting. 

 As you may have guessed from the name, they are one of the commonest dolphins in New Zealand.  If the upper surface of the flippers is dark with the sides of the flipper being distinctly yellowish or with a beige tinge, it's a Common Dolphin.  If you can get a sense of scale, a fully grown Common Dolphin is about 2.6m.  These dolphins are active and playful, and they some times hang out with their cousins, the Dusky Dolphin.  These are called Aihe by Maori.  

understand that these are the dolphins you are most likely to see!,  look for their obvious beak.  notice the size.  look for their behaviour.  spot these grey and white guys anywhere around the coast of new zealand munching on squid and small fish. 

 These dolphins are smaller than the Common Dolphin. They only grow to 2m in length and have a two-tone dorsal fin. , These dolphins can be seen behaving boisterously, even for dolphins, all around New Zealand's coast except for the west coast of the North Island. They can perform spectacular somersaults and body slams. In Maori the Dusky Dolphin is called Papahau.  

easily distinguish a dusky dolphin by its short, stubby dark beak.  look for their most striking feature, a flame shaped marking on its dusky flank.  ,  check for acrobatics and a lot of play. 

 The National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration maintains a network of volunteers and professionals to respond in cases of stranding.Alert local law enforcement as well.Do your best to keep the crowds away.   Lifeguards might also be qualified to help a beached animal.Bring the situation to the attention of nearby lifeguards, if any are present. Contact the stranding network near you by searching the NOAA database at http://www.fisheries.noaa.gov/pr/health/report.htm.; , Marine animals can be dangerous for many reasons. Sharks and dolphins have sharp teeth which can easily hurt you. Dolphins and whales may thrash about unpredictably while beached, and their powerful tails and snouts may cause injury.Marine animals also carry diseases which can transfer to humans. For these reasons, you should always keep at least 150 feet away from beached animals unless specifically instructed to do otherwise by a trained professional.Do not allow children or pets near beached marine animals. This can add undue stress to the animal. If a trained professional requests your aid, remove watches and jewelry which might damage the animal’s skin before approaching., Slather the sunscreen across the skin of dolphins. Be careful not to get any in the blowhole. Zinc oxide can also be smeared around the blowhole of whales to keep it clear.Since dolphins and whales are not usually exposed directly to the sun for long periods, they will need the protective coating that zinc oxide provides. Do not apply suntan oil or other lotions to the animal.Do not use zinc oxide on sharks.  Splash water over its skin and apply wet t-shirts or towels to it. Do not cover the animal’s dorsal fin, pectoral flippers, or flukes. Cut a slit in a wet t-shirt and ease the fin, fluke, or flipper through the slit so that the fabric rests on the animal’s body, not the fin.   Wrap ice packs in a cloth or t-shirt and apply them to the fins and tail. Do not apply ice directly to the animal’s skin. Use an umbrella or tarp to keep the animal in shade. Do not get water in the blowhole., For instance, do not take pictures with a whale or dolphin.Dolphins and whales dehydrate quickly when out of water and should be returned as soon as possible. Spending time taking personal pictures or inviting others to pet the animal will minimize the time spent helping it, cause the animal to feel stressed, and put other people at risk.   Taking pictures of beached animals for scientific purposes is encouraged, but it should be done with care from a safe distance.Pictures of a beached animal’s location, tags, lesions, wounds, and other signs of human interaction like entangled fishing nets should be photographed.  Take a shower if you leaned against the animal with your body or legs.  

call for help.  approach with care.  apply zinc oxide-based sunscreen when possible.  keep the animal cool.  stay focused on helping the animal.  wash your hands after touching a marine animal.this will minimize the spread of illnesses from the animal to you. 

   Draw a bean-shaped elongated oval for the body. Make sure that you are using a pencil for the draft sketch so you can erase it afterwards to make it neat.; ,   Draw a circle at the one end of the bean, this will be the head. For the hind joints, draw two overlapping circles. One should be smaller because it’s for the hind leg that is not in full view from the angle. At around the chest part of the wolf, add a slightly elongated circle for the fore legs.    Draw a two pointed curves on top of the head for the ears. Unlike foxes, wolf ears are smaller. To work out the neck (or the scruff) just draw two slightly curved lines and connect both sides of the head to the bean-shaped body.    For the hind legs, start by drawing curved lines from the leg joint. The lines should bend outwards towards the tail part of the wolf. For the fore legs, you can just add 2 thick lowercase “l”. Since one of the wolf’s legs is hidden, only a small part of the other leg could be seen. For the muzzle, add a small letter “U” at the head.    For the eyes, just add two small tear-shaped figures above the muzzle. Finish the hind leg by adding a similar shape to the one you did earlier but this time, add some small paws at the end of the legs. The tail is hardly seen because it’s hidden behind the hind legs. Because of that, you can just add a long curvy line at the end of the bean-shaped body. You should have the basic drawing skeleton now.    Put in mind the overlapping lines and parts that should be hidden. Remember to use fuzzy-looking crooked lines to get the wolf’s furry look. The line art might not look perfect and crisp but it should look neat when the pencil is erased.    You can add details like the ears, eyes, mouth, nose, paws, claws and fur. You can also add extra lines to emphasize the paw and the fur.    Depending on the breed, wolves can go in different shades from gray to brown or even white.  

draw the body by drawing a really sloppy oval..  add joints and head.  finish the neck and add the ears.  add muzzle and legs.  add eyes and tail and finish the hind legs.  using a pen, draw on top of your sketch.  erase the pencil sketch and add details.  color your wolf. 

 Blowholes on whales and dolphins should be pointing straight up and out of the surf. Avoid getting water in the blowhole while rinsing the animal. Dig a pit beneath the animal’s body and fill it with water to reduce pressure on the lungs.You should also dig water-filled pits beneath the animal’s tail and flippers. Make sure fins and flipper are directed out and away from the animal in a natural way, not crushed beneath the body.  If the animal is not upright, and you feel confident enough to move it, get the help of one or two other people to assist you in gently turning the animal upright. Larger animals like whales might require four to six people to help turn it upright.Use caution when rolling an animal. If the animal is too big, do not risk overexertion by trying to right it.  Sharks, unlike whales and dolphins, need water in their mouths and gills to breathe.Pour a bucket of water slowly and steadily over the shark’s gills, and carefully pour some over the shark’s snout, allowing it to dribble into the shark’s mouth. Do not bring your hands too close to the shark’s mouth, as a bite can be deadly.  

keep the animal upright.  turn the animal upright.  pour water over sharks. 

 Problem animals are those which were sick, confused, or injured, and may have led others to become stranded as well. Returning problem animals that carry an illness could cause their podmates to become infected as well.Wait for marine experts to decide what to do with problem animals.   Some beached animals are brought to zoos or aquariums while being nursed back to health.  Dolphins and sharks have a greater chance of being returned to water, but the decision should be made by a qualified marine expert.  Dragging the animal might cause it serious injury. Instead, wait for expert help to arrive.Chances are that a beached animal ended up beached because it was ill, and should be given medical care before returning it to the sea.  

identify “problem” animals.  determine the possibility of returning a beached animal.once on land, and unsupported by the weightlessness of water, whales might crush their own internal organs and skeletons sperm whales and whales of even larger sizes are almost impossible to return to water.  do not drag or push a beached animal back to water. 

   Draw a bean-shaped elongated oval for the body. Make sure that you are using a pencil for the draft sketch so you can erase it afterwards to make it neat.    One oval should be bigger and longer and should point slanted upward. This is the wolf’s neck and head. The other oval should be drawn on the other end of the body. A long, thinner, vertical oval will be added for the tail.    Just beside the tail and at the base of the slanted oval, add two circles for the leg joint. For the muzzle, add a smaller oval pointing in the same direction as the neck/head oval. Add a tear-shaped figure below the muzzle this would be the jaw.    Because of the angle, only one ear is visible. And to draw this, just draw a small rounded triangle pointing the opposite direction as the muzzle. Add the legs by drawing lines below the leg joints. The hind leg should bend towards the tail.    Add similar lines to define the width of the wolf legs. The bottom part of the legs should look flat into the ground. Add another pair of legs behind the ones you drew before. Because they are only slightly visible from the view, just draw a small part of them, peeking behind the legs  ,   Add 2 pairs of circles at the end of the flat base of the legs. You should have the basic drawing skeleton now.    Put in mind the overlapping lines and parts that should be hidden. Remember to use fuzzy-looking crooked lines to get the wolf’s furry look. The line art might not look perfect and crisp but it should look neat when the pencil is erased.    You can add details like the ears, eyes, mouth, nose, paws, claws and fur. You can also add extra lines to emphasize the paw and the fur.    Depending on the breed, wolves can go in different shades from gray to brown or even white.  

draw the body by drawing a really sloppy oval..  add the 2 ovals.  draw the muzzle and joints.  add ear and legs.  complete the legs.  add paws.  using a pen, draw on top of your sketch.  erase the pencil sketch and add details.  color your wolf. 

 You can begin the sample procedure once dolphin is in position and fully relaxed, no tense flukes. Make sure that the entire blood sample kit is present with you. , Once sample spot is found, rub three times, in a circular motion, with an alcohol swab. ,,   Once the needle is inserted, pull back the top of the needle (plunger portion) to draw blood inside of the capsule. Once capsule is full, remove the needle and place the sample back into the kit. ,, After the procedure, tap twice with your hand on the dolphins’ fluke to signal the end of the sample taking and that the dolphin can return to its normal stationing position. If the procedure went well, reward the dolphin with reinforcement, i.e., food, toys, rub down, play, etc.  

prepare.  kneel down next to the trainer on the side that sample will be taken from.  ,  run a finger along the dark line in the fluke; this is the main blood vessel.  repeat swab procedure for a second time.  ,  get a needle with a capsule for the sample out from kit and insert the tip of the needle into the vein.  ,  draw the sample.  rub the injection site with a new alcohol swab to clean the area.  ,  stand up and walk away from the trainer and dolphin, with the entire blood sample kit.  ,  finish up. 

 A great way to help look after wolves, while raising awareness about the destruction of their natural environment, is to volunteer at a wolf sanctuary. Search online to see if there is one near you. You are more likely to find a local sanctuary if you live in a state that has wild wolves.Research the sanctuary and get in touch with them saying you’d like to volunteer. Volunteer roles can be competitive, so you will have to show why you are a good choice. Volunteering schemes can vary from evenings and weekends to placements where you are on site for a few weeks, perhaps over a whole summer. Volunteers in sanctuaries will generally do a wide-variety of things, such as cleaning out enclosures, feeding the animals, working in the gift shop, and conducting tours.; , If you would prefer to get out into the open country, there are a number of organisations that have volunteer programmes where you can do just that. Search for wolf preservation volunteering online and look for programmes that involve hiking or cycling in the country. You may camp and be asked to take photos of the environment, while acting as a positive spokesperson for wolves.You should understand that you are very unlikely to actually come into contact with any wolves. You will most likely be tasked with maintaining the environment, assisting with daily jobs, and talking to visitors about wolves.This is a great way to experience the outdoors, meet new people, and help to save wolves all at the same time.  Another way to volunteer is to help an organisation with their office work, as well as their campaigning, fundraising and outreach work. Search for the offices of wolf and wildlife charities that you could travel to, and contact them. Explain what motivates you, and what skills and experience you have that can help.   Volunteers are vital for many charities, so don’t be shy about getting in touch.Volunteering like this can also be great way to develop all sorts of skills and experiences that help you develop. It might not seem as exciting as being in a sanctuary or out in the country, but a successful campaign needs people in the office.  A great way to get involved in a movement to help protect wolves is to attend events and meetings that take place. There may be events locally that you can attend in order to hear people talking about the situation and what needs to be done. This is also a great way to meet people who know a lot about wolves and who can help you get more involved.   This may involve going to local Town Hall meetings, or other such events, and speaking up about the plight of wolves. If your state has a lot of pressing issues to do with wolves, you may find debates and listening sessions about relevant legislation and regulation that you can attend. Look on the websites of wolf charities for lists of upcoming events. 

volunteer at a wolf sanctuary.  volunteer in the wild.  help an organisation with their work.  attend an event or meeting. 

 Avoid being seen. If you see the wolf before it sees you, walk away silently. Stay vigilant. Remember: where there's one wolf, there are likely more wolves around. Wolves sometimes travel alone, but they almost always hunt in packs.; , Always maintain eye contact, and do not turn your back. If you try to escape, keep the wolves in front of you. If the wolves get behind you, their predatory instincts may kick in. Slowly back away while facing the pack.  Wolves are faster than you, especially when you're navigating the woods. Furthermore, running will cause a wolf's prey drive to kick in. If the wolves weren't chasing you before, there's a good chance that they'll start chasing you when you run.  Step towards the wolf, make noise, yell, and clap. Back away slowly. Keep acting aggressively, and keep making noise. Maintain eye contact with the wolf, and do not turn your back.Do not try to fight the wolves unless you have absolutely no other option. Wolves are strong and smart, with powerful jaws and a killer instinct. There's a chance that you'll be able to fend off a lone wolf, but you don't want to find yourself at odds with a group.Breathe deeply and try to keep calm. Wolves can sense your fear. If you panic, you risk freezing or running, thereby losing your ability to fight to save your life.  If the wolf attacks, fend it off with sticks, rocks, bear spray, air horns, or any weapon that you have.Find an easily-defensible position: stand with your back against a tree or a large rock. You don't want the wolves to get behind you.   Do not try to "hide in plain sight" or curl up into a fetal position. This will not stop a wolf from killing you. In most cases, an attacking wolf will only leave if you intimidate it and present a bigger threat than it is willing to chance.  If you do manage to drive off the wolf, get to safety calmly and quickly. Climb a tree, a boulder, or another high landscape feature. If possible, get inside a nearby car or building.Do not relax just yet. The wolf may be skulking near you or your campsite, awaiting another chance. If a wolf is particularly hungry, it may try to attack again.  If you are in a group that's being attacked by wolves, make sure to keep all children and injured people in the center. When wolves attack herds of prey, they target the weakest link: young, the old, and the sick. No matter what, do not break the group up. Make sure that you have a person watching in every direction so that the wolves can't outflank your group.  Wolves aim to find the weakest link in prey groups. They are viewing you all as prey. Children are the most likely to be targeted, as they are the smallest and the weakest. When wolves do attack humans, they attack children in an overwhelming majority of cases.This is how arctic wolves hunt musk oxen. They watch the herd from a distance, waiting for the flanks to open up when one of the adult oxen is distracted. They penetrate the interior of the herd to get to the weaker oxen within.  If you are hiking with your dog in wolf territory, keep the dog in your sight. Pick up its poop, keep it quiet, and try to keep it from peeing everywhere. All of these actions will attract wolves, and they will view you and your dog as intruders. Both wolves and dogs use urine and droppings—along with scratches from their claws and scent rolling—to mark their territory, and wolves may attack a dog that they feel is encroaching on their territory., If wolves are prowling around your camp, light a smoky fire to keep them at bay. Use green leaves and damp wood to make as much smoke as possible. When you have some smoking embers, move them near a tree, or disperse them between several trees. Apply sap or resin to the branches, and light them. Try to waft the smoke downwind toward the wolves.   Wolves dislike fire and smoke because it appears dangerous to them. If the wolves have pups around (which is likely in spring, when wolf pups are born), then the fire may cause them to move to another den site if the breeding female believes that that safety of her pups is being threatened.  Use branches, stones, sharp sticks, and other solid objects to create a barrier around your site. If well-constructed, this may keep wolves from getting in – but don't forget that they'll still be able to smell you and hear you.  Wolves howl to claim their territory, and they may interpret the noise as you claiming your territory. If you are in a group, sing and shout together. Be as loud and fierce as possible.   Avoid trying to imitate a wolf howl. This may draw the wolf to you. Lone wolves howl to locate the other members of their pack, and wolves have been known to come running when humans imitate wolf howls. 

avoid areas where wolves have been seen.  if the wolf sees you, back away slowly.  don't run away.  act aggressively and loudly if approached.  fight back.  stay alert.  band together.  keep a close eye on your dog.  build a fire.  create a defensive shelter.  make a lot of noise. 

 This will provide you with enough information about wolves to feel like you actually are one. Remember, you can never stop paying attention to them and catering to their needs.; , This can give you in-depth knowledge on wolves.  Do you have enough land for wolves (they want several square miles where they can exercise)? An adequate enclosure for them, to prevent climbing or digging out? An adequate source of food for them? It will be more or less challenging depending on these factors. So, find out what a wolf needs and how to provide it.  Remember that you will need to protect livestock and wild game, and avoid possible complaints and lawsuits. As wolves are renowned hunters, aggressive, and may often howl at night, you should check with your neighbours if they're okay with any ruckus the wolf may create before it has been trained.  They may not socialize well or consistently, and may become bored with a routine and stop doing any trained response. They are less likely to respond well to scolding or voice commands, but more likely to follow positive firmness, desired rewards and hand commands.  You need to be especially careful with any children who might enter your property; they are more likely to be unaware of "stranger-danger" by wolves unfamiliarity with "visitors/intruders", possibly seeing them as prey (fresh food).  Some countries require licenses and in others it is impossible to own one legally as an individual. Know your nation's and state's laws pertaining to wolves (such as laws on dangerous animals), and be a responsible citizen. Don't do anything without researching the law in your area, to avoid illegal activities.  This may be obvious, but if you aren't ready for a wolf or can't emotionally and physically control one (being in charge of a strong, aggressive, "tamed-wild" animal), then don't get it. Wolves need a lot of attention, exercise and companionship. Can you provide that and withstand the constant demand on your time, as more than a once in a while interest (realizing it is not a novelty for a month or a year, but a job for around fifteen years)? Depending on answering "yes" or "no", then your answer should be clear whether you can handle a wolf or not.  Ask them whether they're willing to keep a wolf at home. After all, you can't do all the care-taking work!  , Interacting with wolves first hand can give you invaluable experience on how to take care of them.  

research wolves a lot.  visit people who have wolves or wolf-dogs and interview them about owning the animals.  check your situation.  ask yourself if you can manage the neighbor's fear.  expect wolves to be different to train and be less reliable than dogs.  provide for safety of the public.  find out whether you need a license or not to own wolves.  know yourself.  ask your family.  visit a wolf shelter, if there is one near your house. 

 A wolf hybrid, also called a wolf-dog, is an exotic animal that is a mixture of a domesticated dog and a wild wolf. Most consider an animal a wolf hybrid if they have a pure wolf ancestor. This wolf should be at the most 5 generations back to be considered a wolf hybrid. However, consider why do you feel the need to own a wild animal in a domesticated setting.They are mostly considered companions instead of pets.   Low Content (LC) hybrids only contain 1-49% wolf content. Mid Content (MC) hybrids contain 50-74% wolf content. High Content (HC) hybrids are 75%+ wolf. HC hybrids are almost indistinguishable from a pure wolf. They may only contain 1-3 dog traits.While a LC hybrid won't act like a dog, they are better for someone new to wolf-dogs. They are more outgoing, easier to train, though they still have the wolf stubbornness and independence.; , Wolf ownership is not legal everywhere. In the United States, the legality of owning a wolf varies from state the state. Some states completely ban private ownership, some ban only certain exotic animals, others require a license, and others have no laws. Look up your state, region, or country's laws to make sure it is legal for you to own this type of animal.Some states allow up to 98% wolf; others draw the line at 75%, 25%, or "no first generation crosses".  Wolves and wolf hybrids are not cheap. They average around $1500 and can go over $2000.This is more expensive than most purebred dogs. Decide if that is the kind of money you would like to spend on an animal.   There is no way to prove the animal's pedigree. Experts at Wolfdog Rescue Resources, Inc. state that over half of the wolf hybrids being kept actually possess no wolf DNA. Other experts claim that the majority of wolf dog breeders are selling hybrids that actually are only dogs.When buying a wolf or wolf dog, make sure to get it checked out by an expert if at all possible. This can save you from dropping thousands of dollars on a fake.  Dogs have been bred to be submissive and to assist humans; they have been bred to be pets. This process has taken 10,000 years. Wolves, on the other hand, have spent the last 10,000 years being wild. Though people keep wolves as pets when they've raised them from a puppy, they are still instinctual animals that can't completely be tamed.Do not take a wolf from the wild. If you are interested in owning a wolf, do not get one from the wild. Instead, adopt one from a wolf sanctuary. Taking wolves out of the wild can be very dangerous and might end in injury or even death.  If you are still interested in owning a wolf or wolf hybrid, visit a wolf sanctuary. Many sanctuaries have both wolves and wolf dogs that you can observe. Before getting one of these exotic animals, talk to an expert at the sanctuary. They can help answer your questions, give you more information, and help you understand the responsibility that goes into owning a wolf or wolf dog.   Try finding wolf and wolf dog owners in your area. Contact them and arrange a meeting. They can be a valuable source of information since they own an exotic animal. Some of these sanctuaries rescue wolf hybrids and may let you adopt one from them.  You cannot get away with buying a wolf or wolf hybrid and hoping it will figure out how to be a good pet. Wolves are not dogs. They need a lot of training to become suitable as a companion, which takes a lot of time and effort on the owner's part.   These animals are cunning and extremely intelligent. They pose a much greater challenge than dogs. Some wolf hybrids are docile, while others are essentially wild. If you don't have the patience or time to train and care for the wolf, don't get one.If you have never owned and trained a dog, do not attempt to get a wolf or wolf hybrid. Many owners who aren't prepared for their wolf or wolf dog end up either dropping them off at sanctuaries, which are already overcrowded, or taking them to the animal shelter where they will likely be put to sleep. Letting them go into the wild almost guarantees they will die. Adopting a wolf then getting rid of it does irreparable harm to the wolf. Since they are pack animals, being split from their home and pack can cause the wolf to get extreme anxiety and even fall ill.  Wolves show affection differently than dogs. Sometimes this affection can be confused with aggression. Wolves greet each other with affection, but since they can't give hugs, they use their mouths. Wolves will chew on pack-mates' faces in greeting or as affection. Wolves may do this to people, too. Most of the time, the wolf will approach you, touch its nose to yours, and then lick your teeth. However, if you get scared and pull away, the wolf will grab your face with its teeth to bring you back so it can greet you and show its affection. Wolves love small children, but they might get excited, jump on them, and try to carry them with their teeth by the head or arm. This could cause injury to the child when the wolf was only showing affection.These demonstrations of affection can easily be confused for attacks.  Wolves like to roam, and they will hop fences, break off chains, and dig their way out of yards. This can be very dangerous, because the wolf might be mistaken for a wild wolf or coyote and be shot. Or it might kill neighbors' livestock or pets. Never let the wolf roam free.   LC and some MC wolves can exist in a normal fence without breaking free. MC and HC wolves are most likely to try to break free. They need 6-8 feet fencing, along with other security measures. The fence cannot have any footholds for the wolf to climb because they can climb out of fenced in enclosures.You also need to dig-proof the area you will keep the animal in. Some LC will break free while some HC will stay in the fence. It depends on how bad the animal wants to be free, how bored they are, and how much outside the fence excites them. A large fenced in enclosure is ideal. Wolves and wolf dogs need a lot of room to run and play.  Wolves are social, pack animals, so they require canine companionship. Just as important is socializing your wolf or wolf dog to people and places at a very young age. This starts training the wolf or wolf dog to be around people in a domesticated setting.   The wolf dog needs to be taken from its mother at 2 weeks old and bottle fed. They need to immediately start being socialized to both male and female humans so they will be used to humans for the rest of their life. Wolves need another canine for companionship and to meet their emotional needs. You need to place the wolves with another canine of the opposite sex around the same size. This ensures the wolf or wolf dog will not be lonely.  You have to be the Alpha of your wolf. When the animal is a puppy, start training them to submit on cue. This doesn't mean that the adult will always submit - wolves are very independent and self-assured. But the wolf or wolf dog will know you are the Alpha and the one in charge.   While training the pup, never hit, bite, shout, or pin or shake the puppy by the scruff. Wolf parents don't punish their pups for chewing and biting; they are very tolerant parents. Try to refrain from physically dominating the wolf, because this could damage the relationship., Wolves exist on a meat diet. Pure wolves and HC hybrids won't be able to exist on dry dog food. Most wolves and wolf hybrids eat 2-5 pounds of meat daily.   Venison is great for wolves. You can feed them fresh road-kill deer, but this requires a permit., Wolves can get very bored, which could result in them breaking free from their enclosure to find stimulation. Build things inside their enclosure area to keep them active, like platforms. Wolves need to be mentally stimulated on a regular basis.Make sure there are trees around and use old logs to hide treats inside. Another good idea is providing swimming areas, like water troughs, swimming pools, creeks, or ponds, for them to lay in and to dig inside. Sandboxes or dirt piles are great for them to dig in. Leash train them as pups so you can take them out on a leash. You should use two leashes when you walk them - one on the collar or harness, the other a slip leash. You should walk them every day., Most vets don't know how to care for wolves or wolf dogs. Many will even refuse to provide treatment on these types of canines.Make sure to find a vet who will care for your wolf before you purchase one.  

know what a wolf hybrid is.  investigate your local laws.  consider the price.  remember that wolves are not domesticated animals.  talk to an expert.  train the wolf.  know that affection might be confused with aggression.  build the proper living conditions.  socialize the wolf dog.  become the alpha.  feed them the right food.  provide entertainment for the wolves.  make sure you have available veterinarian care. 

 You can become an advocate for the protection of wolves simply by talking to people you know and convincing them that action needs to be taken to help save wolves. If you convince people you know to sign a petition, contact their political representatives, make a donation to a wildlife protection charity, or volunteer their time to help wolves, you have single-handedly made a difference.If you don’t have much spare money or time, just raising awareness amongst people you know and meet is a good way to take action. Be sure you know the facts and can make a strong argument before you start trying to get people on board.  A quick and easy way to show your support for the protection and preservation of wolves, is to sign an online petition. It is likely that there will be an active petition on one of the major online activism websites, such as Change.org or Addup.org. Search around online for petitions to help save wolves and sign up.If there is a specific threat to a wolf population, such as the Mexican Wolf, there may be specific petitions for this. If you can’t find a petition you can always start your own.  Social media has become a very popular way to try to raise awareness about causes, such as threats to wolves. If you have found an online petition or campaign you can support it by raising awareness through your social media accounts. Tweet, like and share information about campaigns to protect wolves to highlight the issues and encourage others to get involved.   Search for Facebook groups dedicated to promoting the protection of wolves and join them. Look at the social media presence of key charities and organisations that work to protect wolves and see what “clicktivism” you can do to help. You can use a hashtag to try to help an issue trend and receive more coverage. One popular hashtag is #savewolves.  You can become a lobbyist for the protection of wolves by contacting your local political representatives and asking them to highlight the plight of wolves, and support any relevant initiatives and legislation. You can find the names and contact details of your political representatives via the official government website: https://www.usa.gov/elected-officials   You can also get in touch with politicians in areas such as Minnesota where the wolf population is under threat., There are many parts of the world where wolf populations are in danger, and there is no reason why you should limit your advocacy to your home country. Online activism makes it easy to contact politicians all over the world and ask them to do all they call to help save wolves.   One example is the campaign to protect wolves in Lapland. You can add your name to a statement criticising this and send it online. 

talk to friends and family.  sign online petitions.  use social media to raise awareness.  contact your political representatives.  contact overseas politicians. 

 You can help to save wolves by supporting the work of national wildlife organisations and charities. There are number of campaign groups whose sole purpose is on protecting wolves and raising awareness of their plight. You will be able to find a number of these groups just by search for wolf protections charities, and “save the wolf.”You can choose to donate however much you can afford and are comfortable with. You may opt for a direct debit, or to join an organisation via annual subscription. Joining an organisation often means you receive news and updates on their campaigns, so it will be easier to keep track of the situation.  There are also plenty of international wildlife charities who you can donate to. Big groups like the World Wildlife Fund (WWF) have campaigns to protect wolves, so your donation can help make a difference. Research a few different organisations and choose the one most closely aligned to your views and priorities.   When you donate to a large wildlife charity, you won’t know what part of their work your money funds. You may not be directly contributing the protection of wolves, but you will be helping support a charity that has a voice and can achieve a lot for wildlife.  A fun way to donate to a campaign to save wolves is to adopt a wolf through an organisation, such as the WWF. The WWF have a wolf adoption scheme that you can participate in. You can choose different donation packages to “adopt a wolf.” Depending on how much you donate, $25, $55, $100 or $250, you will need a special wolf adoption pack.   The more you donate the more you get in your wolf gift pack. The $25 pack gets you a photo of a wolf, an adoption certificate, and a species card. If you donate more you will get a cuddly wolf toy, and your photo and certificate can be framed. 

donate to a wolf charity.  join an international wildlife charity.  adopt a wolf. 

 Use any available sources! Also, decide whether you want to research any kind of wolf, or just a specific breed, like a timber wolf or an Arctic wolf.; , A wolf's main prey is ungulates such as moose, deer, elk, etc. and things like musk oxen and bison. They are opportunistic feeders though, and will sometimes eat smaller prey, plant buds, berries, etc.  Wolves are normally social animals with strong bonds, courage and loyalty, although they are afraid of humans. They are not the bloodthirsty killer many think them to be. They do not kill without reason; if a wolf attack seems unprovoked, assume there are reasons only the wolf knew - such as the human was on its territory.   Every wolf is different, too, so some are submissive and others more dominant. It's just like with dogs: the temperament varies depending on the individual animal.  A wolf is born blind and deaf but with a strong sense of smell and the ability to crawl around, in a pack usually made up of two wolves and their other offspring.   As they grow their eyes open, and turn blue. Their eyes turn yellow, orange, or amber, or in rare cases turn green or stay blue, when they get older. When they are puppies they will drink their mother's milk as newborns then be weaned off of it to eat meat. When they are first weaned off of it they will eat half digested meat the adult pack members regurgitate. Then they move onto actual raw meat. For a few weeks the puppies play fight until they determine who is more dominant than the other (however, adult wolves still play with each other). To invite another wolf to play a wolf will use the same play bow motion as your average dog. They may also make "dancing" movements which are also used in courtship. Once they get older the pups will begin to follow the adults on a hunt, but not join in hunting. Then later they will join pack hunts. The ways a wolf pack hunts can vary. One method is to have several wolves chase the prey to where other wolves are hiding. Another method is to surround the prey and then close in on it until it notices the wolves, then charge at it. When the prey falls, before eating it, a wolf will do something called a jaw punch to ensure the prey is dead. It does this by walking towards the carcass, nudging it, and jumping back. If the prey doesn't move the wolves eat. The two parent wolves eat first. Some younger wolves may try to interrupt but if they do they are snarled and barked and and have to wait their turn. After a meal is over a wolf pack will cache the leftovers where they may return to eat them later. Also, a wolf pack will engage in group howling both before and after a hunt. Wolves do not actually howl at the moon but they do howl on lighter nights since those are better nights to hunt on. When landing after jumping their "toes" splay for balance and grip. They also have two methods of grooming themselves: licking themselves and nibbling the fur between their "toes". There is much more about wolf behavior though; it doesn't end there!  , Wolves, unlike dogs, bark rarely. They will, however, emit a soft bark or low "woof" sound to alert other pack members of danger sometimes. They will growl and snarl, with the hackles raised, fur bristled, lips curled and body tense to show aggression. They curl their tails between their legs with flattened fur and ears to show fear. Also, they will lower their ears and narrow their eyes to show suspicion and a head tilt for confusion. They have submission exactly like that of a dog: there is either active submission, where they roll over, curl their tail between their legs, flatten their fur and ears, whimper a lot, and avoid eye contact, or passive submission, where they curl their tail between their legs and lower their body very close to the ground. If a wolf ruffles its fur, stares at another wolf, raises its tail, and possibly growls, it is showing dominance. Just like dogs, wolves sniff each others' rumps to gather information. They do it in the same position too. In courtship a male wolf will "hug" a female wolf's neck, the two will dance around each other and put their muzzle on each others' muzzle, and lick and nuzzle a lot. They'll also sleep side by side and walk side by side, bumping their bodies against each other. Then when the time finally comes (wolves mate in winter since young elk are born in spring and so are their pups), the female approaches the male and tries to be very playful while the male stands still. Also, a puppy will lick, nudge, or nuzzle an adult's muzzle to ask for food. Research their anatomy, especially if you want to draw a realistic one. Wolves have feathery shoulder fur, a blocky muzzle and blocky paws, clumpy belly fur, rough leg fur, fluffy tails, rounded triangle shaped ears, circular eyes and dull claws. They usually have a pelt of black, brown, orange-ish color, grey, or white. (White is either an Arctic wolf or a very old timber wolf).  Try going to a place where they have captive wolves like Wolf Haven International. Some captive wolves are fed berries and bits of cheese, and taught tricks! Remember, though, captive wolves' behavior is very different from wild wolves. This is part of the reason that terms like "Alpha," "Beta," and "Omega" were debunked. , If you feel you don't have enough to be considered an expert, do a lot more research. 

start researching wolves.  research what they eat.  research their personality.  research their behavior.  research their "language".  research captive wolves.  do even more research for multiple years and do wolf related stuff in real life that allows you to interact with or at least see some wolves.  ,  test your knowledge.  you are now a wolf expert!  

 One of the biggest differences between jaguars and leopards is their physical size. Leopards are generally smaller than jaguars, though size discrepancies exist within each species.Jaguars can grow up to 6.25 feet long (1.9 meters). Adult jaguars can weigh up to 211 pounds (96 kilos) and stand 25 to 30 inches (76 centimeters) tall at the shoulders.Leopards can grow up to 6.3 feet (1.92 meters) in length and weigh up to 198 pounds (90 kg).Leopards are taller than jaguars, with adult leopards standing up to 31 inches (78.74 centimeters) tall at the shoulders.; , Another physical distinction between jaguars and leopards is the size of each animal's head. Jaguars typically have much larger heads than leopards, which makes sense given the overall body size difference between these two cats., The size and patterns on each animal's tail can be another distinguishing feature. The tail of a jaguar is typically shorter than the tail of a leopard. A jaguar's tail patterns are also unique: the rosette patterns on the tail may appear to "merge," forming a band around the tail., Though jaguars and leopards have very similar-looking coats, there are some noticeable differences between the two. Close examination of the patterns and coloration can often reveal which animal is which.While both animals have rosette patterns on their coats, a leopard's rosettes are solid. A jaguar's coat will have spots inside the rosettes, setting it apart from those of a leopard. The rosettes on a jaguar's coat are usually much larger, whereas a leopard's rosettes are typically very closely-spaced together.A jaguar's base coat color is usually a shade of yellow, but it can also be reddish-brown or even darker. The throat, outer legs, underbelly, and lower flanks are usually white (though they may have spots).Both animals can have an all-black coat, but a black leopard will still show a rosette pattern on its black coat. A black jaguar's coloration can also appear more like a mix of blue/black and purple. 

compare the body sizes of the two animals.  look at the size of each animal's head.  examine the tail of the animal.  examine the coat of each animal. 

 Leopards and jaguars are both skillful hunters, but leopards are the only known big cat that carries its dead prey into a tree. Leopards also climb/jump out of trees headfirst.If you witness the animal carry its prey into a tree, it is definitely a leopard. However, that doesn't necessarily mean that leopards will do this every time.  There is a distinct behavioral difference between leopards and jaguars when it comes to being in the water. Both jaguars and leopards are skilled swimmers, but jaguars will actively spend time in water, whereas leopards will generally try to avoid being in the water as much as possible., Both cats are strong, skillful predators. However, jaguars are typically more willing than leopards to fight a larger animal species. Leopards, by contrast, will usually run away from larger creatures like lions, anacondas, or even hyenas. 

check whether the animal carries prey into a tree.  observe how the animal behaves around water.  notice the way the animal fights other animals. 

 While physical and behavioral characteristics are the easiest ways to distinguish between a jaguar and a leopard, you can also identify the animal by its geographic location. These two big cats naturally live on opposite sides of the world, though of course some individuals may be kept in captivity in other regions.Jaguars live exclusively in North America, Central America, and South America, and may not be able to survive in a leopard's habitat. Leopards live in African and Asian countries, and may not be able to survive in a jaguar's habitat.  In addition to geographic location, it may also be helpful to know the animal's preferred environment. Jaguars are somewhat diverse in their habitat selection, though they typically inhabit rain forests, flooded wetlands, swamps, and dry grasslands., Though they live on different sides of the world, leopards and jaguars often reside in similar habitats. Leopards can inhabit a broad range of habitats, including woodlands, grasslands, mountains, deserts, and rainforests. The specific habitat a leopard inhabits depends largely on which continent it resides in. 

learn the geographic regions of each animal.  consider a jaguar's typical habitat.  know a leopard's typical habitat. 

 Animals can sense nervousness in humans. When handling animals of any kind, including guinea pigs, you need to remain calm and confident while around them.If you aren’t able to keep calm for any reason, wait to handle your guinea pig at a time when you are calm. Try talking to your guinea pigs so they aren't startled when you try to pick them up.; , There are two possible ways to place your right hand on your guinea pig’s body. The two methods are outlined here:Method 1 — Place your right hand on top of your guinea pig, across his shoulders. Place your right thumb behind your guinea pig’s front legs. And then place your right fingers in front and behind your guinea pig’s front legs (e.g. one or two fingers in front of his front leg, two to three fingers behind his front leg). Method 2 — Place your right hand under your guinea pig’s chest, near his front legs. Put your index finger in front of your guinea pig’s left front leg, and the rest of your fingers behind his left front leg. Use your index and second fingers like scissors to hold your guinea pig’s left leg still.  Your hand should be placed on your guinea pig gently but firmly and without applying any pressure. Squeezing your hand may cause your guinea pig to squirm, which in turn may cause him to injure himself., Once you’ve gripped your right hand around the front of your guinea pig, place your left hand behind his bum. Make sure you have his behind fully supported with your left hand., Lift your right hand up so your guinea pig’s front legs are off the ground. Then support the back end of your guinea pig with your left hand. Make sure your guinea pig’s back legs are always supported, do not allow them to dangle.If your guinea pig struggles when you pick him up, you may need to hold his back legs still with your left hand and fingers.  Once your guinea pig is off the ground, move your arms so that he’s close to your chest and body. Cuddle your guinea pig against your body while he’s off the ground and you’re moving around.Guinea pigs feel safe and comfortable when they’re either against your body or if they have their feet on the ground. 

approach your guinea pig calmly.  place your right hand around your guinea pig’s front end.  avoid squeezing your right hand.  put your left hand under your guinea pig’s bum.  lift up your guinea pig horizontally.  hold your guinea pig close to your body. 

 When first trying to pick up your guinea pig you need to gain his trust. Start by allowing your guinea pig to sniff your hand and fingers before you touch him. Use treats as incentive for your guinea pig to get closer to you and like you.Treats can include small pieces of fruit like oranges, plums, berries, grapes, bananas, watermelon, or cantaloupe. Treats can also include small pieces of vegetables like basil leaves, turnip greens, bell peppers, romaine lettuce, clover, cilantro, cucumber, tomatoes, celery, corn, dandelions, kale, and chard. The following food can be fed to your guinea pig as a treat, but no more than two times a week: parsley, carrots, and apples.  The best way to allow a guinea pig to build a bond with you is to hold him as often as you can. At a minimum you should hold your guinea pig at least once a day., Guinea pigs, unlike hamsters and gerbils, don’t usually bite when they’re scared. Instead, a guinea pig will squirm and struggle in your hands, hoping you’ll drop him or put him down.If your guinea pig struggles while you’re holding him, be careful not to squeeze him in an attempt to stop the squirming. If your guinea pig decides he wants to bite you, make sure your place your hands where he cannot reach them.  When you move to put your guinea pig back onto the floor, or into his cage, be aware that he may attempt to jump out of your hands. As jumping out of your hands could injure your guinea pig, a trick you may want to employ is to put your guinea pig down backwards.If your guinea pig can’t see where he’s going, he will be less likely to jump out of your hands.  When attempting to put your guinea pig back into his cage, do not release him from your hands until he stops squirming. Hold your guinea pig firmly, but gently, a few inches off the ground (or floor of the cage) and wait until he stops squirming. Once your guinea pig stops squirming, place his feet on the floor of his cage. Do not release him from your hands until he stops squirming., Even a guinea pig who likes to be held may eventually want to be put down. For example, your guinea pig may need to pee and want to go back into his cage. If your guinea pig starts to struggle and lick your hand, he may want to be put down.If your guinea pig starts to lick your hand, but then settles down again, he may be okay. But if he continues to lick your hand and struggle, you should probably put him back in his cage. On average a guinea pig may only want to be held for 10-20 minutes at a time. If you hold your guinea pig for too long, it is possible he’ll pee or poop on you! You may want to hold your guinea pig on your lap, on top of a towel, in case of an accident.  

use treats to entice your guinea pig to like you.  handle your guinea pig often.  be careful when your guinea pig struggles.  put your guinea pig into his cage backwards.  wait to release your guinea pig when he stops squirming.  do not hold your guinea pig too long. 

 Wire flooring is not good for your guinea pig’s tiny feet. This type of flooring could easily damage his foot pads, increasing his risk of developing foot sores.Smooth flooring would protect your guinea pig’s feet and help prevent foot sores. If your guinea pig’s current cage has wire flooring, switch to a cage with smooth flooring.; , Your guinea pig needs space to run and play. Since exercise can prevent foot sores, make sure his cage gives him plenty of space to run around. If you have 1 guinea pig, his cage should be 42 x 24 x 18 inches (106 x 61 cm x 46cm).If you have multiple guinea pigs, you will need an even bigger cage so each guinea pig has space to exercise.   The staff at your local pet store can help you decide what size cage you will need.  Rough bedding can leave cuts and scrapes in your guinea pig’s foot pads. To prevent him from getting foot sores, use cage bedding that is soft, thick, and dry.Examples of ideal bedding are fleece and CareFRESH®.Place about 2 to 3 inches of bedding in the bottom of the cage.Bedding types to avoid are cedar pine shavings, corn cob bedding, and straw.Replace the bedding when it becomes wet and dirty. Clean, dry bedding will help prevent foot sores.  Good air flow can keep your guinea pig’s cage from getting humid and damp. Fresh air can also prevent the cage bedding from getting wet. The drier his cage, the less likely he’ll get foot sores. Place his cage in a draft-free area where there is good air flow.If the cage has solid sides, cover the cage top with a wire mesh lid to allow for good air flow., A clean cage is important for preventing foot sores. Each day, do a quick spot clean to remove excess food, clean up urine and feces, and replace wet and dirty bedding. You should also clean and refill his water and food bowls each day.   Change his bedding completely at least once a week.Do a thorough cage cleaning once a week. Remove all bedding and accessories from the cage and clean the cage with hot, soapy water. Rinse the cage and allow it to dry completely before placing everything (and your guinea pig) back in.A dirty cage can have a buildup of a bacteria that could infect your guinea pig’s footpads., The more often you look at your guinea pig’s feet, the sooner you will notice if his feet need to be treated. Look at his feet each day. His foot pads should be smooth and light pink.If you notice anything abnormal (e.g., cuts, scrapes, swelling), contact your vet. Your vet may need to treat your guinea pig’s feet with an antibiotic ointment.   Your vet may recommend some products you can use at home to treat minor cuts and scrapes on the foot pads. Check your guinea pig’s feet during a time when you would normally handle him.  Long nails can curve around and under your guinea pig’s feet, making walking difficult.If the nails are too long on one foot, your guinea pig will start putting pressure on another foot; that foot will then develop foot sores.Trimming your guinea pig’s nails will help prevent foot sores.   If you’re not comfortable trimming the nails, ask your vet to do so.  Since guinea pigs cannot produce their own vitamin C, they need to get it from their diet. Vitamin C-rich foods include bell peppers, parsley, and kale.Guinea pig pellets usually contain vitamin C. However, after about 3 months, the vitamin C in the pellets loses its strength.Try not to feed your guinea pig pellets that are more than 3 months old. Vitamin C supplements are available for guinea pigs. However, do not add vitamin C to water—much of the vitamin’s strength will be lost in a day, and you will not be able to tell how much your guinea pig is actually getting.Your vet can determine if your guinea pig has a vitamin C deficiency and provide suggestions on how to correct it.  Obesity can cause foot sores in guinea pigs by putting too much weight and pressure on the feet.If you can keep your guinea pig at a healthy weight, you can prevent him from getting foot sores. Your vet can determine if your guinea pig is overweight and what his weight should be.   At home, you can weigh your guinea pig with a kitchen scale. Weigh him on a weekly basis.Increased exercise and dietary changes can help a guinea pig lose weight, if necessary. Obesity in guinea pigs is not very common. Before changing your guinea pig’s diet or increasing his exercise, have your vet confirm that obesity caused the foot sores., Exercising will prevent foot sores by keeping your guinea pig at a healthy weight. Place an exercise wheel with solid flooring in his cage; the solid flooring will prevent foot injuries. You can also put his sleeping area, food bowl, and water bowls in different locations to encourage him to move around more.Little toy balls, food toys (e.g., piece of produce in a brown paper bag), and chewing items (e.g., timothy hay, untreated apple branches) can also motivate your guinea pig to exercise. 

choose a cage with smooth flooring.  select a large cage for your guinea pig.  place soft, comfortable bedding in the cage.  make sure the cage gets fresh air.  clean your guinea pig’s cage.  check your guinea pig’s feet daily.  trim your guinea pig’s nails.  feed your guinea pig a diet high in vitamin c. too little vitamin c can cause foot sores in guinea pigs.a healthy diet with enough vitamin c will help keep your guinea pig’s feet healthy and free of sores.  monitor your guinea pig’s weight.  encourage your guinea pig to exercise. 

 Boars are male guinea pigs. If a female guinea pig has been in the presence of a boar, then she will have almost certainly tried to mate and has a high chance of becoming pregnant.   Male guinea pigs can impregnate a female at as young as 3 weeks old and a female guinea pig can become pregnant at as young as 4 weeks old, so don't be doubtful if your guinea pig is pregnant due to age.; , A pregnant sow will begin to drink and eat more as the pregnancy advances. She may eat up to triple the amount she usually consumes. She may also drink more water than normal. Keep in mind that "normal" is relative to your guinea pig's usual habits.   However, do not assume that your guinea pig is pregnant based on just how much she is eating or drinking. All animals, for example, tend to eat more when it's cold, when they're having a growth spurt, and when they're suffering from certain illnesses., A female guinea pig's weight will increase significantly if she's pregnant. Guinea pigs typically weigh about 1.5-2 lbs.In general, by the end of a pregnancy, the pregnant guinea pig's weight will have doubled; the piglets usually make up more than half of the sow's weight.   A good idea is to weigh your female guinea pig regularly (perhaps weekly) and to record the weight. This way you can keep track of her weight in order to determine any patterns of weight gain that may be indicative of a pregnancy. However, if your sow is not yet mature and is less than 6-8 months of age, she will still be growing and thus weight gain may not be indicative of pregnancy.  If you feel your guinea pig's womb very carefully, you may be able to detect the fetuses if she is pregnant. Usually, you can identify the fetuses in her womb from around 2 weeks after mating. Treat the sow with care and never handle her roughly. When feeling your guinea pig's abdomen, never apply pressure or squeeze the area since this could harm both the piglets and the sow.To feel for fetuses, place the sow on a towel on a firm surface. This will keep your guinea pig from slipping. With your non-dominant hand hold her steady around the shoulders, with her head facing away from you. Use your dominant hand to feel her belly. Begin by making a "C" shape with your thumb and first finger, and then sliding the thumb over the top of her tummy and the forefinger underneath her belly. Gently press inwards and see if you feel any lumps or bumps inside her tummy. If pregnant, your guinea pig may have a single piglet or up to 3-4. If several fetuses are present, you will feel several bumps spaced across her tummy, each of a similar size. However, be aware that other things can feel like bumps in the abdomen. The kidney, bladder, or even fecal pellets can all be easily mistaken for fetuses. Bumps can also indicate ovarian cysts or tumors. If you feel something and you're not certain what it is, then consult your veterinarian.  

consider whether your guinea pig was in the presence of a boar.  observe her eating habits.  check her weight.  feel for piglets. 

 If you suspect that your guinea pig is pregnant, then it's imperative that you consult a vet. You will not be able to tell for sure until the guinea pig is examined and assessed by a skilled veterinary professional.   If you need to transport your guinea pig, never pick her up by her stomach as it can harm the unborn guinea pigs and the mother herself. You'll need to encourage her into a transport cage through treats or her favourite vegetables/fruit.  A veterinarian will be able to feel around your guinea pig's stomach and differentiate between the different lumps and bumps, something that you may not be able to do effectively on your own. Your vet should be able to tell whether or not your guinea pig is pregnant through a physical examination, but may also recommend additional testing, such as an ultrasound (see below).You vet may also be able to hear the piglets' heartbeats in the sow's abdomen., An ultrasound scan is the gold standard for pregnancy diagnosis among guinea pigs. Unlike in other species, the stress of taking blood can adversely affect the health of pregnant guinea pigs. Moreover, there is no commercial pregnancy test available for guinea pigs.An ultrasound scan can visualize exactly what the bumps are and confirm a pregnancy. The ultrasound exam involves involves clipping a small square of fur and applying gel to the exposed skin. Then, the ultrasound probe is placed on skin and emits a high-frequency sound that is inaudible to human ears. The probe records the echoes as the sound waves bounce back in order to determine the size, shape, and consistency of internal tissues and organs. This information is then translated into an image. In other words, you will be provided with a visual of your guinea pig's abdomen and the doctor can then confirm or disconfirm a pregnancy. Ultrasounds are non-invasive and do not require sedation.  If the vet confirms that your pig pregnant, then it is important that you make sure you know how to properly care for her. A pregnancy puts stress on the sow's organs and circulation system. Moreover, any rodent that is pregnant carries a one in five chance of dying as a direct result of complications during or after pregnancy or birth. 

make an appointment with your vet.  have your vet do a physical examination.  have your vet do an ultrasound.  ask for advice in caring for guinea pig if she is pregnant. 

 In many cases, you can allow the pregnancy to proceed normally, but make sure you have a vet on hand in case there are complications, which are more likely if your pig is older or younger or has not given birth previously.Try to find a vet who specializes in rodents and other small animals, rather than just a generic vet.  If you have multiple sows, remove the male pig immediately to prevent others from becoming pregnant. Even if this is the only sow you own, you should still remove the male pig before she reaches 60 days in her pregnancy. It is best to house the male in an adjacent cage where he can still be close to the female. A male guinea pig who can not see or hear his mate may develop stress, making him susceptible to illness.   Male guinea pigs will continue to mount pregnant sows, which can cause stress or pain to your pregnant sow late in the pregnancy (after the 50-day mark). She could also become pregnancy just two hours after she gives birth.  You'll want to make sure your pig is getting sufficient food, water, and nutrients since these things are also helping the fetuses develop.   Feed your guinea pig alfalfa hay instead of timothy hay so that she gets more protein and calcium. Your pregnant sow will also need more vitamin C after 4 weeks, about twice as much, so incorporate more fresh fruits and vegetables high in vitamin C into her diet. In addition, you may want to increase your guinea pig's fiber intake. Increased fiber intake can prevent hair thinning, which is common in the last stage of pregnancy.  You should weigh your guinea pig twice a week to make sure that is gaining weight (and not losing it) and is generally healthy (e.g., eating all her food, still social and interactive, etc.) and check she's healthy.   If at any point her weight begins to fall or if she begins to show signs of illness, consult a vet immediately.  Try to make your guinea pig's life follow a routine so as to minimize stress, which can aggravate the dangers that accompany guinea pig pregnancy.   Avoid making changes to a pregnant sow's cage, like removing toys or putting the cage in a totally new location. This could increase her stress and affect her eating and drinking habits.Reduce her exposure to loud noises or bright lights, including direct sunlight. Reduce handling to a minimum and don't handle her within two weeks of the birth. Note that the gestation period is usually 66 - 72 days. 

have the information of a vet.  remove any male guinea pigs.  make sure your guinea pig has enough food and water.  weigh your pregnant sow regularly.  minimize your guinea pig's stress. 

 When your guinea pig is healthy, his breathing will be quiet and easy. However, respiratory problems can make it hard for him to breathe. Your guinea pig may start wheezing. In addition, you may hear clicking or rattling noises when he breathes., A respiratory problem can cause your guinea pig’s eyes and nose to produce discharge.If the discharge is green or yellow, your guinea pig could have a bacterial respiratory infection. A respiratory infection could also cause your guinea pig’s conjunctiva, the inner part of your guinea pig’s eyelids, to become red.Allergies, another type of respiratory problem, can make your guinea pig’s nose red and sore from a lot of itching and scratching., A respiratory problem can make your guinea pig feel pretty sick and not in the mood to eat. He may eat less, or not at all.When you feed him, observe how much he eats.   With a reduced appetite, your guinea pig will lose weight.A lack of vitamin C is one possible cause of respiratory problems in guinea pigs.If your guinea pig is not eating much because he feels sick, he may not be getting enough vitamin C, which could make him feel even worse.  Although your guinea pig may have obvious symptoms of a respiratory problem, your vet will need to determine the exact cause of the illness and how serious it is. To do this, they will perform a physical exam that will include listening to your guinea pig’s lungs. Your vet will also take samples (e.g., nasal swab, discharge from the eyes or nose) to identify the specific bacteria causing the respiratory infection.Chest x-rays can also help your vet diagnose your guinea pig’s respiratory problem. Chest x-rays will show whether your guinea pig has pneumonia.Dental disease can cause respiratory problems in guinea pig because the roots of the cheek teeth (premolars and molars) are so close to the nasal passages. If your guinea pig has dental disease, skull x-rays will help your vet see the extent of the disease., If left untreated, your guinea pig’s respiratory problem could make him extremely sick. For example, if he has a cold, it could quickly progress to pneumonia, which may be difficult for him to recover from. The sooner you get him treated, the better his chances of a good recovery.  If your guinea pig is extremely sick (e.g., very labored breathing, inability to eat, very weak), your vet will likely want to hospitalize him for intense treatment. In-hospital treatments include assisted feeding, injectable medications, and extra oxygen.Your vet will want to hospitalize your guinea pig until he is strong and stable enough for at-home care.   If your guinea pig has severe breathing troubles, your vet may also humidify the oxygen your guinea pig is receiving.Your vet may give your guinea pig an oral or injectable multivitamin in the hospital if he is extremely weak.Injectable medications usually work faster than oral medications.  If dental disease caused your guinea pig’s respiratory problems, then your vet will need to treat it at the hospital. Your vet will need to anesthetize him and use specialized dental tools to work on his teeth.After surgery, your vet may prescribe a pain medication for your guinea pig.  Two types of bacteria — Bordetella bronchiseptica and Streptococcus pneumoniae — are the primary causes of respiratory infections in guinea pigs.Your vet will use diagnostic test results to select which antibiotic will effectively treat your guinea pig’s respiratory problem. Follow your vet’s instructions carefully to ensure all the bacteria is killed.   The medication may come in liquid or pill form. If the antibiotic comes in liquid form, you can use a medicine dropper to put the prescribed number of drops into the corner of your guinea pig’s mouth. If he resists that, you could place the drops on his favorite food.To give your guinea pig a pill, place the pill back by your guinea pig’s molars so he won’t be able to easily spit it back out. Consider putting the pill in a hemostat (clamps that look like scissors) to place and then release the pill in his mouth.Hemostats are available at your local drug store. Contact your vet if you are having trouble giving your guinea pig the antibiotics.  Some antibiotics can cause diarrhea in guinea pigs by killing the healthy bacteria in the digestive tract.If your guinea pig develops diarrhea from the antibiotics, stop giving them immediately and contact your vet. Your guinea pig will probably need to be treated with a different antibiotic.  Once your guinea pig has been treated for a respiratory problem, you won’t want him to get another one. Keeping his cage clean is one of the best ways to prevent a future respiratory problem. Clean his cage twice a week.To give your guinea pig’s cage a thorough cleaning, remove all cage accessories and discard the bedding. Wash the cage with hot, soapy water. Rinse the cage and let it dry completely.Each day, remove leftover food, feces, and dirty bedding.  Proper bedding can also prevent respiratory infections in guinea pigs. Dust-free bedding will not irritate your guinea pig’s nose. Examples of dust-free beddings are CareFRESH® and fleece.Do not use cedar or pine shavings. These shavings contain oils that can be very irritating to a guinea pig’s respiratory tract.Replace the bedding whenever it becomes soiled or wet. Damp bedding can become moldy and increase your guinea pig's chances of getting sick., Adequate air circulation is important in preventing respiratory problems in guinea pigs. A wire cage would provide more ventilation than a solid glass cage.Make sure the cage is not in the direct path of a vent or draft — a constant draft of cool air could make your guinea pig sick., If you have multiple guinea pigs, they should be in a cage large enough to house all of them comfortably. If the cage is too small, your guinea pigs could develop respiratory infections from the stress of overcrowding.The stress would weaken their immune systems and make them susceptible to infection.   If you have 2 guinea pigs, their cage should be at least 30 inches x 50 inches (76 cm x 127 cm)., Rabbits can harbor Bordatella in their bodies and pass it on to guinea pigs. In addition, a rabbit can bully a guinea pig, causing the guinea pig stress if it cannot find a safe place to get away. To prevent a respiratory infection, house your rabbits and guinea pigs in different cages.The stress from bullying could cause a respiratory problem by weakening your guinea pig’s immune system.  Adequate amounts of vitamin C are essential to preventing respiratory problems in guinea pigs. Guinea pigs cannot produce vitamin C in their bodies, so they must get this nutrient from food. Examples of vitamin C-rich foods are broccoli, parsley, green peppers, and mustard greens.Vitamin C dietary supplements are also available. Talk to your vet before giving your guinea pig a supplement. Your guinea pig should receive 50 mg of vitamin C per day.Your vet can help you ensure that your guinea pig receives enough daily vitamin C.  

determine if your guinea pig has trouble breathing.  look at your guinea pig’s eyes and nose.  take note of your guinea pig’s appetite.  have your vet diagnose your guinea pig.  treat your guinea pig immediately.  hospitalize your guinea pig, if necessary.  have your vet correct your guinea pig’s dental problems.  give your guinea pig antibiotics.  monitor your guinea pig.  clean your guinea pig’s cage regularly.  use proper bedding in your guinea pig’s cage.  keep your guinea pig’s cage well ventilated.  do not overcrowd your guinea pig’s cage.  do not house rabbits and guinea pigs together.  add vitamin c to your guinea pig’s diet. 

 Lumps on guinea pigs often require veterinary treatment. Frequently, treatment involves surgical removal of the lump.If the lump is infected, your guinea pig would need antibiotics to prevent the spread of infection after surgery.   Do not try to treat a lump on your own.; , Removing a guinea pig’s lump can be challenging. If the lump is infected, surgically removing it could release bacteria into the bloodstream, causing a serious condition called septicemia.Also, the pus within a guinea pig abscess has a thick, cheese-like consistency, making the typical abscess treatment—lancing and draining—ineffective in many cases.Lancing an abscess involves cutting it open with a sharp instrument.   Sometimes, abscesses can form finger-like extensions and extend into nearby tissues, making complete removal difficult.Mouth abscesses are very challenging to treat because of their location. They can swell and block the throat. In addition, if the abscess breaks open, the pus could fatally choke a guinea pig.Removing a cyst may be challenging as well, since the fluid inside of it may contain bacteria.  If your guinea pig can undergo surgery, your vet will anesthetize your guinea pig and remove the lump. In most cases, a guinea pig can go home on the same day of surgery. However, if your guinea pig has a mouth abscess, your vet may want to hospitalize your guinea pig because of the potential for serious health problems.For an abscess, complete removal is very important. If the removal is incomplete, the abscess could come back.Surgical removal of a skin tumor is curative, meaning that no other treatment is needed to treat the tumor., Lancing may be a good option for mouth or jaw abscesses. After anesthetizing your guinea pig, your vet would first cut open the abscess and drain the fluid with a surgical drain. Next, they would flush the empty abscess with an antiseptic solution. Then, your vet may pack the empty abscess with antibiotic beads. Be aware that this treatment option makes it more likely for an abscess to come back.Flushing the abscess means to fill it with a liquid solution (the antiseptic), then suction the liquid back out. Your vet may have to flush the abscess several times to make sure all of the pus is out. The antibiotic beads would be effective for 2‒6 months., Not all abscesses require surgical removal. If your guinea pig’s abscess is less than 1 cm in diameter, your vet could inject antibiotics directly into the abscess. Your vet would inject the antibiotic into the abscess’s wall. Alternatively, your vet may want to flush the abscess periodically, rather than removing it.Flushing the abscess periodically will help prevent the abscess from causing problems. Your vet will let you know how often the abscess should be flushed.  When you bring your guinea pig home after surgery, let it recover in a calm, quiet area.Place your guinea pig’s cage in an area that does not get a lot of foot traffic from you or other members of your household. If you have other guinea pigs, keep them in a separate cage from the sick guinea pig.  If the surgically-removed lump was an abscess or infected cyst, your guinea pig will need antibiotics to prevent post-surgical infection.Because certain antibiotics can make guinea pigs extremely sick, your vet will prescribe a guinea pig-safe antibiotic. Do not purchase antibiotics at a pet store; they may not be safe for your guinea pig.Guinea pigs typically need at least one round of antibiotics following surgical removal of an abscess.Your vet will determine how long your guinea pig will need antibiotic treatment. To give the antibiotic pill, hold your guinea pig, open its mouth, and put the pill as far back in the mouth as you can. If you can place the pill near the molars, your guinea pig will not be able to spit it back out easily.Give the full course of antibiotics. Do not stop the antibiotic treatment when your guinea pig starts looking and feeling better. This could lead to the growth of antibiotic-resistant bacteria.  After surgery, keep the incision site clean and free of dirt and debris.To clean the incision site, use a clean, slightly damp towel and gently dab around the incision. That area may be a little painful for your guinea pig, so you do not want to use too much pressure.   Examine the incision site for signs of infection: redness, swelling, discharge. If the incision site looks abnormal, take your guinea pig to your vet for treatment.  Your vet may want to see your guinea pig again after surgery to monitor its recovery. During this follow-up appointment, your vet will examine the incision area, remove sutures (if necessary), and generally assess how your guinea pig is doing.  You will not be able to prevent tumors, but you can prevent abscesses and cysts. Because abscesses and cysts form after a puncture wound, remove anything sharp or rough from your guinea pig’s cage. For example, straw bedding can pierce a guinea pig’s skin.Instead of straw bedding, use paper bedding like CareFresh® or Yesterday’s News cat litter.If any of your guinea pig’s toys have sharp edges, take those out as well. Ideal toys for a guinea pig cage are empty toilet paper or paper towel rolls, since they are soft and smooth. Make sure your guinea pig’s food does not have any sharp edges that could damage his gums.  If you house several guinea pigs together, separate them if they fight or bully each other.When they bite each other, that bite wound can become infected and form an abscess or cyst.  Malocclusion (improper teeth alignment) is a common dental problem in guinea pigs.If the teeth do not line up properly, they can overgrow and puncture the inside of the mouth. This puncture wound can lead to abscess or cyst. If your guinea pig’s teeth are misaligned, take your guinea pig to your vet for treatment.   Correcting dental problems in guinea pigs requires surgery. Your vet will use specialized dental instruments to trim and realign the teeth.  

seek veterinary treatment.  discuss treatment challenges.  allow your vet to surgically remove the lump.  have your vet lance and drain the abscess.  allow your vet to inject the abscess with antibiotics.  place your guinea pig in a quiet environment.  give your guinea pig antibiotics.  clean the affected area.  schedule a follow-up appointment.  remove sharp objects from the cage.  separate fighting cage mates.  correct dental problems. 

 If your guinea pig does not have enough room to move about, it will be unhappy, stressed, and might hurt itself. To avoid this, ensure that your guinea pig can exercise and move freely in its cage. Your guinea pig should be housed in a space that allows it to stand on its hind legs.   A safe guinea pig home will have at least 7.5 square feet (2.3 square meters).; , If the lid to the cage is not secure, your guinea pig might find a way to escape. Alternately, cats, ferrets, or other pets might get into the guinea pig’s cage and hurt it. There are many ways to secure the lids of guinea pig cages. The right method for securing your cage depends on the type of cage you have.   Some guinea pig cages, for instance, have a sliding handle mechanism that keeps the guinea pig from escaping. Others have a plastic door that snaps open and shut. Consult manufacturer directions for more information regarding how you can ensure the lid of your guinea pig cage is secure.  The particulate matter in dusty bedding can cause breathing problems in your guinea pig. Unsafe bedding includes pine powder and other dusty bedding. Use dust-free hay, pellet bedding, aspen, or shredded paper instead.  If your guinea pig is either too hot or too cold, it could fall ill. Therefore, keep your guinea pig’s cage out of direct sunlight and away from fans, air conditioners, and vents.Guinea pigs should be kept between 65 and 75 degrees Fahrenheit (20-25 degrees Celsius)., If you incorporate wooden huts or tunnels into your guinea pig’s cage, check them regularly for splintering. Since guinea pigs love chewing on wood, they might chew these wooden objects in such a way that they develop sharp edges., Some people like to include mirrors in their guinea pigs’ cages. But mirrors with sharp edges could injure your guinea pig. If you choose to include a mirror, ensure it is round. Alternately, use a mirror with edges that are covered with rubber or plastic. You might also choose to place a mirror outside, rather than inside, the guinea pig’s cage., While it’s best to choose a cage with barred sides to increase air flow, a cage with barred flooring could cause foot injuries. Therefore, avoid cages with barred floors., The staple of your guinea pig’s diet should be grass hay. Acceptable varieties of grass hay include botanical hay, oat hay, alfalfa hay, timothy hay, and orchard grass. Don’t give your piggy pellets that contain additives, human cereals, seeds, or peanuts. These hard objects present choking hazards.   Give your guinea pig a variety of grass hay so that it won’t get bored with its meals, and will receive a variety of nutrients. Don’t feed your guinea pig lawnmower clippings. They might cause your guinea pig’s stomach to get upset.  

provide enough room for your guinea pig.  ensure the lid is secure.  choose the right bedding.  keep your piggie at a comfortable temperature.  check wooden housing elements regularly.  only use rounded mirrors.  use a cage with solid flooring.  feed your guinea foods that will not hurt it. 

 When preparing for your hamster to have her babies, use a cage that is tank-like, i.e., like a fish tank with glass walls. You want to use a tank-like cage because it reduces the risk of the babies escaping through the wire bars, if the cage you have is a wire cage.Also, you want to have a cage that is only one-story high. Cages that have multiple stories can cause the mother to make her nest on one of the second or third floors. This is risky because one of the hamster babies could fall and hurt themselves or die.; , You want to clean the cage 3 to 4 days before the mother goes into labor. Clean the cage as you normally would, but add extra bedding. Pad the cage with extra bedding material that you usually buy. You can also add shredded pieces of toilet paper for extra bedding. However, do not use commercial fluff or wool to add extra bedding. This kind of bedding can cause harm if the hamster eats it or if one of its limbs becomes caught in the fine fibers.Signs that mother is pregnant and will be going into labor are: a sudden increase in weight gain, nipple protrusion, an aggressive temperament, nest building, and an increase in eating and drinking., Also, remove the hamster wheel, any hamster toys, and tubes/tunnels that are inside the cage. You want to remove these because they can injure the hamster babies., If your pregnant hamster is sharing a cage with other hamsters, move these hamsters to another cage. These hamsters might disturb the mother and her preparations, or they might harm or eat the babies once born. 

use a cage that is a tank.  clean the cage and add extra bedding.  remove the wheel and toys from cage.  remove other hamsters from cage. 

 When you take your piggie out of its cage to play and explore, do not leave it alone. Always keep an eye on it.Let other family members know that you’ll be playing with your guinea pig before you begin your play session. You might also encourage them to knock before entering, thereby giving you time to collect your guinea pig, lest it run off while the door is open.Letting your family members know your piggie is out will also spur them to watch their step when passing through the area you and your guinea pig are playing.  Take steps to prevent your guinea pig from escaping or getting into areas it shouldn’t during floor time. For instance, roll up a heavy towel and lay it in front of nearby doors. Do the same for the gap beneath your refrigerator. Choose a play space that doesn’t have many areas that a guinea pig could escape into, hide under, or run behind.For instance, playing right next to your bed might not be a good idea, since if your guinea pig decided to run beneath the bed, it might be difficult to get it out.  Ensure all electrical cords, plastic bags, and other sharp and potentially dangerous objects are out of reach. Some houseplants can be poisonous to guinea pigs, so don’t play with your guinea pig near houseplants. And if you have cats or other pets that could pose a threat to your guinea pig, take them to another room before taking your guinea pig out to play., There are a wide variety of acceptable toys for guinea pigs, including unpainted wooden blocks, and bird toys with bells on them. All safe toys will be free of small plastic pieces that could break off and pose a choking hazard. They will also be free of sharp edges.Do not buy wooden toys that easily splinter. Don't buy wired balls. These pose a risk of your guinea pig getting their head stuck inside. Never use exercise wheels or balls.  There are many objects or toys that you can give guinea pigs, but you must ensure they are free of toxins or dyes. For instance, you can provide your guinea pig a manufactured house or igloo to hide in, but it must be made of edible or nontoxic materials. Likewise, you can give your guinea pig balls of printer paper, but only if they are blank and do not have printer ink on them.Consult your vet if you are unsure whether or not a given toy or product contains substances that could prove toxic to your guinea pig.  The proper way to pick up a piggie is by placing one hand over its chest, with your index and middle fingers between its front legs and your thumb wrapped around the back of its neck. Place your other hand beneath the piggie’s rump, with your thumb centered on its tailbone. Be gentle but firm when handling., Running wheels and running balls are acceptable for mice and smaller rodents, but not guinea pigs. If your piggies cage has running wheels or running balls, remove them to prevent spine and leg injuries., Guinea pigs can get stuck inside of them and sometimes endangering their life. Pregnant guinea pigs can easily squash their abdomen trying to squeeze into the hay rack. Opt for friendlier alternatives instead such as sacks/cotton bags.   Guinea pigs like to sleep and hide in their hay which encourages them to get inside the hay rack. There's nothing wrong with having the hay on the floor.  

monitor your guinea pig during floor time.  prevent access to unsafe spaces.  remove potentially dangerous items.  choose safe toys.  keep toxic substances away from your guinea pig.  handle your guinea pig gently.  don’t give your piggie running wheels.  avoid buying wired hay racks. 

 When you notice the mother drinking a lot more water than usual, this is a sign that she will be having her babies soon. Therefore, make sure her water bottle is always full. You can also provide extra water by hanging another water bottle in her cage.  When the hamster mother is close to having her babies, she will also be eating more than usual. She eats more than usual because she wants to ensure that she has enough energy for the labor process. Therefore, make sure her food bowl is always stocked. It is also important to supplement her diet with extra nutrients, i.e., food that is high in protein, to help her with the pregnancy.Here are some foods that you can supplement her diet with:Scrambled egg whites Chicken or tofu Porridge Bread soaked in skim milk  , When the time for having her babies is near, the mother might become unusually aggressive. So, unless it is absolutely necessary, try not to handle or hold the mother during this time. If you do, she might bite you to let you know she is uncomfortable with being held., Make sure the cage is in a quiet room, away from any loud noises in the house. Loud noises can stress and disturb the mother during and after birth, which can cause her to harm her babies.  

give her extra water.  feed her a high protein diet.  do not hold or handle the mother.  place the cage in a quiet room. 

 You will know the mother is in labor when you hear little squeaks coming from the cage. Be very careful to not intervene during this process. The mother will give birth in 10 to 30 minute intervals. Either way, it can happen quickly, or take several hours.   If you disturb the mother, this can cause her to stress and possibly harm one of her babies., The birthing process requires a lot of energy from the mother. Make sure the mother has a constant supply of water and is continually fed a high protein diet throughout the entire process.Make sure the water bottle and food bowl are easily accessible for you so you can re-supply them without disturbing the mother. Do not resupply during or right after the labor process. Wait a couple hours before checking and resupplying.  The mother is fertile again 24 hours after birth. Therefore, for the safety of the mother and her babies, do not put other hamsters back in the cage. Generally, you want to minimize contact with the mother for up to two weeks. Hamster babies will be mature enough to leave their mother at three to four weeks of age.   If you keep the babies longer than four weeks, make sure to remove the babies from the mother before eight weeks of age. Remove the babies into gender specific living groups, unless you want an explosion of hamster babies.At eight weeks, the hamsters will be able to reproduce and could possibly reproduce with the mother.  

do not disturb the mother or her babies.  continue to supply her with food and water.  keep the mother separated. 

 Allowing your hamster to acclimate to his new environment is an important building block to gaining his trust. Finding a good location for your hamster’s cage will ease his acclimation. A warm room is ideal for your hamster,especially if it is draft free.The room should not be very busy with human activity—this may be bewildering or frightening to your hamster.Your bedroom is usually not a good place for a hamster cage, since your hamster is nocturnal and will make a lot of noise while you sleep.; , Give your hamster at least a few days to acclimate to his new surroundings. During this time, your hamster will start familiarizing himself with where things are in his cage (food, water, sleeping area).   Do not be concerned if your hamster is washing his face or grooming himself excessively. These are not signs of nervous tension, as is commonly believed. Rather, he is scent marking and claiming his new territory.Scent marking allows your hamster to recognize places and items in his new home., Your hamster will probably see you as a huge predator at first. You do not want to confirm his perception of you by approaching his cage in a threatening manner. Instead, your approach should be slow and quiet, with no sudden movements or noises.Try talking to him in a low and soft voice when you get near to, and reach, his cage., During those first few days of acclimation, your hamster may hide in his cage when you approach it.He may still be very wary of you and his new surroundings. Over time, though, your hamster should relax enough to do normal hamster activities, such as exploring his cage, when you are nearby.Talking to him in a low and soft may help him relax and be comfortable with your presence. You do not need to stand by his cage for long periods of time. Try standing there for a few minutes at a time to see how he reacts to you. Once you see him going about his normal business when you are nearby, continue talking to him. The sound of your voice will continue to help him adjust. Consider offering him treats when you are near his cage.Place them in the bottom of his cage, since he will probably not be ready to take them from your hand.  It is very important that you not touch your hamster during his adjustment period. Acclimating to his new home will be hard enough without you trying to handle him and pick him up. Talking to him and being near his cage will be sufficient.  Once your hamster is adjusted to his new home and your presence, you can gain his trust by handling him properly. He will be more receptive to working with you when he is fully awake and alert, which is in the evening.Do not wake your hamster up to work with him. If he is sleeping deeply, being woken up suddenly can cause him to jump into defensive mode,which could lead to you being bitten or nipped at. If he is busy doing something else when you approach his cage, get his attention by lightly tapping on the cage, moving his water bottle, or softly talking to him., Clean hands are important to handling your hamster. If your hands smell like food, your hamster will see your hands as food and will probably try to bite them.Be sure to wash your hands with unscented soap—even a fruit-scented soap could cause your hamster to bite your hands.If you have multiple hamsters, wash your hands between handling each one. The smell of one hamster on your hands would lead the next hamster to believe he is being attacked., Your hamster will trust you when he can trust that your hands will not harm him. With your hands freshly washed, slowly place one of your hands in the bottom of his cage. Allow him to explore your hand by smelling it.Do not be surprised if your hamster runs and hides when you first place your hand in his cage. From his perspective as a prey animal, your hand reaching into his cage could resemble a large bird swooping down to scoop him up.Rest your hand in a non-threatening way, with your fingers curled. Spreading your fingers out could make your hamster think he’s being attacked.Do not pull your hand away if he starts to nibble on it. His nibbles are a way of exploring your hand. If you suddenly pull your hand back, you could frighten him and make him more wary of your hand.Try offering him treats, talking to him, or stroking his back as he becomes more comfortable with your hand.Eventually, he will take your treats from your hand., When your hamster is comfortable with your hand, slowly reach into his cage with both hands. Hold your hands like a scoop and wait for your hamster to walk into your hands. Support him with both hands as you slowly lift your hands out his cage.Have him face you when you lift him up—he will know what’s happening to him and will be less likely to jump.Your hamster may become skittish and jump off your hands when your hands are still in the cage—let him do so.If he seems agitated, calm him down by giving him a treat and/or stroking his back.Talking to him in a soothing voice could also calm him down. Your hamster may squeal when you pick him up, signaling that he’s annoyed with being held.If he continues to squeal, gently place him back in his cage and try to pick him up at a later time. If you are having trouble picking him up with your hands, place an empty mug in his cage and let him climb into it.When he has crawled into the mug, gently ‘pour’ him out of the mug into your hands.  Being held by you can be stressful for your hamster. Try holding him for a minute or two initially, then slowly increase the amount of time each time you pick him up. Aim for handling him for about five minutes a day.   Hold him close to your body and stroke his back and forehead.When he is more comfortable with being held, sit or lay on the floor and let your hamster crawl and climb on you., When you pick up and hold your hamster, do not let him fall. Hamsters have poor eyesight and no depth perception,so your hamster will have no sense of how or low he is from the ground. In addition, your hamster could injure himself if he gets spooked and tries to jump out of your hands when you have him out of his cage.  After a few minutes, or when he begins to get agitated, place your hamster back in his cage. Just as you picked him up, use slow and gentle movements to set him back in his cage.Try to set your hands on the bottom of his cage before letting him out of your hands. Give him a treat when you place him back in his cage.  

place your hamster’s cage in a good location.  give your hamster time to adjust to your home.  approach your hamster’s cage with care.  stand near his cage.  do not handle him.  work with your hamster when he is alert.  wash your hands.  acclimate your hamster to your hand.  pick up your hamster.  hold your hamster for short periods of time.  do not let your hamster fall.  return your hamster to his cage. 

; , Also place your hand flat in the cage so it can sniff/run over your hand when it feels brave enough (do not force it do to do anything it doesn't want to as he/she will become scared and may bite).  Find out when it is awake and active - the best time to start taming. Note its favorite foods so you can use them to overcome its fear.  This way the hamster gets used to your hand and learns that it only brings food and means no harm. After a few days, leave your hand there while the hamster eats.  When your hamster is confident enough to eat beside your hand, put the food in the palm of your hand. It may be some time before the hamster will eat from your hand without fear. When it does, you can stroke it gently with one finger along its back, the way the fur grows. Never stroke its head.  When it is eating from your hand, cup the other hand over it, and lift it gently a little way of the ground for a few moments at a time.  After a few more days, if your hamster seems happy being lifted up, you can take it right out of the cage in your cupped hands.  Let it run from one hand to the other. Soon it will be confident enough to run along your arm. 

when you first get your hamster, leave him/her in their cage in a quiet room so they can get used to their surroundings.  after a couple of days of not handling your hamster to ensure they feel safe in their environment, spend about an hour each day stroking your hamster and rubbing your hands around the sawdust so it can get used to your smell.  watch your hamster for a few days.  put food right on the cage floor.  feed your hamster from the palm of your hand.  get your hamster used to being picked up.  take your hamster out of its cage.  play with it over a table.  try different types of foods so you can make it happy.  

 Bringing a hamster home to a new environment can be very stressful for the animal. Allow it some time to acclimatize to its new cage and bedding. Experts recommend that you don’t try to handle a new hamster for the first 12 – 24 hours., This gets the hamster used to being touched making it is less likely to bite you. A Q-tip or the blunt eraser end of a pencil works well for this.   Softly speak to your hamster while you are doing this to soothe it and let it hear your voice. Repeat this several times a day for a few days. When it ignores the eraser or starts gnawing it, the hamster is ready for the next step., Hamsters have very poor eyesight and use their sense of smell to interact with the world. You should wash your hands with unscented soap to remove any residual scents of food or other pets from your skin.   This is especially important if you have other pets, particularly hamsters. Your hamster may get the “scent” of another hamster from your hand and think it is being attacked by that hamster. It may bite., This engages your hamster's interest while getting it used to the presence of your hand. A very small chunk of apple works well for this. Put your hand in the cage and let the hamster come up and sniff around it.   Let the hamster gently nibble your hands if it is not uncomfortable. This is not generally a display of aggression as hamsters like to probe and test the world around it with their teeth.Repeat with different treats each time to keep the hamster’s interest., It may climb on your hand, but do not try to cup your hands around the hamster or pick it up at this stage.   Just let your hand lie limply on the cage floor. Outstretched fingers may be perceived as an attack by the hamster., Do this with your hands still in the cage. Keep your hands low to the ground so that if the hamster jumps out of your hand it won’t fall far.   Cup with your bottom hand and place the other hand over the top to create a "hand cave." , Only do so if the hamster appears suitably relaxed in your hands.   Remember that being outside the cage can be very stimulating for the hamster so choose somewhere quiet with minimal distractions. If it seems agitated or starts biting, put it back in the cage and try again some other time.  The more you play and pet with your hamster, the more friendly and tame it will become.   Neglected hamsters that have not been handled for an extended period of time can revert back to their fearful nature and may bite when picked up.You may have to go through the steps to get it used to being picked up again.  Put your index fingers below its neck lightly and your thumbs on top of the hamster's body.   If you are wary of lifting the hamster out of the cage with bare hands, use a cup or a small bowl to get it out of the cage.Disposable plastic cups work well for this.  Hamsters have relatively few defenses in the wild and they are wary of sudden changes in their environment.Even if your hamster is tame and used to being held, don’t grab it from its cage out of the blue. Always allow it to see your hands for a couple of seconds first.  Be aware that hamsters are nocturnal. You will generally have to wake them up to play with them during the day.   Gently move their nest and allow them a minute to wake up.Alternately, you can call softly to your hamster to wake it up.  Hamsters recognize you by scent. A strong perfume or cologne may confuse them. Avoid strongly fruit scented soap when you wash your hands as your hamster may think your hand is food and try to bite it.  Hamsters, because of their small size, are extremely fragile. Never ever squeeze your hamster.   Be particularly gentle in the area just below the forelegs. Pressure to this region can prevent the hamster breathing.Supervise young children when they are playing with hamsters. Teach them to be gentle with the animal., Hamsters can make sudden leaps from your hand and a fall to the ground from a height could injure them. Make sure you are always sitting down with your hamster, so that if it escapes it will fall into your lap. Alternatively, hold it over a table., In the wild, hamsters spend most of their time burrowing deep underground.Hamsters like to feel hidden. They might enjoy being wrapped up in a towel in your lap or put in your shirt pocket while you watch TV., Even tame hamsters will bite if they are startled or frightened. They may also bite if they have the scent of food on your hand. Wash and disinfect the area around the bite and cover with bandage to stop the bleeding. If the bleeding doesn’t stop or it doesn't begin to heal within a few days, go to your doctor.Hamster bites are not generally serious and they do not transmit diseases such as rabies. Some people can be allergic to hamster saliva, although this is relatively rare.  Hamsters do not respond well to physical punishment. Never strike or yell at it.   If a hamster bites, the best way to stop it is by gently blowing on its face. The hamster will rear back and squint because its sense of smell is affected.Yelling or pulling your hand away quickly is likely to make the hamster more frightened and it may bite down harder. 

don’t attempt to pick up the hamster for the first few days.  use a soft, blunt object to gently stroke the hamster.  wash your hands.  place your hand inside the cage with a small treat in it.  leave your hand inside the cage and allow the hamster to investigate.  slowly cup your hands around the hamster.  take your hamster outside the cage.  handle your hamster at least once a day.  hold your hamster securely when taking it in and out of the cage.  never “sneak up” on your hamster.  don’t wake up your hamster suddenly.  don’t wear perfume.  never squeeze your hamster.  sit on the ground or hold your hamster over a tabletop.  let your hamster explore nooks and crannies.  clean a hamster bite carefully.  gently blow on the hamster's face to discipline it. 

 Before you start to clean, you should take a look at the hamster's cage to see what state it is in. Look for anything that needs cleaning at least once everyday, even if it's not a scheduled cleaning day. Cleaning your hamster's cage too often or too little can cause them undue stress, so make sure you are cleaning the right amount when needed.   Look for any droppings or wet areas in the bedding material. You can spot remove some areas. However, if there are a lot of them you should change the bedding. Pick out any leftover food that your hamster may have left laying around the cage. Change the water daily. If the bedding material has become soaked or damp near the water dispenser, you may want to change the bedding out. If the walls of the enclosure are looking dirty or smudged, it may be time for a full cleaning. If the cage smells you must clean it fully. Hamsters have a very sensitive sense of smell and can fall ill if the cage is unclean or the air quality is too poor.; , Before you get started cleaning, it is a good idea to assemble everything you will need. This can make the process much easier and less stressful for both you and your hamster. Collect the following items to get started:Wash cloth. This will be used for scrubbing and cleaning the cage and anything in it. Disinfectant. You can use mild, antibacterial hand or dish soap. Avoid harsh chemicals like bleach as these can harm your hamster. Pet stores will often carry safe and approved cleaning solutions as well. New bedding to place in the cage after you've cleaned it.  You won't be able to clean the cage properly unless you have removed your hamster from it. Place your hamster in a secondary cage, exercise ball, or other safe enclosure while you work.Handle your hamster gently as you remove them from the cage. Cup your hamster in your hands, fully supporting their entire body. Don't leave your hamster in the exercise ball for more than half an hour as they will need fresh air and a break from the activity. Wash your hands before and after handling your hamster to protect both of you from spreading germs and getting sick. You can use regular hand soap for this.  After you have removed your hamster and have placed them in a secure environment, you will need to take out any objects in the cage. Leaving anything in the cage will make cleaning it more difficult and not as effective.Remove all food and water bowls or dispensers. Take out any toys or exercise equipment.  The last thing you need to remove from the cage will be the bedding. The bedding is where your hamster leaves its waste, resulting in what can be a strong ammonia scent which can cause respiratory problems for your hamster. Make sure to remove all of the bedding to make the most of the cleaning.You may want to seal the old bedding in a waste bag of its own to lock in any smells.  Although it may not appear dirty, you will want to clean every toy, exercise station, food and water bowls, and any other thing that is housed in your hamster's cage. Clean them throughly to ensure that your hamster's house is as fresh as it can be.Spray or soak cage items in your cleaning solution to disinfect them. Use your washcloth to clean the cage items as throughly as you can. Make sure to get all corners or any tough to reach spots.  Cleaning the cage is the main focus of the regular maintenance of keeping your hamster's home tidy and hygienic. Make sure you clean every surface completely and throughly. Hamster cages may vary in their construction, however, the same general cleaning tips apply to all types of hamster cages.Use your disinfectant solution and cloth to scrub the cage clean. Some areas may have bedding stuck to the cage wall. These may need to be scraped away or scrubbed vigorously to remove. Soaking problem areas of the cage can help break them up and allow for easier removal. If your cage is a wire or mesh cage, make sure to clean each bar. Some cages are aquariums and these will require you to completely clean each surface and corner.  Before you can put the cage back together, you will need to let the cage dry. Adding new bedding before the cage is fully dry can cause the bedding to become wet, resulting in it needing to be cleaned again faster than normal.You can towel dry the cage and items if you want to hurry the process up. Leaving the cage in the sun can help it dry faster. Sunlight can also help to disinfect the cage, due to its UV light rays.  Once everything has been disinfected, cleaned, and allowed time to dry you can reassemble your hamster's cage. Do a final check as you place items in the cage to make sure they are fully cleaned.Place fresh, clean bedding in the cage first. Put any toys or exercise equipment back in the cage, on top of the bedding. Add fresh food and water to your hamster's bowls or dispensers and place them back in the cage. Place your hamster back in the cage and allow it time to adjust and relax before interacting with it again. Try giving it a few hours to get used to the cage again before interacting with it.  Keeping up with the cleaning of your hamster's cage will make cleaning it easier and will help keep your hamster happy and healthy. After you clean the cage mark the date down and schedule the next cleaning exactly one week later.Regular cleaning of your hamster's cage is necessary. Clean the cage fully at least once a week. Marking down the cleaning schedule on a calendar can help serve as a reminder.  Once a week, you will want to fully clean your hamster's cage. However, this doesn't mean that you should clean only once a week. There are a few things you should do daily to help keep the cage as clean as can be in between more thorough cleanings.Remove any visible droppings. Remove, clean, and refill your hamster's water dispenser. Take out any fresh food that your hamster didn't eat. Add more bedding if needed.  Cleaning your hamsters home is an important aspect of maintaining your hamsters health. Hamsters are sensitive creatures that require a clean home to stay healthy. If you neglect to clean your hamsters cage, you might be responsible for it falling ill. Avoid some of the following illness that result from a dirty cage and keep your hamster healthy:Pododermatitis affects the foot, causing raised red patches and results from extended exposure to urine and feces. Wet-tail is an illness that is caused by stress, which a dirty cage can produce in your hamster. Wet-tail is a serious disease that can kill your hamster. Your hamster may also show signs of illness if it has a runny nose, weakness, or diarrhea. 

examine the hamster's cage.  gather your cleaning supplies.  remove your hamster.  take out all objects in the cage.  discard old bedding.  wash every object that was in the cage.  clean the cage itself.  dry the cage and anything that was in it.  put everything back together.  schedule the next cleaning.  keep up with daily cleaning.  understand the risks of a dirty cage. 

 Dwarf hamsters look cute and cuddly, so you may want to hold your dwarf hamster right away. However, when you bring him home, he will need some time to get used to his cage. Give him a day or so to explore his environment and learn where things are in his cage.The more comfortable he is in his cage, the easier it will be for you to tame him.   During this time, your dwarf hamster will also start learning your activities and movements around your home.; , As your dwarf hamster is adjusting to you and his cage, spend time near his cage without interacting with him. For example, sit by his cage and watch TV or read a book.He should be comfortable with your calm and quiet presence before you start taming him.  Once your dwarf hamster has settled in for a few days, start talking to him so he can get used to your voice. If you have a Russian dwarf hamster, talking to him will be very important, since he can’t see very well. When he knows your voice, he will be less likely to bite you when you pick him up.Even if you don’t have a Russian dwarf hamster, your hamster will appreciate hearing the sound of your voice.   When you talk to him, use a quiet and gentle voice.  Hamsters are nocturnal animals, meaning they are active at night. Choose a time later in the day, such as after dinner, when he is most likely to be awake. If you notice he is just waking up, give him about 15 minutes to be awake before trying to hold him.If your dwarf hamster is sleeping, do not wake him up. If you do, he may be startled, think you are a threat, and try to bite you.Wait until he wakes up on his own.  Before you handle your dwarf hamster, wash your hands to remove any food scents. If your hamster smells food on your hands, he will think your hands are food and nibble on them.Use unscented soap to wash your hands., Make a cup with your hands and slowly lower them into the cage. Speak to him as you lower your hands so he knows you are there and are not a threat.Do not make any sudden movements or loud noises as you place your hands in his cage—this could startle him.If your dwarf hamster is not readily walking onto your hands, consider putting some tasty treats in your hands to lure him to you. If treats don’t work, try using a scoop or a large serving spoon. Hold the item on the cage floor and let him walk onto it (don’t scoop him up). After you lift him out of the cage, transfer him to your hands., When your dwarf hamster is nestled comfortably in your hands, slowly lift him up towards you. If you can, turn his body in your hands so he is facing you. Looking at you will help him feel less disoriented and scared about being lifted up.When you have him out of the cage, let him crawl on you. Exploring you will help your dwarf hamster feel more comfortable with you.Be as still as you can while he climbs and crawls on you. Consider sitting or lying down so he can crawl on you more easily.  Taming your dwarf hamster requires daily practice. Hold him a few times a day for 5 minutes each time.With daily practice, your dwarf hamster will become more tame and easier to handle.   Consider holding him at the same time each day. That way, he knows when to expect you.  Your dwarf hamster may bite or nibble on your hands as you tame him. A dwarf hamster will bite if he feels threatened or scared. He may also bite if he’s bored in his cage or not feeling very well.Nibbling is a dwarf hamster’s way of testing and exploring things in its environment.Your dwarf hamster’s bite wouldn’t be enough to cause bleeding, but it could startle you.A nibble would feel lighter than a bite.  If your dwarf hamster bites you, blow in his face. This puff of air will be unpleasant to him but won't hurt him. He’ll get the message not to bite you anymore.Even if the bite startles you, do not drop him—the fall could injure him.Putting some more toys in his cage, such as empty toilet paper or paper towel rolls, can relieve his boredom and possibly stop the biting behavior. If extra toys or blowing in his face are not stopping the biting, take him to your vet for a checkup., Russian dwarf hamsters can be very territorial. If you have a Russian dwarf hamster, he may have a strong reaction to your hand in his cage and try to bite it, especially if he doesn't know you're nearby.Be extra careful when putting your hands in his cage.   Your hand will look huge compared to his small body size. He will see your hand as a threat to his territory. 

let your dwarf hamster get used to his new environment.  spend quiet time with your dwarf hamster.  talk to your dwarf hamster.  pick a good time to tame your dwarf hamster.  wash your hands.  lower your hands into your dwarf hamster's cage.  lift your dwarf hamster up and let him explore you.  hold your dwarf hamster each day.  learn the difference between biting and nibbling.  react properly if your dwarf hamster bites you.  do not stick your hand in your dwarf hamster’s cage. 

 It might seem obvious, but like humans, only a female hamster can become pregnant. Most people will already know the sex of their hamster, but just in case you don’t, visit How to Sex a Hamster for more information on determining whether or not your hamster is female.   Safely scruff your hamster (hold it by the loose skin just above the shoulders firmly but without pinching), and turn the animal gently over to check its sex. Males will have prominent testicles just around the tail that make their rumps bulge, whereas female will lack this and instead have much more prominent pairs of nipples on the underside. If you’ve always simply assumed that your hamster is female because it had a typically female name when you bought it, then you should probably check. Note that if you think your hamster is pregnant due to a swollen belly, then she’s already to a part of the pregnancy where you should refrain from touching her due to the stress handling causes in the late stages of pregnancy.; , The average length of a pregnancy for a hamster is 15-21 days, so your hamster would need to have been housed with a male hamster within roughly the last three weeks in order to be pregnant.If she hasn’t had company in more than four weeks, then she cannot be pregnant.  Hamsters can start breeding from as young as 6-7 weeks of age.The only way to rule out pregnancy due to sexual immaturity of the hamster is if she is even younger than six weeks.   This also means you need to be careful storing hamsters from a litter together once they approach six weeks old because they will start mating together. This includes any male hamsters with the mother.  A swollen belly alone isn’t nearly enough to identify a pregnant hamster. A swollen belly can actually be a sign of another illness or condition affecting your hamster. Possible illnesses that may result in a pregnant appearance include:Pyometra, which is a womb infection that distends the hamster’s tummy with pus Enlarged internal organs such as the liver or spleen, which are likely the result of cancer Heart disease, which can lead to the accumulation of fluid in the belly Bowel problems distending the belly with waste due to improper food digestion You may notice other signs of sickness with several of these, including increased thirst (her drinker may empty faster than usual), decreased appetite (note if you’re filling her food bowl less often), and loss of body fat (usually over the ribs).  This may have been your first indication that your hamster is pregnant, but in case it wasn’t, watch to see if her tummy begins to grow. If she’s eating, drinking, and exercising as normal and has had a chance to mate, then the swollen belly is a very probable sign she is pregnant.   Note that a hamster likely won’t “show” her pregnancy until the final third of the gestation (day 10+), so you may be less than a week away from her delivering the litter by the time you notice the bump.She will also have enlarged nipples around the same time her belly swells. However, enlarged nipples on a small hamster can be difficult to see, so don't worry if you can't spot them beneath the fur.Handling her during the late stage of her pregnancy will upset her, though, so don't pick her up to look at the nipples.  A pregnant female will want to build a nest late in pregnancy, so collecting bedding material together and taking it to a secluded place in the cage can be a hint of pregnancy., The pregnant female may start to eat marginally more than usual, and also hide more food away, perhaps in the nest. Obviously, in itself this does not confirm pregnancy but it does help to build the overall picture.  Your hamster may become even more frantic in the very late stages of her pregnancy. Signs of imminent birth include becoming restless and alternating between eating, grooming, and nest building. She may also hiss at you if you reach in.  If all else fails, your vet will be able to help you identify whether or not your hamster is pregnant. However, your vet will also likely warn you that even being handled by a professional animal care provider can still lead to the environmental stress that may cause the mother to abandon or cannibalize the litter.   If the swollen belly lasts longer than 7-10 days without your hamster giving birth (or if she doesn’t exhibit any of the other common behavioral traits for a pregnant hamster in this time), then take her to the vet anyway since she may be presenting symptoms of an illness rather than pregnancy.  Pregnant females are extremely sensitive to disruption, and if they feel stressed, they are highly likely to harm the babies when they are born. Having a human feel her belly is definitely stressful to a female hamster, so it puts the health of the babies at risk.  Be extra sure that your hamster's diet is nutritionally sound to ensure the health of the babies. Feed a diet she is familiar with, as sudden changes could upset her stomach. However, an ideal diet is pelleted rat or mouse chow since she cannot selectively eat around the healthy (but less tasty) bits.   Very small quantities of milk and cheese provide calcium for the done development of the litter, and they also help the mother in lactation once the babies are born.As an additional protein source, you can feed your hamster moderate amounts of hard-boiled egg, nuts, barley, and oats.Though you must provide them in very small amounts (or risk gastrointestinal problems), pregnant hamsters can benefits from the additional vitamins and minerals found in fruits and vegetables, such as broccoli, cucumber, cauliflower, apples, grapes, bananas, and strawberries., Female hamsters like to be left completely alone at least a couple of days before giving birth. This means that by day thirteen after mating, you should not even interfere with her cage or bedding. Be as careful as possible when putting fresh food in with her as well. Failure to do this could lead to cannibalization of the newborn babies.Since you may not have any idea when the mother mated, consider that she usually starts “showing” the pregnancy around day ten after mating., In addition to a stressed mother hamster potentially cannibalizing her litter, other hamsters kept in the same cage can lead to the same result. To ensure the safety of the baby hamsters, begin housing other hamsters you have in separate cages as soon as you know for sure that the mother is pregnant.   If hamsters kept in the same cage begin fighting despite usually getting along, this is also a sign that one of them may be pregnant if it appears in association with some of the other signs.  During the first two weeks, the mother will recognize her babies by scent. If you handle the baby hamsters, even by accident, the mother may attack them. It is safe to begin handling them after roughly two weeks.This also includes accidentally transferring your scent from other handling of the cage. Don’t try to clean the cage during this period., Remember that your water sipper is probably placed at a height for your adult hamster. Reposition it if you need to so that the litter can also reach it to drink., Though they won’t be fully weaned until around three weeks, you can start placing solid food in the cage after 7-10 days. You can use a standard pellet diet, but soak the pellets in water first to soften them for the litter., Especially if it’s the mother’s first litter, she is more likely to abandon or cannibalize the litter due to environmental stressors.If this is the case, separate the mother from the litter immediately and take them to the vet. He or she will likely suggest a local rescue or animal hospital capable of helping care for the abandoned litter.  

identify the sex of your hamster.  note if she has been around any male hamsters.  note the age of the hamster.  rule out illness.  look for a swollen belly.  watch for nest building.  see if she hoards food.  look for signs that she’s about to go into labor.  take your hamster to the vet.  do not ever touch the mother’s belly to try to feel the babies.  feed the mother a nutritious diet during pregnancy.  leave the mother alone starting around day thirteen after mating.  keep other hamsters in separate cages.  do not handle the babies for two weeks.  reposition sipper tubes.  start placing solid food for the babies at 7-10 days.  take the litter to the vet immediately if you notice the mother abandoning them. 

 She uses these for energy and to stay warm. While this is what she will eat most of the time, don't overfeed her on just this category or she can become overweight and ill.Organic bird seed, unsalted raw sunflower seeds, dried corn, unsalted nuts, unsalted and unsweetened nut butters, cooked potatoes, and grains of all kinds are great sources of carbs and fat for her diet.; , Your hamster requires protein from a natural source, and luckily you can find most of these options in organic, pesticide-free varieties in local stores. Hamsters need about a teaspoon of protein-rich foods two or three times a week.   You can feed your hamster organic chicken, turkey, or eggs to provide the needed protein for her diet.Cook it thoroughly but do not season it with salt or pepper. Do not serve it hot as it will burn the hamster. You can also serve your hamster live insects such as mealworms or crickets.You may have trouble finding organic varieties in pet stores, but you can find them from online vendors in select countries. Other great sources of protein for your hamster also happen to be good sources of carbohydrates, like beans, barley, peas, nuts, oats, or wheat., In order for your pet to get the right blend of vitamins and minerals, be sure to offer fruits and vegetables in many colors and a variety of proteins and grains.Keep track of what she eats and what she rejects. In some cases, if she rejects a particular food it is because she has enough of that particular nutrient in her diet and doesn't need it. If you find that your hamster rejects all of a particular category of food (for instance, all sources of calcium), you might need to invest in a hamster health supplement to prevent deficiencies. These are available at large pet stores or online.  Think of treats as foods that you don't offer daily but that still play a vital role in your hamster's healthy nutrition.   Never offer any sugary or salted foods or processed human foods. These can't be digested properly by a small rodent and could be deadly.  There are many organic produce options at your local grocery store that you can give to your pet. If you already eat an organic diet with your family, it is easy to buy a tiny bit more than you need and give a small piece to the hamster when you prepare dinner or lunch for your family every day. Throw away what she doesn't eat so that it doesn't go bad in her cage.   Fruits like apple, banana, melon, or grapes are great choices, but you should not offer them too frequently because of the high sugar content. Every few days is plenty. More frequently, try pieces of vegetables like cucumber, corn on the cob, carrot, peas, celery, broccoli, cauliflower, or beansprouts.Don't offer citrus fruits like lemons, limes, or oranges, and don't offer onions, leeks, chives, or garlic. These types of food are too acidic and can cause stomach issues for small rodents.You should also never offer raw potato, aubergine, or avocado, which are toxic to hamsters., Hamster teeth, like other rodents, grow continually and have to be filed down in order to not overgrow. Hard biscuits made for dogs or cats are perfect for hamsters to keep those teeth from getting too long.Dog and cat biscuits are both available in organic varieties online, or try your hand at making your own: Combine two cups of whole wheat flour, a cup of rolled oats, a tablespoon of dried parsley, and half a cup of powdered milk in a mixing bowl. Add a cup of unsweetened peanut butter, two large eggs, and half a cup of water, and stir to combine. Shape the dough into dog-biscuit sized logs and bake for about fifty minutes at 300 degrees Fahrenheit.Experiment by adding different types of seed or nut butters and other healthy additions like flax seed, millet, or different types of whole grain flour.  Your hamster may love some of your healthy foods like whole wheat organic bread, organic unsweetened cereal, organic scrambled eggs, and organic uncooked pasta.Just remember not to serve any foods to your hamster with added salt or hot from the oven!  , In the wild, hamsters are omnivores, which means they eat both meat and vegetation regularly. They forage for food and eat a diet consisting of a variety of seeds, insects, and plants. If you want to make your own hamster food, you have to be sure that you include nutrients from all of these categories, as well as a balance of carbohydrates, fats, and other vital nutrients.   The best way to ensure that your hamster is getting all the right nutrients is to serve a diet that varies every day and includes grains, seeds, herbs, vegetables, protein, nuts, and treats. You can create a hamster mix using organic ingredients, or you can simply offer a small amount from each category of foods every day. Be sure that your hamster's menu includes protein, carbohydrates and fats, vitamins, minerals, and water. The first four elements of a healthy diet will be discussed in more detail in the next step.  For the most part, a hamster will not eat more than he needs to survive. Most eat about a tablespoon worth of food every day, so be sure to add a steady supply of fresh food to his cage daily.Hamsters will also instinctively eat more of what they need and leave behind some of what they don't. If your hamster always ignores particular food, offer less of it and more of what he eats., Water is a huge part of a hamster's diet, and a hamster with the healthiest organic diet will still become dehydrated and die if she doesn't have enough water. Don't neglect hydration in your pursuit of a healthy and organic diet.   Keep a hamster water bottle full of clean water in the cage. Change the water every day.Don't offer other liquids. Hamsters will get plenty of fluids from fruits and veggies, but straight juice or milk is too strong and contains far too much sugar for a hamster.  

make the bulk of her diet carbohydrates and fats.  serve up protein.  be sure you offer a variety.  offer treats in addition to a healthy diet.  give a small piece of vegetable or fruit daily.  offer hard dog or cat biscuits occasionally.  try other treats.  understand natural hamster eating habits.  don't worry about overfeeding.  keep fresh water in the cage. 

 Being prepared is the first step towards giving your hamster a clean cage. Make sure that you have two sponges--one for cleaning and one for disinfecting. You should use a general household disinfectant for the cleaning. Just make sure to thoroughly rinse the surfaces of the cage after cleaning.Have paper towels or clothes handy so that you can dry the cage. Use a brush to clean the corners of the cage. A toothbrush works well for getting into small spaces.; , You need to remove your hamster from his cage during the cleaning process. Ideally, you should have a back-up cage for him to use while you clean. Consider putting your hamster in a different room while you clean, so that the smell of disinfectant does not bother him.If you do not have a back-up cage, consider buying a different type of container for your hamster. A popular choice is a large ball made for hamsters to roll around in. Check your local pet store for these items. Make sure to wash your hands thoroughly before handling your hamster. This will get rid of any unfamiliar scents and let him get used to your natural scent.  Once you have safely relocated your hamster, you need to remove old materials from the main cage. Your hamster cage should have a good supply of bedding material. Popular choices are paper, pellets, or alfalfa shavings. Empty all of the soiled bedding into the trash.Empty the food and water containers, too.  Once the cage is empty, you can thoroughly clean it. Using a clean sponge, use water and a disinfectant to clean all surfaces of the cage. Make sure to follow all directions for the cleaning product you choose. Use a small brush to get into tight corners.Wipe down the cage with a clean, damp sponge after disinfecting. Dry all surfaces of the cage with paper towels or clean clothes. Add new materials. After the cage is clean and dry, replace the old bedding with new bedding. Do not use cat litter or cedar shavings, as these can be harmful to your hamster's health.  You should get in the habit of thoroughly disinfecting your hamster's cage once a week. Make this a part of your weekly schedule. You should also do general maintenance to care for your hamster each day.Every day you should remove wet or soiled bedding from your hamster's cage. You should also check daily to make sure that the cage is in good repair, with no holes or loose doors.  

gather your supplies.  put your hamster somewhere safe.  get rid of old materials.  clean the cage.  get in a routine. 

 Hamsters like room to move, so make sure the cage is large enough. Bigger is better, so get the largest cage your space allows. Make sure not to place the cage near a direct heat source or in direct sunlight. You should also keep your hamster in the house, not the garage. The ideal temperature for a hamster is between 65-75 degrees.Make sure that his cage is out of reach of other household pets who might view the hamster as prey. Remember that hamsters are nocturnal, so you may not want to place the cage in your bedroom.  Hamsters like to move around. If possible, equip his cage with a wheel for him to run on. If you do not have a wheel, make sure that you take your hamster out of the cage occasionally so that he can roam around. Always supervise your hamster when he is out of the cage. Do not let him scurry under furniture or out the door.  Remember to be gentle with your hamster. Try to avoid sudden movements or loud noises when you handle him. Hamsters do like interaction, and you should make time to handle and talk to your hamster every day.Provide him with a clean cage, toys, and healthy food and water to keep him happy and healthy.  

give her a safe space.  let him exercise.  treat him with kindness. 

 You will need a tablespoon, a bowl, a teaspoon, a box of Cheerios, peanut butter, and some honey if you'd like.; , Using a spoon, crush the Cheerios and place them into a bowl.  Add 2 tablespoons of peanut butter and stir until it forms a consistent mix.  For extra taste, add about a teaspoon of honey if desired, then stir until it is mixed in with the rest of the ingredients.  Put the mixture in the oven for 10 minutes on 350.(pre heat the oven for about 5 minutes or until hot  , Once you've removed the mixture from the oven, scoop it into little balls using a teaspoon.  Put them in the freezer for about 20 minutes to harden, then serve them to your hamster.  

gather the ingredients and things you'll need.  crush the cheerios.  add the peanut butter.  add honey (optional).  put the mix in the oven.  scoop.  let harden. 

 Supplementing your hamster's basic diet with treats is fine, as long at the treats you give it are good for it. These are foods that your hamster shouldn't eat on a daily basis but that are good to give it every once in awhile. Some treats that are good to give a hamster include:Sunflower seeds Alfalfa pellets Spinach Lettuce Apples Cauliflower Carrots; , There are some foods that we keep in our kitchens that can be very bad for hamsters, as their digestive systems are not able to process them. Foods to keep away from your hamster include:Chocolate Candy Junk food Onions Uncooked beans Potato Avocado  , While it is very fun to give a hamster treats that it is excited to eat, your hamster needs to eat a variety of foods. Your hamster's main diet should be a commercial mix that is specially formulated to its dietary needs. Treats, on the other hand, should be given as a small supplement to its main diet.   Give your hamster treats sparingly. There is a reason they are called "treats." Try giving your hamster just one or two treats a day to supplement its normal diet. For example, this means only a small chunk of apple and a small piece of carrot in a day. They really don't need much!, If your hamster doesn't eat all of its treat, you should take it out to the hamster's cage. Your hamster is likely to hide it, where it can become moldy and spoiled.   Hamsters like to hide their food, so an empty dish does not mean that they have eaten everything. When you clean your hamster's cage, be sure to be on the lookout for spots where they have hidden pieces of their food. 

pick ingredients that are good for hamsters.  avoid ingredients that are toxic to hamsters.  make sure your hamster has a balanced diet.  remove uneaten treats. 

 To determine sex, you are going to have to look at your hamster's hind end and underside. Your best bet is to wait until the hamster is alert and relaxed to examine it. Grabbing a sleeping or stressed hamster is a good way to get bitten.Try giving your hamster a treat and some attention. Hamsters don’t like being turned upside down (which is exactly what you’re going to do) so petting your hamster and making him or her feel at ease will help this process go smoothly.; , This will give the hamster a soft place to land if it squirms away from you. It will also keep your hamster contained at the same time, making sure that it doesn't fall and then run away.  To safely restrain the pet, approach the hamster calmly, and do not startle it. Place the palm of one hand over the hamster with your thumb and forefinger resting right above the shoulder blades. Gently grasp the loose skin just above the shoulders between your thumb and forefinger to control the head and keep the hamster from biting you.Do not pull on the skin or attempt to lift the animal by the scruff alone.Do not grip the scruff too tightly, either, as this can pull back the eyelids and causes the eyeballs to pop out of the sockets.  Use the rest of the hand to support the animal's body. Using your free hand to support the weight of the hamster, lift the hamster and turn it over so that its body is resting in the palm of the hand you are using to scuff it. Its entire body should be supported at this point.  

wait for the right time to inspect the hamster.  consider working over a large bowl or box lined with a towel.  scruff the hamster.  pick up and turn over the hamster. 

 When making treats for hamsters, it's a good idea to combine their usual food with a few additional ingredients. This recipe as it is should make enough treats to feed to a hamster for several weeks, because they should be fed a limited amount of treats. A combination of these items will give your hamster a little thrill while also giving it excellent nutrition:1 teaspoon sunflower seeds 3 tablespoons hamster food, including pellets and seeds 3 table spoons wholegrain flour 3 tablespoons hot water  , Add all your dry ingredients into a small bowl and stir until well combined. Then add the hot water and mix all of this together until it forms into a sticky consistency.   The mixture should be stiff enough to mold into a loose shape. If the mixture is too watery, add in another teaspoon of wholegrain flour.  Remember not too big, as your hamster will have difficulty munching on a treat that is too big. Depending on the size you make, this recipe should make at least a dozen treats. Put all your small treats on a microwaveable plate when you are done shaping them.   Try shaping the mix into cute little shapes, such as hearts. This will make watching your hamster eat its treats even cuter.  At the halfway point (2 minutes), make sure you turn the treats over. This will assure that they are fully cooked on both sides.   Cooking the treats cooks the flour and makes the treat solid. Be careful when turning the treats over and removing the plate from the microwave. It will be hot! Alternately, you could bake the treat on a baking sheet for a few minutes at a low temperature. Keep a close eye on them while they are in the oven, as the goal is for them to solidify but not to brown. Let cool! And then you're done!  

gather ingredients.  mix all ingredients.  mold into the shapes you want.  put the treats in the microwave for 4 minutes. 

 The ingredients for this treat recipe can vary quite a bit. Basically, you need an egg and a combination of fruits, nuts, and vegetables that your hamster loves to eat. Combining several types of veggies will make the treat extra exciting for the hamster.   Fruits you could use include: apples, bananas, and cantaloupe. Nuts you could use include: Chestnuts, cashews, pistachios, sunflower seeds, and walnuts. Vegetables you could use include: broccoli, celery, corn, cucumber, and dandelion leaves.  A well cooked treat will hold its shape and will not create a gloppy mess when the hamster tries to eat it.  Choose 1 cup total of 2-3 veggies you have picked out for your hamster. Shred or grate them so that they become very small pieces. This will allow them to combine with the egg easily and will be easier for the hamster to eat.Use whatever type of grater you have. If you don't have a grater, take the time to chop the veggies until they are very, very small.  You need to beat the egg until the yolk and the whites are thoroughly combined. This will give your hamster egg treat the right consistency.   You do not need to use an egg beater to beat the egg, although this does get the job done very quickly. Instead, just use a fork to whip the egg until it is combined.  The baking cups that work the best are made for baking "mini cupcakes," because they only hold about two tablespoons per muffin cup.These baking cups will make your treats small enough to be "hamster sized."   It is best to use a non-stick baking tray, as it's not a good idea to give your hamster a lot of oil or butter, which would be used to grease a traditional pan.  Cover the veggies completely with the egg. However, you should leave some room at the top of the cup, as the eggs will puff up when cooked.   Feel free to give each cup of veggies and eggs a little stir so that the eggs and the veggies are thoroughly combined.  This may be hard to gauge but can done by sticking a toothpick or skewer into the center of one of the cups. If the skewer comes out clean, then the cups are cooked.   Let cool and serve, but remember to give your hamster a limited amount of treats every day.  

gather ingredients.  preheat oven to 350 degrees.because you are using eggs with this recipe, it's important to cook the treats thoroughly.  grate veggies.  beat one large egg in a cup or bowl.  put approximately one tablespoon of veggies per cup in a mini muffin baking tray.  pour beaten eggs over veggies.  bake for 15-20 minutes.the egg treats are done when the egg is thoroughly cooked. 

 These sticks can be bought at almost any pet store.   Hamster chew sticks are made to wear down the hamster's teeth, so that they don't get overgrown. This is important for your hamster's health. The amount of ingredients you will need varies. If you just want to make one or two hamster treats, then you will only need one or two chew sticks, a tablespoon of peanut butter, and one or two tablespoons of seed and food mixture.  This can be a messy process, so keep that in mind before starting.  Then place the peanut butter covered sticks into the seeds and food, making sure to cover the whole surface.   You may want to lay the sticks onto the surface of the seed mixture, then grab some mixture in your hand, and then sprinkle the mixture onto the top side of the stick, this will allow you to make sure that all surfaces are covered evenly.  Then place the pan in the freezer until the treats are hard. This usually takes an hour or two, depending on your freezer.   Freezing the treats will make them easy to handle for your hamster. Otherwise, they would be a gooey mess!  , To make treat time more stimulating, you can tie the treat up so that it dangles in your hamster's cage. The hamster then has to do a little bit of work to get to it. This could mean the hamster has to be on its hind legs to get it or it has to climb in the cage to reach the treat.If you have made multiple peanut butter treats, keep the extras in the freezer! You want them to stay firm for the next time you want to give your hamster a treat.  

collect ingredients.peanut butter treats combine peanut butter, the hamster's regular food, seeds, and a hamster chew stick.  apply peanut butter to the chew sticks.this can be done simply by dipping the chews into a container of peanut butter or by using a knife to apply the peanut butter onto the chews.  roll the peanut butter covered sticks in seeds and regular food.combine all the seeds and food that you are using for this project on a plate or other dish that will give you enough surface area to roll the sticks around.  place sticks in freezer.place the seed and peanut butter covered chewing sticks on a plate or pan that will be ok in the freezer.  give one of the treats to your hamster! 

 If you're feeding your hamster homemade food, you want to keep an eye on his droppings. Hamsters can have sensitive stomachs and certain foods may not sit well with them. If you notice your hamster is experiencing diarrhea, try altering his diet. If you've recently started feeding him a particular type of food, remove that from the mix and see if it helps.  When using homemade food, it can be tough to judge how much is enough for your hamster. As stated, most hamsters eat about 10 to 12 grams of a dried food mix a day. Invest in a small scale for your kitchen and try to feed your hamster around that much.   If your hamster gains or loses weight on a homemade diet, talk to your vet. Your vet can give you advice on how to alter your hamster's diet to make sure he's getting enough food.  Before starting any new feeding regimen with a hamster, talk to your vet. Hamsters need specific vitamins and nutrients to be healthy. If you're trying to make food yourself, you'll need some professional guidance. You want to make sure your hamster can live a long, full life.  

watch for diarrhea or constipation.  avoid overfeeding your hamster.  talk to a vet about your hamster's dietary needs. 

 Males are generally larger than females.If you don't have another hamster to compare with, than this may not help you determine the sex of your hamster. However, if you have other hamsters, you can compare their sizes. While this is not a definitive test, it will give you a good idea whether your hamster is male or female.   When you look at an older male hamster from above, you may notice that his back end is more pointed and hiked-up, whereas female hamsters have a rounded bottom.  Hamsters usually reach sexual maturity by around 35 days of age, and in adult hamsters, sex differences are often fairly easy to see.Males have prominent testicles that make their rumps bulge and take on an almond shape, while females have fairly blunt rear ends. , If you see testicles, it is male. If you do not see testicles and can see prominent nipples, it is female. Females have six prominent pairs of nipples.   In dwarf hamster species, the male also has a very prominent scent gland. In the mature male, this gland usually has a noticeable yellow color and is located in the umbilical area.This area is in the middle of the abdomen about where you would expect a belly button to be. If you cannot tell whether you have a male or female hamster, the animal may not be sexually mature yet.  

assess the size of the hamster.  look at the hamster's underside, near where the tail is located.  examine your pet's abdomen for nipples, and assess the area just under the tail. 

 These usually look like small pink circles and may appear slightly raised around the edges. The anus is just under the tail, and the urogenital opening, the location of the urinary and genital organs, is above the anus toward the center of the abdomen.  Sex differences are more difficult to spot in very young pups, but it is possible to sex a pup by looking at the distance between its anus and its urogenital opening. In females, the openings are very close together. You may actually have trouble telling them apart so that the urogenital opening, which in this case is the vulva, and the anus almost seem to be a single opening or structure. In males, the openings are farther apart, so there is very clear separation between the anus and the urogenital opening.You may also see small swellings in the groin area if you have a male. These are the growing testicles.  If you can only find one opening, especially if it seems rather large, you should suspect you are dealing with a female, but recheck the animal often or consult an experienced exotics veterinarian just in case you missed the second opening. This opening can be subtle in a very young male, especially if the animal you are working with is a tiny dwarf hamster.   The most common pet hamsters, Syrian hamsters, are solitary and need to be kept in individual cages, so early sexing is not very important. Dwarf hamsters, on the other hand, are kept in single-sex groups. If you have pups in a single-sex group, you need to recheck them often until sex is obvious. This will help you avoid accidental pregnancies in your group.  

locate the two openings on the underside of the hamster.  assess the distance between the anus and the urogenital opening.  recheck the hamster at another time if you are still not sure. 

 First of all, you need to think about what kind and size of cage you need to make your hamster as happy and content as possible. The minimum amount of floor space required for hamsters is 360 sq inches. Keep that in mind, as most pet stores sell hamster cages that are far too small and costly. Bin cages are cheap and big; look up "how to make a hamster bin cage" and a lot of videos and articles will show up. They are easy and cheap to make, and definitely worth the time. Be sure that whichever cage you choose it is one which has a solid floor so that you can provide ample bedding material for digging and burrowing. Wire or mesh floors can also cause a painful disease called Bumblefoot.  Connecting many smaller cages that end up being 360 sq. inches doesn't count, as is done in Habitrail Ovo or Crittertrail. Hamsters run miles and miles in the wild, so they need a continuous running space, not a lot of tiny compartments connect together. Syrian and Chinese hamsters can NOT be kept together in one cage as they are very territorial and WILL fight. They could seriously injure or kill each other.; , There are three most popular minimums, and although it is not the law, you should get a cage that is big enough. The American minimum is on the small side. The German minimum is best, but the RSPCA minimum will do. You cannot connect multiple smaller cages to make the minimum, as hamsters need the space to run around as they would in the wild. The minimums are:   American/Hamster Hideout forum minimum - 360 sq. in RSPCA/United Kingdom minimum - 80x50cm German minimum - 1 sq. m Although recommendations vary, the basic principle is the bigger the better., It's best to start with a new cage, but if you buy or use an old one, clean it with mild baby soap, and rinse throughout. To take away the smell of the of the previous occupant, you can also use a mixture of white vinegar and water but only do this occasionally. You can also get some pet-safe disinfectant spray or wipes  , You should take care when deciding where you will put the cage, as this will contribute to the overall wellbeing of your hamster. You want to avoid extremes of heat, so keep it out of direct sunlight and don’t put it next or a radiator or other heat-source. Equally, don’t put it somewhere very draughty. If you don’t want to keep it in the house you can put it in a frost-free garden shed or garage, but provide more bedding if you do this.   Hamsters are very sensitive to light and high-frequency sound. Don’t put it in a room that will have lights going on and off at night, and keep it away from things such as televisions, computer screens, sources of running water and vacuum cleaners. These generate ultrasound which can be distressing for hamsters.If you have a wire cage and want to avoid your floor getting too messy from the flying substrate, cut down a cardboard box, which the cage can comfortably sit in (with a few centimetres of clearance around the sides), so that it’s sides are not higher than 10cm, and place it in that.  Hamsters are very active and need lots of things to exercise in their cages, getting a wheel is a good place to start. Dwarf hamsters need a 6.5 - 8 inch wheel and Chinese hamsters need an 8 inch wheel. Larger hamsters, including Syrian hamsters need a 12 inch wheel. It's very important to get a wheel that is big enough for your hamster. Flying saucers cannot replace a normal upright wheel, as it encourages an unnatural way of running. NEVER use barred or mesh wheels, as your hamster can trap a limb or get bumblefoot.   One way to tell if it is too small is to look to see if your hamster is running with an arched back, like a smiley face. If they are, then the wheel is likely too small., If you buy a bottle, buy a good one that doesn't leak too much. If you get a bowl, buy something like a small bendy log bridge to put over it so that your hamster doesn't bury it or get wood shavings in it, or you can place the bowl on a small shelf.  Using a bowl enables you to keep a good track on how much they are eating, and can be cleaner and easier. However, using scatter feeding brings out the hamster's natural foraging skills.If you have a pair of dwarves, then scatter feeding is advisable as it can prevent fighting. If you have a Chinese hamster (note! Not dwarf hamsters. Despite what a pet shop may have told you, they're solitary like Syrians, even the males) or a Syrian hamster then it is advisable to get a food bowl so that you can check their eating habits.   If you get a bowl, buy a small one so it doesn't take up too much cage space., Most houses are suitable for dwarf hamsters and Chinese hamsters, but many are much too small for a Syrian hamster. Bendy bridges can be turned into lovely cave-style houses if you bury them under the substrate! Some hamsters make nests, but they need somewhere to hide and store food anyway.  Hamsters are very energetic and need lots of toys. Make sure to get chews as their teeth never stop growing! Hamsters love toys that they can climb and hide-and-seek style toys. Get some tubes, too - they're no replacement for digging but hamsters love running through them! Make sure that they're big enough, though - many tubes aren't big enough for Syrian hamsters. Also check that they have ventilation, as if they are long tubes your hamster may have trouble breathing in them.  The substrate is the disposable material you fill out the bottom of your cage with. It’s important to get a good one as it will absorb your hamster’s urine and be what they dig into. There are a number of options other than the traditional wood shavings or sawdust, and some specialist websites have reviews of different types. Stay away from substrates such as pine or cedar, as they can cause severe respiratory problems! Use 6cm, or 3in, or more of substrate, as hamsters love to dig. Carefresh is a nice bedding and so is aspen. , As well as substrate, getting some separate bedding or nesting material is important. While bedding is like the carpet, nesting material is like the blankets. Avoid material that can separate into small strands like fluffy bedding and cotton wool. This can cause serious problems for your hamster through ingestion. They could also become entangled and get a limb trapped. Their instincts would be to pull on the limb until it was dislocated, although some very desperate hamsters have been reported to chew their own limbs off and die of blood loss!  Shredded tissue paper, in this case, is the best nesting material.  It’s good to have a nice stock of substrate and bedding at home, so you are prepared and can change it regularly. You will need to keep a close on the cage and keep it clean. It’s recommended to scoop out substrate that is wet from urine every week, called spot cleaning, which will only take a few minutes. The amount of times you clean your cage completely will depend on how large your cage is. 1000 sq. inches or larger cages can withstand a year or more without a full cage cleanout, but smaller cages may need to be cleaned once a month.  It’s a good idea to have a regular cleaning schedule, as your hamster could be distressed if the cage is cleaned too often or too seldom. Spot clean the cage to remove poo daily to prevent wet-tail.  In addition to keeping the cage clean, it’s important to keep it refreshed with toys and things to chew on and dig in. Try giving them empty cereal or granola bar boxes with the printed outside removed to prevent exposure to inks. Hamsters like empty toilet-paper tubes, too, and will love to play in them until they chew them to shreds.  Hamsters love attention! They each have their own personalities, but handling them regularly will help you get used to each other.But of course, you should be careful at all times. For example, don’t hold them by the legs and wheelbarrow them. It strains their little legs and can hurt them or in severe cases break their limbs.   Make sure you give them a chance to get comfortable with their new cage before handling them. Moving into a new cage is a big event for a hamster and they will be more interested in human attention once they are happy.  It’s crucial to provide a good environment for your hamster, but you can also check on their health by listening to their breathing, and if there is wheezing call a vet. Check their paws for lacerations; check their teeth; check their skin to see if there are any signs of flaky or irritated skin. Make sure their nose is dry and their eyes clear.You may consider weighing them to see if they're gaining or losing weight, which could tip you off to problems.  

research hamster cages.  buy a big cage, as big as possible!,  or, use a second-hand cage.  decide where to put the cage.  buy a wheel.  buy a water bowl or a bottle.  decide whether to get a food bowl or scatter-feed.  choose a house for your hamster.  buy some toys.  choose a substrate.  choose some nesting material.  make sure you have enough and change it regularly.  keep adding new things to stimulate them.  handle your hamsters daily.  give your pet a weekly home check-up. 

 It is important that the wood you use to make the chew sticks is unpainted and untreated.Chemicals found in paint and pesticides used to treat some wood could be extremely toxic to your hamster.   Skewer sticks, that you can typically purchase in your grocery store, offer a good option since you know they are safe for human use, which means they are also safe for your hamster. Chew sticks purchased in a pet store are typically made of balsa, so if you want something similar to what you find in the pet store, search for those.If you want to use natural wood from the outdoors, clippings of small twigs from fruit trees are safe for hamsters. However, you should be certain that the tree was not treated with chemicals or pesticides.; , While it is safe to give your hamster fresh clippings from fruit trees, avoid using wood you find laying around on the ground outside, which could contain parasites that can harm your hamster., Certain types of wood, such as cedar and pine, can contain oils that are harmful to the hamster respiratory system. Choose wood that is oil free.Also avoid wood from the yew and oleander tree as these are poisonous for hamsters., You will need to create bunches of 3 skewers in order to make the sticks thick enough to be interesting for your hamster. With a package of 20 skewers, you can make about 13 chew sticks.  It is important to remove the pointy ends of the skewer. Use a very sharp knife or a pair of gardening scissors to snip off the pointy ends.  Your hamster will like the chew sticks better if they are shorter, and thus easier to grab. Cut each skewer in half using the gardening scissors.  Eventually, you will glue the sticks together, but begin by laying 3 skewers next to each other on a piece of parchment paper or cutting board.  It is important that the “glue” you use to hold the sticks together is safe for your hamster. A safe glue can be made by mixing together 1/2 cup white flour and 1/2 cup water until a thick paste is formed.   If you want to make your chew sticks more interesting for your hamster, add a splash of fruit juice such as apple, blueberry, cherry, peach or mango to the glue. Additionally, you can also add tiny bits of dried fruit to the paste.  Generously coat each bunch of skewers in the glue using a paint brush.  You will want to allow the sticks plenty of time to dry so that they do not fall apart inside your hamster’s cage.   You might also want to coat the other side of the sticks in glue. If so, wait until the first side is dry, then flip each bunch over, and repeat the process of brushing on the glue.  In the evening, when your hamster is most active, give your hamster a few of the chew sticks.  When you see that your hamster is no longer using the chew stick, if it has been completely worn down, or if it is damaged, give your hamster a new chew stick. Do not leave old chew sticks in your hamster’s cage as he might injure himself with the sticks.  Does he seem to use them frequently or does he ignore them? If your hamster does not enjoy using the sticks, you should search for alternatives in order to keep your hamster healthy.   Try rubbing the sticks with a carrot. Rubbing the stick with a carrot coats the stick in a flavor that hamsters enjoy.Coat the stick with a bit of honey. Coating the stick in honey shows your hamster that the stick is something he can and should eat.However, do not use this trick often, as your hamster may refuse to use the stick unless it has honey on it. Hamsters can be susceptible to diabetes if they consume too much sugar.Shave off the outer layer of the stick. Using a small, sharp knife, wittle away the top layer of the stick. This releases a strong wood scent that may be appealing to your hamster., If your hamster does not enjoy the sticks, it is safe to give him dog biscuits as long as they do not contain garlic., This offers a good option for chewing, and hamsters also love to crawl inside the tube. Thus, this option offers more than one activity for the hamster., In a pinch, you can also give your hamster a cereal such as rolled oats to chew on. 

use natural wood.  avoid sticks you find in your backyard.  avoid woods that contain oils.  decide how many chew sticks you want to make.  cut your skewers.  cut the skewers in half.  create bunches of 3 skewers.  create hamster safe glue.  glue the skewers together.  allow the chew sticks to dry overnight.  give your hamster his chew stick.  replace the chew sticks.  observe your hamster’s reaction to the sticks.  try giving your hamster dog biscuits.  give your hamster a paper towel tube.  use hard cereal. 

 Purchase KMR, a milk substitute generally used for kittens, at your local pet store. Put the KMR in an eye dropper or syringe for feeding. Feed the hamsters around the clock, approximately three drops per serving.   Alternatively, you can use a mixture of 50% warm water and 50% evaporated milk. Heat up the water in a tea kettle and stir together with a spoon before giving it to the hamster. Test the mixture with a thermometer. It should be approximately 90 degrees Fahrenheit.The feeding schedule for a baby will be very labor intensive. Start with two drops every half hour, night and day. When the pup is about 12 days old increase this to three drops every half hour. After it is two weeks old, switch to .5 milliliters every hour. Stop this regimen after 21 days.; , For hard food, soak pellets in water so that babies can eat them. Immerse them in water and stir them they until they appear soft. Drain them and place them in a dish in the cage. To make them extra nutritious, sprinkle powdered milk on top of the pellets.Alternatively, provide some small seeds like millet, and some wheat germ.The hamster might well refuse hard food until it is about three weeks old. When it does take hard food, begin weaning it off of milk.  Good fresh foods include finely broccoli and apples.Apples will also help keep the hamsters hydrated., Mash up canned dog food made from either beef or chicken. Be sure that it is sufficiently mashed so that there are no large, hard chunks in it. This will provide a much needed source of protein for the hamsters.Alternatively, for protein you can mash up a hard-boiled egg.  Baby hamsters will eat the droppings of adult hamsters. This is actually important to their health because it, provides them with the bacteria to process their foods., If a baby is over ten days old, it might be able to survive without its mother, but will need a suitable environment. Clean the cage thoroughly in case the mother was ill. You will need to make a nest by shredding some toilet paper.   Normally the baby’s mother would keep it warm with its body heat. You will need to keep the cage in a warm place. Alternatively, you can place a heading pad under the cage and set it on a low heat setting. Normally a mother would encourage its baby to urinate and defecate. You will need to do this after each feeding. Rub the genital and anal area with a warm, damp cloth. 

create a milk substitute.  offer hard food.  provide fresh food.  put canned dog food in a bowl.  provide the droppings of an adult hamster.  provide a clean and warm environment. 

 Hamster mothers require 60% more protein than normal to make the milk necessary to keep baby hamsters health. Feed the mother hard-boiled egg, cooked but unseasoned beef and chicken, and mealworms., Allow a nursing hamster mom to have as many sunflower seeds as it wants. Also give her broccoli, sweet apple, cantaloupe, and peas. It is important that a mother be able to pass down substantial amounts of folic acid, Vitamin A, and Vitamin E to the babies through her milk., If a hamster is less than ten days old, it will probably die without mother’s milk. For that reason, it is imperative that you find a mother to adopt the infant. The mother, however, will only adopt a baby hamster if it believes that the baby is its own. You will need to trick the mother, else it turn against the baby and kill it.   Begin by warming up the baby hamster. Take it in your hands with a small towel. Begin rubbing the baby gently with the towel. When rubbing the baby, be sure to remove all remnants of its mother’s nest. Any outside smells will alert the new mother to the fact that the baby is not its own. Take some of the nesting material from the mother’s cage and rub it over the baby to make it smell familiar. Convince the mother to step away from its babies. Try giving it a treat. When it is away, put the adoptive babies with the nest with mother’s natural born babies. Be sure that the mother does not see the other babies being put into its nest. 

increase mom’s protein intake.  give mom vitamins for her milk.  find an adoptive mother. 

 Commercial produced pellets provide a good, nearly comprehensive source of nutrition. However, babies will have difficulty eating hard pellets. About ten days after birth begin feeding the hamster pellets. Immerse them in water and stir them they until they appear soft. Drain them and place them in a dish in the cage.Hamster moms don’t begin weaning children off of their milk until they are ten days old. For dwarf hamsters, the process of weaning will be over within three weeks. From ten days to three weeks old, you should begin feeding the babies progressively more. By three weeks after birth, you will be providing all of the nutrients for the babies., Seeds are an ideal source of nutrition for hamsters, but babies are not prepared to eat large seeds. Place a sprig of millet in the cage for the babies and their mother. Pulling the seeds from the sprig will provide a source of entertainment., Wheat germ can be purchased at most grocery stores.Sprinkle it around the nest. Use uncooked and unrefrigerated wheat germ., Baby hamsters should have unimpeded access to water at all times. In order to do that, the water bottle must be low enough that the babies can reach it. Consider placing a water dish directly in the cage at first, because the babies can inhale too much water from a hanging bottle..   At the same time, you need to be sure that the tube does not touch the bedding where the babies sleep. 

feed the babies soggy pellets.  offer small seeds.  sprinkle some wheat germ.  lower the water source. 

 Ideally, mothers will nurse baby hamsters for the first month of their lives. Other milks won't have the same balance of nutrients. If your baby hamster’s mother died before the hamster is weaned (usually 3-4 weeks after birth), you can act as a surrogate mother by feeding your baby hamster a milk mixture. Formulas designed for puppies or kittens also can work. These substitutes may cause diarrhea.   Combine equal parts evaporated milk and water. Heat the mixture to 90 degrees Fahrenheit before you give it to the baby. Use a syringe or specially designed feeding wick to feed the pup.; , The amount of formula you give your hamster depends on its type (dwarf or Syrian) and age. Generally, you will feed the hamster more milk in the beginning of its early life. Supplement formula with small seeds (like millet), wheat germs, and safe fruits and vegetables (e.g. broccoli, cauliflower, bananas).By the end of a month, you should wean your hamsters from the mixture.Dwarf hamsters under the age of two weeks should receive two syringe drops of formula in thirty minute intervals. You need to feed the hamster through the night. Once the hamster is two weeks and older, you can give him ½ milliliter of formula once per sixty minutes.Syrian hamsters need more milk. Twelve times daily, give these pups 1 milliliter of milk until they are two weeks in age. After this point, give them two milliliters of milk eight times throughout the day. Break vegetables and fruits into small pieces. For example, break one floret of broccoli into several smaller bite-sized amounts., When your hamsters (dwarf or Syrian) turn three weeks old, they will start to consume solids. At this point, begin to wean them from milk. Decrease the quantity of milk by half for one to two days. After this point, cease to give milk altogether.Dwarf hamsters will continue to nurse (or drink milk) until they are about 21 days old. Syrian hamsters will nurse a bit longer until they are 26-28 days old. 

create a milk mixture.  feed your hamster the milk mixture.  wean your hamsters from milk. 

 You can get hamster pellets from pet stores. They are often called lab blocks and are one inch long with a diameter of ½ inch.They contain seeds plus grains, and vitamins and minerals. Pellets ensure that your hamster receives all his necessary nutrients.Baby hamster food should have 18-20% protein and 7-9% fat content. Be sure to also include food high in carbohydrates. If you are going to buy hamster food, look at expiry dates. Realize feed typically lasts only three months before spoiling,Do not feed your pet expired hamster food. There could be hatched moth eggs within the bag., Place your hamster’s pellets in a bit of water. Wait until they are soft. They should not be so soft that they disintegrate. Rather they should have a mushy texture, which makes it easier for the hamsters to eat them., Place the pellets on the floor of the cage. Your hamsters can eat their food more easily when it is reachable. Generally speaking, baby hamsters can start eating solid foods when they turn ten days old. 

purchase hamster pellets.  soak pellets in water.  feed the pellets to the hamsters. 

 Although many adult hamsters get water through vegetables, it is also important to provide water--especially to babies.Place water drinking tubes low enough so the babies can reach them.Make sure water is filtered and sans chlorine.Change water every day.Never give your hamster chocolate, alcohol, or caffeine. These substances can harm your pet!, Hamsters need salt to keep water in their system. Salt generally keeps them healthy as well. In nature, they might lick rocks to receive needed sodium. To give a similar experience, buy salt licks at your pet store., When you want to feed your pet anything new, especially fruits and vegetables, speak with your vet first.Particularly, avoid treats that have a high sugar content. Vitamin and mineral supplements are also likely unnecessary but to be safe, speak with your vet first before giving your pet supplements. 

give them water.  provide salt licks.  introduce new foods cautiously. 

 Shredded white paper is a great choice for hamster bedding.Dry white paper is ideal hamster bedding for several reasons, one of which is the color—the white would allow you to notice if your hamster has an illness, such as diarrhea, or is bleeding from an injury.In addition, the ink on white paper does not rub off as easily as newspaper ink, meaning that your hamster’s fur would not get stained with ink.Use scissors to cut the paper into thin strips. It may be helpful to cut the strips into smaller sections so that your hamster can play with it and burrow in it more easily.; , Both toilet paper and tissue paper are comfortable bedding choices for your hamster.As with the white office paper, make strips of the toilet paper or tissue paper. Because toilet paper is so soft, it may be easier to tear it into strips with your hands.   You can also shred facial tissues with your hands to make hamster bedding., In addition to being a toy, an empty toilet paper roll can also be a source of comfortable bedding for your hamster. For larger hamsters, such as Syrian hamsters, you can cut the toilet paper roll into large strips and allow your hamster to shred it more himself.If you have a smaller hamster, like a Roborovski dwarf hamster, you may need to cut the toilet paper roll into smaller pieces that he will be able to shred more easily., Making your own bedding out of common household items can be fun. If you have a cat, you may have thought about putting cat litter in your hamster’s cage. However, cat litter is not recommended for several reasons, one of which is the litter’s rough texture that would be very uncomfortable for your hamster to walk around in.   In addition, the chemicals in cat litter to control odor can be very harmful to hamsters. Hamsters cannot digest cat litter. If your hamster tries to eat the litter, he may end up with an intestinal impaction that could make him very sick. If you try to use litter that clumps when it becomes wet, the clumps could become stuck in your hamster’s fur like small blocks of cement.  

create hamster bedding with dry white paper.  make bedding out of dry toilet paper or tissue paper.  cut up a dry toilet paper roll.  do not use cat litter to make hamster bedding. 

 Making your own hamster bedding with water is another option for saving some money on bedding. Before starting the process, gather all of your supplies in one place. Some of these supplies include a large bowl, plenty of dry paper (e.g., white paper, brown paper bags, old envelopes), an old t-shirt or colander, and a pair of gloves.You will also need some paper towels and/or a cookie sheet on which to dry the bedding. Making bedding with water can be a very messy process, so it would be best to work in a large sink, such as your kitchen sink. Make sure that you have a drain stopper to prevent paper pieces from going down the drain.The t-shirt or colander will be necessary for draining the water when the paper is fully soaked. Wearing a pair of gloves will keep your fingers from getting stained as the ink from the paper mixes with the water., In addition to being messy, making bedding with water can take a lot of energy. The smaller you make the pieces of paper, the less work you will have to do later in the process.Add the pieces to the bowl and place the bowl in the sink.  Add enough water to completely cover all of the paper.The temperature of the water does not matter. However, if you want to sift the paper with your hands to make sure all of the paper is thoroughly soaked, make sure the water is not too hot., After filling the bowl with water, allow the paper to soak for about five minutes before tearing it apart with your hands.Tear the paper into smaller pieces so that the water begins to look like a watery pulp.If you are impatient, you can start tearing the paper as soon as you add the water. However, the paper will be much easier to tear if you let it soak first., There are a few ways to drain the water—pouring the water and paper pieces into a colander or old t-shirt, or keeping the paper pieces in the original bowl and pouring out only the water.This step may be a little tricky, since you will have to be extra careful not to let any paper pieces go down the drain. To make this step easier, put the drain stopper in place before you start dumping out the water.   If you are using a colander, position it over the drain stopper and pour the water and paper pieces into the colander. Pieces of paper may slip through the holes of the colander. If the stopper fills up, clean it out by putting the pieces back in the original bowl. Press down on the paper in the colander to get out any excess water. If you prefer to use an old t-shirt, position it in the sink next to the drain (with the drain stopper in). Slowly pour the water and paper pieces onto the t-shirt. When you have finished pouring, roll up the t-shirt and wring out the excess water.Pouring out only the water from the original bowl creates less mess, but you may not be able to get all of the excess water as easily as using a colander or old t-shirt. Rinse and drain several times to get out all of the ink. The water will run clear when there is no more ink left., To start drying out the paper, you will first need to form it into balls. Use both of your hands to do this.Make sure not to make the balls too large or too tight—this could increase the amount of time it takes the paper to dry.   You could also form the paper into clumps, rather than balls. The clumps would be a little looser and shorten the drying process.Place the balls on some paper towels or a cookie sheet to allow them to dry.It may take a few days for the balls to dry.Periodically check on them to test their dryness. You may need to change out the paper towels if they get too damp.  After the balls of paper have dried out for a few days, you will need to break them apart. Depending on how much bedding you have made, breaking the balls apart may be tedious and time consuming. To relieve the tedium, consider turning on your favorite TV show or watching a movie.Place the broken-apart bedding on some paper towels. The bedding may still be a little damp, so you will probably need to dry it for even longer to make sure it is completely dry before adding it to your hamster’s cage. Spread the bedding out as thinly as possible to quicken the drying process.For odor control, you can sprinkle some baking soda on top of the bedding after you have broken it apart and are allowing it to dry., After the bedding is completely dry, you can add it to your hamster’s cage. For larger hamsters, add about three to four inches’ worth of bedding in the bottom of the cage. Smaller hamsters do not need as much bedding.It is okay if you add a lot of bedding. Remember that too much bedding is better than not enough. 

organize your supplies.  cut or tear the paper into small pieces.  fill the bowl with water.  tear the paper again.  drain the water.  form the paper into balls.  break apart the balls of paper.  add the bedding to your hamster’s cage. 

 This is for the hamster to enter or leave the container. Make sure that you do not use a tissue box or any other cardboard box with ink on it, if parts of the box are chewed and swallowed the ink can be harmful to your hamster.  This is for the hamster to be able to run out of the container from the hole.   You can bend the container and poke a hole in the middle first before cutting out the shape of a circle.  The size of the shapes will depend on the size of your hamster  , Let the glue dry up first before letting your hamsters play.  You are finished with your final product. Now you can let your hamster play with its new toy.  

cut off the slots of the container.  use the scissors and cut a hole in the middle of the container.  cut out various shapes in the container for the hamster to run in and out} (e.g squares, circles).  glue wrapping paper onto your container using non-toxic glue, if desired.this is to make the toy prettier.  ta-da! 

 No matter what type of cage you have (glass aquarium, plastic, metal bars, even bird cages!) you can make platforms! If you are going for a cheap and inexpensive way, use cardboard. It is easy to cut and use (Just grab them at your local store and ask for a medium to large size cardboard box). Wood platforms are a little more expensive and time consuming. You must use a saw to cut the wood.  Where would you like the platform? How high should it be?  , Cut it at the same length (If you have a glass or plastic cage) or 2 inches (5.1 cm) over the length (for wire cages).  Now if you have a wire cage, slide it in. If you have a glass cage, duct tape it around all the sides and bottom or the platform. , Link together ropes and ladders, cardboard pieces, and yarn to create a hamster heaven!  

choose a material.  measure the length of the cage.  grab a cardboard box.  place the platform.  if you have a wire cage, cut the remaining pieces off, but leave 1 inch (2.5 cm) on both sides for supporters.  ,  add different bridges and cross-overs to your hamster's cage. 

 You'll need:   Your hamster's favorite food (ideally one that includes lots of the crumbly bites and pellets, and with a strong smell) An empty hamster treat log or  a silicone ice cube tray (should be silicone so you can get the bites out) Hot water (kettle, pan, however you heat your water) or peanut butter (chunky or smooth)  The peanut butter makes the treat extra special, but shouldn't be used too often. The water is healthier for regular use.   Any other extra seeds or little bites to add into the mix; , Use as much as you want, depending on how much filling you want.  Using a kettle is the easiest.  Crush some of the crumbly brown bites as they will dissolve and create a paste.   If desired, you can skip the water and scoop some peanut butter into the bowl of food, instead, and stir. Make sure it is not too much, because it is very fatty and your hamster doesn't need much. And remember when feeding it to him, peanut butter is a treat and shouldn't be used for everyday.  Granted, it will not look very attractive, but that's not really what your hamster cares about. , You do not need to be accurate.  At this point it will be a bit too cold, and there is a chance it might snap your hamsters teeth. Just leave it out somewhere in room temperature, and it will warm up a little, without turning back into a paste.  Just plop the log into the hamsters cage, or pop out of the ice cube tray and let your hamster enjoy.  

gather your ingredients and supplies.  put some of your hamster's food in a bowl.  boil some water.  pour the water into the bowl of food and stir.  keep stirring until there is a paste with seeds, instead of water with seeds.  scoop your mix into the log/silicone ice-cube tray.  ,  place into the freezer for an hour or so.  when the paste in the mix has hardened, you can take it out.  serve it up. 

 A playpen needs to be a safe place for your hamster to explore, so it shouldn't be made of materials a hamster can climb or chew. Corrugated plastic is a great option as it is not only slippery, it can easily be cut to any size you need. Another great option is a large Rubbermaid-type container with tall sides.You can attach pieces of plastic together with anything from binder clips to duct tape. Plastic is also really easy to clean and is unlikely to stain. If you decide to use a Rubbermaid-type container for a playpen, never put the lid on the container while your hamster is inside unless you’ve provided proper ventilation.; , Your hamster’s playpen can either just have walls, or you can also build a bottom. If you’re able to place the playpen on a tile or wood floor, you may not need a bottom as the floor may be easy to clean. If you’re going to put the playpen on a carpet, you may want to include a bottom.A bottom is also useful as the playpen will be much easier to pick-up and move while keeping all the toys inside. Each item inside the playpen would have to be moved separately if you build a playpen with no bottom or floor.  Ideally your hamster’s playpen should be bigger than his cage. But, it will also need to fit somewhere in your home on the floor. Plus, you will need to store your hamster’s playpen when he isn’t using it. Take all of these things into consideration when deciding how large you want the playpen to be. In the end it doesn’t matter how big or small it is, as long as it works for you and your hamster.  If you want to give your hamster a place to explore, but you need time to collect the proper materials to build a more permanent playpen, consider using a large box for the time being. A box that a large item was pack in would work best, such as a TV, printer, toaster oven, microwave, etc.A box won’t be able to be a permanent playpen because your hamster will likely chew through eventually. Plus, if your hamster pees inside the box, you won’t be able to clean it up. Consider placing a large plastic bag or garbage bag under the box to help protect your floor.  A hamster maze can be built for use inside your hamster’s playpen, cage, or even on its own. While there are many commercially available hamster maze pieces available at the pet store, you can also build your own using empty plastic bottle (e.g. water bottles, pop bottles, juice bottles, etc.)   Make sure to completely wash and dry the bottles before using them to make a maze. You will need to cut either the top, bottom, or edges of the plastic bottles, depending on the design of your maze. Cutting the plastic will create sharp edges that can injure your hamster. Use duct or electrical tape around the sharp edges to blunt them and make them safe. Use the same tape to connect multiple bottles together. You can connect the bottles end-to-end, or cut a hole in the side of one bottle so a second bottle can be attached at a 90 degree angle.  Use smaller boxes, cans, tins, and anything else you can find that your hamster can climb up and down on. This will provide your hamster with multiple levels within his playpen to explore. You can even get creative and attach these items together in such a way that you create a maze for your hamster to find his way through.Make sure your playpen has at least one place where you hamster can hide while he’s in the playpen. Having a place to hide will make your hamster feel safe if he gets nervous or scared. A great place to look for homemade items is your recycling bin. Just make sure to thoroughly clean any items you decide to use. And make sure to blunt sharp edges with tape or padding.  The purpose of the playpen is so that your hamster has a larger area to run around and play. While some hamsters may be happy with a big open space, adding additional items to the playpen will give your hamster some much needed enrichment. Place items such as the following inside the playpen for your hamster to play with:Toilet paper or paper towel tubes. You can attach multiple tubes together to create a long tunnel. Old shoes. Your hamster will enjoy climbing in and out of the shoe, and using it as hiding place. Bridges, see-saws, and swings. You can make your own, or buy hamster-specific versions at the pet store. Wooden, mineral, or salt blocks. While your hamster may climb these blocks, the real purpose is to give your hamster something to chew on.  Use boxes and toys from your hamster’s playpen to make a food puzzle. Combine multiple items together in such a way that your hamster has to explore them to find a treat. You can also build a maze with a food treat at the end.Make sure any food your give your hamster inside his playpen is deducted from his daily food allocation. If you give your hamster extra food and treats while he’s in his playpen, your hamster made get a little pudgy.  Even if your hamster has a wheel in his cage, placing a free standing wheel inside his playpen will give him another view while he runs. Make sure the wheel is made from a continuous piece of material and not wires or bars. Wheels made from wires or bars can cause your hamster to get one or both of his feet stuck and could cause serious injury., Hamster balls are a great way for your hamster to explore the big world outside his cage without getting lost or stuck. Hamster balls are usually large hard plastic balls with a hatch that can open and close so you can place your hamster inside. Once the hatch is closed, the outside of the ball is smooth so it can roll in any direction. If you don’t have an area within your home that’s safe for your hamster to explore in his hamster ball, consider make a large playpen and placing the hamster ball inside.   Using a combination of a playpen and a hamster ball will limit the area your hamster can explore, thus making it safer for your hamster and more convenient for you. Keep your hamster’s time in a hamster ball to 15 minutes or less. Once he’s finished with his hamster ball, put him back in his cage for a rest., Before you go to take your hamster out of his cage and place him in his playpen, wash and dry your hands. If you’re going to do something else while your hamster is in his playpen, make sure to wash your hands again before touching other items. When putting your hamster back into his cage, again, wash your hands before and after handling your hamster.Hamsters can have ‘accidents’ while in your hands, or climbing around their playpens, so it’s a good idea to always wash your hands before you do anything else. Hamsters also have a really great sense of smell, but very poor eye sight. If they smell food on your hands and fingers, they may bite you thinking it is food. Washing the smell of food of your hands before touching your hamster can save you from dealing with painful bites.  While a quick visit to the bathroom or the kitchen should be okay, you shouldn’t leave your hamster alone in his playpen unsupervised. Your hamster made need your assistance if he ever gets stuck or if he manages to escape.It would also be helpful to close any doors to the room where you’ve placed your hamster’s playpen, just in case he does manage to escape. If the doors are closed, you’ll have a much smaller space to search for your hamster.  Even if your hamster is only going to be in his playpen for a short period of time, it’s always a good idea to include a small water bowl just in case he gets thirsty. This may be even more important if you’re giving him dry treats or kibble inside the playpen.Hamster water bottles that hang on the side of a cage may not work in a playpen. Instead, just use a small bowl of water that your hamster can easily reach.  As long as you supervise your hamster, he should be just fine. But if he’s a Syrian hamster who is a little plump, you may want to avoid giving him any tunnelling materials like toilet paper or paper towel tubes. Unfortunately your hamster may misjudge his own size and get himself stuck inside one of these tubes!If he does get stuck, gently help him get out of the tube using just your hands. Don’t use any sharp objects to cut the cardboard while your hamster is inside.  

build the walls of the playpen with something slippery.  decide if you want to build the playpen with a bottom.  determine the size of the playpen you want.  use large boxes as a temporary playpen.  connect empty plastic bottles together to build a hamster maze.  add multiple levels to the playpen.  include play stations for your hamster to explore.  create food puzzles for the playpen.  place a free-standing wheel inside the playpen.  put your hamster in a hamster ball.  wash your hands before and after your play with your hamster.  supervise your hamster while he’s in his playpen.  provide water for your hamster in his playpen.  be careful when using toilet paper or paper towel tubes. 

 Hamsters will try to chew them, potentially dying or starting a house fire. Make sure all cables are secured high out of reach, taping them to the wall if necessary. It may also help to install plastic "trunking" around the cables, to slow the hamster's access.; , Check the entire perimeter of the wall at hamster height. Spackle or block off any holes, even the smallest ones. Hamsters can keep chewing at these gaps until they're large enough to escape through.  Lilies, Amaryllis, and most plants that emerge from a bulb can be toxic to hamsters. When in doubt about whether the plant is harmful, move the plant to another room.  Move any fragile or heavy objects that could fall over if the hamster knocked them, or if you bumped the furniture. Gather anything laying on the ground, especially sharp objects and pieces small enough for the hamster to eat.  If you have cats or dogs in the house, put up a barrier in the doorway so they can't slip in after you.  Second hand smoke may harm your hamster's health.  Put a portable animal gate or other barrier at the base of couches and beds. If the hamster does find its way into a crevice, you can usually lure it out with treats — but it saves effort to prepare in advance.  Hamsters can chew through plastic cage bars, and sometimes can open the doors of a cheap model. A glass or plastic reptile tank with a mesh top could be a good alternative.   If you are using a cage, consider placing it inside a large plastic tub.  Give the hamster some safe objects to play with, and some tunnels or structures to run around in and hide. You can easily make your own toys out of cardboard tubes and boxes.  Never use cedar or pine shavings, which are toxic to many small animals. Look up reviews of other bedding products before buying, as heavy bedding intended for a larger pet could suffocate the hamster.  Protect your escaped hamster by following the precautions above throughout your house. Keep a close eye on cats or dogs, and don't turn on the vacuum until you know he's safe in his cage.   Roll up rugs and set them aside to protect them from shredding. Move house plants up out of reach. When leaving the house, look around on the floor before opening the door. Check behind the appliance before using the oven or stove. If the hamster is hiding behind it when you turn it on, the heat could kill it.  Turn off all television and radio so you can hear the hamster. Sometimes you can hear them scurrying or even nibbling on some crumbs of food they've found.  Keep a lightweight towel nearby so you can throw it over the hamster if you see it. You may be able to catch the hamster with your bare hands, but that can be difficult.  A line of treats leading into the hamster cage can lure some hamsters back. Many hamsters will simply leave again after eating, but it's an easy method to try.  A shoe box with a hole in it may entice a hamster looking for a hiding spot, especially if there are other animals in the house. Lead the hamster there with a line of treats, and put a little water dish inside. Check back daily to see if the hamster is there.   Put the shoe box in a closet or other out-of-the-way location. Don't forget to remove the silica gel packet from the box, and from any other boxes within hamster reach.  Choose the room where you last saw hamster poops, chew marks, or the hamster itself. Stuff gaps under the door with towels or fabric. Keep all windows closed, and cover all heat and air vents.  Place a few treats in the center of the sealed room and leave them there overnight. If they're gone the next day, the hamster is in that room. If not, seal another room and try again.  Place a bucket on the floor, with books positioned as stairs for your hamster to climb. Lay down a line of treats going up the "staircase", onto the lip of the bucket, and on the floor of the bucket. With any luck, the hamster will fall in trying to get the treats, and not be able to get out. 

hide all power cords.  fill cracks and holes in the wall.  get rid of poisonous plants.  check for other hazards.  keep other pets away.  don't smoke in the same room.  block access to narrow spaces.  hamster-proof the cage as well.  provide hamster toys.  use appropriate bedding.  make your house hamster-friendly.  keep the house quiet.  be prepared to catch the hamster.  leave the cage door open.  create a safe place for the hamster.  seal off a room where the hamster might be.  put down treats to locate the hamster.  set a bucket trap. 

 Use either two large cardboard boxes or four medium sized boxes. Go to a nearby store, or ask your parents to take you. Try to find boxes that are as clean as possible.If you want a pen with higher sides, go with four medium boxes. Otherwise, two large boxes will be fine, especially for a small pet like hamster.; , Once you’ve found some boxes, flatten each out if the store you got them from didn’t already. Do this by undoing the flaps that fold together to make the bottom, or if cut them if they’re taped. Once the boxes are broken down, cut a corner where two sides come together, so that the boxes lay out complexly flat.Use scissors or a craft blade, and ask an adult to help you if you’re not allowed to use sharp objects without supervision.  After you’ve completely flattened the boxes, cut off the lid flaps that used to be the tops and bottoms. You can either discard the flaps once you’ve cut them off, or save them to use them for another project. After cutting off the flaps, you should just be left with long, cardboard rectangles.If you’re using four boxes, just flatten each and cut the flaps off of each box the same way you’d do for two big boxes.  If you’re started with two large boxes, cut each in half length-wise, or horizontally. Use a ruler or yardstick and a pen to make a line down the center to guide you. You should be left with total of four long strips.If you started with four medium sized boxes, you can just use the rectangular strips as they are after you cut off the flaps.  Take each long, rectangular cardboard strip and mark out a line about an inch from the end. If you lay out each strip flat, the line should go from the top to the center on two strips, and from the center to the bottom on the other two. These will fit together to form the pen’s borders.Don’t cut the slots too thick, or they won’t fit together snugly and the pen won’t be as stable.  Find an area of your house with a hard floor surface, preferably tile so it won’t absorb any messes your pet might make. Give the floor a quick sweep and wipe it down with a wet paper towel to make sure there’s no crumbs or anything you wouldn’t want your hamster to eat. Line the strips’ slots up, and fit them together so they’re snug., Grab any toys that are removable from your pet’s cage, and place them in its pen. Use any other hamster toys you might have, such as tubes, dens, or plastic balls. Make rooms using tissue boxes by cutting out doors so the hamster can get in or out, or fold up the flaps you cut off the boxes to make little hamster teepees.  

get medium or large cardboard boxes.  flatten the box.  cut off the lids.  make four long strips.  cut slots in each strip.  put the pen together.  fill the pen with your hamster’s favorite toys. 

 Visit a nearby grocery or department store. Tag along with mom or dad next time they go shopping. Ask someone who works at the store for the biggest box they have in the back.   If you get a box from a grocery store, make sure doesn’t have any food, grease, or dirt stains. Department or electronics stores are great because their boxes usually don’t have any grime that sometimes come with grocery store big boxes.  Place a soft old towel at the bottom of the box. Cover the towel with a hamster-friendly bedding or litter. These include wood shavings, shaved corn cob, coarse sand, and other materials that you can find at your local pet store that are marked hamster-safe.Make sure the litter is marked chemical free and safe for pets. Stay away from straw, because the tough strands can hurt the hamster’s cheeks. Also avoid fluffy bedding products like cotton wool because they can stuck in the hamster’s toes and feet.  Use smaller boxes, like tissue boxes, to create levels for your hamster to explore. Cut off lids so the boxes don’t have tops and bottoms, then cut out little doors for the hamster to get in or out. If you use tissue boxes, make sure you get rid of all its plastic and serrated, or sharp, edges at the opening. 

find a large box.  cover the box’s bottom.  create multiple levels. 

 Make sure to fill your hamster's new playground with toys, whether you built a multi-level box playground, or made a collapsible pen. If you keep toys and obstacles in your hamster cage that are removable, grab them so it can play in its new playpen or box. Use a tray to put treats in your pen, too. Try putting them around the pen in various places for your hamster to find.  Use an empty paper towel or toilet paper rolls to make tunnels for your hamster. Make sure that they’re big enough for your pet to get through. Create a bigger tunnel system by pushing the cardboard rolls into any other hamster tubes you might have, like ones made out of either a chewable material or out of plastic.  Stock up on empty tissue boxes, cereal boxes, boxes that hold canned soda, and other household cardboard boxes. The size of these smaller boxes will depend on the size of the box or pen you used for the playground. Cut doors in them and make a little city for your hamster to explore.  Take a trip to the hardware store, or have your parents bring you. Find a short length of flexible, plastic tubing for plumbing. Use the largest tubing you can find: one with the longest circumference, or longest around. Cut it in half length-wise so you’re left with two long slide shapes. If you or a parent is handy with wood, you can make a ladder for the slide with a small wood frame or box. Use non-toxic glue to attach 5 to 10 wooden dowels for the ladder’s rungs. You can also get an adult to drill holes through the wooden frame and use a hammer to tap the dowels through them.Use a small, solid square of wood for the slide’s top platform. Drills holes and use screws or dowels to attach it to the wooden ladder, or glue them together using non-toxic glue.Have an adult drill holes through the slide shape and the wood square, and use a screw to attach the slide to the square’s underside. Sand out a groove in the platform so the slide fits better. Make sure the pointy end of the screw doesn’t poke through the top side of the wood square.Finally, if you’d like to add some color, use food coloring and water to stain the wood parts of your hamster’s new slide. 

use toys and tubes from the hamster cage.  use cardboard tubes to create tunnels.  cut out entrances and exits on little boxes.  make a hamster slide. 

 You may want to buy a slightly larger size, because hamsters grow just like us, and one day they may just grow out of their little hideout!; , Just put a bit into the house and leave the rest just by the house.  Hamsters normally like to arrange the stuff themselves.  Your hamster won't like to fall asleep on a pile of hamster dung.  If they do not like it, try using softer and less or more toilet paper.  Eating toilet paper can cause some problems for hamsters.  

buy a cute hamster hideout.  take some toilet paper and tear it into thin strips.  don't do any big, fancy arrangements.  give them fresh paper if they soil their sleeping area.  make sure they have plenty of room and feel comfortable.  check they have not eaten the paper. 

 Buy tubes and little toys (non-toxic), or you can make them yourself. Make sure the cage is at least 360 sq inches of floor space, which is the minimum for hamster cages. Keep in mind that the majority of cages sold at pet stores are far too small and really costly.; ,,, Make sure your dream house is safe but fun for you hamster and make sure it can't escape. ,, Make one room like a kitchen. Fill it with shredded paper, mixed treats, and food in with it. Make another room with one hole in a dead end that could be a bedroom filled it with some kind of bedding. Another room can be a living room with the water bottles in it and something for the hamster to crawl on like furniture. Add another room with the exercise wheel, then a play room. Let your imagination go wild. Its up to you!  

buy a hamster cage and hamster.  make sure you have a lot of bedding and comfy places and stuff for your hamster to sleep on.  ,  get a collection of giant, medium and small boxes, also as many toilet roll tubes as you can get your hands on.  ,  with your materials in mind, draw plan for how to design your dream house for your hamster.  hold the tube up to the box and draw around the circle, then cut out the circle on the box, make sure the tube will fit through the hole in the box.  ,  cut the holes in all the boxes once per box or twice, its up to you.  ,  make each room with a purpose. 

 The smallest bin you should get is 106 quarts. If possible, buy the bins with 110-120 quarts. These cost around $11-$15, possibly even more depending on where you are buying from. Common stores to buy bins from are Walmart, Target, Hobby Lobby, Lowes, Home Depot, etc.; ,, Cut out a wire a little bit bigger than what you just marked.  Be sure to be patient, slow and steady so you don't crack the plastic.  Place florist wire or wire insert down and begin to lace the picture wire or other wire through the florist wire or wire insert. Lace through all drilled holes.  Do this twice on the wide sides and once on the long sides. Drill on the TOP, not near the bottom of the bin. , Congrats on making a great cage!  

choose a large, clear bin with lots of floor space and high-ish walls, and a lid that fits.  make sure you have the following: electric drill, hacksaw, wire mesh (also know as chicken wire), and zip-ties.  ,  outline a big area on the lid or side to be cut.  cut or drill the area to be cut.  drill lots of holes on each side of the hole.  drill 4 holes in a diamond shape.  if you want to make the lid extra extra secure, use a hot glue gun to glue down the wire insert or florist wire too.  ,  you're done! 

 The best place is a small animal carrier. In fact, a cat carrier will work fine if the wire is close enough together on the door. You can also use a hamster ball, but make sure you have someone to supervise the hamster.   Consider wearing throwaway gloves for this process so you don't spread germs.; , Take all the toys, bowls, and shelters out of the cage. Shake the bedding out into a garbage bag. Make sure to not shake the bedding out in a food area, as small animals can carry bacteria such as Salmonella.Everything in the cage can carry smells. Therefore, it's important to clean all parts of the cage, including the toys and accessories.  Before deodorizing, clean the cage with a cleanser specifically made for hamster cages or a mild soap. You can use dishwashing soap, for instance, and hot water. Wash everything thoroughly, including the food and water bowls and the accessories.Just be sure not to clean the cage in the kitchen because of the possibility of spreading bacteria. Outside or in the bathtub works best. Use a dedicated sponge and soap to clean the cage, even if you're using dishwashing soap. Using a basic soap gets out most of the feces and urine, helping to deodorize the cage.  Pick a cleaner that will help deodorize. You can use an all-in-one cleaner to clean and deodorize or clean and then use a deodorizer. For instance, cleaning products with enzymes will help the cage smell better.Simpler options include baking soda or vinegar after you've cleaned the cage with soap and water. To use baking soda, sprinkle some in the cage and wipe it clean with a wet sponge. For vinegar, wet the sponge with vinegar and use it to wipe down the cage., Once you are done, make sure you rinse the cage an accessories thoroughly. You don't want any residue left on the cage that could bother your hamster.Rinsing gets rid of any smells that may bother your hamsters. While you don't want it to smell like hamster, you also don't want it to smell like cleaner to your hamster. Let the cage dry before putting your animals back in.  When choosing bedding, stick to aspen if you want to use wood chips. Other types of wood can be harmful to hamsters.You can also use shredded paper with the wood shavings or bedding made from recycled paper.You also can use a couple of other plant-based beddings available at your pet store. These beddings are absorbent. Just be sure to pick one that is plant-based, not ones that are artificial.If you use shredded paper, make sure to use paper without ink. However, paper won't absorb odors as well as other plant-based beddings. Aspen is better at hiding odors than paper, but it's not as good as the more absorbent plant-based beddings. The more absorbent the bedding is, the more it tends to hide odors.To make sure your bedding is ready for your hamster, you can put it in a zip-top bag and let it sit in the freezer for 2 days. That way, any mites that might be living in it will die off., When you're done, be sure to wash your hands thoroughly. Washing your hands helps prevent the spread of bacteria. 

place your hamster in a safe place.  take everything out of the cage.  use a mild soap to clean the cage.  deodorize.  rinse thoroughly.  put in fresh bedding.  wash your hands. 

 The best way to keep a hamster cage smelling fresh is to clean it often. Aim for at least once a week to help keep odors down.If you have trouble remembering, try setting an alarm on your phone to go off when you need to clean the cage. Try adding cage cleaning to your weekend chores, so you remember to do it each week.  Sprinkling baking soda on the bottom of the cage can help absorb odors. Just add the baking soda before you put in the hamster's bedding.Baking soda is a good way to keep your cage smelling great, as it is readily available and very cheap.  Whenever you clean the cage, make sure to always use fresh bedding. If you try to reuse bedding, it can contribute to the smell.You need to change out the bedding because it can build urine and feces over time, even if you have a litter box. However, some people suggest adding a bit of used bedding back in to help the hamster re-acclimate to the cage.  Pet stores offer supplements for small rodents. These supplements can help cut down on odors that your animals produce, which can cut down on odors overall.Generally, these products either have yucca schidigera in them, or they are amino acid based.More research needs to be done on how effective these are for hamsters, but they are generally safe., Whenever possible, get as much air flowing in the area to help clean out the smell. Try opening windows or running your air conditioner.Another option is running air purifiers to help the air smell better.You can also install better air filtration systems at the central level. 

clean the cage once a week.  add a layer of baking soda.  always use fresh bedding.  try a supplement.  ventilate the area. 

 One way to keep your hamster's cage smelling fresh is to train it to use a litter box. That way, you can change out the smelly part more often.Not all hamsters can be trained. However, it is worth the effort to try if you want the room to smell better.  That way, you can use the same spot for a litter box.To find the area where your hamster has been peeing, look for wet or soiled areas. You might see clumped bedding in that area.  You have a number of options for hamster litter boxes. You can buy a litter box designed specifically for hamsters, or you can make one.You find litter boxes online or at pet stores. Alternatively, you can use boxes, as well as plastic, glass, or ceramic dishes. Boxes absorb pee and you can throw them away, but you may find that your hamster chews them up. You can cut tissue boxes shorter for this purpose. Glass, plastic, and ceramic all work well, but you may find your hamster stands on the edge and still pees outside the box., Add sand or small animal litter. You can use play sand for this purpose, but you need to sterilize it first. Litter is also an option, but it can be more expensive. It does absorb odors, though.If you use play sand, be sure to sterilize it in the oven by baking it at a low temperature for an hour or two. You can keep the sand in giant covered bucket for use.Pet stores do sell sand for chinchillas that is already sterilized, but it is more expensive. Hamsters like the feel of sand., Stick the litter box where the hamster has already been going to the bathroom. It can help to stick some soiled bedding in there that already smells like the hamster.You are trying to play on the hamster's habits. If the hamster has already chosen one place to go to the bathroom, you can use that to help train it. Sticking soiled bedding in it helps it smell like the hamster, which encourages it to go there.  While you can change the litter more often than you clean the cage, try not to change it every day. Your hamster likes habits, and when you change the habitat to often, it will get upset.Instead of changing the whole litter, you can also use a scoop to pull out feces and pee (if you see wet spots).As the litter gets low, replace it.  

train your hamster to use a litter box.  start by cleaning the whole cage.as you do, note where your hamster has been peeing, if possible.  buy or create a litter box.  fill the litter box.  put it in the bathroom corner.  change the litter. 

 Hamsters live in individual burrows in the wild and need a cage or tank that mimics this environment as best as possible.Get an aquarium tank or a solid-bottomed wire cage to ensure that your hamster has enough space.   Make sure any tank is at least 10 gallons (37.9 L), though consider getting the largest one you can afford. Make sure the tank or cage has a wire mesh top to keep your hamster from escaping.Consider getting your habitats secondhand to save money if you have several hamsters. Check them for flaws or cracks, which may not be worth the savings. Be aware that you should only have one hamster per habitat because they are territorial, solitary, and may be aggressive. Buy individual tanks or cages for each animal.This can also prevent unwanted reproduction.; , Hamsters are very sensitive to temperature changes and their surroundings. Place the tank or cage inside of your home in a spot that is warm and away from other pets that may scare or harm your hamster.Make sure the area is in a spot that has a consistent temperature between 65 to 70 degrees Fahrenheit (20 to 25 Celsius).Avoid places that get drafts, such as garages or breezeways, or are exposed to high heat from direct sunlight or heating devices. These can undermine your hamster’s health or kill it. Instead, consider putting the hamster cage in your living, dining, or entertainment room. A finished and heated basement or kitchen may also work. Remember to keep the cage away from food preparation or storage surfaces. Be aware that hamsters are nocturnal and may keep you awake if the cage is in your bedroom.  Your hamster’s habitat will need bedding to make her home comfortable and ready for burrowing. Line the cage with at least 2 inches of bedding and add more paper material for nests.Line the habitat with Timothy hay, aspen shavings, processed corncob or pelleted bedding. You can purchase these at many pet and home stores. Avoid pine and cedar chips, the fumes of which can harm your hamster. Place some paper towels or tissues along with the bedding for your hamsters to make nests.  Beyond bedding, your hamster will need toys and places in which to hide and sleep.Decorate the tank or cage to promote your hamster’s health.   Place an exercise wheel in the habitat. Hamsters love to play and the wheel will allow them to run around and get exercise. Incorporate a small box or item such as a flowerpot where your hamster can sleep and hide. Cardboard tubing, such as a toilet paper roll, is also a great option.Include a chew toy for your hamster made out of a safe material such as unpainted wood, dog biscuit or rawhide. Like other rodents, hamsters’ teeth grow continuously and having something on which to chew can wear down their teeth and keep them healthy.Get several toys and place them in your hamster’s habitat to keep her busy and happy.  Hamsters eat hamster mix, which contains seeds, grains, cracked corn and pellets to promote their health. Your hamster also needs a water bottle to ensure her hydration.Put the food in a small dish and refill it as necessary. You can also offer your hamster small, bite-sized amounts of fresh fruits and veggies such as spinach, lettuce, carrots, or apples. Make sure to avoid chocolate, candy, and junk food. Attach a water bottle with a drinking tube to the side of the cage. Make sure the tube allows fresh water to flow continuously., You will need to do general spot cleaning of your hamster’s habitat on a daily basis. At least once a week, you should remove all bedding and clean the entire cage as well as the surrounding area. This promotes the health and happiness of your hamster.   Clean up feces, old food, or soiled bedding every day. You can easily do this when refilling your hamster’s food and water. Disinfect and clean the cage at least once a week or more often if necessary. You’ll need to replace the bedding, disinfect the habitat walls, and wash the food and water dishes.  Take your hamster out of her habitat and put her in a safe place while you do this. This can allow you to safely clean the cage without your hamster nipping you.Allow your hamster to have “outside time” in a safe space while you clean. Make sure he is in an area that is screened off or secured so that he can’t escape. You could also put him in a separate cage or your bathtub, so long as the drain is covered. Some other places you could put her are in a hamster ball, a securely covered and ventilated box, or even an empty dresser drawer. Give your hamster food pellets to occupy him while you clean. It’s important to either place your hamster in a space that is secure or where you can watch him.  Keeping your hamster’s food dish refilled and clean helps him stay healthy and happy. Put new food into the dish as needed and wash the dish at least once a week.Give your hamster just enough food to keep her from getting hungry. Remove crumbs or any other material, like feces, before you refill your hamster’s food dish. Clean the dish with hot, soapy water or in your dishwasher at least once a week. If your hamster sprayed or defecated in it, you’ll also need to remove the food and disinfect it. Allow the dish to dry completely before putting in new food to prevent bacterial growth.  It’s vital to the health of your hamster that she have clean and fresh water every day. Pour out water at least once a day and replace it with fresh water.Remove anything floating in the water before you refill it. Clean the bottle in hot, soapy water if necessary. Check to ensure the water is flowing properly from the tube once it is clean. You can do this by placing your finger under the bottle and pressing on it. Wash the bottle in hot, soapy water or your dishwasher at least once a week.  Your hamster will urinate and defecate usually on one spot of her bedding. You can remove soiled areas daily but you should replace all of the bedding at least once a week. This minimizes the risk of infection and reduces odor.   Remove any soiled areas of bedding and droppings every day. Your hamster may use the same spot to urinate and defecate so focus cleaning and removal on that spot as a part of daily cleaning. Make sure to replace any soiled paper towels or tissues. Clean and disinfect the habitat walls and floor at least once a week and more often if needed. You can use a disinfectant or a vinegar and water mixture. Allow the habitat to dry thoroughly before you replace any bedding, toys, or dishes. This prevents the growth of bacteria or ammonia that can harm your hamster., Just as the dishes and bedding can get soiled, so can your hamster’s toys and hiding spaces. Once a month, clean all of the toys and replace anything that is broken or could harm your hamster.   Use a mixture of vinegar and water to clean your hamster’s toys including her exercise wheel. Wipe them off and then allow them to dry completely. As the toys dry, inspect them for cracks or other flaws that could harm your hamster. Consider throwing away broken toys. Avoid disinfecting chew toys because cleaners can harm your hamster. Instead, throw them away and replace them with new wood blocks, dog biscuits, or chew toys. Throw away any paper toys and replace them with new ones to prevent bacteria growth.  If your hamster lives in a wire cage, she may kick out bits of bedding or food into the area around it. Vacuum or sweep up any areas around her cage that are soiled and disinfect them if necessary.   Disinfect any areas of the floor or walls on which your hamster sprayed with a disinfectant cleaner or mixture of vinegar and water.  Once you’ve cleaned your hamster’s home, reintroduce to him to it. Give him a treat for behaving while you cleaned.  

buy a tank or cage.  set the habitat in a warm spot indoors.  add bedding to the habitat.  jazz up the habitat.  create space for food and water dishes.  clean the habitat regularly.  put your hamster in a safe place while cleaning.  refill the food.  refresh water in the bottle.  replace the bedding.  disinfect toys and hiding spaces.  sweep and clean the habitat area.  return your hamster to his cleaned cage. 

 The recommended minimum size for your hamster’s cage is at least 18 inches (width) x 13 inches (height) x 25 inches (length), which is equal to 450 square inch floor space, which is the minimum for humanely housing a hamster of any type. The 13 inch height is to allows you to fit a 10-12 inch wheel for a Syrian hamster. However, bigger is always better, since your hamster will want plenty of space to run, climb, and play.Your hamster will also want to have separate areas to go to the bathroom, sleep, and store food, which will necessitate a very spacious cage.If you will be housing more than one hamster in the same cage, the cage will need to be even bigger to give each hamster plenty of room. A good guideline to follow is the minimum floor space times the number of hamsters to be put in the cage Some Dwarf hamsters can be housed together in pairs, but only in same-sex pairs to prevent breeding. Roborovski and Russian Campbells are the best hamsters to be housed in pairs. Keep in mind that Syrian hamsters are very territorial and should never be housed together.However, they can be housed near each other in separate cages, so long as they can't be disturbed by each others presence. So a rule of thumb should be to separate their cage by 4-6 inches.; , A poorly ventilated cage can lead to the build-up of ammonia, which is toxic to your hamster and can lead to respiratory problems.Poorly ventilated cages can also lead to bacterial growth, which could also make your hamster sick.Wire cages tend be very well ventilated, but aquariums and plastic hamster cages are often poorly ventilated.Your hamster may start to have trouble breathing if his aquarium or plastic cage is not well ventilated. If you notice that he is not breathing properly or looks unwell in general (not eating, playing as much or has physical signs of illness), consider cleaning his cage to remove soiled bedding. You may also want to consider purchasing a wire cage, that is of adequate size.  You will need clean your hamster’s cage once or twice a week depending on your cage, so you will want a cage that will not be too difficult to clean. Wire cages are probably the easiest type of cage to clean. Aquariums and plastic cages may need more frequent cleaning because of their poor ventilation, but this most likely won't be an issue if your cage is the minimum size or above.Plastic cages are the most difficult to clean, since they often have many different components, are multi-level, and have twists and turns that could be a challenge for you to reach.No matter which type of cage you have, it would be helpful to have a secondary, smaller cage that you can put your hamster in while you are cleaning his main cage or away travelling with your hamster. , Your hamster’s nails could get caught in a grated or wire floor, which often leads to foot injuries. Also, solid plastic floors are easier to clean than grated floors., If you have a Syrian hamster, you will likely be fine with any type of cage, as long as it is the minimum size or larger and has places for him to play, sleep, and eat. However, if you have a smaller species of hamster (i.e., Chinese, Dwarf), you will need to be more careful with the type of cage you choose. For example, you will need to pay special attention to the spacing between the wires of a wire cage (no more than 1/2 inch of spacing), since a tiny hamster could squeeze through those spaces.An aquarium or plastic cage may be better for your Chinese or dwarf hamster, since he would not be able to escape easily., The fact that your hamster’s cage is an important investment does not mean that you have to find the most expensive one that you can find. Small wire cages tend to be inexpensive, but wire cages of the minimum size or more are extremely costly. Plastic cages are also expensive, and most of the time don't even come close to the minimum cage size. Aquariums or bin cages can usually be your best bet. 

select the right-sized cage for your hamster.  select a cage that is well ventilated.  choose a cage that is easy to clean.  choose a cage that has a solid plastic floor.  determine which cage type would be ideal for your species of hamster.  select a cage that fits your budget. 

 Check that nobody wants it for play, heirloom keeping or for fetching a fortune on eBay because once you've changed it, it's no longer going to be that old dollhouse.  Unless it's particularly grotty, a warm, soapy wash should be sufficient for cleaning the doll house walls, floors and other surfaces. Use a little detergent for something stronger. This is best done on a warm, sunny day to allow for good drying, or if you're able to leave it in a room which is very, very warm.   Remove all wallpaper surfaces, carpets and anything else stuck to the dollhouse. You will need to ensure that the dollhouse is clean and non-toxic. Remove any fabric (for carpet) off the floor or curtains, etc., because it won't be clean for long, and if a bulge or seam exists, it will be chewed and stripped out. Remove any removable pieces to help with deeper cleaning.  If these are made of wood or paper, they will need to be waterproofed or you will end up with one stinking mess after a short time. You could use a non-toxic paint to protect these surfaces. One source suggests using G4 pond sealant to protect the wood.Another idea is to use cookie sheets/baking trays or similar to line the base of the house and any other layers, to create a barrier between the wood and the house resident. If you're into craft, tile the floor areas using a non-toxic grout. Alternatively, use thick layers of paper such as toilet paper, changed frequently, to soak up hamster wee, moisture and mess.  Before proceeding, you'll need all measurements for the additions you're going to make. Hopefully you'll be able to find most items around the house but you may also need to buy some, and having the measurements worked out in advance will save you money.  You might need to widen some of the holes leading upstairs and exchange staircases for ladders, etc. Give the dollhouse a good look over with a hamster's perspective in mind. How will the hamster get up and down? Where will the hamster prefer to eat, sleep and play in this house? Choose the solutions to these questions according to the design of the dollhouse you're using.  Dollhouses come with a lot of possible exit places, such as windows, doors and an open back or front that allows access to the house. You'll need to block these up with suitable items, such as hardwood, galvanized wire (hardware cloth), wire mesh, plastic garden "wire" or heavy cardstock. Choose the materials for blocking up the holes according to the sizes of the holes and the need for viewing through the house. It is advisable that the part of the house which is most open to viewing (usually the front or the back of the dollhouse), is covered in wire or wire mesh, so that you and the hamster can see through and so that plenty of air circulates through the hamster house.   You might like to consider adding a small sliding-door in a suitable location so that you can put food/water/bedding into the house as needed. You'll also need to be able to open the house to remove the hamster for play and cuddling, as well as for cleaning. Another door alternative is to cut through the wire front and hold the door in place with paperclips or spring clips. Take note of small exit routes. A crack or any very small opening (seam or corner) will be a tempting place to chew. If such a place is in an outer wall, or floor it will, if possible, soon be enlarged to form an escape route. Be sure to cover it well.  Whether it's the back or the front of the dollhouse that opens out or is wall-less, you'll need to stop the hamster bedding from tipping out onto the floor or bench. Use a piece of wood across the base to create a small barrier; nail into place with a good edge overhang to prevent spillage of bedding. Do this prior to adding the wire covering.  For the windows, nail/screw in, staple in place or glue on the wood/heavy cardstock/wire barriers. Leave the front/back part until last because you'll still need work on the inside of the hamster house.   Consider allowing your hamster to be able to see out of some of the windows by using plastic wire netting or wire rather than wood. It is not only more interesting for the hamster but it will probably look prettier too.  Drill a hole through the wall of the dollhouse to let the watering tube go through into the inside. Check to see that it's easily accessible for the hamster. An alternative method would be cutting a hole in a cardboard tube and putting the water bottle in that.  Untreated wood shavings work best (not pine or cedar). If you want to turn a dollhouse bed into your pet's bed, do that too; in fact, old dollhouse furniture can be upcycled into all sorts of fun hamster things.  Arrange toys at different levels to increase the desire to run around the hamster house.   Hang some toys and chewing items. Be sure to include ladders and balancing areas to help the hamster move around and stay entertained.  This is an optional step but you can certainly prettify the hamster home if you'd like. Use non-toxic decorating items, just in case of fumes off-gassing through the walls or in case your hamster chews through anything. Designs such as flowers, hamsters, your hamster's name, etc. are all suitable additions.  

find an unwanted dollhouse.  clean the dollhouse.  check out the floor areas, both base and upstairs.  measure the dimensions of the dollhouse.  check the suitability of the house for moving around in.  plan how you'll block all of the exit holes.  build up the base slightly.  start attaching the barrier items to the dollhouse.  attach the water bottle to one side of the house.  put in some comfortable bedding, like straw, or tissue paper.  put the hamster's favorite toys and climbing apparatus into the house.  improve the outside of the hamster home. 

 A wire cage is a popular cage type for hamsters but usually is not big enough, so when looking for wire cages often rat cages with 1/2 inch spacing can work aswell as large hamster cages.A wire cage usually has a detachable base made of solid plastic.The horizontal bars are ideal for hanging toys and chews.Big wire cages are more suitable for Syrian hamsters, since they are relatively large and would not be able to squeeze between the wires.Be aware that your hamster could gnaw on the wires,- if not given chews and toys-, which could lead to various dental problems that may need veterinary care., Plastic hamster cages are multi-level, with tunnels and other areas that your hamster can run through and play in. In addition to being visually appealing (plastic cages are very colorful), plastic cages can be good for a dwarf hamster, since his small size would allow him to easily run through the twists and turns of the tunnels.It can be fun to watch your hamster run through the cage. A plastic cage is not ideal if you have a large hamster, since he could get stuck in the tunnels.If you have a dwarf hamster, he could easily hide in the small nooks and crannies of the cage, making him hard to find. Most plastic cages are too small alone and can only be used as attachment cages to a cage of the minimum size.Plastic hamster cages should not have any edges that your hamster could gnaw on., Aquariums are not specifically made for hamsters, but could be an ideal housing option for your hamster. They are typically made of either solid glass or plexi-glass, which makes them very sturdy and easy to see through.To keep your hamster from escaping, the aquarium should be covered with a well-fitted mesh top.You may need to purchase this separately at your local pet store.   The minimum size aquarium that you should have for your hamster is 30-40 gallons depending on the specific aquarium. Just be sure to have the floorspace be of the minimum size or bigger. An aquarium would be ideal if you have a dwarf or Chinese hamster.Aquariums have a few disadvantages, such as being heavy and having poor ventilation.Since aquariums are not hamster-specific, you would need to buy extra items to place inside of it, such as tunnels and ladders., Bin cages are cages that you can design and make yourself. The freedom to be able to design these cages yourself is a major advantage. Bin cages are usually much cheaper to make than it is to buy a proper sized store bought cage, but bin cages may not look as visually appealing as other cage types. 

familiarize yourself with good wire hamster cages.  learn about plastic hamster cages.  consider the pros and cons of aquariums.  learn about bin cages. 

 Using your scissors, cut small holes, ensuring that they are big enough for the hamster to reach in to get the chews and treats hidden inside the toilet tube. Cut the holes at the side of the tube.; , Choose one side and fold it from one side to the other.  Make the pieces big, almost overlapping the size of the holes.  After cutting the loofah chews, add both the loofah pieces and hamster treats in the tube. Make sure the treats are really inside so the hamsters have a hard time getting to the treats. As a result, they will chew the loofah pieces to get to the treats hidden within.  After putting the contents in the toilet paper tube, fold the other end in the same way that you folded the other end.  You may place the toy inside the hamster's cage. Stand back and watch your hamster tear it to pieces, enjoying the toy you just made!  

cut holes.  fold the end of the toilet tube.  cut the loofah chews to pieces.  add the contents.  fold the other end.  give the finished toy to the hamster. 

 Most of a hamster’s diet should be made up of commercial hamster food. These are usually composed either of pellets or seed mixes. They are designed to accommodate your hamster’s diverse nutritional needs.   Because hamsters are adverse to changes in their diet, when you purchase food, consider buying what your hamster was fed at the pet store. After a few weeks, slowly transition it to a different food source, should you choose to.If you are feeding your hamster a seed mix, make sure that it does not only eat the sun flower seeds. Hamsters prefer these, but they will not satisfy all of your hamster’s nutritional needs.; , Try to give your hamster a small portion of fruit, vegetable, or protein either every day or every other day. A portion size equivalent to a couple of raisins is appropriate.Leftovers can rot, contaminating the cage.   Good vegetables to feed your hamster include: turnips, carrots, chicory, spinach, parsley, pumpkin, endive, cauliflower, broccoli, cauliflower, green beans, and asparagus. Good fruits to feed your hamster include: raisins, seedless apples, berries, pears, plums, and peaches. Seeds and pits can be poisonous, so be sure to keep these away from your hamster.Once a week you can add some additional protein to your hamster’s diet with pieces of a hardboiled egg.Be mindful that food hasn’t spoiled and remove it from the cage when it begins to go bad. Fresh food should generally be removed from the cage within a few hours of the initial feeding.  It is important to give your hamster a hard treat approximately once a week. These help keep your hamster’s teeth in good shape and can be a source of additional nutrition or even recreation.   At a pet store you can purchase treats that hang from the top of your hamster’s cage. These forces them to work to get their food and can facilitate play. Mineral or salt licks are a good way to provide your hamster nutrition as maintains its teeth.  You should avoid feeding your hamster kidney beans, citrus fruits, onion, potato, rhubarb, and tomato leaves. Junk food, chocolate, alcohol, and candy are also bad for your hamster.  Hamsters are liable to knock over a water dish, creating sanitary problems. At the pet store purchase a bottle that can hang on your hamster’s cage. Refill regularly with bottled water.   Be sure to clean the water bottle at least once a week.  Specialists differ as to whether it is better to feed your hamster in the morning or evening. It is important, however, that hamsters eat regularly. So pick one time and stick with it.Some experts recommend night time feedings because hamsters are nocturnal and thus will be awake throughout the evening. Others, however, point out that they like to wake up sporadically throughout the day and snack. It is unclear which time is best.  Hamsters can scratch up plastic bowls, creating crevices which foster the growth of bacteria. A small bowl is preferable to a large one, because it will leave space in the cage for your hamster to play..   Place the bowl at the opposite side of the cage from your hamster’s bathroom area. You will find that your hamster goes to the bathroom in one corner of his cage. Note where that spot is and then place the bowl as far from it as possible. Wash the bowl with soapy water during your weekly cleaning of the cage., Supplement this as described above with treats. It can be tempting to overfeed hamsters because you will often find that their bowl will quickly empty. But, hamsters horde food, so it is probable that they actually have food, but have hidden it. , This can be a good way to bond and build positive associations with your hamster. As you offer food with one hand, use the other to pet or hold your hamster. Slowly build up to more contact., Because they have so much extra skin, it can be difficult to tell when a hamster is becoming obese. A Syrian should weight approximately one ounce per inch of length. Also, if your hamster appears slow and sluggish, it is possible you should modify its diet. 

purchase commercial hamster mix from a pet store.  supplement your hamster’s diet with fresh food.  give your hamster hard treats.  know what foods to avoid.  purchase a water bottle.  feed your hamster once per day in either the morning or evening.  purchase a small ceramic bowl.  give your hamster approximately a tablespoon of pellets per day.  try hand-feeding your hamster his treats.  monitor your hamster's weight. 

 The best bedding is shredded toilet paper or a type of soft bedding (like Carefresh, which can be dusty, or Kaytee Clean and Cozy), or aspen bedding. All three are practically harmless.   Some types of bedding can be hazardous to your hamster. Any fluffy bedding, such as cotton, can KILL your hamster. If you use wood shavings, avoid cedar and pine. It releases aromatic oils that can be fatal to your hamster(s). aspen is probably your best choice; , About four inches should be enough  , Never try to make your own food, because your hamsters will miss out on some of the essential nutrients they need to survive. They like variety, so try to buy food with different food types.  19% protein, 6% fat and 8% fiber is the ideal nutrition content. If the protein is a bit low, you can supplement the food with dried mealworms. The same goes for if the food is a bit low in fiber. Supplementing the mix with high-fiber foods works well. Harry/Hazel Hamster and Burgess Dwarf are both the best and most superior hamster food choices in America.  Remove old or stale food regularly. Thea mounts will depend on which food you have.  Do not change your hamsters' food or diet suddenly; take it slow. Add a little more of the new food every couple of days until all your hamster's food is the new kind. Always supplement their diet with fresh, safe vegetables, as well as other non-vegetable treats (if your hamster is a winter white or a Chinese hamster refrain from feeding fruit) such as non-citrus fruit, hard-boiled egg, etc. Keep the amounts small though! Only about a nail-sized cube of extras per day.  Hide the food around the cage for them to find. Don't do this too much, though, as they may not be able to find it, and the food will go stale. Remove any leftover hidden food when you change the bedding. Also, have them run around on the ground freely but you must be watching them. Always keep them away from corners and wires.   If you use a plastic bottle, make sure that the ball is metal, not plastic. Bottles are easier to handle and keep the water cleaner. A bottle will need its water regularly changed, about thrice a week or more if the hamster is a little messier.       If you use a bowl, which is the more natural choice, choose one that is about 1 1⁄2 inch (3.8 cm) tall and fill it about halfway. A bowl will need its water regularly changed; about once a day or more if the hamster is a little messier.       Hamsters prefer bottled water, but it isn't necessary for them to survive.  

choose good bedding.  spread the bedding thickly enough that your hamster can burrow in in it.  pick appropriate food.  feed your hamster every day.  maintain a steady diet.  play with your hamster.  give your hamster water, ideally in a plastic bottle. 

 You can also use fleece if needed, and gather the supplies needed stated below.; , Be ready with the color thread you've chosen for the project. Have ready the polyester stuffing to fill the hammock with. , Sew all three sides and leave one side open for the filling.  Sew up the last edge to complete the hammock.  These twine ends will serve as the ties for the hammock, to be attached to the hamster's cage. Tidy any loose ends and it's done.  Wait for him to start chilling!  

find or make a washcloth for the hammock.  turn on the sewing machine.  fold the washcloth in half.  ,  sew the washcloth into a hammock.  stuff the hammock with the filling.  sew twine at each end of the hammock.  attach your hamster's hammock to the cage. 

 Dwarf hamsters have a similar diet to other hamster varieties. A mainstay of your dwarf hamster’s diet should be commercial hamster food, which you can purchase at your local pet store. Commercial hamster food comes in pelleted form and typically consists of seeds, pellets, grains, and bits of cracked corn.Commercial hamster food has a high nutritional value, but should not be the only type of food you feed your dwarf hamster. The pellet formulation allows your dwarf hamster to gnaw on his food,which can be good for his dental hygiene. Choose a commercial food that has about 15 to 20% protein.If you have the time, you can also make your own hamster food. ; , Fruits and vegetables add extra nutrition as well as variety to your hamster’s diet.Make sure to wash the fruits and vegetables thoroughly with fresh water to remove any pesticides or other chemicals.Examples of produce that you can feed your dwarf hamster are asparagus, broccoli, bananas, and blueberries.Incorporate fruits and vegetables gradually into your dwarf hamster’s diet to reduce his likelihood of developing diarrhea. Start by feeding one small piece of produce a week, then slowly move up to feeding a small piece once a day. If he develops diarrhea, stop feeding him produce and allow the diarrhea to resolve before trying again.Herbs, such as basil and coriander, are also good to feed your dwarf hamster., Protein is an important nutrient for your dwarf hamster. Fortunately, there are several great protein sources from which you can choose. For example, raw and unsalted seeds, such as sunflower, flax, and sesame, are high in protein. Lentils are another good protein source.If you are not too squeamish, you can also feed him insects (grasshoppers, earthworms, crickets), which are high in protein.Consider purchasing these from your local pet store, since the ones you capture outside may have microorganisms that could make your dwarf hamster sick. Small amounts of dairy (plain yogurt, cottage) and meat (turkey, chicken) are also good protein sources., Natural sources of fiber, such as timothy hay and alfalfa hay, are good sources of fiber. Your dwarf hamster may not be a fan of hay, but you can give him a small amount to see if he will like it., Hard treats help your dwarf hamster keep his incisors filed down, which is good for his overall dental hygiene. You can let him gnaw on small dog biscuits, commercial hamster treats, or a small branch taken from a fruit-bearing tree.Your dwarf hamster can have soft treats, too. Examples of soft treats include whole wheat bread and scrambled eggs., Water is just as important to your dwarf hamster’s diet as food. Buy a hamster-sized water bottle with a stem and ball bearing from your local pet store. The ball regulates how much water comes out each time the hamster takes a drink.Do not give your hamster a water bowl or dish. While it might seem like a good thing to do, a water bowl or dish will actually result in a watery mess in your hamster’s cage.Watery messes can lead to mold growth that could make your hamster sick. Fill the water bottle completely to create a vacuum inside the bottle. This will prevent water from leaking out when you refill it.Position the bottle inside the cage so that it is out of direct sunlight. Direct sunlight can cause algae to form inside the bottle. This will not make your dwarf hamster sick, but it will mean that you will need to clean his water bottle more often.The water bottle can be secured to the inside of the cage with two small clips that you can find at your local pet store, in case the clips didn’t already come with the bottle., Although there are a lot of human foods that you can feed your hamster, there are other foods that can make him sick and should be kept out of his diet. For example, there are certain fruits and vegetables that you should not feed your dwarf hamster, including tomato leaves, raw potatoes, and onions.Citrus fruits (oranges, lemons) should also be avoided because they are too acidic for him.   A watermelon’s water content is too high for him.Almonds contain cyanic acid, which can make your dwarf hamster very sick.Fruit seeds can be harmful to your dwarf hamster. If you would like to feed your dwarf hamster fruits that have seeds (apples, peaches, plums), make sure to remove the seeds first.Chocolate contains a substance called theobromine that can negatively affect your dwarf hamster’s circulatory system., The ideal food bowl for your dwarf hamster is small and ceramic. If you purchase a large bowl, you will be more likely to overfeed him. Also, large bowls take up a lot of cage space. Ceramic bowls are chew-resistant, which is a benefit over plastic bowls. Scratches due to chewing can lead to bacterial growth, so a ceramic bowl will decrease the likelihood of bacteria growing in or on the bowl.Ceramic bowls are also very sturdy, which makes them difficult to overturn, unlike plastic food bowls.Place the food bowl as far away as possible from your hamster’s designated ‘bathroom.’ Hamsters choose one spot in the cage to do all of their business. Once you have figured out where that spot is, make sure to put the food bowl on the opposite side of the cage.Clean the food bowl once a week when you clean your dwarf hamster’s cage., There is some debate as to whether hamsters should be fed in the morning of evening. A benefit to feeding them in the evening is that they will already be awake, since they are nocturnal animals. On the other hand, feeding them in the morning means that food will be there when they wake up sporadically throughout the day.Whichever time of day you choose to feed your dwarf hamster, remain consistent with feeding him at the same time. Remember that dwarf hamsters have a very high metabolism, so they will need access to food at all times., Your dwarf hamster's diet should contain a variety of foods so that he receives all of the nutrients he needs in the correct amounts.However, your dwarf hamster may not like everything that you feed him. If you notice that he's consistently not eating a certain food, switch it out for something else.   For example, if you notice that he doesn't like one kind of fruit (e.g., apple), replace with it another fruit (e.g., banana). Keeping a variety of foods will allow you to easily switch out one food for another. Discontinue feeding him food that makes him sick (e.g., diarrhea caused by eating watermelon)., He will only need about one tablespoon of hamster food each day, plus the occasional treat and fresh food. While a tablespoon of food might look like a lot compared to these tiny creatures, dwarf hamsters actually have very fast metabolisms and can eat the same amount as their larger cousins.Do not be tempted to fill his empty food bowl. Hamsters have cheek pouches in which they will stuff their food to save for later. They also have a tendency to store their food under their cage bedding.The fact that your dwarf hamster’s food bowl is empty does not necessarily mean that he has eaten all of his food.  This is especially important for fruits and vegetables, since they can quickly become spoiled and moldy.Feed only the amount of fruit that your dwarf hamster can eat in a day. This may take some trial and error before you determine what that amount is.  

feed your dwarf hamster commercial hamster food.  give your hamster fresh fruits and vegetables.  include a good protein source in your dwarf hamster’s diet.  add fiber to your dwarf hamster’s diet.  feed your dwarf hamster hard treats once a week.  provide your dwarf hamster with fresh water.  learn which foods you should not feed your dwarf hamster.  select the proper food bowl for your dwarf hamster.  feed your dwarf hamster at the same time each day.  observe your dwarf hamster's eating habits.  do not overfeed your dwarf hamster.  remove any uneaten food. 

 Produce purchased in the supermarket is often sprayed with commercial pesticides before being picked and sold. It's a good idea to wash carrots thoroughly before serving them to a hamster.   Make sure your carrot is free of any bruises or damage. Cut off any bruised or damaged sections. Then, wash your own hands for about 20 seconds in warm water using soap.Hold the carrot under cool running water. Rub the carrot as you wash it to get rid of any dirt or grime.Dry the carrot with a clean paper cloth or towel.; , As hamsters are small, you'll need to the cut the carrot before serving. Cut it into tiny pieces. If you have a food processor or a cheese shredder, consider using this device on the carrot to grind it into thin, shredded segments. This will be easier for your hamster to eat.  After cutting the carrot, check for sharp edges. You should not give your hamster food that has sharp edges. These can puncture the insides of your hamster's mouth and, in rare cases, even cause an abscess. If you see any pointy edges on the carrot, cut them off with a knife to form a more rounded edge., Dried vegetables made for human consumption often contain additives and preservatives that might not be safe for your hamster. Only use fresh carrots that have not been processed. These are the safest and healthiest for your hamster. 

wash the carrot thoroughly.  cut it up into small parts.  trim down sharp edges.  use fresh carrots with no additives. 

 The most common staple of a hamster’s diet should be the food pellets that you can buy at pet stores specifically intended for hamsters. These pellets contain a variety of seeds and grains that will help give your hamster most of the protein and nutrients it needs on a daily basis.You should provide approximately one tablespoon of pellet or seed mixture food to your hamster each day, supplemented with treats for variety.; , For your hamster to achieve maximum health, it is important that you give it a diverse selection of food. In addition to the food pellets/seed mixtures, you can also feed your hamster various fruits, vegetables, dog biscuits, or a small branch from a fruit-bearing tree.Harder treats like dog biscuits and fruit branches should be offered only once a week. But they will also help wear down your hamster’s teeth, which will be good for your pet as it ages. Don’t feed your hamster citrus fruits or onions. These food items will give your hamster an upset stomach., Giving your hamster fruits and vegetables occasionally (even small daily amounts) is a good idea to help them maintain a balanced diet.However, too many fruits and vegetables can lead to diarrhea and other physical problems, so be sure to limit the amount that you give them. Think of it as more of a treat, rather than a main part of their diet.Some good fruits/vegetables to try out with your hamster are peas, carrots, banana, broccoli, grapes, cucumber, apple, and celery., Hamsters are more likely to grow accustomed to new foods if you start introducing them to new things when they are very young (even just a few weeks old). The older you let your hamster get before trying new foods, the more likely it will be to prefer what it is used to and refuse the new items., The best way to see if your hamster will accept a new kind of food is to give them a small portion and see how they react. Give your hamster access to the new food type by placing a tiny piece of it in your hamster’s food bowl alongside its regular food. , Give your hamster the food you normally would, but add a tiny bit of a new food gradually for several days. This will allow your pet to become accustomed to the new food while still having access to the food you already know it will eat.Introducing the new food slowly will also give your hamster time to adjust to the new food and avoid any potential negative side effects like an upset stomach.  If your hamster seems resistant to trying new foods, start feeding it several times a day in smaller portions. But don’t refill your pet’s food bowl until it has eaten most of the contents from the previous feeding., While it is important to provide a healthy, balanced diet for your hamster, don’t get too caught up in the extras. Your hamster’s diet should consist mostly of pellet/seed mixture food with smaller amounts of additional items (as discussed above)., If your hamster seems to like broccoli, but you’re always throwing away the bits of celery you offer it, then take that as a sign that your hamster doesn’t like celery. Pay attention to what is left over in the hamster’s cage when you clean it every week. If you see the same foods end up as waste repeatedly, it might be time to try a different food. , Hamsters are notorious for filling their cheeks with food and continuing to beg for more. However, hamsters won’t eat everything you give them, so be mindful. They will hoard the extra food in their bedding, which may begin to rot and become unhealthy for the hamster to be around. Only feed your hamster as much food as it needs to live comfortably. 

give your hamster pellet food.  feed your hamster a variety of foods.  keep the fruits and vegetables to a minimum.  start young.  place a new food item in their food dish.  introduce the food gradually over a period of days.  feed your hamster smaller portions.  stick with the staples.  cater to your pet’s preferences.  don’t overfeed your hamster. 

 You should serve your hamster food and treats in a small bowl. Go for a ceramic food dish over a plastic one. Ceramic dishes are sturdier and hamsters are less likely to chew on them. Place the bowl in an area of the cage that's far away from where your hamster usually uses the bathroom., New foods, even healthy foods, should be introduced slowly. Unfamiliar substances can bother a hamster's digestion, causing constipation or diarrhea. Give your hamster only a small portion of the carrot at first, like one thin slice or shred., After placing the carrot in your hamster's bowl, allow him to eat his new food. You can try mixing the carrot in with his regular pellets or dry food to try to encourage him to taste the carrot.   Not every hamster will take to every type of vegetable. Your hamster may simply dislike carrots. If this is the case, there are a variety of other vegetables you can add to your hamster's diet.  

prepare the food bowl.  introduce new foods in small amounts.  allow your hamster to try the carrot. 

 You want to make sure your hamster is able to digest carrots well. If your hamster has trouble processing carrots, you'll want to remove them from his diet. Keep an eye on your hamster for a few days after introducing the new food to make sure he's able to keep it down.   Examine your hamster's rear end. If you notice any smears or stains, he may have diarrhea. A wet tail is also a sign of diarrhea in a hamster. It may also indicate a bacterial infection in the gut.If you notice an absence of droppings in your hamster's cage, he may be suffering from constipation. This can happen when being introduced to a new food. Any digestive problems that go on for longer than a week should be evaluated by a veterinarian.  If your hamster digests the carrot and seems to enjoy the food, add more carrot to his diet. Gradually increase the amount of carrot you feed him.   However, keep the amount of carrot relatively small overall. Your hamster needs nutrients from his pellets and other store-bought foods. Too much of a certain food he enjoys, like carrots, may discourage him from eating his pellets., Hamsters enjoy a variety of fruits and vegetables as part of a balanced diet. For veggies, you can try squash, broccoli, cauliflower, cucumber, romaine lettuce, and spinach. For fruits, try berries, apples, bananas, and pears.Do not feed your hamster citrus fruit like lemons or oranges. Citrus fruit can be toxic to a hamster.Wash any produce you feed your hamster thoroughly. Always introduce new foods gradually.  

watch for digestive changes.  increase the amount of carrot if your hamster enjoys it.  consider introducing your hamster to other fresh veggies. 

 While hamster balls are extremely popular, many people are critical of hamster balls because of the potential risks they pose to our small furry hamster friends. Before buying a hamster ball, you need to learn about and consider the numerous risks these popular toys can pose to your friend.   Hamster balls can create unneeded stress and anxiety for your furry friend. If not used right, hamster balls can present physical dangers to your small friend. Many veterinarians and animal rights activists have criticized hamster balls.; , Choosing your hamster ball will depend on several factors. Before you even buy the ball, there are important things you need to consider so that your little friend will enjoy his/her exercise machine. Consider:   Make sure the hamster ball is big enough for your little friend. There are a number of varieties of hamsters (most popularly, dwarf and Syrian), so make sure that whatever ball you’ll be buying will be big enough for your hamster when he or she reaches maturity. Choose a color. Hamster balls come in a wide variety of different colors. Try to avoid dark colors, so that you’ll be able to see your hamster clearly at all times. Make sure your hamster ball has plenty of holes in it for ventilation. While most commercially produced hamster balls do have plenty of ventilation, you should still be cognizant of this when purchasing your ball. Avoid using “homemade” or “custom” hamster balls unless the builder/designer has a lot of experience. Homemade balls might be dangerous – they could open up unexpectedly or lack enough ventilation for your furry friend., Before you even put your little friend into the ball, you should open it up and clean it. Many times, plastic animal toys come from the factory without being properly cleaned from potentially toxic and dangerous residues and films.  Because of the nature of the hamster ball (a translucent piece of plastic), hamster balls tend to magnify light and trap heat inside. If you allow your hamster to play in his ball outside, you might be creating an extremely dangerous situation for your friend.   Hamsters are sensitive to sunlight. Hamsters who play in their ball in the sunlight might tend to overheat or dehydrate. Limit your hamsters to indoors or at the very least to extremely overcast (but not freezing) days outside., Even though playing in a ball might seem like a lot of fun for your hamster, your little friend can also get worn out, tired, and dehydrated real quickly. Make sure to monitor his or her time in the ball.   Take your hamster out when he or she is tired. Begin with no more than 15 minutes. If your hamster seems to handle it well, after 3 or 4 times, you can gradually increase the amount of time your hamster plays in the ball. Just make sure to monitor and use your best care and judgement. If your hamster seems lethargic after playing in the ball, and does not recover quickly, consult your veterinarian., Hamster balls are relatively confined spaces. As a result, never put more than one hamster in a ball at one time. The balls are designed for one hamster, and one hamster alone. There are numerous dangers to putting more than one animal in a ball at a time:   The hamsters could get into a fight. One hamster might not be as fit as the other, and could be thrown around as his or her friend is moving the ball. The hamsters could become extremely stressed or anxious because of the confined space.  Small children often do not understand that animals are autonomous lifeforms that feel pain and are fragile. As a result, never let a small child play with a hamster while the hamster is in a ball. At the same time, never let a small child play with any animal unattended. This will help safeguard the life of the animal and the welfare of the child., Letting other animals play around a hamster is creating a dangerous situation for the hamster. As small domesticated animals, hamsters are vulnerable and fragile animals. When your hamster is in his or her ball playing, do not let other animals play in the same area.   Close off any area that your hamster is playing in. Dogs or cats might see your hamster as a toy and try to rip its stuffing out. Larger pets might be confused and might not understand what the hamster and his or her ball is doing. If you do have two hamsters in two separate balls, it is okay to let them play in the same area. Just make sure to monitor them so they don’t run into each other or hurt themselves., Caring for and cleaning a hamster ball is much like caring for and cleaning a hamster’s cage. You need to clean the ball regularly as to prevent bacteria and other waste from building up and possibly harming your little furry friend.   Clean the hamster ball after every use, if possible. Clean the hamster ball at least every couple of uses, no matter what. Clean the hamster ball immediately if your hamster has had an accident in it., Perhaps the most challenging part of getting your hamster to use his or her ball is finding a time that they actually want to use it. You’ve got to time this properly, because if your hamster is tired or just not in the mood, they’re not going to do anything, and they’ll just sit there. Consider:   Choosing a time when your hamster is active. Don’t choose a time directly before or directly after feeding. Once you’ve used the ball a few times, it should be easier to figure out when your hamster wants to play in his or her ball., Hamster balls often have two designs to open them. Either way, you’ll have to twist the ball or the entrance open in order to let your hamster in. Make sure to do this gently, as you don’t want to damage your ball.   Some hamster balls are separated into two sides, and you’ll twist one side off the other to open it. Some hamster balls have a small circular opening on one side of the sphere. You’ll have to twist the door of the ball open to let your hamster in. If your hamster ball is designed differently, consult your instructions., Best practice is to open the ball and allow your hamster to enter on their own accord. You don’t want to throw your hamster in there and traumatize him or her for no reason. If your hamster does not want to go in, try again later.   Open the ball and direct your hamster toward the opening. You can guide him or her, but don’t throw them in against their own will. Try putting a treat in to lure your hamster in. If your hamster goes for the treat, slowly close the ball and allow your hamster to eat the treat before anything else. If your hamster is still reluctant, place the ball inside his or her cage to allow him or her to get used to the ball. Just make sure to watch them, as they might hurt themselves playing in a ball that is not secured., Once your hamster has boarded the ball on their own accord, twist the ball shut and make sure it clicks and is secure so your hamster cannot escape. This is extremely important, as you don’t want the ball to open while your hamster is running around.  After you’ve loaded your furry friend into his or her ball, apply a little tape to two sides in order to provide an extra layer of protection against the ball opening. This will serve a dual purpose of keeping your hamster safe and making sure he or she does not escape into the wilds of your home.   Apply the tape smoothly to the crack that separates the two sides of the sphere (or on the entrance to the ball). Make sure that the pieces of tape are not available inside of the sphere. You don’t want your little friend chewing on or swallowing the tape. Make sure your ball is dry when applying tape., Once your hamster has boarded, the ball is secure, and taped, then move the ball to a flat surface where your hamster will safely be able to move around. Carpet is best for this and will limit the vibrations and other stresses to the ball and to the hamster., If they stop, do not force them to roll. It either means they are sniffing their surroundings or just tired. If they stop rolling for at least 7 minutes, it means they are probably tired and let them back in their cage. If they get stuck in a corner do not pick them up and move them because they are probably just resting. They can get out on their own., One mistake people often make with hamster balls is to let their hamster roam around freely in their ball. This could have potentially devastating and certainly dangerous results. In order to prevent your little friend from getting hurt, you need to monitor your hamster at all times when he or she is in a hamster ball. Consider:   Sitting on the floor with your hamster when he or she is in the ball. Closing off an area, like a living room or bedroom so that your hamster won’t be able to leave your site. Make sure that your hamster won’t be able to access any stairs or similar hazards while in his or her ball. Never let your hamster roam around unattended – in or out of a ball. 

learn about the risks of hamster balls.  choose your hamster ball.  clean your hamster ball after purchasing it.  limit your hamster’s exposure to sunlight while in the hamster ball.  limit the amount of time your hamster is in his or her ball.  do not put more than one hamster in a ball.  never let a small child play with a hamster while in a hamster ball.  avoid letting your hamster play in his or her ball in an area where other pets are loose.  cleaning your hamster ball.  pick a play time.  untwist the ball open.  allow your hamster to enter the ball.  twist the top back on.  apply packing or scotch tape as an extra measure to keep the ball shut.  put the ball on a flat surface, if it is not already.  leave them alone while they are in the ball.  monitor your hamster at all times. 

 The number of popsicle sticks that you will need will depend on how tall you want to make the ladder., The stickiness of food residue could make it difficult for your hamster to walk on the ladder.Allow the popsicle sticks to dry completely.  It is important to use non-stick glue because your hamster may nibble on the sticks and inadvertently eat some of the glue. You would not want your hamster to get sick from eating a part of his toy.Allow the glue to dry completely.  You can get creative with where you place the ladder in the cage.   Set the ladder on the bottom of the cage and have it leading up to another toy. The ladder could also be used as a bridge between toys such as cardboard boxes or milk cartons.  

gather together several popsicle sticks.  rinse off the popsicle sticks to remove food residue.  glue the popsicle sticks together using non-toxic glue.  place the ladder in the cage. 

 You will need several empty toilet paper tubes, bedding, some small cardboard boxes, and a cutting instrument (knife, scissors, box cutter).Make a Fun Hamster Tube Town   Instead of cardboard boxes, you could also use shoe boxes, milk cartons, or empty boxes of tea. Because these boxes are not transparent, you will not be able to easily see your hamster once he's inside the tunnel. Even if you can't see him, trust that he's having fun in there!, These holes will be what the toiler paper tubes go through. To make sure that the holes you cut are the correct size, it may be helpful to first trace the outline of the tube onto the box.Make a Fun Hamster Tube Town   Cut the holes in different parts of the cardboard boxes to give your hamster more options when entering and exiting the tunnel.  If the tubes do not fit easily into the holes, make the holes a little bit bigger. Forcing the tubes into the holes could distort their shape, making it difficult for your hamster to walk through them.   Use non-toxic glue to secure the tubes in the holes.  This will create a little bit of extra work and challenge for your hamster to play in the tunnel.   Even though the tunnel will be covered with bedding, leave an open end where your hamster can gain easy access to it.  

gather together the materials you will need to make a tunnel.  cut circular holes in the cardboard boxes.  insert the toilet paper tubes into the holes.  cover the tunnel with bedding. 

 The more complicated you want to make the maze, the more tubes you will need., In order to maintain the shape of the tubes, be careful not to force them to fit into each other., Hamsters will nibble at the cardboard, so you want to make sure that the type of glue you use will not make them sick., This will create the shape of the maze. The more creative you are with the directions of the tube, the more challenging the maze will be for your hamster.   If you choose to place the maze outside of your hamster's cage, closely supervise your hamster so that he does not escape or injure himself.Other household materials that you can use to create a maze include empty shoe boxes, cylindrical oatmeal boxes, and wrapping paper tubes.  The scent of the maze will encourage them to move even faster through it to get to the treat.  

gather a handful of empty toilet paper tubes.  place the tubes within one another.  use non-toxic glue to attach the tubes to each other.  place the rows of tubes in different directions in the cage.  place a treat at the end of the maze. 

 Just about anything can be used to make an obstacle course, including paper cups, toilet paper tubes, small toy cars, and building blocks.Be aware that small toy cars have paint on them, which could make your hamster sick if he eats the paint. Watch him closely and remove the cars if you see him to start to nibble on them.  You could use an open area of your floor that outside of your hamster's cage. You could also use your bathtub or a large cardboard box.If you use your bathtub, line the bathtub with a towel. The towel will give your hamster more traction as he moves through the obstacle course., The scent of the treat will motivate your hamster to move even faster through the obstacle course., You will want to make sure that he does not eat any part of the obstacle course that could make him sick.  

gather together items to make an obstacle course.  set up the materials in a large open area.  place treats throughout the obstacle course.  keep a close eye on your hamster. 

 The minimum cage requirement is 360 square inches, but you should always go bigger. You should set up a home for your hamster before buying one. You can use a wire cage as long as it has a solid bottom to protect your hamster’s feet and the mesh is small enough that your hamster can’t escape or get stuck. You can also use a 20-gallon aquarium—just make sure it has a wire mesh cover to allow ventilation.Unlike other solitary hamster species, Roborovski hamsters can live in pairs. Just remember to have a separate cage available, incase the pair does not work out. You should always separate them immediately, if they fight.If you plan to have two, try to purchase them from the same litter. You’ll have fewer potential problems if they grow up together. You should also ensure that both hamsters are the same sex to avoid them breeding and producing large litters.Be aware that even hamsters raised together from a young age can still fall out and fight. You should avoid large-scale hamster colonies to prevent the chances of this. Never house Roborovski hamsters with other species of hamster—or other species of animal—as they will become territorial and fight.; , Roborovski hamsters love to burrow, hide, and dig, so make sure you put plenty of bedding into the habitat. A layer of about three inches will be fine. A generous layer of four to five inches will certainly be appreciated.   Soft white cellulose fiber (Carefresh) and aspen shavings are both suitable choices for your hamster. If you choose wood shavings never use pine or cedar as they can cause a number of health problems and contain harmful oils that are toxic to hamsters.Avoid bedding that contains long fibers. Synthetic forms of bedding—such as those made of polyester fibers—are notorious for tangling around limbs and cutting off circulation.  Small plastic trays with a hood are available. They are designed to fit in the corner of a hamster cage. You put special hamster litter inside, which helps to neutralize odors. Most hamsters will use these quite happily instead of soiling their cages. This is optional. Clean the litter pan regularly since your hamster will be put off using it if the area is too soiled., Your hamster will thrive on a steady diet of rodent chow (blocks) and a good food, such as Hazel Hamster, or Vitakraft. Pellets or just one type of food lacks variety and nutrition. Keep in mind that some hamster foods like Vitakraft lack in protein, so you should feed hamsters eggs, and food that has protein in it. You can also provide seed mixes with pellets, grains, seeds, and dried vegetables.However, do not provide seed mixes alone since your hamster can eat selectively around the tasty bits, which leads to an imbalanced diet.   A hamster should have about 1.5 teaspoons of pellets or blocks, or as feeding directions instruct. Two to three times a week, you can also provide a bite-sized amount of fresh fruit and vegetables for your hamster. Consider carrots, lettuce, spinach, and apples.Scatter them around the cage to let your hamster forage for them. Never feed your hamster onions, uncooked beans, chocolate, or any junk food since it can be toxic to the animal.Provide fresh water daily in an inverted bottle with a sipping tube that attaches to the cage low enough for your dwarf hamster to reach it.This will prevent your hamster from accidentally soiling his or her water supply and getting sick.  Choose a wheel with a solid outer tread plate since wired wheels can injure your hamster’s feet. When the hamster is in the wheel make sure his back is straight and that he does not have to bend his back backwards in order to fit in under the central axle as this leads to back problems.Allow your hamster to exercise in the wheel daily, but remove it from the habitat when you aren’t supervising to prevent the chance of injury.   Toys for a Roborovski hamster include tubes, tunnels, hideouts, toilet paper rolls, wooden chews (these will keep your pet's teeth trimmed, as the teeth in hamsters do not stop growing), and bridges. Avoid anything made of soft plastic that can create a choking hazard.Never use any pet store toy that has fluff or filling of any kind.Your hamster will most likely store it in his or her mouth to use it for a nest, but the fluff is harmful to a hamster’s system and can create a choking hazard. Try using toilet paper instead as this is safe for your hamster. Swap toys out of the habitat every few days. By rotating them, you can help maintain your hamster’s interest in the toys.  Roborovski hamsters are naturally curious little animals, and they relish the chance to leave their enclosures to explore what lies beyond their habitats.   An exercise ball is a fantastic way to let your hamster run all over the house without having to worry about injury or escape. Just make sure to keep the ball on the ground floor of multilevel homes to avoid dangerous tumbles down stairs. Hamster playpens are also available on the market, and these allow plenty of space to provide toys and treats. You can also use a very large storage bin as an alternative. Don't use cardboard boxes, though, because hamsters can chew holes in them and escape. Hamsters love to explore rooms, so if you decide to allow your pet to do so, remove all dangerous items and make sure the room is inescapable. Roborovski hamsters can fit through gaps as small as their skulls. Always supervise your hamster when he or she is out of the habitat. No matter what type of play area you use for your pet, fill it with toys, hiding places, and some tasty treats. You need playing areas to keep your hamster active and stimulated.  Robo hamsters also love rolling around in a container full of bathing sand. Purchase chinchilla sand (not chinchilla dust, which is very harmful). Select a long dish or bowl (preferably plastic) and fill it up before allowing your hamster to roll around in it. Roborovski hamsters enjoy a sand bath, but water will stress them out, so do not try to give your hamster a water bath., If you are going to purchase two Roborovski hamsters and keep them together, you will need two of everything (water bottles, nesting boxes, hideouts, toys, etc.). This will reduce risks of fighting. You must also avoid the use of upper levels, platforms, and extra cages connected with tubes in the habitat as it will cause territorial issues and fights.  Once a week, remove everything from the habitat and clean it using hot water. You can use a little vinegar on smelly areas, but ensure that you rinse the areas thoroughly after using it.Fill the cage with fresh bedding as you put it back together.   Don’t forget to give all of your hamster’s toys and exercise wheel a scrub as well when you clean the habitat., Once you’ve set up your hamster’s habitat, you’re ready to bring the hamster home with you. Make sure you purchase from a reputable pet store in person. Do not buy online since you want to take a good look at your hamster before purchasing. Adopting is recommended, you are giving hamsters a second chance at life.  Robo hamsters are most active at night, so you’ll get the best look at your hamster if you visit the pet store shortly before it closes. If you go during the day, the hamster will likely be sleeping., Ideally, you want a young hamster that is only four to six weeks old. An adult hamster will be between 2-2.5” long, so pick a youngster measuring less than two inches., The hamster should be round, lively, active, and alert. The eyes should be clear, ears erect, and the fur should be dry.   Don’t buy any hamster at a pet shop if one of them has wet fur around its rump. This is a sign of a disease called wet tail, and it has probably spread to the other hamsters if you see it in one. If any fur is wet at all, avoid buying hamsters from that store., A responsible shop will keep male and female hamsters separate to prevent breeding. You don’t want to bring a hamster home and end up having her give birth to a large litter a week later. Reputable shops should also guarantee the sex of their hamsters, allowing you to purchase Robo hamsters in pairs without fear of breeding.  You want to test the behavior toward people of the hamsters in the enclosure. They’ll likely all run away from your hand initially, but choose a hamster that peeks out and sniffs at your hand after the initial hiding. Hamsters displaying this behavior will be easier to handle and less scared of you later on.   Roborovski hamsters are naturally nervous and flighty, so you’ll need to give them some time before one will come out and investigate you.  Once you’ve taken all of these steps into consideration, you’re ready to pick the best candidate. Purchase the Robo hamster that displays these qualities and melts your heart.  The pet store may offer a traveling kit to help you transport your new hamster home with you. If not, be prepared to bring something from home with some bedding, a little food, and a few toys. The goal is to make the journey as stress free for the hamster as possible.   Avoid using anything made of cardboard since the hamster can chew through it and escape.  Your new hamster will be very stressed after being handled and removed from its familiar enclosure. Go straight home without making other stops and place your new pet into the already set up habitat slowly and gently.  You need to let your new hamster adapt to his or her new habitat and surroundings before you attempt to handle or tame the hamster. Keep in mind that some hamsters might need more time to adjust to their new home. You should have enough food, water, and toys in the habitat for the first few days, although you'll soon need to start changing food, water, and toys daily.   Cover the aquarium with a light cloth to allow your new pet to adjust to and explore its new habitat in privacy. This is the crucial recovery and adjustment period, so it will take longer if you disturb the hamster. If there are friends, guests, and/or children in the house, make sure they know not to go near the hamster's enclosure. You'll probably want to watch your hamster explore its new home, but Roborovski hamsters are especially nervous and will hide and become very stressed, so resist the temptation for the first few days.  During the taming process—and even after when your hamster is comfortable with you—always make sure your hamster is awake before you try to handle him or her. A sleepy hamster is disorientated and may nip if feeling grumpy or annoyed. To tame a hamster, put a treat in your hand and give it to your hamster. If it runs away, try again later. Once your hamster is comfortable after a few days of taking treats, put it in your palm this time. He/she will probably sit in your hand and eat it. When he is comfortable sitting in your hand, lift him up a few inches, and put him back down. Repeat process for the next few days, until he gets used to the feeling of lifting. Then try lifting him for longer periods of time, then higher, then out of the cage. Robo hamsters are very timid, so it might take a while to tame him. It is very difficult to tame them, so don't be surprised when taming doesn't go well. You should always wash your hands before and after reaching into the habitat or handling your hamster as well. They have poor eyesight, and smelling food on your fingers can lead to an accidental nip as well.  After several days, you can start going about the daily maintenance of your hamster’s habitat. Speak softly to alert your Roborovski hamster of your presence. Start the daily chores—removing old food, toys, and soiled bedding and placing in new food, and a bunch of new toys. Change the water from the water bottle as well.   Doing the daily chores will get your hamster used to your hand being in the habitat. Use slow and careful movements at first.  It’s typical for your new hamster to sniff your hand and then run away again. Don’t try to handle the hamster yet just because he or she will sniff your hand. Try offering treats as well, but have patience and allow the hamster to set the pace. Don’t try to force the behavior.Another option to help tame your hamster is to scoop him or her up in a shoebox or another small box that the hamster cannot escape. Place your hand flat in the box and allow the hamster to sniff at you that way.If the hamster can’t simply hide, he or she will be more likely to approach you. If your hamster runs away and hides, squeaks if you try to touch it, or rolls on its back and/or bares its teeth, then the pet is only feeling stressed, and you should try again with the taming techniques later.  Remember, all hamsters have different personalities. If your hamster is interested in you after a couple days, that’s great. If your hamster still shows no affection to you after a month of training, then your hamster may not ever develop a fondness for human interaction, and you need to respect this. You can still enjoy your hamster by watching your pet play in its playpens and/or exercise ball.  Once your hamster no longer fears you, you can bring it into a designated play area of your house. Roborovski hamsters love playtime outside of their habitats, so you'll be pleasing your pet and keeping it stimulated by letting it run around.   Supervise your hamster if it is allowed to explore a room. Your hamster should spend at least an hour or two outside of the habitat daily whether in an exercise ball, a playpen, or running around a secure space under your supervision. Always switch the toys in the play areas just as you should in its habitat.  If your hamster does start showing signs of comfort around you, then you can begin handling and playing with it. They generally have poor eyesight, so your hamster may accidentally jump from your hands at times. You should sit down, so the hamster doesn't fall from a dangerous height.   You should additionally always use two cupped hands when handling your hamster to prevent accidental falls.  Your hamster will see them as a threat and become stressed, even if it is in the safety of its habitat. The stress opens the door to illness, and this is not good. Keep other household pets away from the room in which your hamster is kept.  

purchase a suitable habitat.  place bedding into the habitat.  include a litter tray.  provide food and water.  place toys and an exercise wheel in the habitat.  consider purchasing enrichment items for outside the habitat.  buy bathing materials.  buy two of everything if you plan to buy a pair of hamsters.  clean the habitat once a week.  do not buy online.  go to the pet store in the late afternoon or early evening.  choose a young hamster.  look for signs of a healthy hamster.  make sure the pet store separates male and female hamsters.  request to put your hand in the hamster enclosure.  purchase your hamster.  obtain a small traveling kit.  bring your hamster home as quickly and safely as possible.  leave your new roborovski hamster alone for the first several days.  ensure your hamster is awake before reaching into the habitat.  acclimate your hamster to your daily habitat chores.  allow your hamster to sniff your hand while in the habitat.  respect your hamster’s individual personality.  play with your hamster.  sit down when handling your hamster.  keep your hamster away from other household pets, such as cats and dogs. 

 Cardboard or plastic; it doesn't really matter. Just as long as your hamster has a way to get to it.; , You can use the tube to trace a circle in the spot so it will be easier to cut and fit.  The other end has to find a way to be in the hamsters' cage. My hamster cage has the critter tubes that go down the side to the box. You can do something similar or different just as long as your hamster can get to it easily and without escaping. , Ok now I know this sound gross, but next time your holding your hamster and it poops, put it in the "litter box". It should realize that since all of its poos are here, that it needs to poo here. When you clean you hamsters cage and you wipe off some poo or pee, put some in the litter box.  By now your hamster should realize that in the litter box is where it should use the bathroom. 

find a suitable box you can use.  cut a hole the size of a paper towel or toilet paper tube on the side of the box.  place the tube you used to cut the hole and place it in the hole to make it fit nicely.  place some of your hamsters current bedding (some that's already in the cage) in the box so when your hamster smells it, it will recognize it.  ,  place some of your hamsters feces in the box.  wait for the hamster to use it.  finished.  

 If you want to keep more than one hamster, Syrian hamsters are not an option unless you are keeping multiple cages as they are a territorial breed and will fight over space. Dwarf hamsters, however, can be kept in the same cage given that they are all the same sex. If you choose to keep a Dwarf hamster, keep an eye on the hamsters to make sure that they are getting along well and don't have troubles with space. Remember that bigger is better when it comes to cage size.; , If you want a small hamster with beady eyes and limited color variety, a Dwarf hamster may suit you better than a Syrian hamster. However if you'd prefer a large hamster with a wider variety of colors and fur lengths, you may prefer Syrian hamsters. Dwarf hamsters tend to have fluffier fur whereas Syrian hamsters have fur more similar to a cat's. Given that Syrian hamsters are larger, it's important to account for more cage size and space if you choose this breed. Comfort for your pet should be the main focus point over any aesthetic preference.  Attention is very necessary for hamsters and the amount of energy you invest in playing with them can affect their entire nature. With lots of attention, the hamster will remember you, approach you on it's own, and be excited to be held and pet by you. In general, Dwarf hamsters tend to be more timid around humans and will remember you less well if you don't play with them everyday. Plus they tend to bite if they don't remember you. Syrian hamsters, however, tend to remember their owners more and be friendlier.  Although Dwarf hamsters are smaller and less easy to find in large rooms, Syrian hamsters are even faster and you have to keep a good eye on them when you have them out.Syrian hamsters also tend to remember what hiding spots are better as well given that their memory is better. If you aren't prepared to regularly take out your hamster and find them when they escape or run off, then a hamster isn't something you should be investing in in the first place.  Each species has its own distinct disease that it tends to be prone to. Syrian hamsters are especially prone to a disease known as wet-tail which they tend to get when they are young due to stress. It is highly uncommon in old age. This disease tends to be highly lethal and needs to be spotted within the first 24-48 hours. It's extremely rare for the hamster to acquire the illness after the first four weeks. Dwarf hamsters, however, tend to be more prone to diabetes. This means that they will need special care in their food Occasionally the hamster will be given a small dosage of insulin, however that isn't usually administered due to the fact that mistake in dosage can result in immediate death.  Despite the tendencies of the breed, handling the hamster themselves will tell you most about their nature. If the hamster is shaking or quick to bite, they're likely not a good choice as they will be a hassle to tame. If you're having trouble deciding between the two breeds, then choosing off of in-store personality may be the best option for you.  

decide how many hamsters you're looking to keep.  make a decision on what you're looking for in your hamster aesthetically.  account for how much time you will have to play with the animals.  look around for any hiding places in the area and account for how well you would be able to catch your escapees.  decide how much money you'd be willing to invest in medical care.  look at the hamsters closely when buying. 

 There should be no other animals inside the room, as they could stress the hamster. Cover any possible hiding spots in the room in case the hamster gets out of the maze.Hamster hiding spots include boxes and under furniture.; , Because hamsters like to chew through everything, it is important that you make your maze out of materials that are safe for hamsters. Because of this, it is best to avoid plastic. Here are two popular options:   Cardboard can be sourced from boxes, presentation boards, and even toilet paper rolls. It may not be very durable, but it will be the cheapest option. Make sure that it is thick and strong, or the hamster will chew holes into the walls and run away.Wood is sturdier than cardboard, but also more expensive. When buying wood, make sure that it is a hardwood, such as birch, oak, or walnut. Avoid resinous woods, such as like pine or cedar; they are toxic for hamsters. Also, make sure that the wood is smooth and free of any cracks or coarse grain; this would seriously injure your hamster.You can use wooden boards or blocks.  Hot glue would be the most suitable for cardboard while wood glue would be the best for wood. Whatever glue you buy, make sure that it is non-toxic, in case the hamster chooses to chew on it. You do not want to use nails or screws, even if you are making your maze out of wood; the sharp metal can hurt your pet.  Look for a wooden board or a sheet of wood that is about 2 feet by 2 feet (centimeters). This will be the base for your maze.   Consider covering the maze with a sheet of plastic. This will make it easier to clean things up if the hamster makes a mess. Be sure to glue or tape the edges of the plastic sheet down so that it does not slide off.  This will keep the hamster from running away in case it manages to escape the maze. You can also put the maze into a bathtub or a hamster playpen. If you are using a bathtub, however, make sure that the drain is plugged up and that the bottom of the tub is covered with a cloth or towel., You can either come up with your own on a sheet of paper, or you can use an existing one. Two great places to find ideas for mazes are on the backs of cereal boxes and coloring mats from chain restaurants; many restaurants offer paper place mats with puzzles and mazes for children to solve. Do not worry about the height of the walls yet.   Make sure that your maze has straight lines instead of curves; this will make it easier to build.  You can either enlarge it simply by drawing it bigger, or you can use a photocopier. Aim for something that is 2 feet by 2 feet (centimeters). You can either draw directly onto the base, or you can draw it on a sheet of paper and then glue the paper to the base.  It will be shaped like a rectangle. The length needs to be the same as one of the straight lines in your maze. The height should be twice the height of your hamster; this will prevent the hamster from climbing out of the maze. Repeat this process for the other walls.   If you do not have enough material to make the walls so high, you can make them the same height as the hamster, but then you will need to cover the entire maze with a sheet of wire mesh so that the hamster doesn't climb out. Consider numbering the walls. Draw a small number on the rectangle you drew, and the same number next to the matching wall in the maze. This will help you remember which wall goes where.  If you are using cardboard, you can use a box cutter or an Xacto blade. If you are using a wooden board, then you will have to use a saw.   Try cutting a few arches into the walls to make smaller doorways for the hamster. This could make it more interesting.  Draw a line of glue along one of the lines of your maze, and place the matching wall down. Wait until the glue hardens, or until the wall can stand up on its own, before moving onto the next. Be sure to add glue into the corners, where the walls join.  Leave the entrance and exit open. You can always block the entrance with a piece of wood or cardboard once the hamster is inside.  Do not keep it on a table. If the hamster somehow manages to escape, it may fall off the table and get hurt., You can leave a treat for your hamster at the end of the maze, or you can leave a treat at various points in the maze to help guide your hamster along. Not only can the treats be very rewarding for your hamster, but they can also help motivate the hamster to go through the maze. Try any of the following treats:Barley, oats, and quinoa Flaxseed Pumpkin seed, sesame seed, and sunflower seed Vegetables, such as: broccoli, carrot, celery, corn, and green beans  , This will create a tunnel for the hamster to crawl through, and make it more like an obstacle course. Make sure that you poke a few small holes into the tube so that the hamster can breath.   To attach a tube to a wall, cut a hole in the wall first, then stick the tube into the hole. Secure the tube with some hot glue.  This will make the maze easier to clean up in case the hamster soils it. The familiar flooring may also help the hamster feel more relaxed and at home.Avoid bedding that is made out of cedar or pine, as this is not safe for hamsters., You can also try using plastic bricks, but only if you know that your hamster will not chew on them. Simply arrange the bricks on your base in a maze pattern. If you want the design to be permanent, glue the blocks down using wood glue. If you do not want the maze to be permanent, do not glue them down; the hamster will not be strong enough to move the blocks aside.   Make sure that the blocks are twice as tall as your hamster. If you cannot find any blocks are that large enough, try stacking them, or covering the entire maze with a wire mesh.  The hamster will start to remember the maze, and finished it faster each time.  Because hamsters are nocturnal, you may not get very good or exciting results by putting the hamster into the maze during the daytime. Instead, try putting it in when its eyes appear bright and awake. This would most likely be in the evening, although you may be able to catch a few moments of playtime in the afternoon as well. 

make sure that the room is hamster safe before building the maze.  choose your materials.  use the right glue.  choose your base.  consider getting a large tub to put the maze in once it is built.  design the layout of your maze.  make your maze bigger so that it fits your hamster.  start drawing a wall on a sheet of cardboard or wood.  start cutting the walls out.  glue the walls down onto the maze, one at a time.  be sure to leave a path through the maze.  place the maze down on the floor or into a tub.  leave treats in the maze.  try building some of the paths out of toilet paper rolls instead.  consider covering the bottom of your maze with a thin layer of its bedding.  try building your maze out of wooden blocks.  try timing your hamster each time you let it run through the maze.  know when it is a good time to run your hamster through the maze. 

 The minimum cage size for one hamster is 360 square inches of floor space; the minimum for two is 720. It is recommended that you have cages larger than that, though. You can house two or more winter whites, as long as they are from the same litter. Make sure the cage is put where there is no direct sunlight.; , About 3 inches (7.6 cm) of bedding or more. Do not use pine or cedar bedding for your winter white. Softwood beddings such as pine and cedar have dangerous chemicals which may cause respiratory problems for your hamster.  Do not place the cage in front of a window. The hamster should not be under direct sunlight.  

get a suitable cage.  provide the cage with lots of bedding.  place the cage with care. 

 If you do, it may cause stress. Stress can sometimes kill your hamster. After 2 or 4 days, you can start talking to your hamster and start to pet it.  If that happens, leave your hamster alone for a while longer. Also, be careful when you're around your hamster and don't make any loud noises that may cause stress.  

don't do anything with your hamster for 2 - 4 days after bringing it home.  if you try to pet your winter white and it squeaks or hisses at you, this is a sign that means: 'i'm scared' or leave me alone. 

 For helping them exercise, provide them with a solid wheel in their cage. Do not use wire or mesh wheels as it can cause bumble foot. Make sure the wheel is big enough so that your hamster's back isn't arching when it runs in the wheel, as that can cause back problems. If you want to bring your hamster out of the cage, provide a hamster ball or a playpen. Don't leave your hamster out for too long, because it can get stresses.  A hamster's teeth really grow fast, especially dwarf hamsters. Provide them with chew toys such as wooden chews to help trim their teeth.  

exercise your hamster.  provide chew toys for your hamster. 

 If they look like they have overgrown, give them a chew stick or something to trim their teeth.  The proper way to bathe a hamster is with certain types of sand, preferably children's play sand. (Never use dust) Leave a dish of it in the cage for your hamster to roll around in.    Never squeeze your hamster! This will cause stress and your hamster will most likely squeak, hiss, or bite. Always handle them gently!  

make sure your winter white's teeth aren't too long.  if your hamster is dirty, never bathe it with water.  try to check when your holding your winter white that there is no infection in the eyes, tail, scent glands, or anywhere else around your hamster's body. 

 A good cage for a Syrian hamster is a cage with a minimum of 360 square inches of floor space. Never give your Syrian a cage any smaller than that because they will be severely cramped. Most pet store cages are too small; instead try a 20 gallon (75.7 L) long tank, a bin cage, or a DIY cage. Remember, a cage that is too small will lead your hamster to extreme boredom and severe stress. It doesn't matter if you see a cute cage at a pet store and think it must be okay because they're selling it there. The only exception to small cages is if you buy three or four and connect them together with tubes. Most cages at pet stores are too pricey anyways.   It's best to avoid "starter cages" or "beginner cages"; these are much too small. Instead, purchase a cage suitable for the hamster's entire lifespan at the start, as this will save you money and bring much stress-relief in the future. The 360 square inches (2322.58 square cm) of floor space does not include levels. Solely the ground floor must be 360 sq in. Levels do not count.; , Remember that safe bedding is a must. Do not use sawdust, pine, or cedar (and any other wood-based) bedding because the oils from these wood types are harmful to your hamster. Avoid cotton as well. This could clog up your hamster's intestines and kill him, and it may also catch on your hamster's legs and break them as he tries to pull free. Use shredded paper, brands like Aspen, Care Fresh, Boxo , and Katyee. These are the most commonly found in pet stores. They keep odors down, are clean and cozy.   Sawdust should be made from untreated wood. When buying it at a pet store, check that the packaging says "untreated." Do not purchase sawdust from a wood mill or carpenter, as this wood is probably treated with chemicals that can be toxic to hamsters. Cotton or string "fluffy" bedding types are extremely dangerous. These types of bedding kill thousands of pets even if the package says it's safe.The risk is that strands of bedding fiber get caught around a leg, then tighten to cut off the hamster's circulation. It will also more than likely break your hamster's fragile bones as it tries to struggle free. The leg becomes gangrenous and the hamster is too sick to withstand surgery. In some cases the hamster has to be euthanized on humane grounds.A great nesting material is toilet paper.Don't get anything with fragrances. You can shred/rip it to small pieces and place it around the cage or in the hamster house. Note that this is not a replacement for regular bedding. Avoid cedar, redwood, and pine bedding, as they contain resin dust that can irritate your hamster's respiratory system. Aspen and Care Fresh are perfectly safe and comfortable options for hamsters. You should also avoid any bedding materials coloured with inks or dyes as they may be harmful to your hamster's health if eaten.  These vary from plastic houses (great for disinfecting and cleaning) to attractive wicker nests. Wicker nests are a much more natural environment for the hamster, but difficult to clean so you will need to dispose of such a house if the hamster soils inside. A hamster house is a must-have, so don't skip over it. A hamster, in the wild, lives in a "den" or a "burrow". It spends all of its day sleeping inside there, where it feels safe and protected from any threat. It also stores its food in its house. Note that some hamsters prefer to sleep beneath their wheel, but you still need a house.   Some people use hutches made for guinea pigs and rabbits for their hamsters, but these are good if you have a pregnant female that needs lots of space and won't want to climb all over her cage.  Most pet stores offer cardboard boxes, but hamsters can chew right through them. Buy a carry-case made for Syrians. Cheap ones with lids that come right off and are easy to escape from are no good; you'll need to purchase a proper carry case from a pet shop. They will be a much more expensive option, but also the better option, as this can be re-used whenever you need and are escape-proof. Do not bring your new hamster home in its cage.   It is also useful to have a reliable carry case at home, for those times when you need to transport the hamster safely to the vet.  Wheels and accessories, like Hideaway Huts, made for Dwarf hamsters and mice are far too small for Syrian hamsters! Allow the hamster to have plenty of room to move around in, and make sure you have an 11-12 inch wheel; Wodent Wheels are best.   When buying a wheel, visualise an adult sized Syrian hamster inside. Your pet needs to be able to run on the wheel with its back straight. If the wheel is too small, the central spoke will cause the hamster to flex in the wrong direction (its back makes a "U"). If in doubt, buy the largest wheel that will fit in the cage, such as a rat-wheel. Also, make sure that your wheel isn't made of wire or mesh material, because this can cause bumblefoot., Your hamster needs quiet to avoid stressing it with loud, sudden sounds. Keep the cage is out of the full sun, and do not keep hamster cages in a room where food is prepared.  The average age is about 2 years. Let your hamster sleep as it gets older, and be prepared for vet trips, as older hamsters are prone to illness. If you have young children, and an older hamster becomes sick, take care to explain to them that the hamster is very old and may not recover, rather than get their hopes up.  Transfer the hamster from the carrier to the cage, which should be set up beforehand. Leave the hamster alone after you put it in its cage, so that it can explore its new home and become used to it.  After about 48 hours (2 days), slowly get to know how your hamster likes to be handled. Start by sitting down and talking to the hamster, in a calm, soothing voice, to get it used to your presence. When the hamster is awake and alert (so evening is the best time), try reaching in to stroke it.   Hamsters are not aggressive by nature and do not usually attack unless provoked. However, they do have poor eyesight, so if your hand smells of food they may bite a finger assuming it's something to eat. So wash your hands first. For this reason, it is a bad idea to hand feed hamsters, since they can confuse where the smell of the food is coming from and accidentally nibble your finger. One option is to place a treat in the cage, (on a spoon) and whilst the hamster is eating his treat, gently stroke him. Take it slowly, let the hamster become used to you.  Have short, non-aggressive interactions with the hamster several times a day until your pet is comfortable with you. Once the hamster accepts you stroking it, try scooping it gently into the palm of your hand. This may take a long time with aggressive females, but tame, friendly males will allow you to hold them after just a few days.   The ideal time to wait before picking up your hamster and taking it out of the cage to play is two to three weeks. To hold your hamster, slide one hand under it and cup the other round the front of its body. Ensure you are gentle. You should never start by picking your hamster up! Try holding out treats for it. If the hamster is too shy to take it from your hands, just put the treat down and wait for the hamster to take it.  Hamsters need to be fed a good variety food, as well as the occasional treat. Commercial brand hamster foods, such as Hazel Hamster (Harry Hamster in the UK), are ideal. Because hamsters are hoarders, give a small quantity that you can be reasonably confident the hamster will eat quickly and not try to stash away.   Make sure the nutritional values are: 17-22% protein, 4-6% fat, and 8-10% fiber. Some experts believe most hamster mixes are a little too low in protein to be perfectly balanced for the average Syrian hamster.It is a good idea to give your hamster the odd treat of hard boiled egg or cheese, cat food, or mealworms. Small bits of cooked chicken or scrambled egg are good sources of protein and may be given daily. If the hamster does not take any excess treats away to eat later within 24 hours time, remove any uneaten goodies., For instance, never give your hamster seeds with husks. The sharp pointed seed husks may hurt the delicate lining of the cheek pouch.Also avoid giving foods with a high moisture content (cucumber or lettuce), since these are liable to have a laxative effect on the hamster's digestive system., Make this available at all times. A sipper bottle is ideal since this doesn't get contaminated with bedding or food in the same way a bowl does. Make sure to check the water level every day, so that your hamster never gets dehydrated.   Wash the inside with a bottle brush. It may look clean, but the inside of the bottle will become coated with harmful bacteria. Use a hamster approved water bottle. Filtered water is best, but tap is fine - as long as you dechlorinate the water, either by using dechlorination liquid/tablets or by leaving the water out in the open over night.  This prevents your hamster from having to chew on its cage bars and potentially damaging his or her teeth, and it prevents the teeth from becoming overgrown. To reduce the risk of teeth overgrowing, give your hamster dog biscuits, dry whole wheat macaroni, or wood from orchard trees, such as apple, pear, plum or cherry.Provide mineral/salt blocks.  Hamster cages should be cleaned out completely every week to 2-3 weeks, depending on your hamster and needs.They should also be "spot cleaned," by removing fresh foods and cleaning toilet areas, each day, depending on the size and type of cage. To clean the cage, take the top off and empty all the dirty bedding and wood shavings and old food into a dustbin. Scrape out all the other remains. Go over the cage with a pet-made disinfectant, then dry it with tissues or kitchen roll, if preferred.   Wash out bowls and water bottle at the same time as cleaning the cage. Dust and rinse all items of the cage. Dry everything and fill the cage with fresh wood shavings, bedding, food, and water. Put all the items back in the cage and clip the top back on. A clean cage makes your Syrian hamster happy and healthy. Try giving your hamster a "hamster toilet," which is a plastic litter pan with a hood that fits snugly into the corner of the cage. Use the special hamster litter which you can purchase from pet stores, and clean the toilet every other day. Hamsters generally catch on quickly as to what the hamster toilet area is for, since instinct tells them to use one corner for toileting, and the confines of the toilet help them to feel secure.  Disinfect the cage properly and change the bedding before putting your hamster back in. While you clean the cage, you can put your pet in a hamster ball and have someone supervise it.   The hamster ball must be the right size. Most balls are only 6" wide, so most are too small for Syrian hamsters. Get a larger 10" ball at a minimum. Or, put the hamster in a pen, supervised, so it cannot escape. Cleaning the cage too often can cause stress; this does not mean do not clean your cage, rather, just clean it every other week and remember spot cleaning is your best friend.  Syrian hamsters are the most friendly and sociable of the hamster family. They should receive attention everyday, but excessive handling can actually cause stress in Syrian hamsters, which can result in bad health. Handle your hamster for 10 minutes at a time, a couple times a day, and then spend time tidying up its cage, watching it run, dig, and burrow.   Be aware your hamster will be sleepy during the day, and most likely to be active at night. So, the best time to socialize is in the evening. Keep your hamster happy with toys. You can buy toys at the pet store or make homemade ones. Never give rubber or non-digestible toys that the hamster could chew small pieces off and swallow. These are likely to cause a bowel obstruction.  Most hamsters are crepuscular, meaning they are most active at dawn and dusk. Wake up your hamster slowly to prevent scaring your little friend. Some hamsters can nip if they are woken up roughly. Allow your hamster at least 30 minutes to wake up, let it get something to eat and drink and go potty before taking it out of its cage.  Rush your hamster to the veterinarian clinic if the fur under its tail is always wet, if it shows signs of a cold, if it has lumps or bumps on its body, or it has gone off its food, water and playing times completely. In addition, you should take your hamster to the vet if it has watery eyes, has runny droppings (diarrhea), its teeth have broken, or if its claws need clipping.   Vets have got special clippers for hamster claws and know exactly how to do it. It is safer and better to leave this to the experts rather than trying it by yourself at home. Hamsters can't run on their wheels very well if they have long claws, since that hurts for them!  

buy a cage.  get bedding for the cage.  buy a "hamster house" for your hamster to stuff with nesting material so it feels safe and cozy.  buy a carry case.  buy wheels and accessories.  locate the hamster's cage in a quiet place.  be prepared for your hamster to live 2 to 3 years.  bring your syrian hamster home straight from the store without detours.  start to interact with your hamster.  give your hamster time to get used to you before attempting to pick it up.  choose appropriate foods and treats for your syrian hamster.  avoid feeding your hamster foods that are not good for it.  provide the hamster with clean, fresh drinking water.  provide chews to help file down the hamster's teeth.  keep your hamster's cage clean.  relocate the hamster while you clean its cage.  give your hamster lots of love.  take care when waking your hamster.  visit the vet when needed. 

 Dwarf hamsters are only around 4 inches long, but they like having a lot of space to run around and play. The cage should be big enough to give the hamster room to move around in addition to holding the hamster's food, water, and toys.Choose from the following housing options:   A hamster aquarium. Buy a special aquarium made for hamsters or choose one designed for fish, which will do just as well. Glass aquariums protect hamsters from cold, drafty temperatures, and they provide an excellent view of the hamster's daily activities. The aquarium should have a mesh cover on top so the hamster can't escape.A plastic hamster home. These expensive hamster cages usually have several rooms connected with plastic tubing, so the hamster can spend his days and nights running from room to room. They are hard to clean and usually way too small for hamsters. Even by connecting several critter trails (or similar cages) together your hamster will not be happy as it does not have a big running space and you can not fit a lot into these cages. Additionally, they are hard to assemble and are usually not tall enough to add big wheels or enough bedding. A wire hamster cage. Especially when your hamster is a baby, make sure that it cannot squeeze through the wires. Hamster cages make a comfortable home for hamsters. These cages are well ventilated, but you have to be careful not to put your hamster in a drafty area. The area around wire hamster cages can get a little messy, since hamsters like to dig in their bedding and pitch it through the wire. Make sure NOT to get a wire cage with a wire bottom. It can hurt your hamster's feet. However, most wire cages sold by pet stores are way too small for hamsters., The best hamster cage is the biggest you can reasonably afford. The RSPCA recommend that the minimum size of cage for a Syrian hamster should be 75cm x 40 cm x 40 cm. (29 ½ inches x 15 ¾ inches x 15 ¾ inches).; , If you have two hamsters, take measures to make them comfortable. Unlike their larger counterparts, dwarf hamsters can be social and some may enjoy being in small, same-sex groups.   If you put a male and female dwarf hamster together, expect babies in the future. Always provide two separate wheels (make sure these are not mesh or wire as they injure the hamster's foot, and that it is big enough so that they do not arch their backs.) , houses or nest areas (do not use cotton nesting material as it is deadly, toilet paper is a great option) , two water bottles, and have enough food for two hamsters. Make sure you have two of each toy as well. They can get along in the same space, but will still retain basic territorial instincts., Dry bedding is essential for the health of a dwarf hamster. It keeps moisture away from the hamster's body and provides shelter and warmth. Choose bedding made of recycled paper, wood pulp, or recycled corncobs. Also make sure you provide a lot of burrowing space for your hamster to dig in. Best would be at least 15cm of bedding in at least one area.   Make sure the bedding you use does not contain pine or cedar shavings. Pine and cedar contain phenols that are toxic to hamsters, since the fumes they produce are so strong.Some hamsters are allergic to certain types of bedding. If your bedding contains pine, cedar, or another allergen, he may start wheezing and sneezing. If you see this happen, switch the bedding to recycled paper or another hypoallergenic bedding.Never ever give your hamster cotton type bedding. It is very dangerous and can kill them. Hamsters cannot digest the cotton fibres in their digestive tract causing blockages. It also presents a choking hazard to your pets.  Set up the hamster's cage and accessories in a comfortable room. Since hamsters are nocturnal, they should be placed in a room that gets dark at night. Make sure the room is a comfortable temperature that veers toward the warm side, since your hamster can catch pneumonia if it gets too cold.Don't leave windows open in the room where the hamster lives. If you have other pets, make sure the hamster is an area where he won't be disturbed or threatened.  A clean cage will help keep your hamster healthy. Scoop out the dirty bedding every few days, and wash the entire cage once a week. In general, a medium spray bottle filled with 2 tbs of bleach or antibacterial dish soap and water will have the cleaning power to disinfect the cage without being too dangerous for your hamster. You can also use a white vinegar to clean the cage. Be sure to wipe down your hamster’s toys, dishes, and exercise wheel too.After cleaning, let the cage air dry for 10-15 minutes before you add 2 inches of new fresh bedding. 2 inches is the recommended amount. Remember that your dwarf hamster is a great burrower. If you don’t give your hamster something to burrow in, it won’t be as happy.While you are cleaning the cage, make sure you put your hamster somewhere safe, so he doesn't escape. Place him in a hamster playpen or a dry bathtub. Avoid placing the hamster in a cardboard box while he waits for you to clean his cage. Hamsters can chew through cardboard quickly.  

pick out a hamster cage.  make adjustments for more than one hamster.  buy hamster bedding.  think about cage placement.  clean the cage often. 

 While Chinese dwarf hamsters can be kept in pairs, they're not guaranteed to get along. The best chance of them getting along is if they were raised in the same litter, or introduced very young. If introduced as adults they're likely to fight.   Consult a vet before getting another hamster to see if it is a good idea for the health and well-being of your pet. If you decide to get another hamster, you may need to use a split cage to introduce the new hamster to the old one before putting them into the same cage.Do not get a male and female hamster or they may breed out of control. While baby hamsters may be cute at first, hamsters breed quickly and it is easy for a pet hamster population to get out of control. Most people would find it difficult to provide adequate housing, food, and care for dozens of hamsters.; , Since Chinese dwarf hamsters are quite small, you do not need a large cage, but you can keep them in a larger cage if you prefer. Line the cage with plenty of bedding such as timothy hay, aspen shavings, shredded paper, or pelleted bedding. Place the cage or tank out of direct sunlight and away from drafts. You don’t want your hamsters to get too hot or too cold.   Do not use pine or cedar shavings because the fumes may be harmful to your hamsters.Make sure that your hamster has plenty of bedding to dig around in. Hamsters like to burrow., For example, your hamster will enjoy an exercise wheel. Hamsters need lots of exercise to be happy, and an exercise wheel is a great way to provide them with that. Make sure that the wheel does not have any openings that may cause your hamster’s tail to get caught.   Give your hamster a nice enclosed place to sleep. Hamsters like to hide and sleep in tight, dark spaces, so place a small flower pot or a box in your hamster’s cage. Add pvc tubes to your hamster’s cage for tunneling and playing. , Hamsters like to burrow and tunnel, so cardboard tubes from toilet paper or paper towel rolls are good toys for hamsters. You can also look for special hamster toys in pets stores. You can also feed your hamster’s need to shred things by giving them paper towels and napkins now and then.Rotate toys each week so that your hamster always has different things to play with. This will help prevent your hamster from getting bored., Look for a specially formulated hamster food mix at your local pet store. Follow the package instructions for how much to give your hamster each day and serve the food in a small ceramic dish placed inside of his cage.   Limit seeds and nuts since they are high in fat and may cause your hamster to become overweight. Supplement your hamster’s diet with alfalfa pellets and fresh fruits and vegetables such as spinach, lettuce, carrots and apples. Give your hamster a large chunk to chew on rather than several small ones or your hamster may bury them in the bedding. Remove any uneaten food after your hamster has finished with it., Hamsters need to have access to clean fresh water at all times. Use an inverted water bottle with a drinking tube to provide your hamsters with plenty of water. Make sure that the water bottle’s tip does not touch or come too close to the bedding or the water may drain out.   Check the water bottle’s tip daily to make sure that it is working properly., Like all rodents, a hamster’s teeth never stop growing. Hamsters need to chew to keep their teeth from growing out of control, so make sure that you provide your hamster with a pesticide and chemical-free stick to chew on. You can also use a dog treat., Hamsters like to be awake at night, so the best time to spend time with your hamster is after the sun has gone down. For this reason, hamsters make great pets for night owls. Be aware that if you try to pick up your hamster during the day, it will be more likely to bite you., To help keep your hamster happy and healthy, you will need to keep his cage nice and clean. Once per week you should also perform a deep cleaning on your hamster’s cage. Remove everything from your hamster’s cage (including your hamster) and scrub the sides and bottom with warm, soapy water. Then rinse and dry the cage before putting in new bedding, your hamster’s accessories, and your hamster. In addition to a weekly deep clean, you should also do the following every day:   Remove and replace any soiled or damp bedding. Remove and dispose of droppings. Remove old food. Check the corners of your hamster’s cage for hidden food. Hamsters have a tendency to stash food for later., It will take some time and patience before your hamster is ready to let you hold him. Build up his trust in you by allowing him to sniff your hand and even give you a little nibble. You can also offer your hamster a treat from your hand to build up his trust in you. Once your hamster is comfortable with you, you can try to pick him up.   To pick up your hamster, gently cup both hands around him and lift him slowly out of his cage. Do not swoop in and grab him or you will startle him and cause him to hide from you., Hamsters also need time outside of their cages to be happy. Once you have established trust with your hamster, take him out of his cage once per day for a little supervised play time outside of his cage.   Make sure to keep him in a room where you can monitor his movement. Otherwise he might hide somewhere and make it difficult for you to find him. Make sure that there are no hazards in the area, such as electrical cords, that your hamster might gnaw on., A healthy hamster will be much happier than an unhealthy hamster. If a hamster is well cared for, it may live to be 1-2 years old. Take your hamster for regular check-ups with the veterinarian to make sure that he stays healthy and happy.   An unhealthy hamster may have a variety of symptoms, such as dull-looking eyes, matted fur, weight loss, shaking, runny nose and diarrhea. If your hamster is sick, take him to see a veterinarian right away. Hamsters can catch the common cold from humans. If you are sick, avoid holding your hamster until you are well again so that you don’t make him sick. 

consider getting two same sex hamsters.  keep your hamsters in a cage made for hamster or mice.  provide your hamsters with accessories that will make them happy.  provide toys for your hamster.  feed your hamster a special hamster food mix.  provide a water bottle for your hamster.  give your hamster something to chew on.  remember that hamsters are nocturnal animals.  clean your hamster’s cage regularly.  handle your hamster with care.  allow your hamster some supervised time outside of his cage each day.  get regular veterinary care for your hamster. 

 A good cage for your hamster is one that keeps him safe and is easy for you to clean. A wire hamster cage with solid flooring is generally the best choice.   The bar spacing in a wire cage should be less than one-half inch to prevent him from escaping. The wires should also be covered with a substance called PVC to prevent rusting. Make sure the cage flooring is smooth. Your dwarf hamster could get his feet stuck in wire flooring and possibly break one of his leg bones. If you have a cage with wire flooring, cover the flooring with a smooth material, such as cardboard or laminate flooring (available at a hardware store). Cages with colorful plastic tubes and tunnels are fun to look at, but can be very difficult to clean. In addition, your dwarf hamster could chew through the plastic. Clean your hamster’s cage and its components once a week with hot water.His bedding should also be replaced with each cleaning. Glass aquariums do not always circulate fresh air very well, which could lead to a high level of ammonia in the cage, which can be toxic to your hamster. Clean the aquarium regularly to prevent an ammonia buildup. Glass aquariums also lack good ventilation and may heat up rapidly if placed in direct sunlight.; , The fact that your Russian dwarf hamster is small doesn’t mean you should put him in a small cage. In fact, the larger the cage, the better. Your dwarf hamster’s cage should be at least 60 cm (24 inches) long and 40 cm (16 inches) deep.A larger cage will not get dirty as quickly. With a large cage to call home, your dwarf hamster won't be as likely to get bored or agitated. When your dwarf hamster is happy, he's less likely to develop compulsive behaviors, such as bar chewing, that are bad for him. If you have more than one dwarf hamster in the same cage, a large cage will keep them from being aggressive towards each other. If you have chosen a glass aquarium to house your dwarf hamster, it should be at least 10 gallons., Cage bedding has several benefits. It helps keep the cage clean by soaking up your hamster’s urine. Cage bedding also helps your hamster feel more at home. He'll be able to forage and burrow as much as he likes.Pine shavings would be a very comfortable bedding for your hamster.Do not use cedar bedding. Cedar oil can cause your hamster’s fuzz to fall out and his skin to crack. If his skin cracks, he can become dehydrated and very sick., Place your hamster’s cage in a comfortable room (65 to 75 °Fahrenheit/18 to 24 °Celsius) where the temperature stays constant and there are no drafts. Within the room, do not place the cage near a heat source (e.g, fireplace, window with lots of sunlight) — this could warm up the cage too much, especially if it is a glass aquarium.A room that is too cold (below 60 °Fahrenheit/15 °Celsius) could make your hamster very sluggish, possibly to the point of hibernation. Because hamsters like to play at night, your bedroom would not be a good place for your hamster’s cage. The noise of his activity could keep you from getting a good night’s sleep.  Russian dwarf hamsters eat like other hamsters.Hamster food comes in pelleted form or as seed mixes. Your dwarf hamster should eat either one tablespoon of pellets or one to two teaspoons of seed mix per day.Pellets are very healthy and give your dwarf hamster something to chew on. Chewing on pellets helps your hamster keep his teeth filed down.Be careful with feeding a seed mix to your dwarf hamster — he may pick out and eat only the tastiest seeds in the mix, causing him to miss out on important nutrients.Seed mixes tend to be high in fat.A good quality commercial hamster food should contain at least 15 to 20% protein.Read the ingredient label to see how much protein is in the food.  Your dwarf hamster needs to eat more than just pellets and seed mixes. He should also eat some fresh vegetables that add variety and vitamins to his diet.Wash the vegetables thoroughly to remove pesticides.Give him fresh vegetables daily and make sure you remove the old ones so they don't molder in the cage.   Leafy greens (spinach, Romaine lettuce) are great additions to your dwarf hamster’s diet. Other vegetables to feed your dwarf hamster include broccoli, cauliflower, and cucumbers.Add vegetables to your hamster’s diet very slowly — one small piece of vegetable once or twice a week.This will prevent him from getting diarrhea.Work up to feeding one small piece of a vegetable once a day., Protein is an important component of your dwarf hamster’s balanced diet. Good protein sources include boiled chicken or turkey,hardboiled egg whites,and canned and drained tuna.Vegetarian protein sources include tofu, flaxseed, and roasted soybeans.Add extra protein to your dwarf hamster’s diet once a week.Whichever protein source you choose, feed it to your dwarf hamster in one small piece at a time.  Whole grains (whole wheat toast, cooked rice, cooked pasta, unsweetened cereal) make great, healthy snacks for your dwarf hamster. Make sure the cooked rice or pasta is completely cooled down before feeding it to him.Crunchy toast and cereal would be good for your dwarf hamster to chew on. As with the other foods, feed the grains in small bits to your dwarf hamster.  Treats are another good way to add variety to what your dwarf hamster eats every day. Commercial hamster treats are available at your local pet store.Your pet store may carry “yogurt drops” for hamsters. These are very fattening, however, so your hamster should not eat them very often.  Russian dwarf hamsters are prone to developing diabetes,so high-sugar foods, such as fruits, should be avoided.Other high-sugar foods to avoid include corn, white bread, and white rice.   Some foods—raisins, potatoes, onions, garlic, sprouts—are toxic to dwarf hamsters and should be avoided., Your Russian dwarf hamster will need constant access to fresh water. Place a water bottle with a stem and ball bearing in your hamster’s cage, and replace the water every day.Attach the bottle to a side of his cage at a height where he can easily reach the stem with his mouth.   Do not put the water in a bowl. Your hamster would eventually turn his cage into a watery mess by drinking water from a bowl., Environmental enrichment is an important way to keep your Russian dwarf hamster mentally and physically active. The more enriched his environment, the happier and healthier he will be, and the easier it will be to tame and handle him.Examples of toys include empty toilet paper and paper towel tubes.Plastic portable tubes also make great toys for your dwarf hamster. You can purchase them at your local pet store. Keep in mind, though, that he could chew through the plastic—replace the tube when he’s chewed enough to cause damage. You can also make your own hamster toys. Examples of homemade toys include ladders, hamster houses, and obstacle courses.  When it is time to feed your dwarf hamster, hide or sprinkle some of the food morsels deep in his bedding or within another object in his cage.This will encourage him to forage like he would in the wild.   You may notice that your dwarf hamster will stash food in different areas of his cage as a snack for later., Chewing not only keeps your dwarf hamster busy, but also keeps his teeth filed down.Your dwarf hamster would love to chew on wooden cubes. To add more fun, the cubes have holes on multiple sides that he can crawl through.Your hamster could also chew on a bendable wooden toy, which is made of rounded pieces of wood that are banded together. You can also twist this toy type into different shapes to create walls, platforms, and houses that your hamster could play on or in. Give your dwarf hamster small, soft rawhide chews to chew on.Dwarf hamsters also like to chew on mineral blocks, which can last a long time. You can find chewing materials at your local pet store.  Exercise helps your dwarf hamster stay in shape and mentally alert. An exercise wheel will allow him to get plenty of exercise within his cage. Make sure the exercise wheel is solid—your dwarf hamster could get his feet stuck in wires and potentially break a leg bone.   If the exercise wheel starts to sound squeaky after a while, grease it with Vaseline where needed.An exercise ball will allow your dwarf hamster to exercise outside of his cage. Let him play in the ball for up to 30 minutes — not only will your hamster need a rest after about 30 minutes, but he may also need some fresh air. Let your dwarf hamster run in the hamster ball in different rooms, but never near a set of stairs or open water, like a pool.Plastic flying saucers are also good for your hamster.He can run on them like he runs on an exercise wheel.  Having clean hands will keep your dwarf hamster from biting you when you pick him up. If your hands smell like food, then he will essentially see your hand as food and bite it to try to get a taste.Wash your hands with unscented soap before handling your dwarf hamster., Creating a scoop with your hands will keep your dwarf hamster supported as you lift him up. In addition, by placing your hands underneath your dwarf hamster, he will probably walk onto them.Do not reach down into your dwarf hamster’s cage to pick him up. Your hand will remind him of a large bird of prey swooping down to snatch him up — he will be terrified by this.Use slow and gentle movements when putting your hands in his cage. Always speak to your dwarf hamster before putting your hands in his cage. Your voice will help keep him calm as you go to pick him up.Do not chase your dwarf hamster around his cage to get him to step onto your hands. Let him come to you instead of the other way around.  There are important differences between your dwarf hamster’s nibbling and biting when you pick him up. His nibbles are friendly and are his way of exploring your hand.Nibbles generally do not hurt.   Bites are usually not friendly. They are your dwarf hamster’s way of telling you that he is stressed, scared, or just upset that you haven’t handled him enough. Hamster bites are usually faster than a nibble and are accompanied by a sound of distress, like a squeak. Bites can be painful. Whether your dwarf hamster bites or nibbles, do not jerk your hand away. This could frighten him and make him wary of you. Gently blowing in his face and saying a firm "no" should stop the biting behavior., Russian dwarf hamsters have short memories,so your dwarf hamster may not remember that you just held him the day before. Handle him each day so that he will not become distressed or upset with not being held enough.   Dwarf hamsters enjoy being handled.Do not let your dwarf hamster fall out of your hands when you hold him.Prevent this by supporting his body and keeping him close to you when you lift him out of his cage.  

choose a cage that is safe and easy to clean.  select a large cage.  cover the cage floor with bedding.  pick a good location for your dwarf hamster’s cage.  select a commercial food for your dwarf hamster.  add fresh vegetables to your dwarf hamster’s diet.  include a protein source in your dwarf hamster’s diet.  feed your dwarf hamster grains.  incorporate treats into your dwarf hamster’s diet.  avoid feeding your dwarf hamster certain foods.  provide your dwarf hamster with fresh water.  place toys in your dwarf hamster’s cage.  hide his food.  give your dwarf hamster something to chew on.  give your dwarf hamster exercise equipment.  wash your hands.  make a scoop with your hands inside of his cage.  determine if he is nibbling or biting.  handle your dwarf hamster every day. 

 Many hamster cages come with food and water dishes, but if yours doesn't, you'll have to buy your own. Hamsters drink water through bottles with a metal dispenser. Fill the water bottle with fresh water as it runs out.Don't let the water sit in the bottle for too long. If your hamster is slow to drink, refill the bottle a few times a week, and clean the bottle every now and then. Make sure the bottle doesn't leak. Your hamster can get sick if it gets wet, which is why it takes their water through a bottle instead of an open container.  Serve your dwarf hamster food in a shallow plastic dish. This enables hamsters to access the food easily while keeping the cage clean. Hamsters like to nibble food all the time, so the food dish should be kept stocked with fresh food. Throw it out if it gets wet. Pet food stores sell a range of food for hamsters and most of it falls into the following categories:   Fortified pellets or blocks, which should be the hamster's staple diet. Seed mixtures meant for hamsters, which may be added as a supplement. Hamsters also need to eat protein like meal worms (dried or alive), crickets etc., Dwarf hamster teeth grow long and sharp. Your hamster needs something tough to chew on to keep its teeth at a comfortable length. Buy chew sticks or another tough chew toy meant for dulling hamster's teeth., In addition to pellets and seeds, hamsters enjoy treats every once in a while. Vegetables, fruits, and other fresh foods may be added to the hamster's diet in small doses. Be sure not to give your hamster too much, since you don't want him to have an upset stomach.   Hamsters can have small bits of lettuce, carrots, apples, broccoli, and tomatoes. Your dwarf hamster will also eat oats, cooked meat, and plain yogurt.Avoid giving your hamster citrus fruits or sugar, which can make a hamster ill. Peanut butter is another food to avoid feeding your hamster, as it can choke on it. 

buy your hamster a water bottle.  buy hamster food.  buy chew sticks.  give your hamster treats. 

 Your hamster will have a lot of energy and it'll like to exercise, especially at night. Provide your hamster with toys it can use with or without your help.Exercise wheels are the classic hamster toy. Make sure the wheel is stabilized at the bottom of the cage so it doesn't tip over when the hamster climbs on. Also make sure isn't a wire wheel or your hamster can hurt his feet. The wheel shouldn't be smaller than 8 inches. Otherwise your hamster will get back problems.These can also be loud, so if you are a light sleeper, put your hamster’s cage in a different room.Exercise balls are another popular choice. The hamster is placed inside a plastic ball, which rolls as the hamster runs around. Do NOT buy such a ball. The hamster is very susceptible to stress. They often panic in these balls and can hurt themself if they run into objects.  In the first few days of getting a new dwarf hamster, do not attempt to pick it up. Just put your hand in its cage and let it sniff you to get used to your scent. Don't grab or otherwise roughly handle your hamster, since it has a very fragile body. Always pick a hamster up from the bottom or else it will feel threatened. Start off by sitting on the floor and holding it near the floor. If it senses an easy escape route, it’ll be less likely to bite or squirm.Hold your hamster every day. If your dwarf hamster doesn't socialize frequently, it may stop being as friendly when you want to play. Gently lift your hamster from his cage and let him scurry around your lap at least once a day., Dwarf hamsters are very clean animals and rarely need intervention from their owners to maintain good hygiene. However, once a week you can pour some small animal sand into a bowl and allow your hamster to take a sand bath, which imitates the type of substance hamsters use to keep clean in the wild.If your hamster is very dirty, get a small brush that humans use to dye their hair roots or a toothbrush. Wet it and gently stroke your hamster with it. Dab dry with a rag. Never bathe a hamster by submerging it in water. This will cause the hamster to become very ill.  

provide toys and sources of entertainment.  hold him correctly.  help your hamster stay clean. 

; , Purchase bedding, a 3-foot long cage with lots of area space, fortified pellets or blocks, a water bottle, toys, a small house for it to sleep in, a wheel, a ball, food, sawdust, fruit sticks, honey sticks, yogurt drops, milk drops, things to bite on like wooden chews, and anti bacteria spray.  Imagine if your brother or sister feeds the hamster then you think it hasn't been fed so you feed it again. That would be 2 feedings in 1 day. Give your hamster its food and plenty of fresh water every day at the same time. Food and water must be provided at all times. Change the food and water daily.  Before you get your hamster, make sure you clean the habitat and place bedding, water, food, toys, and a small house in the aquarium.  They tend to bite out of the boxes; they are only cardboard. You'll have to bring a larger, more comfortable travel kit with some bedding, water, food, and some toys.  It will be in a bit of a panic at first. But don't bother it for the next four to five days to let it adjust to your new home. If you insist after the next day to play with it, you will stress your hamster even if it doesn't bite you. If it does bite, it is to be blamed on human disrespect and not hamster nastiness or aggression.  This will take a couple of weeks. Offering treats from your hand will help. Don't be frightened if the hamster nips at you. Sometimes they do that just to test your hand. Respect your hamster's space if it runs away, bares its teeth, and/or rolls on its back.  

first you need to write down a list of names to call your pet hamster.the names can be anything you want ex: bob, fred, hammy, daisy, lilly, honey, etc.  before you get your hamster you need to go to your local pet shop.  also the day before you get your hamster it is a good idea to make a spreadsheet like the one on the picture.  it is best to buy your hamster in the late afternoon to the evening, because hamsters tend to be more awake by then.  when you get the hamster it will come in a couple of boxes.  when you get home open the box and put the hole by the cage door and let the hamster run out.  tame your hamster slowly by letting it get used to your hand, voice, and scent. 

 You should look for a heavy ceramic food dish that they can’t tip over.You can mix things up by finding a small bowl or dish that has bright colors, a neat design, or an unusual pattern. Good places to look for these include home goods stores, thrift shops, or supermarkets. Choose a smaller bowl that can contain around 5 oz. or a couple of tablespoons of pellets. Be sure to wash it out well before giving to your hamster.   Be sure to hook a water bottle onto the cage. Your hamster will need water in addition to food.; , Buy a nylon hammock instead of a fleece or cotton one to ensure that your hamster won't chew through it. Hang the hammock in the corner of a cage. Make sure that your hamster is able to climb onto it with ease. Hammocks are actually proven to make hamsters happier, so it is a good purchase., Hamsters need a wheel for exercise. You want a wheel that has a solid, plastic bottom, not spaced rungs. Hamster feet can get stuck in the rungs! You can find wheels in many different kinds of colors these days, so shop around., Hamsters need to grind down their teeth by chewing. There are plenty of chew toys you can give your hamster to make him happy that will also make the cage look great. Walnut shells, unpainted oak or Cherrywood squares, wooden balls, and rolled oats are all great for chewing., You can buy plastic tunnels for your hamster online or at the pet store. These are sometimes known as habitrails. They snap together to create pathways between different houses, nets, or tanks. You can also create your own maze. Find many different parts, including straight pieces, curves, ramps, and nesting boxes. Snap these together, making sure that they are secure.   Many wire cages have holes where these tunnels attach. These cages are called “modular” habits.Make sure that the maze either circles back to the cage or that there is a suitable “dead end,” such as a nesting box or a separate cage.  

choose a fun food bowl.  string up a hammock.  place a plastic wheel in the cage.  sprinkle in plenty of chew toys.  design a maze with plastic tubing. 

 When you run out of toilet paper, save the paper rolls. You can also use paper towel tubes. Put these around the cage. Your hamster will use them as tunnels, and they may chew on them a little bit. You can have multiple tubes in a single cage.   Replace the tubes once they have been chewed through or if they become damp.  Gather at least four popsicle sticks. Cut two in half, and sand down the rough edges.Using non-toxic glue, attach the pieces so that they form a ladder. The cut pieces are the rungs, and the uncut pieces are the siderails. Make sure that there is a short gap between the rungs. Hamsters love to climb, and giving them ladders will help them exercise while sprucing up your cage., For this, you will need a piece of corkboard, miniature wooden dowels (about 8x40 mm in size), four wooden cylinders, and wood glue/PVC glue. Glue the cylinders onto the bottom of the corkboard for legs. Wait fifteen minutes before flipping over. Glue the dowels around the edge of the corkboard to form a fence. Leave a gap so hamsters can enter.Be sure to prop a ladder against it so hamsters can climb up to it.   Let the glue dry completely for a few hours before placing it in the hamster cage.  Clean out a tin can. Make sure that both ends are removed, and sand down the rough edges until they are smooth. There should be no jagged edges or protruding parts. String a wire or a thin chain through the can, and attach both ends to the top of the cage. The swing should hang low enough for your hamster to crawl in and out. You may leave a ladder out for your hamster.Do not use string. Your hamster may chew on the string, causing digestive problems., You want to find a pot that is small enough to fit in your cage but large enough to house your hamster. Paint this with fun colors using non-toxic paint. When it is completely dry, tip it on its side in the main part of the cage. Your hamster will fill it with bedding to sleep in.   Do not use stickers as your hamster can eat these.  

collect empty cardboard tubes.  fashion ladders out of popsicle sticks.  build your own hamster platform.  create a swing out of a tin can.  paint a flowerpot nest. 

 Before you start decorating the cage, think of a fun theme for your hamster cage. Some people decorate their cages for certain holidays. Others stick with certain colors. Think about how you want your cage to look. Some ideas are:   Space Christmas Seasons like Spring or Fall Desert  , Hamster toys come in a variety of colors and shapes. Nesting boxes can be found as igloos, animals, or cottages. There are wooden bridges, tree-shaped tunnels, and miniature castles. Find toys and accessories that fit your theme, or use what you think is cute. Remember, hamsters need plenty of hiding spaces, tunnels, climbing walls, and chew toys so you can look for several different options.  You can provide some extra scenery to the cage by printing or drawing a landscape. This should be as tall and wide as their cage. You can choose a normal woodland scene or chose something that fits your theme (stars and planets for a space theme, pine trees and snow for Christmas, etc.).   If you have a tank or aquarium cage, you can attach this with tape to the back of the tank. Place it on the outside of the tank with the picture facing into your hamster’s home. Do not put it inside the cage. If you have a wire cage, glue it onto cardboard. Prop it up behind the cage, just far enough away from the cage so that the hamster cannot chew on it.  If you have a bin, aquarium, or tank style of cage, you can draw designs or notes on the glass side with a dry erase marker. Only draw on the outside of the cage. You can erase it with a dry eraser or with a damp cloth.You can also place stickers on the glass so long as there is no chance they will peel off and fall into the hamster’s living area.  

choose a theme.  fill the cage with decorative toys and tunnels.  hang up a picture.  draw on tank walls with dry erase markers. 

 Campbell's Russian hamsters are best housed in glass aquariums or tanks.Be sure there is a top that allows air in so the hamsters don't asphyxiate   Make sure the aquarium is at least 3 feet (0.9 m). long (0.9 m) and has an ample amount of "floor area." In addition to having space to exercise and burrow, your hamster must have ample bedding, food, water, hideouts, nesting boxes, wheels, and toys. Secure the tank with a wire mesh lid to prevent escape. Avoid cages that are sold for normal-sized hamsters. The Campbell's Russian hamster may be able to squeeze through the bars. Additionally, cages marketed specifically for mice and Dwarf hamsters such as CritterTrail are often too small, so the aquarium is the best choice.; , A 3-in. layer should suffice. If you wish, you can provide up to 4 or 5 in. of bedding. There are several brands of bedding available in pet stores. Shredded paper can also be used.   Do not use pine or cedar wood shavings. Wood shavings can contain harmful oils and cause a number of health problems for your hamster. The safe kind is aspen shavings which can be used without problem.  Make sure you have:   Water bottle. Place it in a corner of the aquarium using some sort of stand. Nesting boxes. Food. Tip: To occupy your hamster, scatter the pellets or blocks around the habitat for your hamster to forage for instead of placing food in a regular hamster bowl. Toys. Provide at least some of the following: wheel, tubes, tunnels, ladders, wooden chews, sticks, hideouts, toilet paper rolls. A sufficient number of toys are essential to your pet's stimulation, health, and overall happiness. Change out the toys in the habitat frequently to keep your hamster interested. Introduce new toys and bring back old ones.  Some Campbell's Russian hamsters can be housed in pairs if introduced to one another at a young age. For two hamsters, provide two water bottles, enough food for both hamsters, two nesting boxes, and enough toys to prevent territorial disputes.  A plastic storage bin would work as well.   If you would like, you can let your hamster explore a room. Remove all dangerous items (such as electrical cords) and block escape paths (vents, airways, spaces under the doors). Make sure there are no cracks or holes in the walls. Keep toys and food in their play areas.  They should not be bought from pet stores as you will almost always end up with a hybrid, not a Campbell's Russian hamster. Responsible breeders can provide you with a specific color or coat-type, if desired.   Avoid buying hamsters online. If you are purchasing them from a pet store, go in the afternoon or early evening when they are most active. Confirm with the seller that the hamsters are separated by gender. Responsible sellers will do this to ensure that female hamsters are not pregnant at purchase. Ask your seller about the age, size, gender, and the temperaments of the hamsters. Aim for a hamster who is 4-6 weeks old (less than 3 in. long). Healthy hamsters have a round shape and are alert and active. Dry fur, clear ears, and erect ears are other indicators of health. Be wary if any hamster has wet fur around its rump -- this indicates a disease called "wet tail," which can be spread to others in a living space. If possible, place your hand inside the tank to test the hamster's temperament. Avoid buying hamsters that bite aggressively. Bring your hamster home as quickly as possible to minimize stress and confusion.  Allow it to adjust and explore its new surroundings. Cover the aquarium with a light cloth, if desired. Provide the hamster with enough food and water for this period of time.    Remove old food and spoiled bedding. Change the water, put in fresh food, and change out some toys. Acclimate your hamster to your physical presence. Begin "taming sessions" during the evening, when the hamster is most awake. Place your hand in the habitat and allow your pet to investigate. Be patient if it bites the first few times. Once your pet is comfortable with your hand in the habitat, invite your hamster to take treats out of your hand. Slowly encourage your hamster to sit on your hand, then try slowly lifting your hand up. Each step of the taming process may take a few days or a week. Let your hamster run away and explore. Never chase it around the tank. Leave it alone if it rolls on its back and bares its teeth.  Introduce it to the storage bin, the hamster playpen, and/or the safe room. Always supervise your hamster in any of these play areas to prevent escape or injuries.  Avoid cleaning the hamster cage every week. This can cause stress for your hamster. Move your hamster to a safe play area first. Soak toys in warm, soapy water. Clean the habitat with warm water and soap as well. When dry, place fresh bedding, food, water, and toys into the habitat for your pet to enjoy. Return your hamster back to the habitat. 

purchase a suitable habitat for your hamster.  place fresh, safe, and clean bedding into your hamster's living space.  have all your supplies ready and place them inside the cage/aquarium.  limit the number of hamsters you keep from 1 or 2.  obtain a playground or a playpen if you are interested in giving your hamster a space for "out-of-tank" excursions.  purchase your campbell's russian hamster.  leave your hamster alone for the first 3 to 5 days.  after 4 to 5 days, lift the light cloth from your hamster's enclosure, alert your hamster of your presence, and start the daily chores.  once you have successfully tamed your hamster in its main habitat, you can introduce it to its new play area.  clean the hamster's habitat every two to three weeks.  keep your hamster away from other household pets.  

 The diet should be comprised of rodent chow, vegetables, fruit, nuts, and seeds. Clean water and rodent chow should be available all the time. Make sure the water bottle is attached to a drinking tube.Recommended fruits and vegetables include spinach, lettuce, carrots and apples. Provide a fresh supply every 2 or 3 days. Remove uneaten food daily. Do not give your hamster chocolate, candy, uncooked beans, onions, or any kind of junk food. Clean and refill the water bottle every day. Take your hamster to the veterinarian for a yearly check up.; , Your hamster can live in a wire cage or an aquarium (10 gallon minimum) with a mesh top. Line the cage with at least 2 inches of Timothy hay, aspen shavings, or processed corn cob. The cage should also have an exercise wheel, cardboard tubes, and a piece of natural wood.Clean the cage with warm soapy water once a week and add new bedding. Remove any soiled bedding and droppings every day.  Going to a new a home is stressful. All of the new sights, sounds, and smells can be overwhelming. Let your hamster settle in for a few days before you begin the taming process.Talk to your hamster in a calm voice when you feed him. This will help him get used to the sound of your voice. Talking when you provide treats (sugarless cereal,whole wheat bread,plain popcorn, cooked pasta, scrambled egg) helps your hamster associate your voice with something that is good.  Hamsters are nocturnal animals. They sleep during the day and are active at night. If you notice that your hamster is playing, stretching, eating, or grooming, this is the best time to schedule your taming sessions.If you wake your hamster up during the day, he will be stressed and is more likely to bite you.Your taming sessions will be much more successful if you work around your hamster’s sleeping schedule.  Take a clean piece of tissue or toilet paper and leave it in your shirt for a few hours. Then place the paper in your hamster’s cage. You can also wear a sock in your shirt or waistband and then place the sock in the cage.Hamsters have a sensitive nose and a strong sense of smell. They rely on their nose to tell them about their environment.Be consistent with the scent of the items that you place in the cage. Do not try out any new laundry detergent or perfumes during this process.  When your hamster is awake, sit next to the cage and talk to him. If your hamster eats, drinks, and plays in front of you, he is comfortable with you. You can read a book or sing softly to your hamster during this time.  Devote at least 10 minutes a day to taming your hamster. If you cannot tame him every day, shoot for every other day.The more time you spend with him the better.   If you take a long break or go on vacation while you are trying to tame him, he will regress.You may have to go back to some of the earlier steps instead of picking up where you left off. Work to handle your hamster around the same time each day. This will create a routine for the two of you., Because your hamster is older, he may have never been tamed or has forgotten. It takes time to build trust and to unlearn any bad behaviors. It will take longer to tame him than it takes to tame a young hamster.The time it takes to tame your hamster will vary. It depends on the personality of the hamster and how much time you spend with him. It could take weeks or months to tame him.Most hamsters will come around if you are patient and consistent.  You should never physically punish your hamster. Do not flick him or tap his nose. If he bites or nibbles, lightly blow in his face. You can also tell him “No!” using a serious tone .   Physical punishment only creates fear. If your hamster is afraid of you, you may never be able to tame him.  Hamsters do not have a good sense of sight. If your hand smells like food, your hamster will think that your hand is food and will bite you. If your hand smells like another animal, your hamster may think he is in danger.Unscented soap is best. However, if you use a scented soap, use the same soap each time.  Place a treat in the cage and leave your hand inside the cage. Your hamster may come and investigate your hand when he comes to get the treats. Do not try to pet him at this time.   Pay attention to how your hamster responds. His behavior will let you know when you can move on to the next stage. If your hamster runs away, urinates, defecates, or flattens himself close to the floor, he is still afraid.If he is frightened, place the treat in the cage and try again when your hamster is no longer stressed. Trying to work with your hamster when he is stressed can make him sick and will make taming him more difficult.  Once your hamster is comfortable with your hand, leave the treat in your hand and wait for the hamster to come to your hand. Do not wiggle your fingers around or try.The hamster should not have to climb all the way onto your hand to get the treat. He should be able to reach the treat with his paw.  When your hamster is ready, he will begin to eat out of the palm of your hand. When he does this, use your other hand to pet his body. Only use one of your fingers when petting.Do not pet him on his head. This will aggravate him. Always allow your hamster to control the level interaction. Do not force him to come to you or eat out of your hands. He will move at his own pace.  Place your hand in the cage and allow the hamster to walk into your hand. Once he is in the palm of your hand, place your other hand on top of the hamster to create a little cave. Make sure his head is sticking out. Hold the hamster a few inches above the ground while he is still in his cage.Avoid picking him up with your hand. Always allow him to walk into your hands when he is ready.Never approach your hamster from behind. He cannot see you, and this will scare him. Your hamster may try to jump out of your hands at first. Your hamster may urinate because he is nervous. Do not drop him or get upset with him. Talk to him in a calm tone and say, “It’s ok. I know you are a little nervous.” Gently place him back in his cage and try again later.  Once you have held your hamster in his cage a few times and he seems comfortable, try to hold him outside of the cage. Pick him up using the cave method and bring the hamster to your chest. Your hamster will feel more secure next to your chest.Hold him over your lap or close to the floor in case he falls. Hamsters have delicate bonesand can suffer serious injuries due to falling.Try this in a room that does not have a lot of hiding places in case he gets away. Make sure the room is quiet with no other pets around.Remember to watch how your hamster responds. If he squeals, growls, or grinds his teeth, put him back in his cage and leave him alone., Sit with your hamster and allow him to get used to you.To set up a bathtub, plug the drain and place a blanket or towel in the tub. Put your hamster in the playpen or bathtub with you. Bring some treats and allow your hamster to explore you and the new space.   To create a playpen, sit across from another person and make a barrier with your legs. Place the hamster in the middle and allow him to move around. You can also use a kiddie pool as a playpen.  

feed a balanced diet.  house in a solid-bottom cage.  allow your hamster to get used to its environment.  observe your hamster.  place something in the cage that smells like you.  sit next to the cage.  spend time with your hamster every day.  be patient.  do not discipline your hamster.  wash your hands with unscented soap.  place a treat in the cage.  hold the treat in your hand.  let your hamster eat the treat out of your hand.  cup the hamster in the palm of your hand.  hold your hamster outside of his cage.  set up a playpen or bath tub. 

 When you get your new hamster, you’ll need to provide it with a comfortable place to live. This means you need to set up a suitable cage for your hamster. You should put down some absorbent bedding to make your hamster feel comfortable. This also allows your hamster to go to the restroom in its cage. You’ll need to spot clean the bedding daily and replace the entire thing once a week or so.Be sure to also put a water bottle for your hamster to drink out of in the cage.; , Hamsters are omnivores, which means they subsist on animal-based food as well as plant-based food. The most common thing to feed hamsters is dried hamster food pellets, but it is a good idea to supplement your hamster’s diet with small pieces of raw fruits and vegetables as a treat a couple times per week.Typically, hamsters should eat about 10 grams of dry hamster food twice each day. For a treat, consider giving them small bits of broccoli, peaches, cauliflower, or bananas. Do not give your hamster anything citrus (like lemons or oranges) or acidic (like onions) because it could cause your hamster to get an upset stomach. During the first few days after you get your hamster, be careful not to push yourself on it too quickly. This is especially important during feeding time. Just put the food in the cage and then leave the hamster alone to eat in peace. This will help your hamster feel safe around you.  You need to give your hamster some time to get used to you and to feel safe and settled in its new home. Don’t try to force any contact with your hamster for the first week or so.Sometimes this process can take a bit longer. It’s important for you to be patient in the beginning.  When you’re in the same vicinity as your hamster’s cage, try talking to your hamster in a soothing voice. You want your pet to begin to recognize your voice as this will help it learn to not fear you.You may want to come near the cage and spend a few minutes at a time (several times each day) just speaking gently to your hamster. You can even take the cage lid off after the first few days so that your hamster can hear you better. Just be careful to make sure it doesn’t escape.  Begin to feed your hamster with treats in between the cage bars or through an opening in the top of the cage, depending on what type of enclosure you have for your pet hamster. Associating you with treats will help your hamster get over being afraid of you.You can also rub the treat in your palm so the hamster can get to know your scent. Continue for a few days.  Before you try to pick up your hamster for the first time, you should wash your hands thoroughly. This will remove any scent of food that may be lingering on your hands. You don’t want your hamster to accidentally bite you.You can even wear gloves when picking up your hamster in the beginning if you are afraid of being bitten.  When your hamster is awake, slowly put your hand into the cage. Let your hamster sniff your hand. And don’t force it to do anything. If your hamster is acting scared and backing away from you, remove your hand and try again in another week or two.You can also include a couple of treats in your palm to help your hamster feel less afraid. Don't pull away when your hamster makes sudden movements at you when you are going to pet or handle it. You are only going to scare it even if it scared you.  Once you have spent some time easing into contact with your hamster, you should try to pick it up. Be sure to hold it firmly in your hand so it doesn’t fall and hurt itself. After a while, your hamster will go into your hand all by itself.Never grab your hamster, as your hamster will see that as a threat. Instead, cup your hands and let it walk into your hands on its own. If your hamster makes a squeaking noise, that means it is agitated and you should put it back in its cage. Take some more time letting your hamster get to know you before you try to pick it up again.  Your hamster may be nervous at first, but once you start to pet your hamster and talk to it, it will be calmer than before. Be sure to read your hamster’s body language – if it backs away from you or makes squeaking noises, put it back in the cage. If it seems interested in you and approaches you freely, then feel confident in continuing your course of action.You don’t want to try to force your hamster into something that will make it scared. This could be detrimental to the bond you’re trying to build with it. It may even take longer to tame the hamster in the long run if you try to rush it.  Be sure to spend plenty of quality time with your pet. The more time you spend engaging with one another, the more confident your hamster will be interacting with you. This will lead to a tame hamster before you know it. Soon, your hamster will be very tame and friendly.You should try to hold your hamster for at least a few minutes every day. Otherwise, it will be harder for it to get used to you and it will take more effort to tame your hamster.  Never forget about your hamster. Remember that you have a little furry friend who wants to play with you and interact. Give your hamster lots of love and affection (and don’t forget the treats!). This is the single most important part of taming a hamster.The more you play with your hamster, the more tame it will be.  If your hamster bites you, this usually means that they are scared or anxious. Biting is a natural response to fear for hamsters. If your hamster is biting you, give it some more time before you try to hold it. Keep talking to it and letting it smell your hand occasionally, but don’t force it into your hand for a couple more weeks. Wait until your hamster doesn’t seem nervous anymore (shown by biting, shaking, squeaking) when you put your hand in the cage.Be cautious about not waking up sleeping hamsters. This can startle them and cause them to bite. Hamsters may also bite if your hand smells like food. So be sure to wash your hands thoroughly before handling your hamster.  Since hamsters are such small creatures, you’ll need to monitor them closely for potentially dangerous health problems. While most hamsters are generally healthy, a problem can worsen quickly in a hamster’s tiny body.The biggest health problem among hamsters is diarrhea. This condition needs quick vet attention since hamsters can perish from dehydration. The telltale sign that your hamster has diarrhea is when your hamster’s rear end looks wet and brownish in color. Another common medical complication for hamsters is protrusion of the eyeball from the socket. This is usually caused by an eye infection or by some other kind of physical trauma. If your hamster’s eyes look like they are bulging, take it to the vet immediately.  Hamsters can be territorial creatures, which means that they may not like to share their cage with other animals, including other hamsters. If your hamsters are fighting among themselves, you may need to separate them permanently into different cages.At the very least, make sure there are no closed off portions of the habitat where one hamster can corner another. And try to make sure there is two of everything so they don’t fight over food and water.  

give your hamster a nice home.  feed the hamster regularly.  wait a week before trying to touch it.  help your hamster recognize your voice.  give your hamster treats.  wash your hands.  start carefully inserting your hand in the cage.  pick up your hamster.  try to make him or her feel safe.  continue interacting with your pet.  show your hamster love.  handle biting hamsters.  watch out for possible health problems.  deal with problems among pets. 

 Gently restrain your hamster by carefully holding it by her scruff behind her neck. You shouldn't apply too much tension to the skin or you could cause its eyelids to retract (and pop the eyes out of the sockets).   Set your hamster on a table or desk while you check her teeth. Holding it at a height could cause injury if she wriggles loose and falls.; , While holding your hamster, lift your hamster's lip and see how long the teeth are. There's no specific recommended length for the teeth. But, your hamster's teeth are too long if:The incisors (the front teeth) force your hamster's mouth open The lower incisors grow past the upper incisors Your hamster can't open his jaws to get around something small (like a peanut)  , While still gently restraining your hamster, lift up its lip to see whether its teeth are aligned when the jaw is closed. The tips of your hamster's incisors should meet together (the same way scissor blades do). Hamster teeth have a slight curve so they should meet point to point.If the teeth aren't aligned (known as malocclusion), your hamster's teeth will wear unevenly and can cause the teeth to become overgrown.  Although the teeth at the front of the mouth (the incisors) usually cause the most problems, your hamster's molars can develop problems too. The molars at the back of the mouth can develop sharp spurs. These spurs are long growths on the teeth that look like hooks.These are difficult to see and may require a special instrument with a light source and speculum to check them.   Spurs are painful for your hamster because they can dig into the tongue or cheek pouch. Usually, your hamster develops spurs on the molars only after having problems with the incisors.  If your hamster has problems with his teeth, it may start acting strangely about his food. For example, your hamster may move food from the food bowl, hold it in his cheek pouches, and then bury the food in the nest.You should be monitoring if your hamster is eating the food in its dish or if it's disappearing from the bowl because he's hiding it somewhere.  In addition to overgrown or misaligned teeth, you may notice your hamster drool saliva so that its chin is constantly wet. Your hamster's breath might smell bad. It might also lose weight if it is having trouble chewing her food and eating.Your hamster's coat might also look worse since it can't get nutrients from eating food.  If your hamster's incisors become severely overgrown, they can grow round and puncture your hamster's lips or the roof of his mouth. To check for infection, look for any sore on your hamster's face or any pus that's discharging near the mouth.A puncture and overgrown teeth can cause a secondary bacterial infection that is very painful, so get immediate medical attention for your hamster.  If your hamster's teeth are getting long or you suspect dental problems, take your hamster to the vet. The vet can check for other health problems and will check for dental problems. The vet will check your hamster's teeth by using a speculum and otoscope to look deep in the mouth.Since it's difficult to see into a hamster's small mouth, the vet may want to give a little anesthesia to do the examination and x-rays while your hamster sleeps.  If your hamster's teeth are overgrown, the vet may use a dental drill to file the teeth down. The vet will also file down the molars to the correct length. Your hamster may need a sedative or anesthetic during this procedure.Some veterinarians may clip or cut the teeth, but if the clippers aren't sharp enough, the tooth may fracture lengthwise down to the root, which is painful.  As a preventative or if you know your hamster is prone to dental problems and has had its teeth trimmed by the vet in the past, give your hamster orchard wood to gnaw on. Gnawing on untreated wood can help your hamster wear down his teeth so they don't get too long. Or, you could give him a hard dog biscuit which has the added benefit of giving your hamster calcium for strong bones and teeth.Types of wood that are safe to give your hamster include: elm, ash, maple, birch, apple, orange, pear, and peach. Avoid giving: cedar, plum, redwood, cherry, and oleander.  Once your hamster has had a professional filing, maintain her teeth by filing her teeth every two weeks. Carefully grasp your hamster with your thumb under her chin to immobilize her head. Gently place a diamond file rasp horizontally in her mouth so the rough surface is against the tip of the incisors. Draw the file to and fro to gently rasp down the tooth.If in doubt, only remove a small amount of tooth each time you file. Or, ask the veterinarian to show you how to file your hamster's teeth.  

restrain your hamster.  check the length of your hamster's teeth.  make sure the teeth are aligned.  check for spurs.  watch for changes in behavior.  look for physical signs of dental problems.  monitor your hamster for infection.  get your hamster examined.  have the teeth professionally trimmed.  give your hamster things to chew on.  file your hamster's teeth. 

 First, you'll need to select a cage for your hamster. Dwarf hamsters, including Russian Campbells, are notorious for chewing and nibbling.Therefore, an aquarium style cage would be better than a cage with bars. Hamsters can chew through the bars of wire cages.An aquarium cage comes with certain special considerations. As it can collect heat easily, keep the cage out of direct sunlight. Make sure you set the cage on a stable surface, out of reach of children and other pets.Hamsters enjoy climbing. They cannot climb the walls of an aquarium cage. Therefore, pick up some ladders and other climbable objects at your local pet store. This will keep your Russian Campbell occupied in his cage.; , Your hamster's cage needs to be cleaned on a regular basis. This prevents the spread or build-up of unwanted bacteria, which can lead to illness. Clean your hamster's cage once a week.   First, remove your hamster from the cage. Place him in a sealable box or pet carrier case with a few handfuls of clean bedding. You should also add some food and water, in case he gets hungry.Throw out all the old bedding, droppings, and any disposable toys made of materials like cardboard. Remove washable toys, water bottles, and food bowls. These can be washed in warm water and mild dish detergent. Wash these items, rinse thoroughly, and then set them aside to dry.Use a paper towel alongside mild soap or disinfectant. Wash the cage completely, getting the sides, corners, top, and bottom. Then, rinse completely. Remember, hamsters lick and chew so it's important to get any soap or disinfectant residue off. Dry the cage completely.Put down a fresh layer of bedding. Replace any disposable toys. Put washable toys, food bowls, and water bottles back in the cage. Your hamster's cage is now clean and you can put him back in safely., The bottom of a hamster cage should bel lined with appropriate bedding. Wood shavings are often used in hamster cages. However, pine or cedar chips can cause respiratory problems for dwarf hamsters. Make sure to avoid these types of bedding as well as unlabeled wood beddings.Aspen-based beddings or sand-based beddings are generally safe for hamsters. Before adding bedding to your hamster's cage, make sure it's free of mites and other insects. To do so, put the bedding in your freezer for 48 hours. This should kill any potential insects. Then, allow it to return to room temperature and add it to your hamster's cage.Never use cat litter, corn cob, newspaper, or scented bedding. These contain chemicals and other materials that could cause health problems for your hamster., Exercise is vital for your hamster's well being. Make sure you provide a wheel so your hamster can run. You should also provide toys. Dwarf hamsters need a lot of stimulation to be happy and healthy.   Pick a solid wheel without rungs as this lessens the chance of injury. For dwarf hamsters, you do not need a wheel bigger than 6.5 inches. If you're using an aquarium cage, you may not have a way to attach a wheel to your cage. Therefore, make sure you get a wheel that stands on its own.Tubes and hidey-holes are hamster toys sold at most pet stores. Due to their small size, dwarf hamsters tend to enjoy such toys as they can squeeze into them easily.Hamsters may also enjoy small plush toys for chewing and playing. Make sure you remove any small parts, like eyes and noses, as these might pose a choking risk. You should also check the materials used in any toy you give your hamster to make sure materials are hamster-safe.  

choose the right cage.  clean your cage regularly.  invest in quality bedding.  provide a wheel and toys. 

 They generally cost 1.00-10.00 dollars, depending on what brand, quantity, and store you buy them from. Although these fun treats look fantastic and colorful to you, they may not be as great for the hamster. They are usually just slabs of wood brushed over with a non-toxic paint.; , (Apples are the best). Cut off about a 3-4 inch section that is about 1 cm. - 1 inch thick.  Only give these in small quantities on occasion, so they can be used to keep your pet happy and healthy,  , They will gladly trim the teeth down and give you some tips.  The main safety issue to keep in mind is that you never give them anything that is not non-toxic.  

you can throw in 1-4 chew sticks/toys.  if you are looking for a more nutritious, environmentally friendly way of keeping your hamsters teeth shaved down, you can use pesticide free fruit tree branches.  you can use dog biscuits as a replacement, although they can come high in fat.  if you still have trouble keeping their teeth down take a visit to your veterinarian.  hamsters will chew on most things that are given to them, so finding the right tools should not be too hard. 

 Your hamster's diet is a major component of his care. You can purchase hamster pellets or mixes at a pet store. These should be fortified with the vitamins and minerals your hamster needs to survive. On average, dwarf hamsters only need about a tablespoon of food each day.However, discuss your hamster's diet with your vet just to be safe. If your hamster is on the bigger or smaller side, he may require more or less food.  In addition to store-bought food, you should supplement your hamster's diet with fresh food. Hamsters in general enjoy a wide variety of fresh produce, seeds, and nuts. However, there are some special considerations to take when caring for a dwarf hamster.   Be careful with fruit. In nature, dwarf hamsters come from a desert environment. Therefore, anything too watery can cause digestive problems. Do not feed your dwarf hamster too much fruit. If you want to give your hamster a treat, consider dried fruit without added sugar.Veggies and legumes are a better option than fruit when it comes to produce. You can feed your dwarf hamster spinach, asparagus, alfalfa sprouts, bean sprouts, squash, green beans, and dandelion flowers.Seeds and nuts are also great for a dwarf hamster. Pumpkin seeds, sunflower seeds, chestnuts, buckwheat, and sesame seeds can all be a great addition to your dwarf hamster's diet., There are certain foods you should avoid feeding to dwarf hamsters. They can cause health problems or carry other hazards.   Sticky and sharp foods should be avoided. Sticky foods can get stuck in a dwarf's cheek pouches. Sharp foods can puncture the mouth. If you feed your dwarf hamster anything that may have sharp edges, like walnuts or squash, examine the food beforehand. Remove any sharp bits.Certain foods can upset a dwarf hamster's stomach or cause illness. In general, do not feed your dwarf hamster processed food, salted seeds or nuts, garlic, onion, tomato, citrus fruit, almond, kidney beans, eggplant, watermelon, potato, or avocado. 

pick quality hamster food.  add fresh food.  avoid certain foods. 

 Due to their size, dwarf hamsters can easily get lost in your home. They can be very difficult to find if they escape. They are also highly susceptible to injury if stepped on or attacked by another pet. Therefore, never allow your dwarf hamster out of his cage without supervision.   Many hamster owners get what is called a hamster ball. This is a sealable plastic ball you can place your hamster in. Your hamster will be able to run around your home with the ball as protection. However, you should never leave your dwarf hamster unsupervised in a hamster ball. Hamster balls can break, allowing your hamster to escape.  A dwarf hamster will live for one to two years on average. if you want to make sure your dwarf hamster is healthy for most of his life, watch for signs of illness. Certain medical issues should be evaluated by a veterinarian.   Check your hamster's eyes and nose once a week. Hamsters are prone to colds, marked by wetness and discharge around the nose. Eye infections sometimes occur in dwarf hamsters, although they're more common in Winter Whites than Russian Campbells. It's still a good idea to occasionally check your hamster's eyes for discharge. An eye infection should be evaluated by a vet.You should also look at your hamster's bottom once in awhile. Staining, loose stools, or a wet tail can indicate diarrhea. Female hamsters may develop infections in the womb, marked by a foul odor and discharge from the area above the anus. Diarrhea and other infections require a trip to the vet.As your hamster gets older, it's not uncommon for his fur to get patchy in places. However, in a younger dwarf hamster bald spots, rashes, and scaly skin may be a sign of an allergy or a mite infestation. Take your hamster to the vet if you notice such changes.When handling your hamster, feel for any lumps and bumps. Benign cysts are common in hamsters but, in rare cases, a lump could be cancerous. New lumps should be evaluated by a vet as soon as possible., Dwarf hamsters are usually high energy. They're prone to sudden bursts of movement. They also chew, dig, and make nests frequently. Dwarf hamsters groom themselves a lot, so it's not uncommon to see a dwarf hamster licking or scratching frequently. If you notice a lack of grooming, a dip in energy, and a disinterest in chewing and digging, take your hamster to see a vet. Abnormal behavior can be the sign of a medical condition.However, there is one exception. If your dwarf hamster is on the older side, you can expect him to slow down with age. This is generally not a sign something is wrong. If your dwarf hamster is older than a year or a year and a half, it's normal for him to be less high energy., Hamsters can develop diabetes. The first sign is usually an increase in water consumption. If you suddenly notice you're filling up your hamster's water bottle more than usual, make an appointment with a vet to have your hamster checked for diabetes. 

supervise your hamster when he's out of his cage.  watch for signs of illness.  note abnormal behavior.  keep track of water consumption. 

 Overgrown teeth make it difficult for the hamster to eat. This is because the long teeth force the jaws permanently apart, the long teeth grow into the roof of the mouth or pierce the lips, or the teeth develop sharp jagged edges that make eating painful.If your hamster's food is not disappearing like it usually does, then it may not be eating due to dental problems.; , Since your hamster can store food in its pouch, don't take the disappearance of food from the bowl as absolute evidence it is eating. It is not unusual for hungry hamsters that are struggling to eat, to pack their pouches or else hide food in their bed.  If the hamster is trying to eat but having a hard time, it will probably spill food all over the place. So, if your hamster is being messier than usual, you should begin to suspect that they are having an issue.  Take a look at your hamster for signs of saliva staining around the mouth or down its chin. Long teeth can make it difficult to swallow properly. They also cause pain, which makes the hamster drool heavily.  If you suspect your hamster isn't eating, then try to determine if it is losing weight. It can be hard to assess a hamster's weight, especially with its fluffy fur, but if you think it is losing weight, that can be a symptom of dental problems.  Infected teeth can cause accesses to form in and around the mouth. This will cause the region to swell, which should look different from when your hamster packs its cheeks with food.   The area may smell badly as well, as infections, such as abscesses, tend to emit a foul odor.  It is the incisors, located at the front of the mouth, which most commonly overgrow. These can be seen with the naked eye at home. To check the incisor teeth, gently grasp the hamster's scruff so that its lips are drawn back in a "smile."However, take care when handling the hamster not to get bitten. Be aware, that being overly enthusiastic when holding a hamster's scruff can cause its eyes to pop out of the socket. So, if in doubt, have a vet or vet tech show you what to do.  The tips of the hamster incisors should meet like two chisel blades coming together. The incisors are curved but you need to make sure they grind against each other. Otherwise, they are at risk of overgrowing.   Determining if the incisors are too long can be tricky, and requires some experience. As a general rule, imagine whether your hamster is able to open its incisors wide enough to nibble on a peanut. If the gap between the tips of the incisors when its mouth is fully open is not sufficient to pick up a peanut, then the teeth are too long. Also, look for malformation. Look for teeth that are angled oddly, such as sticking out to one side. Sometimes, hamsters with really bad teeth even have teeth that are pointing straight into the roof of their mouths.  The molar teeth are more difficult to check out and you may need a trip to the vet to get these checked. However, molar problems are usually the result of problems with the incisors, so if the incisors are fine then the risk of molar overgrowth goes down (but is not eliminated altogether).Conversely the hamster with overgrown incisors is at increased risk of molar problems. Thus, if you trim the incisors and the hamster's chin remains wet, then get a vet to check the molars.<  , In addition to having dental problems because the teeth are not worn down, it is not uncommon that hamsters have a genetic tendency for their teeth to grow not in perfect alignment. This means the teeth do not meet at exactly the right place, like the blades of scissors coming together, and they do not wear down against each other.Spotting signs that your hamster's teeth are misaligned before they cause a real problem will allow you to deal with the issue before it becomes a problem. Hamsters have two types of teeth: molars located at the back of the mouth, and incisors at the front. The two sets are separated by a large gap, called the diastema. Thus, the incisors at the front of the mouth are easy to see, but the molars at the back sit deep within the cheeks and are difficult to see. In order to get a good look at a hamster's molars, the hamster is sedated and a special speculum used by a veterinarian.  A vet may use the speculum from an otoscope to peer inside the hamster's mouth and check for spurs on the crowns of the molar. This can be tricky, especially if the hamster has full pouches or has recently eaten.If your hamster is especially unwilling to be looked at, but you suspect a problem, then the veterinarian may need to sedate the animal to inspect its teeth.  Overgrown incisors can be trimmed down with nail clippers. However, it's best to have a vet or vet tech show you how to do this first. It can be tricky to hold the hamster still while clipping its teeth.Overgrown molars need to be clipped with special long handled clippers, often with the hamster sedated. This should be done in a veterinary office., Prevention is better than a cure, as it avoids the pain and discomfort of dental problems in the first place. To avoid these problems, provide your hamster with blocks of untreated wood or a dog biscuit to chew on.Giving your hamster constant access to these things can prevent tooth problems but it is not a guarantee. You still need to inspect your hamster's teeth regularly to look for problems.  

look for signs your hamster isn't eating.  don't assume food that disappears has been eaten.  pay attention to signs that your hamster is having difficulty eating or making a mess.  notice excessive drool.  look for weight loss.  inspect your hamster's head for abscesses or a foul odor.  look at the front teeth.  assess whether the front teeth are too long.  decide whether the molars need to be inspected.  inspect your hamster's front teeth for genetic dental problems.  get your hamster's molars checked by a veterinarian.  trim your hamster's teeth.  prevent dental problems. 

 Hamsters are tiny creatures, so a small brush is all you really need. You can look for one at pet supply stores. However, a soft bristle toothbrush or paintbrush, about 1 inch (2.5 cm) in size, will also work well., The fur length of hamsters can vary. Some Syrian hamsters can have very long fur, however, making it difficult to groom them with a brush. If yours has long hair, you can use a small pet comb (such as a cat flea comb) instead., Some hamsters love being brushed, others are more reluctant to be groomed in this way. It is a good idea to have some treats available when attempting to brush your hamster, especially if it is a new pet. Offering it plenty of treats before, during, and after brushing will encourage it to form positive associations with being groomed., Gently pick up your hamster and set it in your lap. Pet it and offer it treats. Do not start brushing until it seems calm., Move the brush or comb lightly down the hamster’s belly back. Always work in the direction that your pet’s fur grows in. This will make the process more comfortable for the hamster., If you encounter knots or tangles in your hamster’s fur, do not force your way through them, or tug at them. Instead, gently brush through them a little at a time until they are cleared., Brush your hamster any time it appears to have tangles or dirt in its fur. Otherwise, groom your pet about once a week. Some hamsters, especially long haired Syrians, may need brushing twice a week. This will prevent matting., If your hamster is prone to frequent matting or tangling, or refuses to be brushed, you may need to shorten its fur. Carefully use a pair of cosmetic scissors to trim its fur to about 1 inch in length. Work cautiously so that you don’t cut the hamster. If you feel anxious about trimming the fur, see a vet or professional pet groomer for help. 

purchase a brush.  buy a comb if your hamster is long-haired.  have plenty of treats available.  place your hamster in your lap.  brush your hamster’s fur.  handle tangles carefully.  groom your hamster frequently.  trim your hamster’s hair if necessary. 

 If your hamster is not tame enough to be handled, you will need to tame him before you can even think about trimming his nails.   Be patient when working with your hamster. Remember that it will take time for him to get use to you, and to being handled. If you lose your patience, it will frighten him, prolonging the process even more. If your hamster badly needs his nails trimmed, but is too wild to be handled, take him to your vet where they can use a sedative to take care of the nails. Have plenty of treats ready during the taming process, too!; , Once your hamster is tame, and doesn’t mind when you hold him in your hand, spend a few minutes each day holding him in the position you will hold him in when trimming his nails.   There is no right way to hold your hamster when trimming his nails. Find a way that is comfortable for both you and your hamster. You can try holding him upright in your hand so that his paws stick out above your fingers, or try holding him flat, so that you will be able to grasp his his paw between your fingers. Don’t hold on to his paws when first practicing this position. Get him comfortable with it before moving on to that. Give him a treat to reward him when he sits still in your hand. After practicing for a few times, you might also consider wrapping him in a small towel to keep him more contained, if you think it is necessary. If he sits very still in your hand, it may not be necessary.  Once your hamster is comfortable sitting in the nail-trimming position, spend time each day holding each of his paws between your fingers. Begin with a very gentle grasp, and when he becomes more comfortable (e.g. doesn’t try to jerk his paw out of your fingers) begin to grasp a bit more firmly. You want your grasp to be firm but gentle when you trim the nails.   Remember to reward him after each training session! Either with a treat or some time spent running around in his ball, if he has one.  Once your hamster will allow you to grasp his paws, take time to examine them carefully. It is critical that you understand where the quick is. If you trim the quick, it will bleed and be very painful for your hamster. If you do trim the quick it is unlikely he will let you trim them again.   Most hamsters have nails that are translucent, so when you look very carefully, you will see a part that is nearly clear, but closer to where his nail meets his paw, there will be a more cloudy part; this is the quick. The quick is the area where the blood supply to the nails ends., If you have never done it before, it is a good idea to have your vet do it the first time. This way, you can watch the procedure, and see how it is done, as well as how long the nails should be.Do not try to trim your hamster’s nails on your own if he is not tame enough to sit still while you hold him in your hand. Ask your vet if you can watch him trim the nails, and if he can explain the process as he goes through it so that you can do it on your own.  You will need good lighting (a small desk lamp may work well), a pair of small pet nail clippers or human nail clippers (you can also use nail scissors as well), some styptic powder to use in case you cut one of the nails too short, and treats for your hamster.Styptic powder can be found at most pet stores or online. This powder is used to stem bleeding. Hopefully, however, you won’t need to use it. You might also consider wearing gloves if you’re worried your hamster might bite you, although this should not be the case if you have spent adequate time taming him.  Don’t squeeze him too tight, but firmly enough that he is secure in your hand.You can also wrap the bottom half of your hamster in a towel to help keep him contained. This will also give your hamster a feeling of security.  With the thumb and forefinger of the hand you are using to hold the hamster, hold his paw firmly. This way, you will be able to trim the nails of that paw.  This is why it is important that you have a bright light (or that you sit in bright sunlight). Hamsters nails are usually translucent, and with brighter light you will be able to see the quick. You should absolutely not cut this! If you do, it will be painful for your hamster and the nail will bleed.   The quick is the area where the blood supply to the nails ends., Make sure that you are trimming only the nail, and not the quick! Clip the nail. Your hamster may squirm at the point if he feels frightened. Offer him a treat, if necessary.   On some days, your hamster may be too squirmy to trim more than one or two nails. If this is the case, don’t try to force him. Simply trim the nail that is the longest, and try again tomorrow., If you were successful with the first nail, and your hamster is still calm and still in your hand, proceed to the next nail. You should only continue to trim the nails for as long as your hamster will sit still.   If he gets impatient and squirmy, either take a break for a few hours or try again tomorrow.You should also try to choose a time of day where your hamster is least active. Hamsters are nocturnal animals, so they will be less active during the day.  Once you are finished with the nail trimming session, reward your hamster with a treat. Although nail trimming will not usually be a pleasant experience for either of you, if you consistently reward him with treats, he will learn to associate nail trimming with something good.  If you feel that you need some help trimming your hamster’s nails, you can have someone hold him for you while you trim. However, you should ask someone who has spent time handling your hamster rather than someone who has not. If the person who will help you has never handled your hamster, let them spend some time holding and petting your hamster for a couple of weeks before trying to trim his nails.   This may be the best option if your hamster is very squirmy every single time you try to trim his nails. It will allow the person to hold the hamster to hold on more firmly because he/she will be able to use both hands, and it will allow you to hold the paw more carefully while trimming because you will also have two hands to use.  Teach them how they should hold the hamster, and let them spend time holding your hamster in this position before attempting to trim the nails.  Once your hamster is comfortable, you can ask your friend to hold the hamster in the correct position. Make sure you are underneath a bright light so that you will be able to see the nails easily.   This will probably work best if you and your friend face each other. This way, your hamsters paws will be pointing out, directly at you. If you need to talk during the trimming, make sure you keeps your voices soft and relaxed. You may scare the hamster if you shout or talk very loudly.  If he squirms, give him time to relax before attempting to trim the nails. Once he is still, very carefully place the nail between the blades, and snip it off. Repeat this for each nail.   Again, be sure that you are not cutting the quick!  , Once you have trimmed all of the nails, have your friend either hold him more loosely so he can relax, or place him back in his cage. Give your hamster some treats to let him know he did a good job.   Don’t forget to thank your helper, too!  

tame your hamster.  practice holding your hamster in the “nail-trimming” position.  practice holding his paw between your fingers.  examine his nails carefully.  consider having your hamster’s nails trimmed by a veterinarian.  gather your supplies.  hold your hamster firmly in one hand.  hold one of your hamster’s paws.  look for the quick.  place the nail in the clipper.  continue trimming your hamster’s other nails.  reward your hamster.  ask someone for help.  show your friend how to hold the hamster.  have your friend hold the hamster.  grasp your hamsters paw in your hand.  reward your hamster. 

 Making a container of chinchilla sand available to your hamster will help keep it clean and groomed. This product is readily available at pet supply stores., A bowl made of a hamster-safe material such as terra cotta is ideal. Place enough chinchilla sand in the bowl so that it is about one-half to three-quarters full. That way, your hamster will be able to easily climb in and out of the bowl., Your hamster should be able to freely access the bowl of chinchilla sand, and it is perfectly safe to leave the bowl in its cage. Setting the bowl near the hamster’s exercise wheel can encourage it to use the sand., Many hamsters will roll around in the chinchilla sand, using it as a dust bath. This will keep their fur clean and free of greasy buildup. Some hamsters may use the sand bowl as a litterbox. Otherwise, it is fine to reuse the sand as long as it is not soiled. 

purchase chinchilla sand.  fill a bowl with chinchilla sand.  place the bowl in your hamster’s cage.  observe how your hamster uses the sand. 

 Clipping a hamster’s tiny claws can be difficult to do correctly, and in many cases it is unnecessary. Most hamsters will be able to keep their own claws trimmed naturally, just by playing and behaving normally., You can help your hamster keep its claws trimmed, however, by placing objects for it to scratch inside its cage. A bowl of chinchilla sand, like one used for sand bathing, will often do the trick. You can also try putting a clay tile in your pet’s cage. When your hamster digs or scratches, its claws will be naturally trimmed., If your hamster’s claws are unusually long, or do not seem to stay trimmed naturally, you can attempt to clip them. However, make sure that your hamster is calm before you begin, and offer it plenty of treats.Hamster claws are very small, and so you may find that a magnifying glass comes in handy. Good lighting will also make it easier to see what you are doing. You can use nail clippers to do the job. Grasp your hamster’s claw gently but firmly. Be patient and cautious, and clip only the very end of your hamster’s claw. If you try to clip off too much, you may hurt your hamster or cause it to bleed. If your hamster becomes anxious or wiggles away while you are trying to clip its claws, just let it go and try again latter. Forcing the hamster to have its nails clipped will only make it frightened, and the process will become more difficult. Trimming the longest claws first can be most effective. That way, if your hamster wiggles away, you will at least have helped some. You should not need to clip your hamster’s claws more than once a month, and perhaps even less frequently.  If you are really struggling to clip your hamster’s claws, or feel like it has a claw-related issue (unusual length, hangnails, infection, etc.), contact a vet. It is better to get help than to accidentally hurt your pet. 

remember that most hamsters do not need to have their claws trimmed.  give your hamster materials to encourage healthy claws.  clip your hamster’s claws if necessary.  see a vet if you need help. 

 Long-haired hamster may get dirt or mats in their fur that can only be removed by brushing them. The best instrument to use is a clean, unused, soft-bristled toothbrush. Some hamsters may enjoy being brushed, and will sit still for you. Others may find it very annoying and try to get away.Long-haired females may not need to be groomed as often as the males, as their normally have shorter fur.Some long-haired male hamsters have a ‘skirt’ at the end of their bodies, made of fur. This fur may need to be cleaned more often than other parts of them. You may want to get in the habit of brushing your long-haired hamster once a week.; , If you want to try something different, and if you think your hamster would appreciate it, you can buy a small rubber brush that slip onto your finger. Some are designed for pets, some are designed for humans (as tiny massage fingers). If you find one and want to use it, it would work the same as a toothbrush. Just remember to be gentle., Some long-haired male hamsters have skirts that can be a couple of inches long. These skirts may end up dragging through your hamster’s water dish or poop and getting dirty. While your hamster should be able to clean his own skirt, it may be easier to simply cut back the fur instead.This is also helpful in the warmer months if your hamster is overheating. You can cut back the length of his skirt to keep him cool. Be careful that you don’t accidentally cut your hamster’s tail, which will be shorter than the skirt.  If your hamster should get himself into trouble and get some sort of toxic substances on him, you do not want him to lick it off. Hamsters clean themselves with their tongues and mouths, which means anything they clean off their fur will be ingested. Do the following instead:If possible, use scissors to cut away any fur that contains the toxic substance. If you cannot cut off the fur (maybe, as an example, the substance is also on his skin), use a clean, unused, soft-bristled toothbrush with a very small amount of warm water. Use the toothbrush and water to clean the area until all the substance is gone. If you use water to clean you hamster, use the smallest amount possible.  One alternative to using a wet toothbrush to clean your hamster’s fur is to use a damp cloth. As with the toothbrush, use only the smallest amount of warm water you can. And if possible, try to only get the top layer of your hamster’s fur wet., It may seem tempting, but never use shampoo or soap on your hamster. If you need to clean him, use only warm water. And use as little water as possible so as not to remove any of the important oils on his fur.The only exception here is if your vet recommends something specific.  Before you hamster goes back in his cage, make sure he is completely dry. Any dampness left in your hamster’s fur can cause him to get cold, which in turn can make him sick. If you’ve used water on your hamster to help clean him up, you may want to hold him until he’s try, in order to allow you body heat to warm him up. 

brush your long-haired hamster.  buy a rubber finger-brush for your hamster.  cut your long-haired hamster’s fur.  remove toxic substances from your hamster.  use a damp cloth for clean your hamster.  avoid using anything other than water.  dry your hamster completely. 

